I kept reading through all the drawn-out, detailed story for the sole purpose of seeing how justice is dealt.  The ending is simply ridiculous because it does not match anything that the story leads up to.  This poorly thought-out ending ruined anything I did like about this book.
Terrible story.I kept telling myself it would get better.  I was so wrong.I wish I could get a refund!
I wish I had read more of the one star reviews before I wasted my money on this book.  The first part of it sounds like a teenage diary, except the female character is in her 30's. The middle started to pick up, and then started to be beyond belief.  The ending made me feel like I needed to take a shower for some reason.  It was awful, and makes me wonder about this author in several ways, none of them very good.
I don't like spoilers in reviews so won't include one here, but the ending of this book is so bad I can't believe it was ever published.  I had mixed feelings about the book -- somewhat clever, somewhat annoying -- but I stuck with it thinking the author would find a great way to wind it up.  Instead we get . . . you've got to be kidding me.
I am still angry that I wasted my time and money on this ridiculous book.  Seems like a good plot at the beginning, but soon you find yourself saying over and over again ""What?"", ""No Way!"".  Totally unbelievable.  I kept reading thinking the author must have a really clever way of wrapping up all the insanity.  There was no wrap up, there was no ending.  All the hateful characters and plot lines just stop.  In the author's acknowledgements she writes that she got stuck when the book was 82% completed, and her editor had to help her finish it.  She should have just stopped at 82%.  I wish there was a way to demand my money back after feeling totally manipulated and ripped off. Don't buy this book!
The first half was great.  It kept my interest and what you think is great character development.  Then, when it takes a huge plot turn, and you think, ahhh this is really getting interesting and original, it spirals down into a hugely depressing read.  It's two people who's lives have gone horribly wrong and both are just terrible, stupid people.  I wanted to throw my book across the room but it's a Kindle so I couldn't. I did think, ""what a huge waste of time"".  Don't bother.  It wasn't entertaining, just depressing as all get out. Shame on the author for such a let down.  It could have been wonderful if good finally won out over evil.  As it is, there is no payoff for hard money spent and hours of time I will never get back.
In reading Gone Girl, by Gillian Flynn, I was struck by several things. This book began clearly, as a whodunit, and ended as a descent into madness, for virtually all of the characters. It was uneven for this reason and didn't appear to ever get into a smooth rhythm. It was also a book of pure hate, not the least of which is a long series of characters (not all of them men) who are both obvious and subtle misogynists.The two main characters, Nick and Amy, married five years, are about to celebrate their fifth anniversary when Amy disappears. It seems, for this first part of the book, that Nick may have had something to do with it.However, at about 1/3 of the way through, we begin to see who Amy really is, and who Nick really is as well. These two are the most self-aggrandizing, vitriolic, hate-spewing people on the planet. Amy is ridiculous. Nobody, including her child-psychologist parents, seems to have any idea that she displays clear signs of sociopathy. People seem to ""hurt themselves"" around her all the time, but they just want to be her or be loved by her, or so Amy says, and her parents buy it every time. They are the few characters who aren't painted as hating women, but they certainly seem to care less for their child than the books they write about her life and make a living from.Aside from this, both Amy and Nick seem to think all women are either smart, but nasty bitches or just flat-out dumb. There was some clear indication that the author, a Midwesterner, seems to find the stereotype about New Yorkers thinking Midwesterners are dumb rubes to be true.I didn't care much for this story. It was too frustrating to read about innocent characters getting framed or hurt over and over, and the ending was absurd.I did think the concept was interesting, but the execution was unpleasant and not at all fun to read. I would not recommend this book.
The ending of this book was so full of holes it was swiss cheese!1. How could Amy get pregnant so fast with invitro insemination treatments especially at her age -- these treatments do not have such good outcomes as this; usually the first insemination does not work and sometime they never work (especially considering her age) - but, of course it works for her the very first time and on the first day of her return!!!2. These invitro insemination treatments must have the consent of the husband and cost thousands of dollars AT THE TIME OF THE PROCEDURE, neither of which Amy had;3. It would have been very easy for Desi's mother to have established Desi's whereabouts during all the time that Amy was missing and prove that Desi was not responsible for kidnapping her;4. Why didn't the two thieves show up and disprove where Amy had been -- why didn't the landlady show and up disprove where Amy had been;5. It was at 20 weeks that Amy told Nick that she was pregnant - that would have meant that she would have had to have gotten pregnant (through invitro treatment)IMMEDIATELY UPON HER RETURN in order to already know the sex of her baby, and for the invitro treatment to have worked THE FIRST TIME!!! Also, she would have been showing by that time and Nick would have known by looking at her that she was pregnant and she wouldn't have had to ""pee on a stick"" to prove it;6. Also, since she was ""being raped every day by Desi"" while she was gone, wouldn't Nick want to prove that this baby was his before giving in to her demands?
Many one star reviews are concentrated on the end of the book or lack there of.  What got me was two thirds through the book.  Detectives and FBI who are investigating a missing person have come to the conclusion that it is now a murder.  When the missing girl shows back up however, they simply shrug off accusations that the girl is the one at fault.  Nation wide media damns the husband but all investigators involved completely dismiss the wife and the murder she committed.  Her previous victims are written off because they would make bad witnesses.  Any cop who invested that much time in an investigation would have seen it through.  FBI would have followed up.  Just when you think the police interview of the girl will lead them on the right track, they walk away.  Way too many holes for anyone who has read a good book.  I was let down before the book ended, so the ending was eh, whatever.  I collect books, this was one of three I have read this week.  This is the only book I have bought in years that I don't care to keep. Such praise and high hopes and so much disappointment.  Like an old motor, took a while to warm up, finally got going, and died.
Wow.  Just finished the last page.  As obviously brilliant and insightful as the author is about the mind of men and women, SURELY she could have come up with a twist in the end to not leave you feeling like you need a shower to wash it off of you.  And I don't mean that in a good way.
Will NEVER again read another book of this LOSER author!  A total waste of my good time and smart brain!
It's a mystery to me how this book mangaged to become a runaway bestseller.  When Nick and Amy leave New York after losing their jobs they return to his small hometown in Missouri where he buys a bar with his twin sister, Go.  After two years Amy, however, isn't working nor has she made friends.  No surprise here.  Both characters are profane, self-indulgent and just plain silly.  One day a neighbor calls Nick at The Bar and tells him his cat is outside the house and the front door is open.  Nick rushes home to find Amy GONE.  Who cares?  I was more concerned about the cat.  Nick doesn't bother to feed the kitty or call Amy' parents.  People call this a page turner? I kept turning pages and skipping paragraphs to  find out how bad the ending was. I knew the conclusion  was lame going in but I didn't know a runaway bestseller could be this bad from the start.  Run readers run from this turkey.
Having read Dark Places, I was really looking forward to Gone Girl Gone. What can I say...I hated it. This novel represents everything I loathe in the crime genre - increasingly unbelievable plot turns, unforgivably cliched characters (Tanner Bolt, really??), unlikely motivations and actions, a heavy reliance on convenient coincidence...need I go on? This is a far less accomplished piece of writing than Dark Places and I cannot recommend it. There is nothing new, clever or compelling here, fellow readers. One star, at best.
There are plenty of reviews discussing what the book is about, so I will skip that..  I had read way over half of this book when I started emailing friends it was one of the best books I read in a long time and recommended they buy it immediately.I just finished the book a few minutes ago and all I can say is: ""Really that is how you wrapped up the ending?"". It was awful.  I would not have cared if it was a happy or sad ending, but this ending made me now hate the book.Now I am emailing everyone to tell them NOT to buy this book.  Honestly I can't imagine what she was thinking.  I had planned to buy her previous two books but not now.
1. Started well.2. Got worse3. Unlikable characters4. Mystery readers like to have all information and try to figure out the plot.  Did not happen in this book.5, Ends poorly.6. Unsatisfying
I'm sorry.  I apologize in advance to those who adore this book and admire the author's cleverness and facility with ""playing"" the reader.  YOU MAY LIKE IT.  THAT IS OK.  We can agree to disagree. If you read this review, you are doing it because you want to hear what I really think and not just the gushings of the author's friends and of people who totally buy into the book, right?  Right.SPOILER ALERT.Now, I love a good unreliable narrator, a text that takes you for a spin and you suddenly realize, hey, the narrator is either not understanding what's going on HIMSELF or is presenting only the details he or she wants to present for readers to see him in a good light.  You sort of have a double-understanding in texts like that.  They are tough to do and very much fun when done right.But this is not what I consider a good novel with an unreliable narrator.  If you want an unreliable narrator to take you on a ride, read Philip K. Dick's mainstream novel Confessions of a Crap Artist.  This is just . . . I don't know, the author doing obvious maniupulation and lieing to us.  I don't mind being ""played"" as a reader if the payoff is ""Of course!"" the way it often is in these twisty little passages of novels, but this just made me feel I was playing in a mudbox and I wanted to wipe it off my hands.The first third of the book makes you sympathize with this poor little woman who writes the diary, but then you realize what a lying conniver she is.  Slowly you see that you have been almost 100% lied to, not just misled or teased, but tricked.  I do not think it is playing fair with the reader.  It becomes so obvious what a psychopath she is, and I don't like the husband, either, because he cheats and seems as shallow as a cookiesheet full of stagnant water.  I guess the ending serves them both right, but I just couldn't stomach the thing.  I did not drink the Kool-Aid.  Yuck!  I feel as if I wasted time that I could have spent watching re-runs of the Big Bang Theory.  You see, those characters are flawed and do things that could be seen as mean or crooked, but you LOVE tham and you understand them and want them to be happy. I just wanted both of these idiots to fall into the abyss.  Buh-bye, idiots!Here I have been LIED TO the whole first half of the book and then the plot basically falls apart, because if she did all this setting stuff up and then it turns out she's not dead and she reappears, then who did all this setting up to make it look as if he killed her?  Is that not an offense that she would be arrested for after all the publicity about her being killed and such?!  They aren't going to pursue charges at all?  And now I am supposed to feel all OK about how clever it was and how it justifies whatever?  There is not enough NO in the world.I read fiction to make sense of the world, not to be jerked around and fed bull-corn.  I read fiction in order to have a vicarious experience that I enjoy.  That's why I don't read stuff with excessive gore, explicit endless hump-hump-hump sex, or ""inside the mind of a serial killer"" because I do not WANT to be in there.  I want to be in a fun rollercoaster ride that delivers what it promises.  This did not.  If you want to read a caper novel where you actually DO root for the criminals--read Donald E. Westlake Grandmaster, any of his books, especially the Dortmunder series.  Those books will not leave you feeling ripped off (maybe avoid THE AXE because justice is not done there either and it might make you mad, but the others are great rides.)  I just can't recommend that you waste your money and time on this particular book, as clever as the author was for the first part of the book.  And there weren't a bunch of typos and messed-up sentences the way you see in lots of indie pubs now.  That's the highest praise I can give it, I suppose.Sorry to be a downer.  Next time I'm only going to review books I adore and we won't have to go through all of this,.  Not recommended.Again, I'm sorry it didnt turn out better for all of our sakes.
If I could give this book a no stars or how about minus five stars, then I would be satisfied. Why I read the book: silly me, I happened to see the movie trailer with cute Ben Affleck and the movie piqued my interest, the movie looks good. The book, is a perfect example of wasted minds and what parts of our society are turning into.Sadly, I have ""experienced"" the psychopathy of Amy characters in real life and who do maddeningly enough somehow get away with murder.I once wandered into an online writers group, interestingly enough based in Missouri, and Illinois and the East Coast, whose sole purpose was to reel in a lonely person, fake friend them, then steal that persons writing and mind break them by writing Limericks using their writing, poems and chats. Then all the other writers on the website jump on the ""thread"" and write how they sure ""got"" that poor sucker, and literally fifty people go on to rip that poor lonely newbie to shreds. And that's apparently entertainment. Entertainment to set up Limericks meant to cause treasure hunts of nonsense and the very real kind of danger where peoples lives are destroyed, they have nervous breakdowns and kill themselves. Oh, but it was all in the name of fun.These characters are sick, twisted and ugly.There are weird and bizarre references, such as ripping on Ray Bradbury, who is an exceptionally skilled writer. ""The Martian Chronicles"", and ""Something Wicked This Way Comes"", are lauded among the Sci-Fi community. I used to teach both of those and students loved him.The ending does not make any plausible sense whatsoever.Margot is the only okay person in the whole bunch. And the detective, that is it. If the economy is failing, why are the bars and bowling alley still going strong? Wouldn't Amy have any need for stitches or medical treatment? She is just invincible? Subhuman?Who enjoys this kind of madness?Give me anything else, even a bad romance (or Ray Bradbury), and I'll give it five stars over this.I can't figure out why everyone loves this book. It is the epitome of shallowness. I agree with some of the other one star reviews especially the one about needing to scrub the yuck off after the ending.
Book should be called 'Gone Money Gone Time.' Because after purchasing the book and reading it, all you want to do is hit your head with it wishing you could go back in time and purchase a book actually worth reading. Unoriginal, cliched-ridden, flat static characters and scene upon unbelievable scene. One of the worst novels I've read this year.Between Twilight, 50 Shades of Grey and this book, I fear the death of literature is upon us.
I really wanted to like this book, but the ending was just terrible! The entire book was just unbelievable to me. However, it was suspenseful, which is about the only nice thing I can say about this book.
What to say about this manipulative, facile piece of... well, you get the idea. Selected for my book group, I will now think twice before bestowing credit on the bestseller list, upon which this book resides.Making an escapade with a true sociopath does have its charms, I'm sure, but this book doesn't. I don't know who I liked less, the husband or the wife. If you can't care about either character, you've made a hapless journey with both. The ending, in which the husband crumples like a cheap suit, is the most disappointing finale for a trashy novel that I have ever read. Reading it did have one good outcome: I ran straight back into the brilliant arms of George Eliot and ""Middlemarch,"" where I belong.
******Sort of Semi-Spoilerish*****************This book was so awful that I have broken the ""never comment on books"" rule.  Usually I let people feel things out for themselves.  I have loved a lot of books that most people would skip right over.  Where do I even begin with this book?  It got huge reviews and I'm thinking I need a great mystery I can carry with me to and from the beach. I didn't think I was getting into anything deep but wanted something to keep my attention. The first part of the book had me somewhat interested.  I admit that I felt strongly that I knew where this was headed and was not really surprised at the ""twist.  What I was surprised at were the characters this author has created.  I have never been more offended by Amy and Nick.  I truly didn't want to see either triumph in the end.  The stereotypical marriage and how the author sees men vs. women was too much.  To all the men out there I must say, Women have more than two sides.  Most of us are neither the cheerleader, doormat, football loving chicks so you will like us or the vindictive, psychotic, clingy mess that will make your life not worth living.  There is no lesson in this book, there is no path leading us to the answer of ""oh ok this is why you made the characters that way"".  It was just life sucks and people are crazy.  I'm so offended by every single character that I could hardly look past that to the dialog.  And oh the dialog, just awful.  There were so many avenues and places the author could have taken us, not even crazy turns, just logical twists that would have made this book so much more.  It felt like halfway through the author just got bored and decided to torture us.
Not all books I read have to be literary genius, but I typically avoid complete trash.  I missed the mark with this one.  The first 50% were tedious with repeated facts and limited plot progress.  The second half turned into a nonsensical plot line with poorly developed characters that frankly, we not likable enough to care about anyway.  If I hadnt been stuck on a long international flight, I likely would have dropped the book.  But I persevered to possibly the worst ending of a book I have read in years.  I honestly wouldn't waist my time with this book.  Its a light beach read AT BEST, but even then you can do a lot better.  Avoid.
Let me start by saying that I love mysteries and have probably read a few hundred of them over the years. With all the praise for Gone Girl, and its best-seller status, I had high hopes for this book. I actually hated it. I don't understand how it became, or stays, a best seller.  I found the story contrived, the characters extremely unlikable, and the writing amateurish. In addition, I found factual and grammatical errors, which leads me to think the author was careless, or worse. I am sorry that I can't be in any way positive about this book, but it was an unpleasant waste of time and money for me.  Perhaps I started with the worst first, but even if that is the case,  I certainly won't read another of her books.
Oy vey.  Oy vey, what a novel.  SPOILERS READ ONLY IF YOU WISH TO COMMISERATE ABOUT THE TRAGIC AWFULNESS OF THIS BOOK I always hate when the bad guy at the end of a crime story--whether it be in a film or a book, will spill to the hero--AT LENGTH, how and why he committed his crime, because this is only done for the audience; it's obscenely CONTRIVED.  Girl With The Dragon Tattoo comes to mind as another example.  And Flynn just goes on and on and ON with Amy explaining how she did it and why and it becomes more and more ridiculous the more Amy ""explains"".  This book was laughable after a while, luckily I borrowed my copy from a friend.  And the bizarre revenge scheme seemed to be too much, right?  Very much like the film SIDE EFFECTS with Rooney Mara--there wasn't enough cause to do what she did--in my opinion, way, way too excessive, elaborate, unrealistic.I'm sorry, I can't resist, I will now commence with random criticisms of the ABSURDITIES of this novel, for those of you who enjoyed it, forgive me:1. Amy doesn't know how much milk costs?  Really.  So she's been saving money for a year, prior to framing her husband.  To be so driven, she must have been frugal during that year of planning, to save as much money as possible, one of the ways to do that is at the food store, no? I bought expensive boots once and the way I did it, was by denying myself all of my favorites at the food store--ladies, you know, how much can be saved when you cut back to purchase a decadent item, you know how driven you are.  So Flynn's maintaining that Amy just blindly walks through food stores throwing things into her cart, never knowing the final tally, never ever ever EVER looking at the receipt even out of curiosity? 'Kay.  Oh and the very first time she's heard about expensive milk is at her hideaway, so Mo never discussed the prices at the food store?  Or anyone else that Amy was in contact with--over the span of her entire life? And she has credit cards in his name--rack up even greater debt then and pocket some of the money from the credit cards--DUH, so that when you leave, you can live in luxury--for a long time, for like EVER.  You see, a sociopath would be very concerned about living WELL, because they regard themselves as superior, she would travel somewhere exotic, because the sociopath's main concern is self.2. And her initial plan to begin with was to kill herself to complete her framing of her husband?  WHAT????--that plan is, considering her sociopathic character, really, thoroughly, unbelievably far-fetched, oh and then she changes her mind and decides not to kill herself--whatever. I, I, I have no words, this is such a juvenile move by the author that I barely know what to say.  Flynn takes her character and starts pounding it mercilessly to force it into a shape to fit her convoluted storyline.3.  And why let your husband even suspect you're alive, that you did it, that you are trying to frame and punish him?  It doesn't make sense--it doesn't make any sense at all, just leave.  And if you're that bent on having him suffer, you would not alter your opinion just by watching him in interviews and you would certainly not allow him any shred of the truth, this is explained in the novel as Amy playing with Nick, ""allowing"" him to know.4. And she gave around 700,000 to the parents whom she supposedly detests SO much--I doubt that would have really occurred, given her supposed desire to look out only for herself.  She would have refused them the money, being possessed of a horror of poverty and middle class life, I'm certain, and she would have refused to lend her husband the remaining amount to start a bar--none of this makes any sense at all. NO SENSE EMPLOYED HERE.  Had she really been such a devious Amy she would never have married Nick in the first place, to tell you the truth, the whole novel is based on a sublimely false premise, because in reality, being as gorgeous as described, she would've used her assets; her beauty, wealth, and intelligence, in order to marry well and have a very successful career, and gain as much popularity and authority as utterly possible.  If you read about the psychopaths, sociopaths, narcissists among us, they strive to attain success, they are your politicians, members of the high positions of corporations, the military, etc--they want power and money and respect, they are conniving, and they pretend very convincingly to appear warm and human, but they are NOT.  They have been described as emotional shells, they're the person in the room who, while everyone is bereft over an event, they sit pretending to be--the sociopath perceives him or herself as the center of the universe--literally! they have no sympathy and they no empathy, they are selfishness incarnate.  Amy would have married a wealthy man, a lap dog, no? She speaks of love for Nick?  No.  She would seek someone wealthy whom she could possibly control--a Dupe, for she would be concerned not with love if she's ACTUALLY  a sociopath  as they are incapable, she would be concerned with wealth, position, authority, she would never have married a Nick kind of guy--this is the most ludicrous part of the book--I cite Twain here, the character must act as he or she has been described, not forced into a mold that the author wants them to be.  The film BLACK WIDOW has a more accurate view of a cunning female sociopath, there is no feeling there, they only love themselves!!5. And, uh.. as for the Nick character: why not get rid of the incriminating evidence in the shed? You know your wife is framing you, she's stupidly offered a way to destroy what is set up to frame you, why not take advantage?  Explain this to me in a way that makes sense.6. Oh and she utilizes another woman's urine to obtain a positive pregnancy result by proffering lemonade and saving her urine in the toilet (sigh) Yup, right, I want to live in the Universe where this is a possibility.  And she can then convince a doctor to NOT do a blood test to determine pregnancy, she really has that kind of pull in the medical field, huh?  Hey doc uh, I fear blood and needles, let me instruct you on how to do your job.  Perfect!!  If I;m not mistaken a doctor will also use a sonogram, and a blood test and a urine test right?????  And a pelvic exam, I mean, come on!!!!!!!!  Why not add insult to injury Flynn, because you have Amy discussing her evil machinations, ""I saved pee and I contrived to avoid a blood test, tee hee!"" Go all the way, really, leave reality behind and have Amy say in the book ""Then I used Noelle's pelvic region and I drugged her and took a blood sample and...""This book is a fun read only for those who wish to make fun of it, very much like watching Food Network Star or any kind of Bravo reality show--it's a story meant only for humorous critiquing--that's all.  Yes, it kind of holds your interest, with ploys and information being injected at intervals, but once you started thinking about it, it's like the movie SPEED, you watch, you have fun and then you really PAUSE, mid-reading to contemplate the massive holes.  Because I can see her writing this, trying to reason out why the characters are behaving as they are and then using her own reasonings for the characters--it's so unsubtle because of her recurring departure from reality.  Ever read Dostoyevsky? CRIME AND PUNISHMENT?  He spent practically the entire novel explaining the motive for murder and the killer's reaction to his act--and it is...brutally realistic, severely incisive. I'd read FBI profiler John Douglas' books on murderers prior to reading CRIME AND PUNISHMENT,  and I read C AND P with my jaw dropping--a cliché yes, But Dostoyevsky accurately portrayed so many of the psychological characteristics observed in murderers--it's stunning work.  Here's sound advice: rent Flynn from the library, and download Dostoyevsky for free on Project Gutenberg.  Sorry for the length of the review!!!!!!!
The writers style is condescending which explains why the characters are so unlikeable.  The book was boring and I had to put it down.  I was reading for a book group but I will have to tell the group, I could not even force myself to read this.  I know it has good reviews which makes me doubt all the hike surrounding a book like this.
DAY 1:Absolutely can not wait to begin reading Gone Girl! Enthusiastic praise from friends, family AND it was on the New York Times best seller list for years!Day 1, two hours:Some interesting clues, the literary device of inserting diary entries is acceptable, but I wouldn't want to read books using this technique on a regular basis.Day 2, three hours:I've already guessed the husband's secret and am 99% certain I know how this will all end.Day 3,  one hour, ten minutes:Increasing lower tolerance for plot, characters, dialogue.Day 3, four hours, fifteen minutes:Finally, I am finished with this dreary tome. Eight hours, twenty-five minutes of my life I'll never get back.A QUIZ!!!a .Should Amy really have done herself in?b. Should the husband have strangled her?c. Why do some people, myself included, feel compelled to finish a book with no redeeming value?d. Which is the greater flaw, writing such a disappointing book or reading it?DAY 9!I KNOW THE REASON THE ENDING WAS SO UNSATISFACTORY!!!!!!I am absolutely certain that I have discovered the reason the story ended so abruptly and in such an unsatisfactory manner!!!!Follow along with my line of reasoning: Best seller, movie rights - ""soon to be a major motion picture"" with a major star.Can you say SEQUEL??I would bet my copy of the book, if I hadn't already gotten rid of it, that the author is already cranking out the next volume - follow the money.What could the title be? Gone Husband? Gone Baby?We haven't seen the last of these worthless, annoying characters.NoNoNoNoNoNoNo.
The book started out fine and at least kept you reading. Then it seemed like the author just copped out. To say it was disappointing is an understatement. Waste of time and $.
A lot of opinions about this book. Why? It epically fails the 40 page rule. Dreadful self-absorbed cardboard 'characters'(that's being very charitable) described very woodenly- with not a whiff of charm or style (or discernible skill). Good god people have a lot of time on their hands to wallow through this muck. How do you stay wake? The beginning was appalling- offering absolutely no incentive  to recommend continuing. Who could get to the supposedly dreadful end? Life is much too short.We are trapped in an era of ineptly produced fiction that, like reality television and 'vampire' movies/tv shows and America's Got Talent! and Katy Perry, that carries the implicit message-you're doing just fine. yes you're totally miserable but look-you're not nearly as bad off as these geeks. And that's what they want you to think. They're just amazed it was that easy to lull everyone to sleep.If you don't demand better quality you'll never see/read/hear it. Toodles!
I will keep it simple.  This was one of the worst books I have ever read.  If I bought a hard copy of the book instead of a kindle copy, I would have returned it after the first chapter.  But since I was stuck with it, I read it. I realize that we all have different tastes and interests of course.  And I respect that others may have enjoyed it.  But to me, this book was poorly written.  And there was absolutely nothing likable about either of the main characters.  I would not recommend this book at all.  I did not enjoy any part of it. Like the characters, the book was inane and insane.
This book is an ugly story about two ugly ""beautiful"" people who torture and manipulate each other, as well as many others in their lives.  It was the first time, in a very long time, that I considered abandoning a mystery about halfway through the book.  Character development is what usually grabs me in a novel, but these two shallow characters had no redeeming qualities that would make you want to root for either one.  I'll admit that I finished the book, just to see which character would ""win,"" but they are both ""losers""--deservedly so!  This was the first book by Gillian Flynn that I've read, but it will also be the last.
There are plenty of reviews summing up the main plot points, even a few spoilers, so I won't take the time to add any further plot details.First: the writing. Mediocre at best. All the ""psychological insights"" are right out of an Oprah/Dr. Phil show. There is nothing deep about this book, other than the deep pile of dung that you have to wade through to get to the end.The book is divided into three parts. The First Part of this book starts off interestingly enough, grabs you and pulls you in. However, about half-way through the first part it seemed rather obvious what was going to happen. From the moment Nick got home, to find his wife missing, I knew what the ""surprise"" was going to be.The ""surprise"" at the start of the second part was only surprising because I figured the ""surprise"" would come closer to the end.By the time The Third Part arrived, I skimmed through the pages, just wanting to end the painfulness that is this book. Believe me, this was a page turner, and not in a good way. I almost gave up (and, in retrospect wish I had).There is nothing redeeming about this book. It's about love gone very wrong, and people who are not very likable. Maybe Nick's sister Go is ok, and one of the detectives is ok. But, really, the hate in this book is so powerful that it suffocates you. And, while many people have complained about the bad language, I didn't seem to notice, as I was too busy trying to find something, anything to like about the book.And then there is the ending. I feel cheated. I read the book all the way to the final page (skimming most of the last hundred or so pages), AND THAT WAS IT? Really? I mean, what the heck? It's flat and unsatisfying.  If my copy of this book had been an actutal, physical copy, I'd have taken great pleasure in throwing it in the trash. Actually, I would have taken great pleasure in burning it.  Alas, I have a digital copy, so the only satisfaction is deleting it -- which is small consolation because I'm still out the $$.There are lots of reviews, across the spectrum, for this book. Many 5-star reviews, and, as of this writing, over 3,200 1 and 2 star reviews. That's a lot of bad reviews. Most books don't get that many.  There are certainly more positive reviews. I think it is fair to say that you'll either really like the book, or really hate it. Personally, I can't understand all the good reviews, and I'm guessing that all the people who love this book can't imagine why I dislike it so much.Since I can't say who will like this, or who won't like it, all I can say is: find a cheap copy, that way if you hate it as much as I did, you'll only be out a few bucks.Speaking of bad language, I certainly had several bad words to say when I reached the end. I have read some bad books, but this one is the worst book I think I've read. The only good thing I can say about this book is that I finished it, then deleted it from my library because I can't imagine ever wading through the dungheap of this book again.
This book is dark in ways that make you question the author's character and ethics.  Mystery stories are supposed to deal with evil by showing evil manifested, having society confront the evil,  and then restoring moral order by the resolution of the mystery.  That restoration of moral order makes the existence of evil bearable.  This story shows a sociopath bringing her spouse ""down"" to her level of sociopathy and shows a society incapable of restoring moral order.  The sociopath's actions are at first directed at creating a misuse of society's need for justice by framing her spouse.  Instead, she manages to create another monster - her husband - because he now becomes sociopathic to defend himself against her.  Then she embarks they on creating yet a potentially third monster - her child.  A child conceived not from love or even from a sexual act - but from a desire to manipulate.  The book is depressing and demoralizing because it postulates a world where there is no justice and there is no successful societal mechanism to remedy injustice.The popularity of this novel is frightening - because its underlying message is so negative.
I read this book because of the ratings and was very disappointed.  The entire premise is ridiculous. It failed to create any feeling of concern for the characters.  It was a waste of money then time.
I had three separate people (whose opinions I value) in the course of two days tell me I absolutely HAD to get this book.  How could I resist?  The book started out interesting enough, but I kept wondering when it was going to start to live up to the recommendations.  By the time I was half way through the book, I realized there wasn't a single character I liked or was rooting for.  At the end of the book, the only character I wanted to see more of was the misogynistic abusive old man.  To be fair, the writing itself is very well done, but the story left me cold.
This was selected by my book discussion group.  I would never have finished it, except for that obligation.  I felt slimy when I had finished it. Ugh! It is ugly and badly written. What is more, the characters are not in the least interesting. How dreadful that the novel should have deteriorated so badly. Jacqueline Susan did a better job than this Ms. Flynn. This is the worst book I have read in YEARS. I'm sorry I bought it on Kindle and won't have the satisfaction of throwing it in the trash. I'm a Psych professional - the science is bad -- sloppy -- ; the lawyer in my group pointed out that the legal & police procedural material is bad.
I hope I never meet any people with the many warped ideas of marriage and how married people think as most of the people in this book seemed to think.  In all my 76 years I have NEVER meet such mean people that apparently thought they were normal!!This was a waste of time and money for me!!!!
This book has shown up on a lot of the ""must read"" lists for summer 2012.  I was excited to read what was described as a clever mystery.  Don't waste your time.  I am beginning to wonder whether the definition of clever has been dumbed down.  This is not an intelligent read.  The characters are not well developed.  I could say that I didn't care for them but I'm not sure I was really given a chance to know them.  And, the ending is ridiculous.  What are the publishers thinking?  Contrary to the New York Times review, there is no evidence of a quicksilver mind in this book.  I am craving a truly well written mystery that doesn't pander to the general public's desire for simplicity.  Gone Girl is not that type of book.
I was stunned by how bad this book was considering how popular it was. The two main characters are really twisted. As I kept reading, the book got worse. Don't know why I even finished it, probably because I was hoping for the book to get better. The ending was so totally stupid. Save your money and time by not getting this book.
Maybe it was creative, maybe it represents something about the darker nature of humanity.  Thank goodness no one I know.  I didn't find it very compelling, just repellant.  Skipped over huge amounts to read the ending. Also a disappointment.
I can't understand why everyone loves this book. It took me about half the book for me to figure out what was bothering me, I just didn't care about the characters. None of them. Sterotypical cops, slimy lawyer, unrealistic Amy and Nick.
I am so confused as to why people liked this book? The ending was awful. I just felt like the characters at the end of the book you could of cared less about it. I just wanted the book to be over!
This is a TERRIBLE book. When you read a book like this you have to go do something good to try and remove the YUCK wrapped around your head in an attempt to remove it."" Simple and pure. When I finish a book and it leaves lingering feelings of I now have to climb out of muck there is something horrible wrong. Why spend time reading such negative disgusting garbage. Ask yourself the question, ""Do I want to read something that is powerfully positive or powerfully negative."" If it is negative you want this is the book for you. You could read this and watch the recent shootings at the same time for an extra dose of feel good. After I started reading and figured out the agenda (emotional spiral downward)  of the book I skimmed it then discarded it.
It was predictable.  After reading 3/4 of this novel, I quit reading.  I think it is the first book that I've ever started reading  and just said ""enough"" before the ending. The  author used too much foul language that I felt was not necessary to the story line.  I understand the use of such language is required to give the reader a better sense of a character's thoughts and feelings, but this was overdone.  Another thing about this book is that I kept sensing that the anger and hatred was from the author and not the character. I couldn't move away from that feeling.
I don't even know where to begin with this one. Do I start with the withering setup, or do I start with that ""plot"" twist, which we all saw coming a mile away, that opens the second part of the book? Lots of negative reviews have focused on the ending of the novel, which I never got through, so I can't comment on it, in all honesty. What I can comment on is my experience of reading half of this lame-brain book, which had such promise. See, there's something to liking at least one of the characters and there's also something to trusting that the narrative we're reading is honest and truthful. In The Church of Dead Girls, by Stephen Dobyns, the narrator, halfway through the book, confesses that he's...(I won't spoil it for you, because it's a totally great read). Here, because we actually ""like"" the narrator, we sympathize with him; we can feel his pain. This deepens our understanding of the other characters around him as well. It's a beautiful touch, a light touch, rather than what we get throughout Gone Girl, which is so heavy-handed and nonsensical that more than once I thought, Pulp it and use it as toilet paper. Because in so many ways that's what Flynn is doing to her readers--she's using us as her toilet. Look, reader, she seems to be saying, I can tell you whatever I want and deliver it to you however I want and you're going to buy it and I'm going to keep pooping it out and I'm going to use your sensibilities against you. What do I mean by sensibilities? I mean that if you give me a book that purports to be a mystery, then halfway through decide that it's actually not a mystery at all and something more akin to ""The War of The Roses"" (you remember that film, right?), then I'm going to call you out on it and I'm going to say that you've hijacked me and I'm going to say that you've cheated and I will cry foul. FOUL.This novel is nothing more than aggrieved screed against marriage, which is fine, but it's far from original and it's far from being a good read.
This book is ""unforgettable"" but in a bad way. I will always remember struggling to get through this book because 1. It's the most I've paid for a Kindle book and 2. From all the positive reviews it should have been a book I loved.I've tried to think of at least one positive thing I can say and believe about this book. I thought of one...only one positive remark and that is this Author can write. The story, as it slowly evolved, was convoluted and complicated and would take a talented writer to do what she did. What I disliked the most was there are very few likable characters within this story and the characters I could have liked were not fully developed.I agree with the reviewers who basically think the ending was a mess. It was! I too felt the Author ran out of speed and was unsure of how to end the mess she created. I read 2-3 books a week. This book took me almost two weeks to finish. I hate that I wasted 2 weeks of my life in the belief that it had to get better and realizing after reading the final page that it didn't get better...it only got worse. It makes me sad that I have to write a bad review. I wish I could come up with one redeeming reason to read this book...I can't.
I don't know what it is about me and ""blockbuster"" books-but this one failed to grab me ( I was one of only a few in my circle not to get into the 50 shades, twilight and Harry Potter ones either!). I just didn't get it-I didn't care about the characters at all and struggled to finish the book. If asked to sum it up in one word-meh!
This book was predictable, dumb, and read like a Lifetime movie. It started off good. I thought it was going to be an exciting read. Nope. Not even close. Only one person in my book club liked it. No idea why people rate it so high. The writing is decent but the characters are not. You have been warned.
I was initially amazed by this book and recommending to everyone I could. SPOILERS FOLLOW.... like everyone else, I felt so much sympathy for Amy in the first part of the book, and within a chapter I wanted to run her over with a truck. The ending was the most disappointing conclusion of a novel that I have ever read, and after I finished the book I felt almost physically filthy, and wanted to wash all memory of the book from my mind. Save your money, because if you buy this book or even get it from a library, you will feel cheated. Maybe some will like the book as I at first did... but I found that it had so much promise, all of which was killed in the ending's lack of justice.
I absolutely enjoyed this book to the point that I was going to tell all my friendsthat they had to read it or they would miss the ""book of the year"". While reading it,I was sure that Oprah would have endorsed it as a book of the month, or whatever herbook club called it!! What a let down. Can anyone explain how a book which enthralledreaders could end in such a disappointing fashion? Am I the only person who felt thatthey had wasted their time reading this book?
Can't give Gone Girl more than 1star.  In the beginning, I liked the main character(s), and thought the author's diary technique unique.  This became tiresome after awhile, though, because neither character had a unique tag or pattern.The author telegraphed too many of her ""twists"" and the story quickly unraveled.  (Spoiler ahead). Worse, after Amy was revealed to be a straight-up sociopath, I found it impossible to identify with her or any of the characters.  I didn't "" like"" anyone in the story, and there was no one to root for.  Just a collection of selfish jerks.
It will leave you feeling icky. The characters are phony and the plot is ultimately silly. I kept thinking it was just glib, but now I think its also inane.
Ordered this book And the book I received was paper back and was the movie cover which is not what I wanted nor was it the book described in the details. Disappoint. Price was awesome but not what I wanted.
This book was such a waste of time and money. I hoped the plot would get better, but no....it kept getting worse!Just read the synopsis on Wikipedia or some spoiler website and call it a day.
Wow, seriously?! I'd actually like my money back. I don't think I've ever said that about any book...EVER! At first I kind of liked the book, then in the middle I didn't want to put it down...then it turned into such an over worked, unbelievable mess. It became a chore to finish. I just wanted to finish what I started and hoped it would get better, but I kept finding myself saying ""Come on, you're kidding me right?!!""  I didn't like any characters, and the story line was too much. No way anybody could be that conniving and have that much forethought. Now the ending, are you kidding me?!  Right in the middle of a thought the book ends. I actually thought my Kindle was missing pages. I kept checking. Several times. Then I realized that was actually the end. It wasn't even finished! I am actually pissed. What a waste of my time. I really can't believe this is a best seller. And going to be a movie!!! Spare yourself the frustration and don't bother...
Not having ever read a book by Gillian Flynn before I came to ""Gone Girl"" with no idea of what to expect except it was supposed to be a very good mystery by a very good writer. All I can say is that disappointment doesn't quite make it as a description of what was written on the pages.There is barely a plot - and it is, in the end unresolved, the characters are wooden, the dialogue is terrible - people just don't talk like that, and the interior dialogue is even more pathetic. I have read bad books  before, but never one hyped this much that was this bad. Clearly Gillian Flynn must know someone in the publishing industry because otherwise I don't see the manuscript getting by a first reader, never mind being accepted and given such a huge budget for promotion. I guess the word that describes it best is ""pathetic."" Thank-fully I didn't spend any money on it, but borrowed it from the library. Whew!
Imagine spending several hours with two unlikable people with very few if any redeeming qualities--it's in this book. Add to this every stereotype you have ever heard about New Yorkers versus those bumpkins that live in the Mid West--it's in this book.  Toss in a whole lot of misogynistic ramblings with every female pretty much being a psycho, controlling bitch and the men helpless momma's boy patsies--it's in this book. Play out every cliche about bumbling incompetent cops and the brilliant, non mistake making criminal--it's in this book. And have it all culminate in one of the worse most unsatisfying endings--it's in this book.  If that's your idea of a good time, then maybe you'd love this book.  While this is not the worse thing I've read, it certainly felt like a complete waste of time by the time I got to the end.
I am so angry right now! All the time I wasted on this book just because of its critical acclaim. It might have been somewhat more tolerable if the two main characters in this book had only destroyed each other. But no... the destruction had to be intergenerational with absolutely no peace for anyone after all the dust had settled. Horrible book, horrible ending, and horrible experience!
So many pros:  Excellent plot, clever, witty, creative, kept me guessing and thinking, great writing, all the makings of a fantastic read-  Until the end.  To say I was disappointed and frustrated would be an understatement.  I was so freaking mad, so much so that I regretted reading it altogether.  It was like building anticipation for a vacation or fun day destination, hearing everyday how exciting and fun it's going to be and then when you finally arrive you find that it is the worst and most boring place you have ever visited. I was simply amazed that such a talented writer with such a great story was not able to provide an equally exciting ending...SO disappointed.  :(A few things throughout that I kept thinking that would happen never did and that was a huge let down.  I don't want to mention specifically what I am talking about because I don't want to give anything away, but because of my ""detective"" like personality and logical thinking, there were things in the book that the detectives could have done (or investigated) to prove the guilty person's guilt and none were ever mentioned or considered by the police department or the antagonist.  These were smart characters and none of them thought of any of the things that I thought of (one in particular) that I would have done to prove the truth-  and it most certainly could have been done, or at least been attempted, but wasn't.  I was surprised that the detective that Ms. Flynn worked with to get accurate information never thought of these things that I did.With that said, still, if the ending would have been as good as the rest of the book I would have given it at least 3-4 stars. Because of the terrible ending I am sad to say that I convinced my daughter not to read it.  Tragic.To those that don't like the ""F"" word, it is used repetitively.  This did not influence my rating at all, but I just wanted to mention it as a courteous warning for those that are concerned about language.  :)
I was enticed by the story in the beginning, enjoying the 2 points of view, but quickly came to be annoyed and appalled by the pointless actions of these hopelessly dislikable characters.  I don't understand what all the fuss about this book is. So much promise, so little to show for but unnecessary misery on part of the reader.  I usually don't continue reading a book I don't enjoy but for some unknown reason kept going, maybe in hope of an amazing end.  After all, there were so many outstanding reviews... Nevertheless, it turned out to be a real waste of time and money.
I thought this book was awful and wished I could have the time back I spent reading it.  I don't even know why I bothered to finish except I think I get hoping it would get better and I would end up liking it.  I find the fact that they are making it into a movie ridicules and will not waste any more time or money on this.
I really wish I could return this book. It was really not that entertaining, was predictable and a very weak ending.I suppose there were parts I was entertained as I did finish it. But was not at all impressed.
About a third of the way through the book, I recommended it to a friend as not just a murder (or not-murder) mystery, but a fascinating exploration of the breakdown of a marriage as told from the radically different points of view of two flawed but believable human beings.  At about the halfway point, I learned that I would have to take back that recommendation completely -- it's actually a much more conventional, cliched exploration of the kind of character that only exists in murder mystery novels.  And the ending is unbelievably unsatisfying, the kind that makes you say, ""That's it???  You're kidding!"" as you put down the book in disgust.Obviously a lot of people really enjoyed this book.  If you are a big fan of the conventional mystery genre and its usual villains, you may really enjoy it too.  But if not -- if you think it's going to be a nuanced exploration of real people in a real marriage -- you will be very disappointed.
This book was highly publicized.  So, I felt compelled to see what all the hype was about. Unfortunately, I did not read any reviews prior to my purchase.  Started out a little slow but then built up to a suspenseful, ""can't put it down"" kind of  story with some very interesting twists. I was really enjoying myself and even advised my family & friends they may like to read it also.  Unfortunately, as it became closer and closer to the end,  my interest began to swiftly spiral downward. And, at the end of the book, I was so dismayed that I just wanted to scream and throw it across the room.  Absolutely one of the most massively disappointing book endings I've ever read. I will never purchase another book from this author as I do not ever want to feel this screwed (as in ""to deprive of or cheat out of something due or expected"") again. Couldn't call and warn my family and friends fast enough.
Awful book. The only people I know who liked it were mid 30 year olds. Writing, story, everything about it was horrible. Can't imagine what the movie will be like.
Felt completely ripped off! I could not believe the book ended the way it did! It felt like the author just gave up or hit a literary wall. Completely disgusted!
I kept plugging along because others told me you get to a point in the book with plot twists and it gets better.  I struggled.  I hated the characters - ALL of them.  I hated the writing style - it was so boring with pages and pages of long descriptive paragraphs (reading her diary? ugh!)  I would not recommend to anyone.
I was excited to get Gone Girl because it has been pretty highly ranked lately. When I first started the book, I wasn't convinced it was something I would love; I didn't find the writing to be very engaging, believable, or well-done. As you keep reading the book, though, you could get the impression that this approach is purposeful, I suppose, because of one of the plot twists. For that reason, and because there was a good bit of suspense even early on in the novel, I did keep reading it. Ultimately, I even read to the very last page, increasingly cursing myself for having gotten myself too far in to quit now. I'll admit, there are numerous plot-twists and surprises that kept me going back to the book. I kept hoping that many of the traits that I so disliked about the novel, and the writing, would be revealed to be elements of the plot themselves, even. Retrospectively, though, I've got little to recommend in this book. You may read to the end, but it won't be a satisfying, fully-realized reading, and, if you are anything like me, you'll wish you had used that time for something else.Overall, here are my complaints with this book:1. The ending was terrible. It was a mishmash of cheap plot tricks, unlikely scenarios, and even more unlikely (and unlikable) character decisions. Yes, all the loose ends were tied up, but at what cost?2. The characters were ridiculous. There was not a single character that wasn't contrived from a number of stereotypical flat representations we've seen a million times (usually these flat characters are reserved for minor roles; not in this text).3. The plot never seemed very well thought-out. Frequently, when one problem got too big for the author to handle, there was a conveniently planned revelation that, no, the main character had already predicted this approach, and, two years earlier, had concocted a plan B, or C, or D, that itself was even more ludicrous than the original plot wrinkle had been.4. The writing wasn't particularly good. Sometimes, even poorly constructed plots could be saved by really stellar, awe-inspiring prose. Not in this novel.Good luck!
I just finished Gone Girl and am left shaking my head. Although the foundation of the story could have been interesting, the writing was so tedious and, I'm sorry, childish, that the idea got lost. I don't understand the rave reviews, and I don't understand how it has topped book charts for so long.Maybe this is what modern writing has become. Flynn may be an author, but she is not a writer. There is nothing unusual in her word choice. There is nothing compelling about her pacing. Most authors who are not real writers are at least good storytellers, like John Grisham. Flynn is neither.If you want to understand writing, REAL writing, read Pat Conroy's ""My Reading Life"". He talks about the great writers who influenced him and very specifically why. He has notebooks of interesting words, turns of phrases, ideas. Then he masterfully, like an artist with words, creates vivid writing that absolutely leaps off the page. That is what writing should be.If writing like Flynn's becomes the standard, count me out.
This book was bad in so many ways.  I, like other readers, cannot figure out how it was on the best seller list..at all.  The ending notwithstanding, other features of the book were more annoying and distracted from the plot.  The writing is very sophomoric, although I did like the double entries from each main character.  I felt like I was reading a book written by a fifteen year old boy, with a thesaurus in one hand and Penthouse magazine in the other. The verbiage was poor.  I read through the first half quickly, then, upon discovering that Amy was a sociopath and self absorbed ""nut bag "" I did a speed read through the rest of the book.  A friend of mine wanted my take on the book, so I felt I needed to finish it. I seriously doubt I will read any more of Gillian Flynn's books.  I wasted precious reading time.That being said, I think I might want to see the move.  Just to see if the movie script follows the horrible written script, or if they will allow the characters to speak like intelligent adults instead of high school boys in gym class.
Shame on Flynn and all of the reviewers who falsely praised this disappointing waster of my time. After a slow start, I found myself completely sucked in to the story—especially after reaching part two. With descriptions like, ""Terrifying"" and ""You will not be able to figure out the end at all..."", I couldn't wait to find out what happened. So I buckled down, stayed up until 1:30am to finish it and then felt like throwing the book against the wall.With each turn of the page I kept thinking, ""When's Amy going to make a her fatal mistake and what's it going to be?""Then I got to the last page and NOTHING. How I could I be so stupid.For those of you who haven't read it yet—don't. If you choose not to listen to my advice, feel free to come back here after you're finished and leave a reply. To save you time, you can simply copy and paste the following:  Tom, I'm sorry. I should have listened to you.::SPOILER ALERT::If anyone still wants to read it because of all of the hype, I can sum up the entire novel in 5 sentences and save you time and money:""Man comes home to find house a mess and wife gone. Clues and an affair lead you to believe that he is guilty. Woman is a sociopath who faked her disappearance by creating evidence to frame her husband for murder. While in hiding, she makes a terrible mistake, kills a man and crafts another lie so that she can return home. Woman gets pregnant, the two become codependent and live miserably ever after.""  THE END
This book came so highly recommended by folks that often exchange books back and forth with me - but I found this book just awful!  I finished it just so I would know the ending but oh how I wished I had never started it.  :(
NOTE: SpoilersFor me, the problem with this book was that the main characters were never really likable. From the first page to the last, I could care less what happened to either of them. In the end I wanted Nick to deal Amy the emotional blow she deserved but other than that, I found them both selfish and egotistical.Amy starts out as a supposed sweet girl who comes off as wanted to be a good wife, until we find out that for years she's been preparing to frame her husband for her own murder. The diary thing, pretending to love him, pretending to be BFF's with the neighbor (Which they never discuss after she returns home - are they still friendly?), pretending to be sickened by blood... all this in preparation to turn the tables on the man she feels is wronging her. The entire thing felt impossible and unrealistic. Once she takes off, she has $10K in cash which dwindles quickly. What was she expecting to do with that money anyway? We're expected to believe she thinks this is a suitable amount to start over somewhere else? Spoiled rich kid or not - she's got to know that's nothing.Nick is so unemotional, I found him boring. Finding out he had a mistress was shocking and yet, not surprising. He's an arrogant guy who had his ego checked when he got laid off from his job and had to move home to help his family. Plus, it's clear he's unhappy in his marriage. Once he figures out he's being played, he finally embraces an emotion: anger, and that's when I thought this book might turn around. How wrong I was!In the end I expected to read that Nick found a way to turn the tables on this woman, learn his lesson and move on. Instead it's like the author couldn't figure out how to end it and just shrugged. We hate Amy and want to see her get what's coming to her and yet, it never happens. He's terrified of his own wife, a murderer and sociopath, and yet stays with her.I love my Kindle but I really wanted to chuck it at the wall when I was finished with this book.
This is by far one of the worse books I've read in a long time.  The characters were totally unbelievable.  I was never convinced of the reality of the action throughout the entire book.  The characters were unlikeable and the behavior of all of them was completely unrealistic.  From the husband  to the wife to her parents and all the other characters - I could not fathom why they behaved as they did.  You couldn't possibly believe the wife was dead, you couldn't possibly believe the husband's reactions were even remotely reasonable, you couldn't possibly believe the parents blew away all their money and then so nonchalantly ask the wife for her trust fund money.  I could go on and on.  Nonsensical story!  Can't believe people thought the book had any validity.  It had to be the shock factor that numbed readers brains because the actions just didn't add up. Any man who would even consider allowing this insane person to be the mother of his child isn't too tightly wrapped himself.  A shocker, but so far-fetched it wasn't worth the time it took to read.
One star is actually far too generous.  Not a single character is likeable or has any redeeming qualities.  They are either sick and twisted or devoid of any emotion. Even the few who could have been sympathetic simply give up. I'm not trying to make it sound intriguing; it's just plain bad. I plodded through to part three, where I just wanted it to be over already.  I stuck with it for the payoff at the end - and there wasn't any!  The plot went from bad to worse to just idiotic.  (I actually said aloud, ""You've got to be kidding me!"") I've read many books where I've been disappointed in the ending but still enjoyed the book overall.  Not true here.  It is quite literally the worst ending I have ever read.  Overall this book is depressing, foul, bleak...there aren't enough adjectives like this to describe it.  I cannot fathom why anyone would find it enjoyable or why it's a best seller, but really, it's not worth it.  Even a book as poorly written as ""50 Shades"" made me laugh and cry at times.  This one just leaves you feeling grimy and empty.
I think there have been only 2 books that I didn't finish because I didn't like them.  For the life of me, I can't explain why I actually finished this one.  I hated it!  There is not one likeable or redeeming character.  I hated the endless stream of consciousness, internal monologue in every chapter!  I hated the ending!  I can't imagine why so many people have liked, much less loved, this book.  Will I read another book by this author, absolutely not.  Needless to say, I don't recommend this book or author to anyone.  And I can't believe I'm writing such a harsh review.  I've never written one even remotely like it, but then I've never spent so much of my valuable time on such a worthless activity.  Can't imagine I'll watch the movie either.
Yet another in a long line of novels that are short on story and characterization and long on the writer combining words in whatever way will keep readers turning the pages (and guarantee Hollywood will come calling for script rights). The main characters are horrible people; worse, their awfulness quickly becomes predictable. I guessed every decision they would make well before the page revealed it, and kept plowing on only so I could tell my book club members that I read the whole thing. As for the ridiculous ending, it didn't outrage me so much as fill me with relief that finally I was done with this dreadful tome. My greatest regret is that I paid money for this waste of several days of reading time.
Weird story, with unbelievable characters. Tried to finish it but just skip read the last half. Not recommended at all.
Had to read this for my book club and barely finished it before we met. Starts out slowly and really gets tedious after that. This book is very dark and found myself wishing the author would get on with telling the story. She is too long winded, just too much detail. I pretty much had figured out the ending half way through the book. I do not recommend this book and  probably will not read anything else she has written. I do agree with her on the fact that we do not have an unbiased legal system anymore. You are pretty much tried and convicted in our 24 hour, sensationalized,  got to get the ratings, so called news channels today.
I bought Gone Girl because it was so highly rated.  After reading it, I really wish that I had skipped it.  Almost every character in the book is a 'psycho' and I just don't find that interesting or worthwhile.
This is the 1st book I've read by Gillian Flynn. I have no intention of reading another. I just finished it & I feel like I need a shower. There was not 1 sympathetic charecter in the book. The 2 evil main protagonists deserve each other. The thought of the consequences of the ending was the last straw for me. My daughter gave me a light-hearted self help book for Christmas. I'm going to start it tonight & try to cleanse the characters in Gone Girl from my brain. O.C.
This is such a distasteful picture of the world that owes a bit to clockwork orange, no one has class or charm, everyone is weak or sociopathic and dangerous.  the story puts you teeth on edge with a distasteful exercise with no hero just a lot of rotten potatoes - soft and rank with  blatant spots of rot,.  These are not character that you would chose to spend time with, you just don't want anything too do with them including read about them
I'm So mad that I wasted my time reading this piece of crap book. The ending was worthless, and apparently the author doesn't really care. Obviously, because she is making bank off this book/film. Don't waste your time reading this book. It's a complete waste of time. It's a SLOW read, but I expected some awesome ending. Nope. Nothing. How the HELL did this get published?!? I guess anyone can be a published writer.
I read this when it was first out.  Though the writer's style is engrossing, somewhere in the middle it falls apart.  At least is does if you work in business.  The girl who went missing could never have gotten away with her scam - and only a writer who has not worked in business could imagine that the scheme would work.  As someone who works with insurance claims, i found the story implausible.
requested from a library - as popular as this book seems to be, unfortunately it did not impress me with its writing style - forget the story - we read not only out of interest to what happened but out of the reading pleasure, the delight of author's language, the magic of a word woven into a fabric of what is - none of those I found here - would not recommend it to anyone.
I don't understand what the hype is. First of all the book drags the first 300 pages. The second part seems a little exciting and then drags.  The ending makes no sense, no closure, as if the author got tired of writing. I am pisst off I actually paid for this book. Do yourself a favor borrow it from the Kindle library or wait for the movie and be prepared to fall asleep.
I expected to like this book because so many of my girl friends have recommended it.  But I really did hate it!  I think it's poorly written and the dialogue is exaggerated and unrealistic.  I brought it with me on vacation and ended up leaving it in our hotel's library because I don't want it on my bookshelf.  It actually made me mad.  But clearly I'm in the minority.
From the opening through the painfully predictable storyline and up to the pitiful ending this is one of the most ridiculous books I've ever wasted time on.Unbelievable and totally unlikeable characters set within an equally unbelievable scenario.There are no twists, no turns and absolutely nothing unexpected - total drivel without a redeeming feature.
yes, I am well aware this book was in the top 10, but I really struggled. My friend told me once you get thru ~ 30% of the book(kindle speak) it really picks up. First, I shouldnt have to read a 1/3 of any book to start and like it. Secondly, I thought the writing was less than average. I really just could not get into this book.
I had already read ""Sharp Objects,"" so I was really looking forward to this book.  Several people I know had already read it and convinced me it was worth the download.  I wished I had saved my money.  There were so many holes in the ending that I almost didn't finish the book.  I'm sorry I did because it didn't get better.
I wish I could give this book no stars at all. It is vitriolic, depressing, spiteful, unbelievable, denigrating to both men and women, inaccurate regarding psychological pathology, oppressive, droningly long, monotonous, tedious, and boring. Do not read this book. It is a waste of time. No redeeming qualities at all.
In tune with the current Zeitgeist, and to me that's the opposite of praise. If you enjoy being played with by a clever but arrogant author, this one's for you. Odious characters, impossible plot twists, self-congratulatory authorial attitudes: the great success of this book should make one ashamed.
THIS REVIEW CONTAINS SOME SPOILERS.I cannot stand this book. I still get mad when I think about how I read this all the way through; I should have stopped, but I didn't think it would be that bad. There closest to likable characters in this book were the sister, the attorney, and a former victim of our titular Girl; everyone else was vapid, self-centered, disgusting examples of human beings. This was given to me by someone else, and I would have been even more peeved if I'd paid money for this book.Amy's parents who are completely obtuse at best use their daughter as the basis for their best-selling book series in such a way as to shame her when she makes choices they don't agree with. When they lose everything due to their irresponsible actions throughout their life, they turn to said daughter to save them.Nick is a complete jerk who for some reason thinks it's a good idea to open a bar in his hometown using the remainder of his wife's wealth. Lacking excitement and tired of his life, he foolishly begins a relationship with one of his students--which is disgusting enough to begin with given the power differential, but I may especially sensitive to this given that I work in a university and this is an absolute no-no.And of course, Amy. Who likes nothing more than seeking revenge on those who she perceives have wronged her in some manner, or whom she has grown tired of. The ""amazing"" woman who cares for no one but herself, but wants others to be equally as enraptured as she is with herself. The chameleon who blames others for her plight and dissatisfaction with her lot, yet feels so flippant about her life that she is willing to give it up to have her revenge. The loathsome creature who feels no compunction at taking the life of another, regardless of how repulsive the man and his obsessive love for her was.This book is one long story of lies, half-truths, and manipulations. The story itself is incredible--and by that I mean, beyond belief. I find it easier to suspend my belief for a story that is rooted in fantasy than one that purports to depict a ""regular"" person's life. The fact that all of her machinations could be so carefully planned, that so many pieces could be put into place in anticipation of the plot, is truly unbelievable. Once Amy chooses to return she works her manipulative ways to wrap her parents around her finger, as well as the public. She has lost some support of law enforcement, as her motive and sociopathy has become clear.Yet just when you think that a satisfying end is near, that's when everything changes. Earlier in the book, Nick shares with us a seemingly insignificant detail that suggests one more reason why their future began to unravel, one more reason that the golden couple began to drift apart. This comes back as a plot twist to ensure that no one will receive anything resembling a satisfying end to this train wreck of a relationship. The impetus for this reconciliation, and the off-page ploy which brought it about, disgusted me more than anything in the rest of the story.I had read Sharp Objects prior to reading this book, and while I didn't love that story I was truly excited to read Gone Girl given the rave reviews I had heard from co-workers, friends, and the rest of the world. My grad school cohort happened to pick this for the monthly book club, and I was quite excited because I actually already had the book as well as the time to read it to participate for once. I hated the book so much that I didn't even attend the book club meeting because I didn't want to think about it, or get angry. I don't know that I have ever had such a visceral reaction to a book before and certainly not since. I refuse to read a Gillian Flynn novel again, given the fact I didn't like either novel I read and the second is easily the least favorite book I have ever read. Amongst everything else, it made me feel depressed and I just didn't want that in addition to the anger and frustration it made me feel.I will give this book one thing--it is compelling, suspenseful, and I found it hard to put down. However, if you are a person who wants to read a book with likable characters, this is not a book for you. If you like to read books with an actual heroine, hero, or even anti-hero(ine), this is not likely the book for you. But if you like dysfunctional characters, or narcissistic personality disorder intrigues you, by all means... but you may want to borrow it, just in case.
First, I realize that this review is late arriving. This is because I promptly made and effort to forget about this book after finishing it; which was not easy because so very many people loved it and wanted to talk about it. While I do understand that everyone is different and has every right to like whatever they like, I could not believe that my closest reader-friends, with whom I share, consult, and delight about books loved it and thought it was an excellent mystery. That, alone, is my single complaint. I can't find any way to criticize the author for her characters because they are her characters. That is the liberty that writers have. I too noticed how awful the people were, but that can be reality; and even if it's not the book is fiction. It was not, however, a whodunit or mystery at all for me (or my mom for that matter) having ""figured it out"" about 1/3 of the way through the book. Of course I had more faith in this widely popular book so I believed that my theory was to be undone at the end with one more amazing plot twist that would make the book worth the couple of days time I took to read it. I was not only disappointed, but aggravated about the waste of time, and so so confused by all of my respected reader-friends' glowing responses to it.I do not intend any disrespect toward Gillian Flynn when I reference a waste of time. I am delighted that people are still reading; reading anything more than a magazine - reading books!! I am happy that millions of people did enjoy her book. Again she has the right to (and should) write characters how ever she wants. I will just pass them up in the future.Still I have one question that I can't get over:  Did ANYONE ELSE have this figured out before the 50% mark and find it incredibly boring after that?
Where to begin with this review....First off, and to point out the few good things about this book, it was fast-paced, well written and seemed promising.Now, on to the bad. I don't think I've ever had the misfortune of coming across such pathetic, unbelievable characters. Not one of them had a single redeeming quality: Amy is smart, but haves no self esteem and the compulsive urge to be liked by everyone; Nick is a douche; Go doesn't appear to know which way to go throughout the entire book; Boney is a loser; Amy's parents are pushovers, and the list goes on and on, ad nauseam.And I don't mean that the characters have to be good in order to be likeable: take Hilly Holbrook from ""The Help"", for instance. She was one mean b---h, yet she was completely believable and I really enjoyed her character. In Gone Girl, none of the characters seem to care much about anything or anyone, and are moved by inertia, because there are no logical reasons for them to act the way they do and make the choices they make. They are all basically rotten to the core. Amy is so bad she is plain psycho.I was also annoyed by the fact that even though you are reading what is supposed to have happened, it becomes obvious very quickly that events happened differently, and that spoiled the suspense for me. Likewise, and as you get to know the characters, it is clear that they will get no resolution or closure, and you are left hanging on Amy's last words for an ending. Way to go, Ms. Flynn!I don't know what else Ms. Flynn has written or how this book managed to be included in the Best Sellers List, but I'm sure I'll never read any of her other books, and I most certainly will never trust the best seller list again.
The first 3/4's of this book is addicting, but the last 1/4 made me wish I hadn't read it.  It's both completely unbelievable and unsatisfying.  A depressing ending is one thing, but a depressing ending without the slightest bit of believability or truth to it made me regret reading this.
I read this book because it's a best seller. I struggled getting into it but halfway in it started to get a little interesting. However, the ending did nothing for me and basically ruined the whole book for me. Struggling to see the best seller in this book....hope the movie is better.
why anyone would want to read about two such banal and evil people is the real mystery.  couldn't care less about these two empty soul-less people. have we really fallen so low as to ""entertain"" ourselves reading about such utterly unremarkable purely selfish characters? ugh
Started out intriguing, but then it feels like the author wove a web so tangled, there was no way to save it. The last 1/3 of the book was illogical and unbelievable, it was a big, empty void. Incredibly disappointed in what was packaged up as a so-called ending.
No spoilers here. Great book right up until the end.  The author basically wussed out of what needed to be done.  Totally unsatisfying. I'm sure the end is some high literary snarky twist that the literary elite loved, but this avid reader just wanted justice.
Started reading this book and just could not understand all the great reviews.  Halfway through I thought okay now it is getting interesting but the ending was such a dud. In fact I had to check twice on my Kindle that I was actually at the end of the book!
I was so depressed after reading this book. Nobody is the hero and certainly not the heroine. I found the reaction of Amy REALLY over the top. I couldn't get a feel for why Nick did what he did nor Amy's reactions. I found the switching between characters rather exhausting. I stuck with the book because I wanted to see how it would end. The ending was beyond horrible. I am so sorry that I invested my time reading this book.
This is one of the worst books I have ever read. I can not understand these good reviews. The characters were completely unlikable and the story so contrived. The writing was terrible. I am so sorry I wasted my time. How did this get to be so popular?
I never leave reviews for anything, but just feel I must for this book. It is just awful! Finished it only because I thought for sure it would all come together and make sense. Nope! Please don't waste your time or money on such a terrible book!!
The two people in this book are both crazy. They go back and forth with each other all the time. When she disappeared I figured what had happened. And did not understand why it took so long for the others to do the same. Nobody won this battle.
I had such a hard time finishing this book. Did not like the characters, the writing, the plot or the ending A complete waste of time that I won't get back. I COULD have been reading a fun book from Janet Evanovich about Stephanie Plum....
This book was really formula driven in the beginning, and I had to force myself to keep reading it. It picks up. However it turns several times, and the ending left me feeling despondent. I don't know if it made up for the slow start.
This book is one of the worst books of the year,for me.It is vile,absurd,demented and without any redeeming value.It seemed to be written just so the author could show how she could write about repugnant,psychopathic people.This is truely trash.
After watching the movie filth certainly did not want to waste my time reading the book. Many other good books to spend my time reading. Filth has become the norm in our culture and we do have to stand up for what is good and right!!
I don't understand how this book has clung to the SoCal bestseller list for so long.  This is one of the most numbing books I've read in quite some time.  Had it not been one of our book club's books, I'd've round filed it early on.
A disappointing read and denouement. I expected more than some Fatal Attraction sophistry. It gets you in  and then it drags and drags on. Then it chicken's out into a ""literary"" finish. Sad really - how good writers give into University Reconstructive critics from the avant-garde faculty.  They always approve of the type of books that people don't want to read, ie -dense allegory. Yuk
The book was well written and excruciatingly clever, but I did not enjoy the story.  There was no ending, and it was not a gratifying read.  I wish I'd stopped halfway through; I won't be reading any other books by this author.
This is probably the worst ""mystery"" novel I've read! The end was very obvious, and the characters were very dull, I hated all of them, specially the husband. Don't waste your time and money, it's so not worth it!
This book reads like a bad movie script for Keanu Reeves. A really ridiculous and implausible series of plot tweist, as if the author is trying to prove how clever she is. I am baffled by the acclaim this novel received.
I can't fathom why this book could get such rave reviews. The plot and characters were so dysfunctional that I was literally angry when I finished it. Whenever I see that it is still on the best seller list, I cringe.
This was such a loathsome book, I don't even want to discuss it.  Simply cannot understand why everyone thought it so great.  All the members of my book discussion group, with one lone exception, also hated it.
The book started out pretty good. The story kept your interest until about half way through. The ending is so unbelievable and leaves you feeling like you wasted your time and money. Choose something else!
Terrible ending that completely negated how well written the rest of the book was.  Engaging until the end....dont know what happened...like it wasn't thought through...don't waste your time or money.
I picked up this book on someone's advice. I really wish I haven't. It was a colossal waste of time. Truly terrible, not thought-provoking, not challenging. Just a total self-righteous flop.
The worse end I've ever read. How did Amy get herself pregnant with a sperm sample. The sperm die with an hour of collection. There was not enough information on how she inseminated herself. As a lab tech I'm going to say the frozen specimen would not have worked. How did she get the sperm into her uterus? This is a minor lack of accuracy of this book. The police investigation was botchy. The end was horrible. Next time I purchase a book I'll read the reviews first. Waste of time and money
I didn't read it after buying it because as I glance through it, all is saw were f words--I knew it wasn't for me.  I just wish I hadn't spent good money on such trash.
More on my BLOG: http://chorescanwait.wordpress.com/2014/07/27/gone-girl/Started and finished: 7/6/2014-7/11/2014Rating: stars (1 out of 5)Would I read again? NoWould I recommend? NoBook Summary:Nick and Amy Dunne is a couple with a dissolving marriage.  Two differing points of view come together to reveal what happens to Amy Dunne, who one day ends up missing.  The book offers two opposing views that shifts back and forth from Nick to Amy.  The pressure begins to intensify as the public turns on Nick and he must prove his innocence.Book Review:This is a book I really disliked and struggled to get to the end.  The book has a formula- to first offer the reader a perspective of the world as seen by Nick or Amy.  Then the point of view shifts from how Amy sees Nick’s world and vice versa. As I started to learn more about the characters, I began to hate both of them equally.  Unfortunately, I never stopped hating them to the end; there was nothing redeeming about this story. The plot twists was unbelievable and felt the author was trying to write a plot for a movie - which of course I was correct since it will be in the theatres soon.  Come on, even the lawyers name, Tanner Bolt, has Hollywood written all over.Favorite Quotes: NoneRandom Thoughts:This story is disturbing because it’s about how two people in a loveless marriage stay together and is hell bent on hurting each other physically and mentally. There is nothing redeeming about this story and I wish I never spent the time to read it.
Interesting story idea but nothing but whining characters. Hated them both. It would have been better if they had just killed each other before the book was written.
Author's style is too labored.  Tries too hard to be clever.  As a former English and Creative Writing teacher, I wasextremely disappointed in the novel.
I was really hoping for more with this book. There was quite a bit of build up and stress that occurs in this story, only to be seriously disappointed in the end.
If I could give it 0 stars I would.  This is one of the worst books I have ever read and I cannot get back the time it took to read.  The characters are flimsy at best with no redeeming qualities.  The husband is supposed to be a salt-of-the-earth, midwestern, all-american type but he's written to be cowardly and feminine and as he says without ""the womanly art of articulation"" but he's supposed to be a semi-successful writer...so his chapters read as self-effacing crap.  The wife does not rise above selfish, snobbish, spoiled brat out to teach everyone lessons about consequences yet she never faces hers.  And we are supposed to believe she is brilliant.  Not buying it!  (I wish I could say I didn't buy the book!)  I laughingly finished the book hoping they were both dead at the end, but sadly that was not the case.  Don't waste your time with this poorly written, completely horrible book!
Good, until the end. No justice!  Very anticlimatic. Portrays the worse in people. No redemption. I will never bother on one of her books again
The ending killed the whole book for me. It seemed like it was written by someone else that had not spent anytime understanding the main characters.
I have never reviewed anything before but I had to review this book.  I hated this book.  It started out fairly well and seemed like an interesting mystery but the further I got into it, the more I hated almost every one of the characters.  It was a waste of my time and I don't generally feel that way about most books that I read.  The main characters are vile, hate-filled people who have no redeeming qualities.  The language got really old and so did the sexual situations.  I found myself skipping through pgs in order to find out what happens in the end (hoping it had a good ending) to be very disappointed.  I'm glad that I got it through the library so I didn't waste my money after it coming highly recommended to me.  Definitely don't waste your money on this one.  I'm still trying to figure out why they would want to waste money and time on making a movie out of this book.
It started off horrible, got so good I couldn't put it down.... Ended horrible. Save your money.... You'll just end up ticked off at the end!
I have never bothered writing book reviews before. I always thought to each his own, and that people have different tastes. But this book was so bad i felt like it was my duty to warn people not to waste hours of your life that you will never get back. For the life of me, I cannot figure out why Gone Girl by Gillian Flynn got such great reviews and awards. I rarely ever feel like i wasted my time reading a book and it is precious time i will never get back but i sure felt like that about this one. The sad part was it had an interesting premise so i wanted to see how it all turned out. If vampires had started glittering a few chapters in I would have at least thrown it out instead of plodding on. ugh! Slow start, horrible writing, dreadful characters and terrible ending! I need to really read a good book to get the bad taste of this one out!
I tried really hard to like this book.As I slogged through the first half of the book with it's endless minutiae seemingly taking the reader nowhere  - I thought to myself ""it has to get better""Despite my misgivings I allowed myself to relax a bit into the second half as the story picked up - the characters gained some dimension and the plot seemed to deepen.This is when I should have stopped...This is one of the worst endings I have come across in a LONG time! I really should get a refund on the time I wasted reading this book.I find it really hard to believe that the characters would make the choices they eventually did...Sad , waste of time - wish I had read the reviews here before I bought it. Can't understand why some give it such good reviews
First of all, I respect the opinions, positive or negative, of all others about this book. So many people loved the book, and quite frankly, I'm puzzled. I am of the other camp. I did not have a love/hate relationship with the book as some do. I did not like the book at all, and cannot for the life of me understand what all the hype is about it. Didn't like the two main characters, or the supporting characters, and felt the events were unbelievable, totally unrealistic, and that the plot was simply preposterous.Also,what was up with constant the barrage of bad language? After enduring page after page after page of f*bombs, and other graphic language throughout the whole first part, I came to the conclusion that the author stuck that in merely for shock value, to capture the readers attention. Interesting (and juvenile) writing technique.I'm a mystery lover and I kept reading, hoping the book would get better.  I stubbornly stuck with it through the ridiculous plot twists to the very end. And for what? The ending fell embarrassingly flat, and seemed like something you'd expect in some newbie writer's first effort, not in a bestseller. I may be in the minority, but this is my honest opinion.
I have hesitated to post this because i hate to write a bad review for book, but i really didn't like this one.  I wanted to stop reading after the first few pages and it never got any better...This writing style is probably intentional and driven by the main character, but in any case, it made me crazy.  It is very glib, very pretentious.  It's like having to spend hours at one of those cocktail parties where everyone is trying to impress everyone else with how smart and witty and urbane they are.  (I had the same reaction to the movie, The Out of Towners, (Jack Lemmon version) if the example helps any.)  So, maybe another of the books by Gillian Flynn would be very different with a different set of characters...but I'm not willing to pay for another book to find out.
I felt the story dragged on and the ending was awful. I skimmed through the last few chapters because I couldn't take it anymore!
I am so annoyed by this book, and I really cannot figure out why people liked it!The story is totally frustrating, I found myself thoroughly annoyed with the characters and the author, and in the end I was royally pissed off. I did not like anyone, and did not care what happened anymore. I had to force myself to finish it, and then found the ending even more frustrating.This book is really well written, and at first I was involved trying to figure out what happened. However, then I just could not stand the story. Talk about narcissistic personalities, and at the end of a novel I want something to have grown or change, and this one did not do anything. Just left me feeling trapped and dirty, as the main character did.
i really wanted to like Gone Girl, had heard so much about it.  By the 10th page I was annoyed by the constant interruption of needless flippant dialogue, description, chatter.  It was beginning to read like one of those silly cop movies where the two characters make quips while they're running through traffic.  By the 15th page the constant interruption to the plot moving forward was making me angry and by the 25th page I gave up in disgust.  The author decided that ""cutesy"" insights would substitute for the reader's intuition and that a leaner character development was undoable.  Where was a good editor?  Sadly, I put the book down and will never read it.  I hope the movie is better...should be, it's written like that was the end goal.
I just purchased this book on the recommendation of ""The Week"".  I'm only on the fourth chapter, but I'm hating it.  It is so poorly written, I am gritting my teeth - literally.  The author either is incapable of literary writing, or is too preoccupied with hipness and gimmicks to write well.  (Amy is a quiz-writer who wants to be a real writer, so each chapter told from her point of view is a diary entry in which she is supposedly honing her writing skills, yet she can't help including a quiz - really???)  If ""The Girl with a Dragon Tattoo"" gets a B- for literariness, this book gets a D.  I can sometimes get past poorly written suspense if the plot is sharp, but judging from the other reviews, the plot is very weak.
I enjoyed the beginning of this book, with the back and forth between the husbands current situation and the ""diary"" of Amy. When I got to the middle of the book (revealing no twists), I thought that this book was going to get really good.. what a dynamic twist, well-written. I think there was so much time spent developing the characters and the situations, that when it got to the end it was as if the author forgot who they were. There is NO WAY those people would have actually ended up like that. What a COMPLETE and UTTER disappointment to watch what could have been an amazing ending, some good spy craft and a nice setup, but no...... (spoiler alert) after all that is done, the end result is that they ""complete each other in their absolute disfunction that even though I might get brutally murdered at any moment, it's totally the way to go... "" Really??????? The hatred between these two is so well documented that this ending seemed so false and thrown together. Using hatred and fear as motivation to stay in a deadly situation because at least you're present??? Ugh... HORRIBLE... completely wasted my time on this book.
I almost quit reading this book. Not once, but several times. I cannot tell you how many terrible books I've finished to the end but this one was very, very close to it. I soldiered on and on, bored and hoping for it to get better and was still waiting at the end.The author tries to be pretentious in language and lifestyle and fails, tries to create personalities and dialogue that makes sense and fails, tries to create a story that entertains and fails.... The only thing that this book is successful in is earning a great deal of unexplainable money from people who have an unexplainable love for pure crap. I resent that I paid for this book and am glad I had the good sense to refrain from the movie.Awful.
You know those books where you keep reading and hoping it will get better, then you finish and your first thought is ""what a waste of time?"". That pretty much sums up gone girl for me. Going in I knew nothing about this book and I wish I had read some of the reviews first. The first half of the book was mildly entertaining (I stress the word mildly) and then it just goes off the rails and into the outlandish. I pretty much hated it. Hated the characters, hated the writing style, and honestly do we really think people can be that stupid and not see through Amy's crap? I mean come on, every supposed plot twist made me want to scream. I just thought the whole thing was so dumb and not imaginative in any way at all.
One of the worst books I've read in a very long time.  Don't waste your time.  Here's a spoiler: sociopaths always win.
I gotta say I am very dissapointed. This unbelievably crazy book was, and still is a best seller. I was very excited to finally be able to start reading it. The reviews were good, and I even heard people discussing it at work. I am once again let down by the reviews.This book was horrible. Terrible things happening in a marriage where divorce was not an option due to the fact that the woman was out of her mind and the husband didn't have the balls to end it either.The first part of the book I was totally on her side, but when the truth unraveled little by little lie by lie I couldn't believe the extent this scorned woman took things.Ridiculous how they manage to get away with all the wrongs they both did and how they find a happy ending. I am so mad. They both deserved to go to prison and stay there for good.Frivolous woman and clueless man.At the end I'm still wondering why does he smile when he shouldn't? Why does he hide the clues instead of having the detective accompany him to find the rest of them? What was Go's part or contribution in the story?(less)
I started out really wanting to like this book. I like mystery books there is something about the puzzle of the mystery.  As for this book, go to the library.  The first two parts go back and forth and keep you guessing. For those if us who don't like foul language - be aware there is a healthy amount here and you may want to read something else. The end of the book absolutely ruins the whole story. It is so bad that I have no urge to see the movie coming out because it is gonna be terrible.  Keep searching if you need a good book - find yourself buying ""The Fault in Our Stars"". There will be no disappointment there and you will read a book that proves the English language can be beautiful.
So many people kept telling me to read this book. I started it a few times and couldn't even make it past the first twenty pages, but I was interested in seeing the movie. I finally restarted it and finished it, and was completely disgusted that I had wasted my time reading this book. The plot was ridiculous, the characters were despicable, and the ending was horrendous. I felt thoroughly manipulated by the end of the book. I have absolutely no idea why this book attained any sort of popularity at all, nor why it would be made into a movie. The only reason I might still see the movie is I am hoping for a different ending, some kind of redemption for the small effort I put into finishing this book.
The book was not written well and ended horribly. I'll never read another book from Gillian Flynn, two thumbs down.
I wish I had never read this book.  There is not a single likable character in it and the ending was infuriating.
i'm only into the first 40 pages and am TRYING to plow through it because a psychologist friend whom I respect was anxious for me to read it.  My problem, so far, isn't with the story but with the writer's style.  It feels very forced.  It seems to me the author is ""too wordy"" (uses 20 words where 3 would do); seems to be trying WAY too hard to be ""literary."" Uses too many 'almost cliche"" descriptors.I'm hoping the style becomes a bit more ""user-friendly"" OR the story becomes riveting enough to hold my interest.  Right now, I'm forcing myself to read it so I can discuss it with my friend intelligently.  (Or maybe I'm just way too co-dependent.)
When I read a book I expect justice to be served in the end. Maybe this is an old fashioned idea but this is my expectation. I don't have time to read many books so I invest some time picking one out. I made a mistake with this book. I enjoyed the character development and plot twists but to echo other reviewers, the ending was just frustrating. It was not true to the characters that had been very sharply painted, one as pure unadulterated evil with remarkable intelligence and the other as a somewhat pathetic, self -centered immoral being. The reader is asked to suspend way too much disbelief and too many loose ends are dangling.  I will avoid this author in the future.
I now have no desire to see the movie now.  Disappointed with ending. Don't waste your time reading this book.
I feel like I've wasted my time reading this! What a shame it started out good.  Save yourself time and money.
I'm not sure what all of the hype is about over this book. Other people that have reviewed the book state they are disappointed with the ending, but entire story is disappointing. There are no redeeming qualities for any of the characters, the husband is an amazing idiot and the wife is portrayed as being so intelligent, so conniving, that she can get away with murder. The entire world is full of idiots she can easily manipulate and have them believe what ever she wants. The writer makes all men look like they are womanizing, helpless idiots and women are sadistic, manipulative, psychos. If you want a glimpse of what this book is about, look up the movie trailer.
Advertised a Hardback with original cover art and received mass produced paperback with movie poster cover.
the book was a good read overall. It had a slow beginning but once you got into it it was a REALLY great read even though some parts were un believable but that ending ruined the whole entire book for me. It's like the author just decided to stop writing. Did she get bored or something.. It's like the consequence was that they had to deal with each other but there wasn't even an epilogue.. I saw this book EVERYWHERE and read it with out reading the reviews.. I was engulfed in the book until the ending an then i got to the end and disappointment isn't even the word. I was yelling aloud when I got to the end I was so upset and distraught about it.
I was so bored I had trouble finishing the book.  This book held little mystery and no plot.  It was a character analysis of two extremely narcissistic, immature and selfish individuals.  I didn't care what happened to either one.  If I had had the option, I would have given the book zero stars.  I haven't disliked a book this much since Bonfire of the Vanities.
REASON I GAVE THIS ONE STAR IS BECAUSE IT WAS THE MOST BORING BOOK I EVERREAD. IT WAS ABOUT NOTHING
Requested and received this book for Christmas.  It was on list after list and seemed to be highly recommended.  Wish I had read the reviews before I asked for it.  Could have used that money for a Starbucks card.Like many others, I stuck with it thinking it would have some sort of resolution.  Certainly had potential. How very, very disappointing and a total waste of my time. I will never pick up a book by this author again.I don't understand this trend with authors and editors to leave the reader hanging. When I plunk down good money and invest my time, I want a story worthy of all the hype.  This one does not deliver.
The ending was such a disappointment, I would not refer this book or waste my time seeing the movie. :-(
While reading this book you might think...""this is so interesting!"" or ""I wonder what's going to happen!"" or ""How is this all going to be resolved?"" But then you get to the end and you will most certainly be thinking, ""I wasted my time reading this entire book for THAT?!?!?"" You will be left feeling disappointed, cheated, and just generally pissed off. It seems as if she got the to end of the book and just gave up during the last 20+ pages. She didn't care anymore and that's obvious. For a book that gets you extremely invested in the characters it is an EXTREME let down. I would NOT recommend this book to anyone. Spare yourself!!!
So full of holes Swiss cheese would be embarrassed to be seen with it.  A poor attempt at being clever.
Unfortunately, this supposedly unique story is a just a very derivative hack and shredding of a previously written story. But even if I didn't know this, I would have guessed it due to the uneven characterizations, story holes, illogic, and phenomenal amount of ""dialogue"" that did nothing more than summarize, summarize, and summarize the other story for the reader. There was so much unneeded dialogue, so much repetition, so many unneeded scene details that it was horrendous and even painful to plod through this trying-to-be-hip-and-icky-sick-profane-to-make-up-for-lack-of-originality-and-authorial-gumption quagmire.
This is a very badly written novel.  In the beginning, when the marriage appears idyllic, it is like reading a fourteen year old girl’s romantic fantasy.  As the story progresses the main characters change radically and behave in a manner that is totally inconsistent and completely unrealistic.  The twists and turns in the plot become increasingly far-fetched and the ending is utterly ridiculous.  How this ever became a bestseller is baffling.  One can only hope that the movie version throws out most of the novel’s plot, but given that the Ms. Flynn has written the screenplay that is unlikely.  I won’t be going to see it.
I don't understand why America likes this level of dull. Don't be pulled in by the hype. Not worth it.
Really?  That was the big twist?  After a thousand pages (felt like it anyway) of rambling, silly, contrived, badly-written garbage fiction?  This is what sells well these days?  I kept reading expecting some sort of redeeming twist, but the whole thing read like a bad outline.  Insert unsurprising twist here, insert another there.  I slogged through it for weeks, skimming self-indulgent passages that strained to be interesting or witty or surprising, all for a non-ending that left me swiping my Kindle looking for the missing pages.  Surely it must be here somewhere!  Wrong.  What a waste of time.
This book started off interesting, but ended up crashing and burning into one of the worst plot endings I've ever read. I only kept reading to see just how ""Amazing"" Amy would get her just deserts after her years of manipulation, deceit, and pure evilness. But, alas, the joke was on me! The ending of this story left me flabbergasted and not in a good way, which is too bad because this book had a lot of potential.I will not reveal any spoilers, but I will say some of the plot twists, especially the ending, were ludicrous, ridiculous, absurd, etc..... Overall, I was underwhelmed, let down, and left feeling disgusted and irritated. Similar to feeling like I found a bug in my food. Just repulsed...Helpful hint: If you must read this book, borrow it from a friend or check it out from your local library, like I did. It's not worth purchasing in my opinion.
If you like dark, sadistic books about psychopaths and their inability to love, this is for you.  If I had it in hardcopy, I would trash it and NOT pass it on.  Did you see the rather dark movie called ""War of the Roses?""  It's a tale of a couple that literally annoy each other to death.  This book has a similar feel, only without the humor.  (To jog your memory, the ""War"" starred Michael Douglas and Kathleen Turner.""I did not walk away from this book and did finish it.  It is very well written and I was able to enjoy it for the talented prose of Glynn.
Someone truly needs to tell me what all the fuss is about.  This book is so bad it shouldn't be a book it should be fodder for a cat's litter box.  Sad, really, because Flynn's other novels are excellent. If this is her first book that you've read, please consider others.I applaud that she tried to have the ""enemy"" win in the end but the ending was so implausible and unrealistic that it leaves one laughing and wondering how on Earth she thought this might be okay.But she's laughing in the end.  A hit movie, millions of copies sold.  Egads.
The writing style was certainly interesting but the plot was sick. Literally, I almost did not finish the book. As an older person thinking about how young people - young married couples - would read into this book, well, I thought it was pretty twisted.  And I guess that was Flynn's point - to make a twisted book. These are two really screwed up people and the ending was even screwier. I'm not going to give away the plot or  the ending but suffice it to say, I didn't like the book and I wouldn't recommend it. I won't be reading any more books by this author. Sorry.
I'm sad I wasted my time reading this misogynistic minefield. These conjoined psychoses of characters made me so depressed by the end I just wanted my life back (you can't unread this dreck). I bet the movie is going to be a hell of a lot better than the book simply, and only because of, Ben Affleck. I'm going back to reading real books and not popular bestsellers, thank you very much. This goes in the trash-heap of books I regret reading ie: The Girl With The Dragon Tattoo and Twilight (yes I did). PS: I saw the movie today, it was worse than the book!
I was so excited to read this book, then so terribly disappointed.  This book was horrible.  It started out so slow taking forever to even get into anything even remotely interested, at about 57% of the book I thought finally we are getting somewhere and this book is going to get really good.  Nope, got my hopes up and not only did it not get any better it actually got worse!  Toward the end of the book it felt like the writer was just tired of writing this book and ended it without an actual ending.  One of the worst books I have read in a long time.
This is a poorly-written book about a crappy person who goes missing, the crappy person who kinda-sorta goes looking for her,  and the constellation of unlikable caricatures that float in and out of their life. The narrative prose is overwritten and unsubtle, Amy's diary entries make you hope she stays gone, and Nick is so pathetic he deserves for them to pin it on him. Oh, and every main character is inexplicably an alcoholic, ""just because,"" I guess. It's an unstimulating, unfulfilling novel and not worth your time. Don't believe the hype.
So,  I suffered through having to read the F word about a thousand times just to get to a good conclusive ending and I got jipped!  After all the intricate work of creating such a deep dark plot - how did it end up with the lamest conclusion ever!  It was absolutely ridiculous - at least now I won't have to suffer through the movie.Don't waste your time reading this book - I lost 8 hours of my life and lost brain cells trying to navigate through the language and sexual references only to be disappointed beyond belief at the anticlimactic finish.
Yes, I am baffled. What on earth makes this book a best seller? I found the book to be bland, actually halfway between bland and BLAND.  The writing style has the feel of... ""it was a good tele-movie, so lets re-produce it into a book format"".  The characters are empty, they have no warmth and are entirely one dimensional, purely created for the short few weeks that they are need in this plot. Just a bunch of typical CSI/SVU-like scenes strung together.The plot/twist is unique, and credit to the author for stringing all together in the 'he said - she said' format. that works well.Unfortunately not my taste, maybe it stands out in the crime fiction genre, but so what.  I'm glad I purchased it in the kindle format, it is not a book you would call a collectable and display on the shelf.
I overlooked this book initially based on early reviews, but 2 friends begged me to read it.  The story goes back and forth every chapter to Amy or Nick and it's aggrivating when they change chapters.  It's very long winded and you can scan many pages without every really reading them.  The ending was the most disappointing.  I invest all this time into this book and to have an ending like this one is ridiculous.  BE FOREWARNED--THE ENDING IS NOT REALLY AN ENDING.  My guess is they will try to make a sequel, but I won't be reading it.
I found this book to be slow and disturbing.  I did not find one character that I could like - even a little. I like a story with likeable characters that you have an investment in - not even the supporting characters made me want to root for them.  The premise of the story had so much potential, but the story just seemed to be all over the place that I lost interest about half way through.  It seemed like the author hated women, which is funny since it was written by a woman.  I am sorry to say that I would not recommend this book.
I just don't get the popularity of this book. It was thoroughly predictable. I was correctly guessing each next step which left me bored. I trudged through just because I kept believing there must be something better but the only part about this story that surprised me was the ending which was not a good thing. I was hoping that at least the ending would make up for a story that seems too familiar to be original but I was left completely dissatisfied and irritated I wasted 4.99 on the purchase. I won't bother watching the movie.
I was intrigued until the second half of the book turned this story into Nicholas Sparks meets Nancy Grace utterly ridiculous tale featuring two characters who are the most reprehensible people you grow to not care about at all.  I kept at it, though, and made it 90% through the story until my principles could not allow me to dignify this stupid story by finishing the book.  I never in my life stopped reading a book out of sheer disgust.  There's a first time for everything, I suppose.  I predict the movie goes straight to DVD.
I am absolutely baffled by where the hype for this book came from. The plot is so outrageous that I had it figured out incredibly early on, telling myself ""no, it can't really be what I'm thinking"" and kept reading in the hopes that I was jaded from watching too many television shows with the same types of outlandish story lines. It was everything I prayed it wasn't. All I can picture is a bunch of miserable women sitting around hating their husbands and identifying with and living vicariously through Amy, who is a loathsome character at best, and then recommending it to all their miserable friends to read. The beginning was slow and boring, the middle impossible yet predictable and the end a terrible injustice. Save yourself a few hours of your life and read a better book.
Rarely is our book group unanimous in our opinion of a book, but all ten of us disliked Gone Girl.  We could not understand how it was on the Best Seller list for one week, let alone 68 weeks!  If you are curious about Gone Girl, save time and money by waiting for the movie version.  Better yet, read a Harlan Coben novel if you are looking for the ""can't put the book down once started"" experience with plot twists and at least one likable character.  For me, the lesson of Gone Girl is to pay no attention to Best Seller lists.
I read all the reviews which were very good so I bought the book.  The book is written in he says, she says.  One chapter is a he says the next is a she says.  That's how the whole book went.  Read the whole thing when I was on vacation in Cancun while sunbathing to pass the time.  I still can't figure out what the big hoopla was about the story.  Maybe it was the format?  It was a real waste of money especially when I could have purchased a much better book.  Not likable characters especially the girl.  The guy was a wimp.
It WAS an intriguing ""read"", even through the slow moving, boring 1st third.  WAY too much time spent there.  The plot then became interesting because it moved in an unpredictable, yet stimulating, direction -- right up 'til the ending.  The ending STUNK!!  That could never happen that way.  If you didn't have an ending well thought out (decided), or just wanted your readers to be left disappointed, then you succeeded!  The ending just wasn't believable and made me feel that I wasted my time reading the whole book.
If you like reading a book with vulgar language through the entire book then you might not mind this.  I found it disgusting and completely unnecessary.  I only finished the book because it was a book club reading and I wanted to see if there was anything redeeming about it.  The plot took a very, very long time to get you interested. Very slow beginning.  Since it was supposedly ""a page turner"" I continued on.  Eventually it has an interesting plot.  I was completely disappointed in the ending.  It seemed like the author couldn't figure out a good ending so it just kind of ends.I've never read anything else by this author but due to the unnecessary language in this one, I won't be reading any others.Would have given it zero stars if that was an option.
I know a lot of people say they hated this book because of the ending but I hated it way before then.  I had already figured out the big ""surprise""  in the book way before we got to it so that was a let down.  The main characters are just nasty annoying people.  The only reason I kept reading was because I kept reading how wonderful and innovative and shocking the book was so I kept hoping it would get better. It didn't.  Honestly, I just can't understand the hype. It is a bad bad book from start to finish.
the main characters become so obnoxious that it is intolerable and i regret wasting time to finish this predictable book
After reading some good reviews, I really wanted to like this book. I'm sad to say I think it might be one of the worst books I have ever read. Too much of the characters thinking, the explaining of clues. The plot became so outrageous toward the end it was totally unbelievable. I also didn't care for the turn to gross sex talk. And then the guy takes her back? Are you kidding me? And there's no ending? Thank goodness I got this from the library! Live and learn, I guess this author is not for me.
Read the book then saw the movie.  My daughter disagree about the value of this story.  There was one line in the book that was unfortunately left out of the movie, so I think some of the intent of the book was missed.  I didn't like the two primary characters, but since I grew up near Hannibal, MO, I was interested in the commentary on the economic and social environment, so it became a character for me.  All in all, I wouldn't recommend the book or the movie, and it might just be generational.
I am angry I wasted my time and money on this ridiculous book. It started out with the illusion that it might be a good plot in the beginning however, soon you find yourself saying over and over again ""What?"", ""No Way!"". Totally unbelievable. I kept reading thinking the author must have a really clever way of wrapping up all the insanity. There was no wrap up, there was no ending. All the hateful characters and plot lines just stop. In the author's acknowledgements she writes that she got stuck when the book was 82% completed, and her editor had to help her finish it. She should have just stopped at 82%. I wish there was a way to get my money back after feeling totally manipulated and ripped off. Don't buy this book!
I like to read books that are simply enjoyable to read or books that may be a bit of a difficult read but offer something- knowledge, understanding, etc. This book was neither for me.  The characters were unlikeable and the situations unrealistic. The writing was passable.  It was a chore to finish the book and then there was absolutely no pay off at the end.  I feel like I wasted my time reading this.  Next time, I'll think twice before assuming that a great Amazon score means a great read.
I can't imagine why this book received so much positive press. The prose is overblown and poorly edited. The narratives of the husband, Nick, and the wife, Amy, go on ad nauseum, but offer nothing that makes either character remotely sympathetic, or even interesting, unless, perhaps, you are a prison psychologist. This book may work for some as a send-up of a bad marriage, but does not illuminate or enlighten us about human relationships, emotional truths, or mysteries of intimacy anywhere on the spectrum of normal human interaction. As far as I am concerned, it violates the first rule of fiction: give us at least one character we actually care about. Gillian Flynn makes Jacqueline Susann look like Jane Austen.
I picked up this book because it seemed everyone was all tongue wags about it and the reviews (Kirkus, Library Journal, Booklist, Publishers Weekly) were very good. The book started out OK, but nothing great, quickly devolved, and then fizzled. I can't wrap my head around why so many people think this is a wonderful book. I consider myself reasonably intelligent (Masters Degree), love to read well written books, and this one was just left me yearning for a good read. This wasn't it.
this book is just awful,so much so that I am convinced that the good reviews are part of a PR strategy and fake.
A HORRIBLE BOOK!  Sick ending.  Will not read another book written by her.
I did not like this book. In all my reviews I constantly say that I am not a professional reviewer so I do not ever say anything bad. If I don't like a book I usually do not give it a review but this one makes me shake my head. I cannot picture it as a movie. It has been on best seller list for months which automatically confirms that I am not a good reviewer. I do not recommend it. The only other book I ever read that I would not recommend was a James Patterson novel about robots.  In the past six months I have read over 50 books and this Gone Girl is just not my idea of relaxation or knowledge which is usually what I look for in a book. The language is horrible also.  What a waste of money.
There isn't a single character in this book who is likeable or who I really cared about. The characters were all completely dysfunctional and selfish.  I couldn't help but wonder why so many people gave this book such wonderful reviews.  Is it because when we read a book like this it helps us to realize our lives aren't really that bad afterall?  Has reality TV caused us to believe this is normal and lowered our expectations of good literature?  There were also some glaring editorial mistakes in time.  At one point the author said she had been ""sweetening him up for several weeks"" when she had only been with the other person a few days.  My opinion, don't waste your time reading this book.
Sorry to say, I actually regret having read this book.  Aspects of it's absurd plotting have become stuck in my mind as  kinds of mind-worms.  Friends of mine that had read the book recommended it to me based on my interest in the mind of the pyschopath, and I thought this story was about one.  It is most certainly not about a psychopath.  Both of the main characters are immature, vengeful, self-involved puppets operated by the author.  I do not recommend this book to anyone.
I had to force myself to finish this book.  Is this a modern version of ""No Exit""?  Is the author telling the reader that the world is peopled with sociopathic, narcissists who manipulate and betray others for their own pleasure?  Hey, guess what?  I knew that already.  There was not one fully drawn well integrated character in this work (perhaps GO was the only sympathic human being that could be identified). Never again for this author.  Wish I could get a refund.
This is one of the worst books I have ever read. I am avid reader. I put this book away half way through. One of my daughters said I just had to finish it. So I struggled through until the end. The back and forth between real time and the diary was cumbersome to follow. The male lead was unbelievable from beginning to end. The female lead was interesting but far fetched. The very worst part was the end. I really wanted justice to prevail but this author had another idea.
Another 50 Shades of grey. A  psychopathic story , hallucinations and lots of profanity. I guess, American women writers catching up on a quick pot of gold, women clicking theirs heel with profane stories for a quick sale and dirty money maker. this is definitely , NOT a novel , NOT literature, a yearn written wrote under some hallucinating influence. It so sad that our taste has gone down so low for the sake of making a quick buck and it sells. I wasted $8.99 on trash
Normally, I'm the one in my family who tries to make heads or tails out of it when a book or movie doesn't seem to end. In this case though, I don't even know where to begin. Why Ms. Flynn would decide to end her story in this manner is beyond me and the ethics of good journalism. Let me cut to the chase. This book does NOT end! Yes, it's interesting as hell; but I have to say, I'm sorry I wasted my time.Do yourself a favor... become gone reader and don't start!
This book is not worth the money! I decided to purchase it because I heard the movie was coming out soon and wanted to read the book first. I made my self finish the entire book even though I lost interest less than half way through hoping the ending would be worth it. NOT! This has got to be the worst ending of any book I have ever read! That is saying a lot, because I read constantly! Do yourself a favor; wait for the movie to come out on TV and save your money.
Am I the only person who thought this was one of the slowest, most boring books I've read in a long time?  I kept reading thinking any time it would get good because all the reviews here (and other places) RAVED about it.  I started and quit once and then decided to try it again.  It dragged just as much the 2nd time I tried it.  I've never read this author before and will not read any other books by her.  I'm just glad I didn't waste the money buying a hardback.
This is a fast moving book, but the two main characters were ultra-manipulative, selfish people.  The twist that keeps you reading is that they are totally unpredictable and you wonder what will happen next.  I can see it was left open for a sequel, but I have no desire to see what they will do next.  I was kind of hoping they'd kill each other off in the end, but instead they're going to inflict a new generation with their solipsistic ways.  So disappointed.
I've learned one thing from all the reviews:  if there are a lot of one star ratings, save your money. This book must hold the world's record for use of the ""F"" word.  I think the author has a talent for writing hidden in there somewhere and should try relying on that instead of shocking her readers.  Does she really want to be remembered in the literary world for trashy novels? I suggest the author try again, and write with a little class this time.
Don't know why this is a best seller. Didn't like it and ending was awful.
This book really doesn't warrant all the hype it's gotten.It's not terribly written, but it requires you to believe that everyone did and acted exactly as predicted at all times. You would have to be the most accomplished game theorist that ever existed for anything in this book to actually happen the way it is written. The ""twist"" is predictable, the people unlikable, and the ending just ran out of steam. Totally not worth the purchase.
I find the interest and fascination with this book absolutely shocking.  Creating a prosaic and mundane plot the author then peopled her story with unlikeable and self absorbed individuals who I cared not a fig about.  Stereotypes prevail in this quick read and I was more than happy to leave this book.There are so many well-written, well-plotted mysteries and thrillers available today I am surprised that Gone Girl has stayed on top for so long.
The plot was good but the writing sucked. The beginning 1/3 of the book was a snore fest and the ending was horrendous. Felt like the author had to meet her deadline so she just wrapped it up by throwing some words together. There were so many loose ends that it almost feels like a To be continued.... type of ending. Thank god she re-wrote the ending to the movie version because I'm sure ppl would demand their money back if the movie ended this way too.
I wanted to read this book as it has gotten so much hype.  The first half dragged and then I was encouraged as it picked up in the second half.  However, that was short lived as the story and characters just dissolved into unbelievable, uninteresting, hateful nonsense.  And I totally agree with others that the ending was just terrible.  Nick deserves Amy.  I will not read another book by this author.  I feel like I need a shower after reading this book.
I honestly can't figure out why people rave about Gone Girl. Even more mystifying is how it manages to stay on the bestseller list for week after week.Without a doubt, this was the worst thirteen dollars I ever spent on a Kindle book.I hate to give up on a book, but this was a real slog to an unsatisfying ending. (My wife says it's because I don't like books about relationships - dysfunctional or otherwise. She's probably right.)
I really do not understand the hype. This is a story full of unlikable (and one-dimensional) characters doing ridiculous things, and the ending was awful.The only ""wrinkle"" was the ""unreliable narrator"" aspect, which (for me at least) was obvious from the start.Thriller? Nope. Suspenseful? Not really.The only reason I kept reading was to see how Flynn was going to cleverly tie up the loose ends - and then she didn't.
I gave this one star because you cannot give fewer and still write a review. I'm saddened by the fact that this is third author I've read in a little over a year whose language, use of profanity actually got in the way of her story. What have we come to when someone cannot tell a story with out pulling out the ""f"" word in every other sentence and worse yet using it as middle name for the Son of God. I'm not a prude but this is going too far, just not literature. This is a cheap seamy novel, one that showed promise then went in a downward spiral. I just couldn't finish it I was so insulted by it.I will not read this author again.
Let me just start out with I wouldn't waste my time on this book.  Not only would I like a refund, but I wish I could get back the hours spent reading this crappy book.  This must have reached the best seller list because of some book club hype.  It is a boring ridiculous story with a ridiculous drawn out plot and terrible character development.  Don't waste your time on this book of ~400 pages of ""Amy gone, day three""'  etc. etc,  Really?
This book isn't worth paying for. I wouldn't recommend the story even if it were free, because you cannot get the time back. The entire first half is a struggle to keep reading because its so boring. The second half gets interesting, and gives you hope, only to drag on way too long. By the end you don't care one bit about the characters, you are just begging for it to resolve and be over. And then it doesn't. This book is truly a disappointment.
I'd prefer zero stars for this book. Some stories can end so maddeningly,  but hold your interest. This book was a ridiculous story and it was full of pathetic characters. The plot was too ludicrous to believe. The plot self destructed. Even the setting could have interwoven some historical interest, yet failed miserably. The intense foul language and sex depictions were very low life and trashy. Ms Flynn' s book was a waste of time and money.
This book was awful!  The writing style drove me crazy bouncing back and forth between the two main characters.  Even if I wanted to enjoy the book, the ending was terrible, and I felt cheated.  I wasted my valuable time reading this useless novel.  Usually you come away with something from a book, whether it be knowledge, enjoyment, humor, a lesson to be learned or just plain romantic enjoyment, but this book left me frustrated and stunned.
I will start off by saying that I LOVED this book.  It was so different and I couldn't stop reading.  Every free moment I had to read more, more, more.  I was telling everyone about it, and how good it was.  But I warned myself, and them, that I hadn't finished it yet.  I read the reviews, good and bad. I was prepared for an interesting ending.  I even formulated different endings in my head wondering how it could end, and if I truly would be upset at varying scenarios.  I was definitely not prepared for the ending.  It was so bad.  Just bad.  That's all I can say.  Over and over.  It felt like the author gave up.  Like she got tired of the story and stopped. I really was hoping for a powerful ending that left me satisfied, that left the characters with the fate they deserved.  But, No.  If I hadn't been reading on my kindle, I may have even thrown the book across the room.  Or used it in the fireplace.
I know everyone seemed to like this book, but it just had too much language for me.  The f word was probably used 1000 times and maybe some people talk like this, not me, and not my friends.  I think the book would have been much, much better and just as realistic without the language that was used.  I hope the movie when it comes out has the language removed, but I doubt it because Hollywood seems to think this is what sells movies.  Ugg!
I know this is a hot book right now and if I have any true literary understanding I should love it but...I didn't.  I am an avid reader but it was a little too clever for me.  As a woman who understands how sometimes you just want to get back at a man who has wronged you, and who didn't blame Lorena Bobbitt, there were parts of the book I appreciated.  But I hated the ending and I hated the wife Amy.  I found her a sniveling spoiled brat.
Spoilers Ahead:Here's some life advice for the main characters of this book:- Pick careers that are more stable and pay better than ""writing"" (despite cliches to the contrary, financial security will solve most of life's problems -- trust);- Don't move to the midwest (it sucks);- Either be a ride or die or get off the horse and divorce -- faking your own death is for passive aggressive losers
Really what else is there to say that hasn't been said?I couldn't put it down in section 1. It was everything I wanted in a book UNTIL IT WASN'T.Section 2 .... words fail me. I wanted to punch the author in the throat. Literally.Everything from this point on was like a bad, cheesy, lifetime movie. And the ending..... made me set on never ever ever ever reading another Gillian Flynn book. Like ever.
I bought this book based on the hype and found the writing unimpressive, the characters annoying and the story convoluted.  I picked up the wonderful book ""Charms for the Easy Life"" by Kaye Gibbons after reading this tripe and it was like a breath of fresh air after driving by the dump.  Had I not been stuck on a bus with nothing better to read I would have thrown ""Gone Girl"" across the floor.  Don't waste your time.
I heard so much about this book, that I was dying to read it.  But, page after page, I struggled to keep interested.  A friend told me to stick with it and it would eventually hook me.  It did...but not until half way through when the mystery is revealed.  Then, after finally committing to the story, I was completely let down by the ending.  For such a great plot idea, I'm shocked this ending was all the author could come up with.
I was excited to read this book, with all the hoopla...movie.....so DISAPPOINTED!It started out pretty good and it kept my interest but then it turned into the most far fetched, unbelievable story! I don't understand all the rave reviews.  It has the worst ending...it does not have to be happy ....just awful....can't believe this is what we have for current day fiction. Should have been turned away. Just appalled!!
After hearing several friends reference Gone Girl, I decided to give it a try. I'm so surprised this has been a good seller. The story is absolutely riddled with implausible dialogue, phony-sounding character names, repeated specifics (motes of dust, anyone?). Ugh, it was beyond trite. The scene with the abandoned shopping mall was so silly and contrived I almost had to stop reading. The Amazing Amy children's book series playing so prominently was, time and again, so self-indulgent and implausible. The whole thing was just a complete mess. I also found the language lazy and gross. One of the last lines has the husband feeling sorry for the wife and he explains to her it's ""because every morning you have to wake up and be you"". I feel the same for Gillian Flynn! She's somehow convinced a lot of people that this book has some redeeming qualities. It's a sham.
Waste of time.  Amy is crazy. Certifiable. Felt like the author kept rambling on when Amy was  talking. Was exhausting.  After reading halfway through, I started skimming the pages and skipping around.  Nick is a horse's a..... They make a great couple.  I never did connect with any of the characters. Didn't care what happened to any of them. Didn't care much for this book.  Won't be reading anymore books by this author.
Not a favorite at all, was very disappointing. Can't say to much without giving it away. i found it extremely hard to get into and follow
I hate the story telling style this writer used.  The plot didn't flow well and a large part of it didn't make sense.  In order for this story to work, the character Amy had to be plotting the basis of the storyline before she met Nick.  I think people got on the ""awesome book"" bandwagon and catapulted this hook to a best seller.  It is undeserving of best seller and it is one of the worst reads of present day.
I am an avid reader but never wrote a review before. Gone Girl has compelled me to do so. The ending ruined it for me. I liked the book for the first 3/4. But then it seemed like the author just got tired of writing. It is amazing how a bad ending can change my whole perception of the entire book. I glad I got this book from the library. I would have been very disappointed if I paid for this with my hard earned money.
After reading so many reviews about this book, I purchased it. I am in no way a literary scholar but, I can say generally the story was drawn out and the ending was unsatisfying. I kept reading because I kept feeling like the climax of the story was about to happen but, there really wasn't a climax. After I was done reading, I was very disappointed that I wasted my time reading it to begin with. I don't recommend it.
This book hardly merits review. I just wanted to let people know it's not as wonderful as you've been led to believe, and also to spoil the ending. Most of the reviews I read of this book were in Entertainment Weekly, including Rob Bruner's inclusion of the book in the ""Best of 2012"" issue.This book is only the best of 2012 if by ""best"" you mean most profoundly disappointing, with the least satisfying ending of possibly any book I've ever read (at the end, after the failure of her nearly perfectly executed plan to frame her husband Nick for her murder, monster sociopath ""gone girl"" returns home, and Nick decides to stay married to her; I feel no compunction about spoiling this POS).While I wasn't framed for murder, I do feel victimized by the press on this incredibly bad book. Bye, Gillian Flynn. Bye, Rob Bruner.
It took me a whole month to read it!!! Just hated picking it up.There was not a like able character in the book, with the possible exception of Rhonda.  Halfway through I could no longer care less whether Amy wad dead or alive and if not for my habit of finishing every book I start I would have abandoned it.Even taking into consideration backgrounds, formations of character due to parents and upbringing, I found the plot ludicrous.  Any mediocre cop could have solved the case; so many traceable clues not followed up.I feel the book was just pointless!
Forgive the sexist tone, but this book is for those who enjoy keeping and reading dairies. The endless and minute details are maddening. Moreover, the continually misuse of pronouns from the ""so-called writers"" in the novel is also distracting. I could not continue reading beyond chapter 6. Rhetorical question: Is there a writer of fiction under 50 who can use the verbs have and get correctly? Not worth reading.
How this dribble got on the best seller list I will never know.  And, if that isn't bad enough they are going to try and make a movie from it.  Good Luck on that. I just wanted to throw the book in the garbage the second I finished. All through the book you never understand what is motivating the characters and I might add you never do. It is malicious which out explanation and the worst part is there is no END!
More than once I wanted to put this book down but kept reading to see if I could get to the part that made this a bestseller and then a movie. Uninteresting and poorly developed characters. Predictable plot with unsurprising and flat twists. This book reads like a compilation of parts of real best selling authors best selling plots and protagonists. Haven't seen the movie but it has to be better than this book.
I can't believe people are lining up to see the movie for Gone Girl. I think it was truly the worst book I have ever read. I read a lot of books, probably 3 a week and truly despised this one. The main character Amy was the most horrible character ever created in a book. Her parents are equally as disgusting, calling her the Amazing Amy. I wish I could have put 0 stars, that is how much I hated this book.
I hated this book from the first chapter, but because I dislike quitting I stuck it out to the last horrific sentence. As a reader I felt I was being manipulated emotionally while simultaneously being intellectually assaulted. This paints a very jaded view of the world we now live in.  Suffice it to say I will forget this novel as quickly as possible, and no way would I see the film, Ben A or not.
I was super excited to read this book. About 100 pages in I wondered if I should keep reading or not- it felt like it might be a novel akin to fast food- you can't resist it, but after you're done you feel a bit sick. This book was a complete and total waste of time and the ending...sick. I can't believe I wasted my time reading this. I'm all for a good dark mystery/thriller, but she truly does not deliver this. And, given the ending, the author strikes me as very self-satisfied with herself- ""look how clever I am!"" Please. Don't waste your time on this book.
Sorry, I did not like this book. It went on & on. The descriptions and adjectives reminded me of an English Lit major trying to impress her professor. I have to admit I skimmed most of the middle of the book just to get through it and then read the last few chapters. I could not handle all of the dialogue. The plot was interesting, but too strung out. I think she should stick to short stories!!
This book is easy to read, although not entertaining.  I found myself drifting throughout.  The twist was a nice surprise and good, but should have been placed further towards the end.  It would help close the book a little better.  As it is now, the book has no ending; not as in Guess your own, but truly...the story was not concluded properly.  I never write book reviews, good or bad but this is the worst ending of any book I've ever read...can't get over it.  America must be deprived of good fiction if it's placing so much emphasis on a book like this.
This book has been on every website and blog that I have read for months and months. A lot of the things that were said about it are correct: It is beautifully written, it will keep you guessing, and it is truly intriguing. The feeling that I had at the end of the book was one of revulsion. The characters are realistically scary in that I don't want to live in a world with people like them.
It's rare that I don't finish a book.  I always feel that even reading a less than desirable book it must get better.  This was my exception.  I started it thinking that with so many people loving it, I would too.  Part of the way in I gave up and decided life is too short and there are too many other good books to read to waste my time.  Now I hear it's being made into a movie.  Oh dear!
I wish I wouldn't have wasted my time reading this book. The ending is absolutely terrible, and I feel as if the author simply just gave up. It makes me wonder whether Flynn was just as insane herself as was Amy. I'm am warning you, DO NOT WASTE YOUR TIME WITH THIS BOOK. Its a great plot, but it is a terrible, revolting, unrealistic, and disappointing ending. Shame on you, Gillian Flynn.
The only good thing that I can say about this book is that if you have hopes of anything redeeming about it, you will keep turning the pages.  Unfortunately, once you have turned the last page, you see how much you wasted time and money that you can never get back.  It starts out looking like a decent mystery but quickly goes down hill when you realize that there is not one likable character in the book, no one to sympathize with or to hope for.  This is the only book that I have ever read than left me feeling nothing but anger and disgust.
Hated this book.  Didn't like or care about either character at the end.Also pg. 425, in the police interview she says she was in the ""trunk"" of the car and yet she knew that Desi stopped the car at Hannibal to throw her purse out.  How did she know that when she was tied up in the trunk?That and a lot more besides made me very mad I wasted time on this book.
I cannot for the life of me understand why so many people are reading this book. The characters are all despicable. The plot is telegraphed right from the beginning. You know exactly where it is going after the first 100 pages. I can only conclude that most of the people who like this book read bodice rippers or enjoy mysteries by the likes of Danielle Steele and Mary Higgins Clark.
Every review I read said that this was a page-turner, a surprise a minute.  Not in my humble opinion.  The plot was formulaic at best.  The prose was completely uninspired.  You end up rooting for neither character, which makes the ending highly unsatisfying.  Avoid this book and all its hype.  If you must read this, don't spend the money and borrow the book from the public library.
I ws very disappointed in the story, Agony just to finish it.
I found this book to be a great disappointment.  It came highly recommended to me and I looked forward to the read, but as the book went on (and on, and on, and on) with one ridiculous plot twist after another, I found it very difficult to care what happened to either of these people.  I paid for it, so I finished it, but will not be investing anymore time in books by this author.
Don't waste your money or time. This book falls short in so many ways. The beginning is incredibly boring with terrible writing and lame characters. I stuck with it because the book won so many accolades. The middle got good for a while but the plot that was woven became hard to believe and dull. Then the ending was just horrific. I would not recommend this book to anyone!
I usually only get books at the library. I'm frugal, ok cheap.  But really wanted to read this and the wait list was ridiculous.  So I ponied up the dough and bought the ebook.  Good, though a bit unbelievable story.  Then the ending just out right sucks.  I was so mad that I invested the time and money. I don't want to spoil it, but seriously, the ending was unacceptable.
Cheap, predictable plot which could've taken an interesting turn or two in a couple of places but didn't, and the back-and-forth narrative at the end was like death by a thousand papercuts.  I kept thinking, ""end already!""  I was foolishly hoping the much-touted twist would come on the last page, but no luck.  The characters weren't particularly interesting, either.  Blah.
I did not finish this book although I attempted to - got to page 66 with much and just could not go any further - very very poorly written and I spent money to purchase it - will sell it at my next yard sale or give it away!  I am an avid reader and I am shocked that this story stayed on the Best Seller Fiction list let alone even got there - who did the author pay??
I don't know what the fuss was about, a very mediocre read
I'm sorry I read this book. I loathe the day Ipicked it up
What an awful book about insane and awful people.  I rushed to the end to get it over.  This is not a case of a marriage gone wrong, but a case of a truly psychotically insane person.  I have great difficulty understanding why it could be so popular.  There is something very wrong with a society that thinks this is a good read.  I wouldn't recommend it to anyone.
I read this book because it made a few ""Top Books of 2012"" lists and for the life of me I do not understand why.  Neither lead character has any redeeming qualities; I did not care about either of them, so the story never sucked me in.  Even if I step back and compare it to other books written about dysfunctional people, it pales by comparison. Very disappointed!
I haven't read a novel in a long time and decided to try this. It was very disappointing. The story is ridiculous and the mechanics are so bad that you have to wonder how anyone found this entertaining. I like smart. I like clever. This was neither. The ending is totally absurd. I wonder if the author just got tired of writing and just wanted to be done with it.
Life is too short to read a bad book, and a bad book it is. The plot is complete BS, it contradicts itself and most of it is actually difficult to read---because it's so flaky. If you like books with substance and at least one character with one admirable quality then you run away from this book right now. Because this trash has nothing for the smart reader.
Did not like the book although it has been a best seller and received rave reviews! It was a disjointed story of a sour marriage with no purpose except manipulation on the part of the wife! She should laid to him straight as to what she thought without all the bulls***! It's why people hate each other--husbands and wives refuse to level with each other!
I would not recommend this book.  Way too wordy, chapters go on and on without telling you anything new *constant repeat ... and if the author took out all of the foul language the book would be 2 chapters shorter.  Really crappy ending ... what a waste of time reading this book.  Very disappointed, I don't know how it ever made the best sellers list.
Oh my gosh! I really enjoyed the fist half of this book. Then towards the end I waited and waited and waited and NOTHING! I can not believe a book would end like that. Such creative writing at the beginning and then NOTHING, and I'm easy to please. I enjoy all of my free kindle ebooks! I wish I would have purchased the actual book so I could burn it!
I had heard over and over about how great this book was. Really?  I haven't been so ticked off in a long time to waste money on something like this book.  It was difficult to get through and at the end I really did not care about a single person in the book. If the preview thing is available, do that first because it never gets any better than that.
Heard this was good so I bought it (don't usually pay this much for a book). Beginning was intriguing, but the rest of the  time I was thinking how twisted and sick this story line was. Usually you get into a book because you can relate to the characters. Tried to sympathize with both and couldn't do it. Both were in my opinion weak and unlikeable.
I utterly despised all the characters in this novel.  I am a voracious reader of all types and can't think of another book where I had no empathy for any of the characters introduced and not incidental.  I read faster and faster hurrying to reach the end and hoping for a miracle!  A miracle that would snuff the main protagonists at least.  Booooo!
Hated this book.  Did not like the characters in the book and don't know why I read it all the way to the end.  It was recommended to me by someone who really liked it, but I didn't find it either interesting or worthwhile to read.  A friend of mine was reading it at the time that I was and she hated it too and wondered why she finished the book.
I only had to read the first three chapters to figure out I don't like this book. Hateful characters and the dialogue is awful (profanity and crude language really don't make you seem clever, just plain unintelligent). I normally hate putting a book down once I have started reading it, but this is one exception. I have NO desire to continue on.
I did not like this book!  I don't know how others feel,  but when the heroine of the book is a megalomaniacal murderer, I am not enchanted!  It was very well written.  What a shame that Flynn wastes her abundant talent on such a horrifying story!  A monumental waste of time, from my perspective, and the last time I read a book by this author
It had potential, it really did. But once you realize what's really going on, the story gets more and more ridiculous. And the ending..are you kidding me? The whole crazy scenario ends like that? The hype about this book was exaggerated greatly because after the ""great reveal of truths"", it becomes a joke. I wouldn't recommend this to anyone.
I was reading this for my book club.  I couldn't finish it.  It just went on, on and on.  I personally don't like it when a woman writes in first person as a man -- it just doesn't ring true.  The writing was lyrical and poetic but that did not add to the book; I think it was actually distracting.  I can't imagine how this was a best seller.
I wanted this book to end 200 pages earlier. It was disturbing, maddening and infuriatingly unrealistic and deeply unsatisfying at the end.It left me sick at heart, with a stomachache. If our society can produce people as pathetic and evil as she describes, the world is a very dark place indeed.I will not read this author again.
the worst and most implausible ending of a story.  After suffering through the first half of the book things took an interesting turn and I continued reading.  I should've have tossed it and saved myself the time.  Luckily I was on a long flight, so I can feel somewhat okay with having wasted it with this book.  Never another Gillian Flynn.
I kept thinking this book was going to get better. It started out slow...got really weird ...then stranger still and just ended. Absolutely awful. I won't read this author again, nor will I see the movie. (I can usually accept a book for the value it holds even if it isn't really my cup of tea, but not this one...it was just sick & wrong.)
The first half of the book had promise and some of the writing was enjoyable.  Then it felt like she had to come up with an ending and quickly concocted something -  it was just awful.  The second half was so unbelievable and ridiculous and the characters just sort of dissolved.Wish I had the hours back that I spent reading this!!!
I saw the movie and thought it was great. Suspenseful, full of plot twists, and kept my emotions bouncing all over the place. So, on the premise the book is always better, I bought the book.Wrong. Very, very slow. I read about a third of it and it never got my attention. It might get better in the end, but I will never know.
This was the worst book I have read in a long, long time. At the end if left with me a feeling of ""i wasted time reading this"" How it got to be a block buster movie I will never know. Two misfits feeding off each other. It would have been better if husband and wife would have killed each other. Put an end to everyone's misery
About the worst book I have ever read. Some claim the book is so well written. Well, that's no pass in my world. A crazy format, alternating between two dreadful characters, and a dreadful ending do not make for great literature. Like other reviewers, I am so glad I borrowed the book from the library and didn't spend one penny on it.
Really?  People LIKED this book?  These are 2 of the most despicable, unlikeable people on the planet.  I kept reading just because I wanted to see how it ended.  The ending was as warped as the people who starred in this book.  The rocks in her head fit the holes in his perfectly.  I would call this book a monumental waste of time.
With all the ""hoopla"" surrounding the movie, I figured I'd pick up the book at the library and enjoy a good read.  I absolutely hated this book from the get-go.Boring, made very little sense, and the characters were just awful and unrelatable.Will GLADLY be returning this to the library tomorrow.  :(
I read this for a book club and did not enjoy it at all!  Neither of the main characters is sympathetic and it's hard to find supporting characters who are developed enough to redeem the book.  I also found it annoying that even though the story is told from two different characters' viewpoints the ""voice"" doesn't really change that much.Almost everything about this book put me in a bad mood.  I recommend you read almost anything else!
What a HUGE disappointment this book is.  The book started off great.  After I read the big surprise, the book went downhill after that.  Many, many missed/lost/dropped story lines, and opportunities that are just to unbelievable.  The ending is a joke, an insult.  I regret buying this book.  I wish I could get my money back.
It started with 2 characters I didn't like being incredibly uninteresting. Then in the middle it progressed to 2 characters I don't like being semi interesting. It ended with 2 characters doing completely unbelievable things that I didn't care overmuch about as they were both insufferable douchebags in all their incarnations.
Was greatly disappointed in this book. It read like a teen age love story. As a thriller it was greatly contrived and the writing was Dull, Dull, Dull. I do not understand all the great reviews, and could not finish it without a quick scan. When the ""mystery"" of the Gone Girl was solved, it was really hard to believe.
With all due respect to the 5 and 4 star reviewers, I am not sure that I read the same book. I will not get in a long drawn out review as to why this book deserves only 1 star I will just keep it short and sweet. The ending of this book is terrible! I actually set there holding my kindle wondering what just happened. Terrible
I found this book in the recycling bin at work. At first I was really impressed by the wit and flow of the book. I was ready to give it five stars! I wondered why someone would toss this book. Soon it became clear to me why it was put in the bin! Total rubbish! It stopped making sense after the first section. I could not dispend my level of disbelief after that. I find it REALLY strange that it could be going so well and then turn and go so bad.
This book was very engaging...at first. I couldn't put it down. Then, towards the end, it just became way too far fetched. I could poke holes in so many pieces of the story that it just became distracting for me. By the end, I still couldn't put the book down, but only because I wanted to finish it as quickly as possible so I could get it off my Kindle and move on to something better. I recommend not wasting your time on this book.
While this book starts out as a thriller, it soon fades into a poorly written novel. The characters are vapid and egocentric, with few redeeming features. The prose is repetitive, often finding the same words in one paragraph. There is very little that is of value here. Not worth the time with so much else to read.
I am sorry I wasted a whole weekend reading such a depressing book. I know that 3% of the population are sociopaths and manipulating liars but I really don't need to spend my precious time getting into their demented minds. The book gives the message that one cannot survive knowing much less loving such a person.
I bought this book based on the description and all the reviews saying it was so good.  Don't be mislead.  I often get Kindle books for a third the cost and some are quite good.  This one was a huge disappointment and I paid wayyyyyyyyyyyyyy too much.  Story line was bizarre from the beginning but I tried to hang in there.  For half the book, Amy's sections weren't worth reading.  I almost stopped before I got half way.  Then it picked up and got interesting, then a complete tire flat at the end.  Easy to conclude the author may be as disturbed as the character Amy in the book.
A three-headed monster.  The opening is slow and very annoying.  The middle is thrilling.  The ending is a disaster, one of the worst I've ever read in popular fiction.  Flynn writes well but I'm sorry I wasted my time with the book.  I wanted to see what all the fuss was about.  I'm still waiting to find out.
The movie is coming out soon, so I wanted to read the book before seeing it. I am going to skip the movie! This book had a great start and kept me reading. But, when the truth of the story became clear, I was really disappointed in the way the story ended. I probably will not read another novel by this author.
Started out okay..downhill from there. You like this person..then there's a twist and..just felt very contrived. Stopped about halfway and flipped to the end to see if it was worth slogging my way through. It wasn't. It did save me the price of the movie because there's no way I'm going to suffer through that.
I read this on recommendation from a friend..What a mistake.. This is the only book that when I got to the end, I was actually mad I wasted 3 days reading it, even more annoyed at myself for spending money on it.. the end of this book was stupid and I most likely skip the rest of her books.. SO disappointing.
Worst ending of any book I've ever read! *Spoiler*! The movie ends the same way so there'll be even more people out there to hate this book. I can't believe all the 5 star ratings this book has been given, did any of ya actually read the book? Bad start, great middle part and terrible ending. I'm depressed.
This is one of the few books that make me feel as if I need a shower after I've read it.  It really turned my stomach.  There is really only one redeeming character 'Go'.  The protagonists, I ended up by thoroughly disliking both of them.  I don't expect happy endings but i really dislike sleazy ones.
Why this book is so popular is beyond me. Both protagonists are hateful creatures who deserve each other. There is a hole in the plot a mile wide at one point. It is clever with plot twists and changing points of view, but leaves you with a sour taste and no desire to read another book by this author.
This is the most overrated book I have ever read.  It's a total waste of time and money.  The story is bizarre;  the woman is not the least bit interesting.  There were no redeeming qualities in this book.  However, I see that it is on the best seller list;  she must have a wonderful agent/publicist.
Truly unlikable protagonists. I can believe that the sociopath is a sociopath but it is hard to accept that the other character could be such a spineless twit. I found the book so unpleasant that three-quarters of the way through I stopped reading it for several months before finally finishing it.
A waste of money. As a librarian, I have read many books of differing types but could not get into this one at all. I really tried to enjoy it but found it to be BORING at best. I did not find it suspenseful. I could not finish it. In addition, I was really annoyed at all the words in parenthesis such as(He said)and (I, for one, ...). Go to the library and borrow it because it is not worth buying.
The characters were unlikeable.  The plot was nonexistant.  I hated every word I read, but just can't make myself not finish a book I've started.  I kept hoping it would improve, but it didn't.  I don't understand all the rave reviews.  Am I the only reader in the US who didn't like this book?
This is NOT a thriller but kinda twisted love story. If you are looking for a plausible thriller or crime story, don't waste your time on this. The book doesn't require a deeper thinking that it is very easy to finish the book but I still wish that I read something else that is interesting.
Started out interesting.  Horrible ending.  Author decides, she doesn't know how to end the book and says ""oh well, I'll just bring them back home together."" Really Gillian!!FINISH THE STORY NEXT TIME PLEASE!Hate that I wasted my time and gave the author money to read this book.
I cannot believe this keeps on top of the ​charts, I guess its because of the movie being made? The characters are despicable, and there is not one redeeming quality in any of them. I'd give it 0 stars if I was able just to keep you from wasting your hard earned money. Its really that bad.
Many many and better choices to read the destruction of marriage and its participants.  Characters are caricatures.  Nobody really says or thinks ""vino veritastic"" do they?  Trite. And predictable for all their desire to become something they weren't. Waste of good reading time.
My reading time is limited, and I'm really disappointed that I wasted precious time reading this book.  It's mish mashed together, hard to follow, and like other reviewers have stated, I can't believe it actually got published with an ending like that.  Don't waste your time, seriously.
The book had a slow start but was really great through the bulk of it. I loved the twists and turns. I loved to HATE Amy. But what I really hated... I hated, hated, hated, HATED the ending!!! That ended worse than any book I've ever read! Grrrrrrrr! Can I write a new ending for it?
Like the person who reviewed The Girl on the Train and said the train should have run over all the characters.....the train should also have run over Nick and Amy......they are boring, repetitive, and deserve their going nowhere ending.......nothing uplifting lives in this book...
This was interesting reading to start with and then had an incredibly bad ending. I have made a note to myself to avoid reading future novels by Gillian Flynn.  I felt like I had wasted hours of my time for nothing when I finished the book.  One star is too much to give this book.
This book resembles Breaking Bad - it's cleverly constructed and makes you keep turning the page. However, the characters are toxic, unlikable, and, by the end, I didn't care what happened to any of them.Overall, I think the author looks down on humans.***
This is a book that kept me reading, chiefly because it was a book club pick but also because it WAS a page turner that kept me guessing.Then came the end...I hated it!  Had I been reading a paper version and not a Kindle version, I'd have tossed it into the trash.
This is probably one of the worst books I have ever read.  The initial plot is slow to start but does suck you in slowly but surely.  Then BANG the ending is such a let down.  Wish I had read the last chapter first then I would not have wasted my time reading the entire book.
Why the hype?  Why the F-bombs?  Why the dumb plot?  Why the lewd and smutty scenes?  Why did I bother?  Why, Why Why?  It was like picking through a rotten decomposing salad for edible bits, but getting precious little.  Recycling my copy, at least the paper could be reused.
I know this book, and the movie that came out, is popular. I read it on the recommendation of a serious reader friend. As I started the book, I had powerfully negative feelings about the husband. I was positively disgusted by him. As I became introduced to the wife, I was stunned to realize how powerfully negative she was too, and also thoroughly disgusting. I got 2/3 through the book when I came upon a scene that made me realize I had actually read it before. And it seemed as though I had intentionally tried to forget the book because I disliked it so much. I plugged on hoping to have been wrong, since this was recommended by my friend. As if the entire rest of the story wasn't torture enough (oh, but it was!), the ending was the killer. The ending literally left me in a rage! This book seemed to be an exercise in painting the picture of some of the Sickest. Most twisted. Perverted. Psychos. In the world. And then ended with no way out of the nightmare. Just a total waste of my time. In fact, worse than that. Twice now I have spent time putting images in my head that I never wanted or needed. I was able to put much of it out if my mind after the first reading. The second reading has left indelible marks there now. The book truly made me ANGRY. One of the worst things I have ever read, by far. Did I watch the movie? Yes. I can't stand Ben Affleck, so I was delighted to get to see him play such a jerk. Unfortunately he came off somehow nicer in the movie. And I hoped they would change the ending dramatically, as movies often do (which usually pisses me off, but I would have welcomed here). Once again, no such luck. All in all, this only served to teach me I am much more a glutton for punishment than I ever imagined. I would NOT recommend this book. Or the movie. Find something more uplifting. We have enough darkness in the world.
Waited for a while to get the book from the library, but the waiting list was so long, I finally decided to buy one. Figured copies would be showing up in the thrift stores soon, and I was thrilled to get a hardcover for 50 cents and am I glad that's all it cost, because I hated this book! Was intrigued at first, then by the time the husband started revealing his lies, was annoyed. Felt like I was being tricked by his wimpy behavior. And I was so tired of hearing about how ""wonderful"" and ""amazing"" and ""brilliant"" Amy was! We are constantly reminded of how much pressure the poor girl was under (external and internal), to be the ""amazing"" Amy of the stories. I get that this pressure/praise made her the twisted, sick person she was, but how many times do we need to be reminded of this? Maybe the reminders are for everyone else in her life: they, especially her husband, need to remind themselves of how wonderful she is because not-so-deep-down, they already know she is actually a terrible person? I had a feeling Nick's father may have a moment of lucidity & take care of the Amy problem, but no such luck. Unfortunately, I could never manage any sympathy for her. She never came across as more than a superficial, snotty, rich-bitch, and her parents were just plain creepy. I suppose that was intentional, because I got the heavy-handed impression they were the role-model for the Nick & Amy marriage/debacle. The woman controls the hapless man by any means necessary, and who are we to question the methods, because ""who knows what really goes on in a marriage"", etc., etc. Does a disservice to marriage, I think.  And, please, what detective couldn't have solved the crimes? The obvious mistakes in Amys' story of her ""abduction""? All the purchases with credit cards-ever heard of computer traces, time-stamps, etc.?  How could no one notice someone bringing the large number of ""Man Cave toys"" to the sister's shed, including the sister? This is just for starters. And the ending made me ill. Nick had many people listening to his fears, facts, etc., and he is still taken in by Amy? Does he really think they can recover what they lost? And then she's pregnant, even though they have not been together since she returned, as he reminds himself? She has her ""secret weapon"" or whatever-the sperm bank. Even if she used a turkey-baster on herself, she would still have to get the goods from the bank. Could that not be traced? Am I supposed to believe she could engineer this without a trace as well? Everything Amy did could have been torn apart, but it wasn't. Maybe I've read too many crime novels where things are figured out, reasonable conclusions are reached, and people are expected to meet some consequence. This book left me frustrated because I know what they all could do to stop this silly bitch, but no one would do it!!! And what was the deal with that ottoman? Could someone please tell me what was so important about the damn thing? Let me guess-it symbolizes the ""elephant in the room"", or the exposure of ""dark secrets"", maybe man's inability to conquer the darkness of the soul, or some other existential nonsense...AARRGGGHHH!!! Didn't give it back to the thrift store. Figured it would be cruel to pass on to another unsuspecting soul. Shredded it.
First Sentence:  When I think of my wife, I always think of her head.It is the fifth wedding anniversary of Nick and Amy Dunne.  When Nick goes down to breakfast, he finds Amy is missing and the back door open.  Did she run away?  Was she taken?  Or did Nick actually murder her?It is not an auspicious beginning when one starts out intensely disliking the protagonist, followed shortly by an equal dislike for the victim. Two things are required to like a book; at least one character for whom I can feel affinity and knowing that justice is done in the end.  This had neither, except for a couple supporting character and that wasn’t enough.  The book quickly degraded from there.The only redeeming quality to this book is that the disappearance was well done.  Other than that, this is an unpleasant story, about unpleasant people, doing unpleasant things to one another.  Only the twin sister, Go, was at all interesting.As to the plot; about half-way through, the ending seemed predictable.  Hoping my suspicions were wrong, I admit going to the end.  Unfortunately, I was not wrong.  The ending was not only predictable, but illogical and displayed the author’s lack of knowledge.  If this book is supposed to be a look into the minds of men and women, they are people one never wants to meet, let alone know.“Gone Girl” is a book that never should have come in the first place.  Dorothy Parker said it best, “This is not a novel to be tossed aside lightly. It should be thrown with great force.” Had I not downloaded the e-book, it would have been a literal wall-banger.GONE GIRL (Susp - Nick Dunne – MO - Contemp) – NR/DNFFlynn, Gillian – 3rd bookCrown, July 2012
Part 1. On their 5th wedding anniversary Amy disappears from the family home she shares with Nick in Carthage, Missouri.  This part alternates between Amy's diary entry and Nick's narrative of what is happening. Part 2. Amy resurfaces and again we have alternate accounts of Nick in Carthage and Amy in an Ozark motel. Had the novel ended here I would have been content. Part 3 was the resolution. Had this book been written by a man it would have been torn to shreads as a misogynist rant. With the exception of Go, Nick's twin sister, and to a much lesser degree Detective Bony, the women are stereotypes and largely comic characters: Shawna, Andie, Noelle and even Maureen are the kind of small town women looked down upon by so-called sophisticated East Coast professional women; Jacqueline Collinge, the over-protective, indulgent but destructive mother and Ellen Abbott the rabid judge, jury,  feminist daytime tv show host. Even Amy's New York friends are trivialised. The parents of Amy, child psychologists and authors of the Amazing Amy books are depicted as rather bland, stupid people. When a publicity-seeking high profile lawyer comes across as the only person with integrity,  then something is wrong. What is this book supposed to be, thriller, horror, black comedy, satire? I found this book a struggle to read. The language doesn't bother me as it was used to emphasise the difference between the real Amy and Amy of the diary. The characters of Nick, easy-going, non-confrontational, emotionally cold and Amy, spoilt,  intelligent,  vindictive are not easy to like and I didn't like them, especially Amy. I cannot understand the 5 star reviews. Joel Dicker's novel was not well received by many reviewers but his gentle satire on America is funnier than this book. Of course, Flynn is mocking television, Dicker is making fun of Writers, Art, and Nick knows his place, popular culture. This book reminded me of the film, Battle of the Roses, with Kathleen Turner - a film I didn't like. Possibly I have missed something but I think not. A waste of time novel.
I picked this book up on the recommendation of a few people I now know not to trust when it comes to book recommendations.Let's begin with the incredibly juvenile, unimaginative writing.  A diary?  Really?  I realize the need for this pathetic ""device"" in the development of the poor plot, but right away, I was turned off.  A character who writes such drivel in such a manner isn't one I have an interest in.  I would rather read YA novels about characters who might actually write a diary because those would at least have substance and a realistic development of character, not the drippy predictability that fills the pages of Amy's diary.I won't even bother to review Nick since he is a stereotype of a stereotype, and a poor one at that.The ""twist"" I kept hearing that I needed to wait for was so obvious that it hardly deserves the moniker.  The build up to said twist was so incredibly drawn out that I was tempted to flip pages to the ""ah-ha"" (or really, ""ah-duh"") moment just to save myself at least some of the time of my life that I clearly was never going to get back.  But I plowed through, desperate for SOMETHING to like about the book.  No such luck.  By the end of a needlessly long book filled with repetition, I was literally skimming the pages, eyeing the ""time left"" indicator on my Kindle so I knew when I could, with relish, make this twaddle gone from my device and move on to something worth reading.So here is my ""last word,"" which I think I've earned after losing countless hours on reading this book:  if you love reading like I do  and you love the beauty and mystery that CAN be accomplished by writing, run from Gone Girl.
Amy Elliot is a captivating blonde with a razor sharp wit, and a brain like a chess player.  Whatever the situation, Amy has thought it through ten steps ahead of anyone else.  She is a writer, her Amazing Amy series of teen books has made her wealthy, but the popularity of those books are on the wane, and Amy now writes quizzes for magazines.  She meets Nick Dunne at a party in New York City, and the two hit it off immediately.  Nick is her equal,  he is also a writer, they share a similar wit, charm and level of intelligence, and the two eventually get married.  They are deliriously happy for the first two years of their marriage, but then both lose their jobs in the economic downturn, and they move to Missouri to take care of Nick's ailing mother.  Nick wants to open a bar, called the Bar, with his sister Margo, and asks Amy to borrow the money to get the bar going.  All of these things put a strain on their marriage, and suddenly, after the bar has opened, Nick seems cold and distant to Amy.  The coldness eventually turns to verbal and physical abuse.  Finally, on their fifth wedding anniversary, Amy disappears.  Who is responsible?  Is it Nick?  Is it Desi, Amy's ex, who may have raped her? Was it Hillary Handy, Amy's girlfriend who seems to be obsessed, with her?  Was it Margo, who's never liked Amy?  Was it Nick's father?  A raving Alzheimer's patient, who despises women?This book is intriguing, in that it gives you both sides of the story of Nick and Amy, from both of their perspectives, and that's rare in a murder mystery.  But along comes the plot twist, and the reveal of what happens to Amy, from there the book goes completely off the rails.  First of all, the story of what happened to Amy is fairly ludicrous, and Ms. Flynn strains credulity repeatedly with this plot twist.  She doesn't do any favors to any of her characters.  Nick is portrayed as a self-absorbed prima donna, and Amy's character is absolutely trashed after the disappearance.  What the author does to Amy is almost criminal, she has taken an appealing, warm, quick witted and charming person, and turned her into someone unrecognizable, and certainly not likable.  So where to go when the book has no true protagonist, trash the media of course.Actually, the author does a pretty good job of describing the media hoopla over such a case, and even puts in an over the top Nancy Grace type character screaming for Nick's head in a noose every day.  But the high powered lawyer that Nick hires to free himself from the charges is pretty much standard issue stuff, nice suit, phony smile, no depth.  And the ending is disappointing as well, the book seems to be building up to a climax, and then just limps to the ending.  What is most disappointing is that it seems like women authors seem to have trouble writing strong, intelligent, women characters.  My favorite female character in any novel continues to be Jane Eyre, and that was written by Charlotte Bronte in 1847.  I've read a lot of books by female authors since then, and not one of the female characters in any of those books measures up to Jane Eyre.  That's a sad commentary on how women are written in contemporary literature.For more book and movie reviews, visit my blog reviewswithatude@wodrdpress.com
What this book lacks is character growth.  The style is interesting, with two voices alternating, one if which we learn is false, followed by the true voices of the main characters in part 2. The twist in the middle is a coin flip to figure out; like all mysteries the author simply withholds the information you need to ""solve"" the mystery. But the very anticlimactic ending is very I satisfying because neither character GROWS. What is the point of investing many hours slogging through a novel if the protagonists remain unchanged from beginning to end? Answer: none. I wish I'd never read this book.Spoiler alert!  So the villain wins, I can live with that. Some of the best books I've read involve the hero making a crucial mistake and paying a heavy price. But this hero, Nick, loses his nerve and then loses it some more.  Near the end he seems to be growing a spine and then it turns to jello. Amy weaves a poisonous web, allows her victim to survive, but traps him forever.  She is evil from beginning to end, he is a coward from beginning to end. Ugh! ONE of them needs to change in some way! Ms. Flynn, I was going to read your other two books but this has out me off for good. And of course the man is spineless and weak...smacks of blatant misandry!Some readers may feel that the revelation of information along the way, such as Amy faking her own disappearance or Nick revealing his affair, represent character growth, but it does not.  No matter what point in the book you choose, both Nick and Amy would react exactly the same way to a plot development.  AS, for that matter, would the investigating cops, Nick's lover, Amy's parents, Nick's sister...everybody.  Nobody learns anything in this book...most of all, the reader!  So sorry I read it.
When Gillian Flynn popped up on a super-serious Sunday morning talk show a week or two ago (a show mostly devoted to politics) and was heavily praised from a well-known veteran newsman, well, you know that a novel has gone into the special category of ""ubiquitous."" There are more than 4500 review on Amazon to date and the four-star and five-star ratings far outweigh all others.I'm only posting a few sentences as a cautionary note to any potential reader--mostly because ""Gone Girl"" requires a major investment in time.There are two main issues I have with ""Gone Girl"" and they both deal with the plot's plausibility. Sure, writers stretch storylines all the time.  Suspending disbelief is part of the fun of reading, correct?  So this just deals with my preference level, when I'm shaking head in wonder.  I suspended for a bit, then found myself free-falling and, ultimately, crashing hard.You can find plenty of spoiler-riddled plot descriptions elsewhere but the basic premise of ""Gone Girl"" is that a wife stages her own disappearance to look like a possible murder, to put her husband in deep jeopardy. He's not the prince you might think he is at the outset.The biggest leap you have to make toward the end of ""Gone Girl"" is that after all this work and trouble and months of constructing an intricate scenario and with everything working as she planned, that she would (spoiler alert!) return. What the...?  The scene that inspires her to return? A head-shaker.The second biggest leap you have to make is that in the middle of the book she is hiding out / hanging out at a motel and has several encounters with others at the facility--extended encounters--and doesn't get recognized, even though her ""disappearance"" and potential murder have reached the level of national news.  Yes, she's added a few pounds and let herself go, but, really? ""Hard to swallow"" doesn't begin to cover it.""Gone Girl"" didn't just jump the shark, for me, it jumped the whole ocean.  I was completely suckered into the plot at the beginning. At the outset of reading ""Gone Girl,"" I told a few friends that it was good--so far.  I sailed right past my 100-page rule (when I would normally set something down if it doesn't appeal to me).  As I said, I was pulled in.And then the plot began blowing up.  In the end, the implausibility factor hit new levels of gawking disbelief. Read only if, well, you absolutely ""must.
If I had testicles they would be blue. Characters were annoying, plot left a lot to be desired and the ending was lackluster and hard to swallow. I wanted to stop reading this book so many times but kept on just to see if ANY of the characters would get what was coming to them. But no, didn't happen and regret not putting the book down after the first few chapters.
I was glued to this book for an entire week, unable to put it down, so curious how it would end. Then I got to the end and couldn't believe how lame it was. So disappointed !! Don't waste your time or money on this huge disappointment of a story. I'm so irritated about it.
I bought this book to read for a book club but I'm really sorry that I did. I hated the writing style, hated the characters and truly despised the ending. It seemed like the author just gave up in the last 25 pages. I certainly won't be buying anything else by this author.
I hate author who don't take the time to finish a book. They don't consider I spent my money, gave up my time, some nights sleep but they don't think enough of me to conclude come to a conclusion to there book.  Would never invest my time in another of Gillian Flynn book.
I am an avid reader especially when it comes to mysteries.  I waited for 4 months to get this book from the library and when it finaly was available I couldn't wait to read it.  It was the most boring and dragged out novel I have read it a long time.  The build up from reviews had grabbed my interest to read it but now I wish I had let it slip through my fingers.
This book is pure nonsense. The author appears to be so engrossed by the 'complex' psychology of her characters, that she fails to even consider the 'detective' aspect of the narrative. A little bit of concerted investigation on the part of the police officers could have easily uncovered any number of holes in Amy's story. And the ending - oh come on, really?
I have nothing positive to say about this book - because there was nothing positive about the story or the writing.  I read it for my book club otherwise I would never have finished it.  The author has a very negative view of humanity, what was her point in writing it?
I saw the twist coming from the beginning, but in my versions there was much more depth and detail. And as everyone has said the ending is poor. Over half of the book is dedicated to setting up the story to begin, less than 10% is for the poor excuse for a resolution.
I was so disappointed in the book. Honestly - I didn't care for the readers or their crappy ""accents"" either.The whole thing dragged on, and I kept thinking... This has to get better... WRONG. Terrible ending. Can't believe all the hype of this ridiculous book.
This book had 14,000 ""fairly good"" reviews so I bought it...now I wish I could get my money back.Only buy it if you want to waste your money and if you have nothing better to do with your time. Also there is absolutely no ending...what's up with that!I guess I better stop counting on people knowing good literature because this clearly isn't!
I couldn't even finish this book because I couldn't even keep up with her writing half the time I didn't even know what she was talking about. She's all over the place. The same thing over & over page after page, drags it out! Would not tell anyone about this book.
Oh my god did I struggle with this.. I was told there was a great twist so that kept me reading but I soon realized it wasn't that great!! I won't even start on the absolutely stupid ending that had me wondering what the hell any1 would get from reading this book
All over the map and the ending was crazy
What a disappointing book.  You pretty much know exactly what's going to happen from the first few chapters.  You just don't know how.  Story of people you never have any compassion for and really don't care how it unfolds because you can't relate to either one.
I don't care how many copies it sold. Flynn writes like my freshman English class students. Oh, and she thinks the language of Barcelona is Spanish. Oops! An epistolary novel with no likable characters. You have to wonder what anybody saw in it. A complete bore.
The concept of this book was good. The execution fell short. I predicted the ""plot twists"" and didn't even want to finish the book. I finished the book just to see how it ended. I actually liked the ending but the whole book could have been done better.
Books like this are why I seldom read bestsellers.I have to have some affection or respect for the characters. I have none for these. Bitter, angry, spoiled, narcissistic - you name it.Not worth the $4.99 I spent for the Kindle edition.
It was a page turner, I'll give it that. The plot was twisting and turning every which way but I just felt like it could have been 200% better if she had used a more expressive vocabulary. Just something was missing. And not to say the ended completely sucked.
This book started out with an interesting premise;however the author failed to make any of the characters the least bit likeable. In my opinion, that is vital to keep the reader interested. I plodded through to the end of the book, hoping to see justice done, but again, the author failed me.  I doubt I'll read any of this author's other books. Unfortunately, I am having serious trouble finding good books -- way too many poorly written books get rave reviews.
After hearing people raving about how great the book was I bought a copy.  I finished it but I found it quite slow and drawn out and the ending was just stupid.  I personally did not think it was all that good and I would not be recommending it to my friends.
I'm pissed off I read this book.  It has mediocre writing and the plot is all too predictable.  The ending strings it perfectly into a sad money sucking series which will seduce the minds and pockets of poor beach readers.  Don't waste your time on this book.
At first I couldn't put my Kindle down. The book was soo great. (I even began  recommending it to my friends.) I finished it the other day. Booo!!! I was so let down by the ending. I think I want to write an alternate ending just to make myself feel better.
I was surprised how poorly written this book was considering all the fanfare about it. I guess I just don't get these kind of books. It was wildly unbelievable, boring for the first half and then ended with a thud. I would not recommend this book to anyone.
What a terrible book.  A friend recommended it and my sister also read it; both of them enjoyed the book.  I was so bored and hated all of the characters so much I hardly wanted to finish the book.  I finally did and I can't believe I wasted my time on it.
I read everything but couldn't get through this book. I ended up reading the last few pages just to get it over with. I wanted to read it before seeing the movie, but now have no desire to see the film because I so disliked the book. What a waste of time!
This is the first negative review that I have written because I usually like most books.  Though I wanted to like this book because it had a bizillion positive reviews, I could not get past the offensive language.  I thought I could, but I just could not.
This is a book without any characters that I find even remotely interesting and certainly not in the least sympathetic.  While the plot is revealed in an interesting way, the reader may also feel deceived and manipulated.  I wish that I had never read it.
i only finished this story because i had spent good money on it .  the story was long tedious and at times quite boring  throughout the whole laborious read my only thought was .... who was the bigger jerk .. the husband or the wife .  big waste of money.
It just okay, not great, just okay, well almost. This reader enjoyed the first eighty pages and then got bored with the next two hundred. By the time the reader got to page three hundred he was completely hooked, but then, the ending sucked! The reader felt as though the book deserved a cataclysmic finished with all that happened, but it was an almighty let down. Also, the people who stole the money got off too lightly when, facing a psychopath, there would have been all hell to pay for. But that's really only a side issue, anyway. The main point was that it was a way too long with my edition being 560 pages!  It was probably the fully unedited version with a fair bit sex and confronting language which actually suited the story, but most people, if confronted with being bored at about page 250, they would've probably given up. The version would have been better if the chapters were much shorter and the novel being restricted to about 430 or so pages which would be a whopping 130 pages shorter! Consequently, the book didn't and couldn't give this reader any sense of it being a thriller. This reader was glad that he stuck with it, but to be honest, it wasn't a great read. It was a bit of a slog and for a long period and this reader kept flicking pages, speed reading, counting pages read and then counting pages not read. It didn't maintain my interest. After all, it took me about 300 pages to become interested in the story. So, I am very surprised that it got so many positive reviews. (It was probably for the shorter 432 page edition). But, it doesn't get a positive one from me. This story only gets one star.
I really enjoyed this book until the end.  It was interesting, great twist in the middle.  And then the worst ending in any book I have ever read.  I wouldn't read another book by this author or see this movie unless the ending changed.  What a letdown.
I read the whole thing- I'm sorry I did. Part 1 was mysterious. Did he do it? What does he know? The rest of the book just gave me bad feelings, bad energy deep in my core. What a terrible read - what evil energy was created from these two characters.
These characters are so poorly drawn. There is no depth. The twists have been done so many times before and so much better by many others. Read the first hundred pages. Drop in again on 255. Finish up with the last 50 or so.  You won.'t miss a thing.
Horrible ending! Complete waste of time once you reach the conclusion. Can't believe it is a best seller. I would like my money back if that were possible. The story was engaging however unbelievable it is but the ending undoes the entire experience.
Written in a two person perspective, like separate memoirs, an unemployed journalist named Nick Dunne is a typical male. He's a selfish guy's guy and a philanderer. A man who should never have married. His wife, Amy Dunne is a spoiled socialite brat and manipulative lying sociopath. Together they are toxic. When Amy discovers that Nick is cheating on her, she spends over a year coming up with the perfect plan to undo him and succeeds. She stages her own abduction and possible murder, for which Nick is charged only to return some time later acting as though nothing has happened. What she does to those who she encounters along the way is beyond ridiculous. Once safely home again, she threatens to tear his life to shreds if he leaves her thus, the coward that he is, stays.None of the characters are likable or believable. They're all as soulless and as hollow as the stars. Calling them characters, is a stretch. The situations are too perfectly contrived and executed, and the writing is tedious and wordy. The police are portrayed as bumbling idiots as though they are unable or unwilling to search for the truth. The author would like you to believe that the character was that good.I'm a fast reader and normally finish a good book in an afternoon or a day. I spent there weeks on this one, unable to continue for more than a few minutes at a time.I find it difficult to understand how this book made the top ten when it should have never gone past the publisher's waste bucket.Like Nick Dunne was coerced by his wife into deleting his novel, so should have this author.
If I could give this a minus star I would. Very slow to begin but since they were making movie I kept with because I through it must have some merit. A total waste of time and a absolutely terrible ending. Will not trust another book by this author.
I only read it after the EW cover story on the upcoming movie.  While it is a well crafted story, I did not like it.  It is full of hatred and violence and unfortunately does not have a sense of redemption at the end.  Not sure I will see the movie.
Boring Book - When you have finished the book which was a real chore, you feel like the human race has sunk into some kind of dark hole.  Every character is weak, lazy, selfish etc.  The back and forth dialog was very repetitive and rather childish.
What a waste of my time. Who doesn't know that ""it's important to you and me"" is proper grammar. There is no such thing as a perfect murder and in real life this would have been very different. Disappointed that I spent money and time on this book.
I have never read a book where I had no sympathy for any of the characters. I ended up hating all of them. I read the book because I kept hearing how everyone liked it. I had to finish the book just to see how it ended. Personally I hated the book.
wish I would have read some of these reviews before buying. I read about 100 pages and had to stop. I just didn't like it. only bought it because movie looks so good. i'll still see movie, I hope its better than the little bit of this book I read.
Do not like to read a book where I can find no characters with and redeeming qualities. Hope this is not based on people the author knows. I was very disappointed with it, forced myself to finish because I kept thinking it was going to get better!
I can hardly believe this is a popular book. To me the whole thing was sick, really sick. Amy is a sociopath and instead of being caught in the end her husband gives in to her. It left me with an awful feeling. Don't waste your money on this one.
The plot is driven by the character development and endless detail.  Unfortunately the characters are neither likable or believable. The ending adds to the disbelief and it is a relief that the inevitable finally happens and the torture is over.
I think the book is highly overrated.  I did not enjoy reading Gone Girl.  In fact, I had to force myself to keep reading.  The story line had zero interest to me.  The characters and the games they played were ridiculous.  Not my kind of book.
Didn't like the characters, didn't like author's writing style - just as self aborbed as her characters - and stopped reading at half way mark. Only do that with about one in one hundred books. Don't go looking for ""Gone Girl.""  What a waste.
Has no literary qualities. The journal entries become monotonous. The subject matter is trite. I burst out loud laughing as I read each page in last quarter of book had "" psycho bitch"" on it. A true waste of eye movements and my mind
I kept waiting for something to happen and nothing did.  I finish every book I open with the exception of this one. I skipped to the last chapter.. That's something I never do.  This was a tediously written book and it deserves my one star.
This was the first book I've read by this author.  What a waste of time! Just dumb.  Got me hooked at the beginning, but started rambling with twists and turns that didn't make sense.  And the end!  Wow!  Don't waste your time on this book.
This book was terrible.The flashback style from the viewpoint ofdifferent characters was very confusing, simply alazy way to structure a novel.There were no characters to root for, so in the endI didn't care.
Awful. Would not recommend to anyone.
I should have read not only some positive reviews but negative reviews. Ended up disgusted with myself for spending the time reading this book. The ending lacks redemption, and I sat there thinking - ""This is it? The best the author can do."" I planned to see the movie, but not any more. Done with this.
I hated the ending. In fact, this is the worse ending I have ever read, and I read close to a 1000 books. My high moral compass could not accept how the book ended. I know it's only a book but that is how I feel. I agree with the reviewer who said don't paid for the Kindle version, get it at the library.
This is the worst novel I have ever read -- and, I really don't know why I gave it more than my usual 100 pages. The plot of a dysfunctional marriage entered into by two nut jobs is highly improbable and simply not credible. I have given only one star for this review but I do not believe it deserves any!
First it took me at least 5 tries to get through this book. When I finally did, all I could think of was what a waste of my time.I just don't see how this book made it to and stayed on the best seller lists. Probably read by the same people who thought 50 Shades of Grey was a well written book.
I was not impressed with the pace of the story and the continued use of the F word throughout.  I did not finish the book as the repetition attempted to stretch the story into nothingness.  I will not waste my money on the movie.
I tend to pick the books that I read based on customer reviews since they're usually the most honest. This was not the case with this title. I read it based on it's status in the best seller section on amazon but this may be the worst ending to a book that I have ever encountered. She just stopped writting. Horrible. Not even good enough in the meat of it to make up for that kind of ending.
I've heard nothing but good things about this book and after listening to various coworkers rave about it I had to read it. So I got it on CD to listen to during my commute. This goes to prove that just because ""everyone"" loves something it doesn't mean I will.I got three tracks into the first CD and I had to give up. I don't know whether it was the excruciatingly in-depth mental process of the main character or the narrator's pendantic style of address but this book is not for me.
I have been reading all genres of books for over 50 years. This is the first book I have ever read that I totally disliked the main characters. There was no one to root for. Terrible ending. My favorite genre of books is mystery and I love twists and turns, but this was just awful. Awful!
Why is it that the worst books end up getting the greatest hype? There is so much great fiction out there that never gets noticed or even bought probably, and then there's crap like this. I'm not finished with the book so I can't speak to the ending. But what I've read seems to be a circular journey into the snide thought processes of the protagonists.The author's tone reminds me of Sylvia Plath without the suicidal tendencies but the same snide, hateful, and judgmental sentiments about other people. All the characters with redeeming qualities in this novel, namely Amy's parents and Nick's mother and possibly the boyfriend, are mocked as clownish for their happiness, kindness, and thoughtfulness. (Okay, the boyfriend is way too clingy, but...)No redeeming qualities, neither protagonist seems to have learned anything to better themselves or evolved positively in anyway. It's just s tortured journey into the narcissistic mind. I cannot believe someone actually made this mess into a movie.By the way, marriage IS work. It IS about compromise. If you're too selfish to do that, then don't get married. Maybe that's a message the author is trying to send. If so, there are much more powerful ways to convey that message.If you want to read an author who knows how to write characters and plot in a fulfilling way, read anything by Alicia Rasley. She's a master.
I found it slow moving and boring.
I read the whole book in two days...couldn't put it down! I was enthralled, right up until the last sentence. I won't put in a spoiler, but for such a great read the ending was extremely aggravating. Very disappointed.
I bought this book because of the reviews.  It did not hold up to the promise and at times was long winded and boring.  But I persevered till the an unbelievable end.  My first book by this author and probably my last.
ugh... I've never read a book where the ending was that nothing happend. It's as if the author, herself, got tired of trying to figure out what ""should"" happen, and decided that it was easier to simply stop writing.
Started with high expectations struggled through till last chapter. Just words on paper characters superficial and one dimensional.Not unlike watching a 3D movie with out the special glasses. How this book became a best seller is a mystery,more intriguing  than the novel.
If I could give this book zero stars, I would. Because I hated it.When I read a book, I need to feel a connection to the characters, and while I don't want to imply that the characters of Amy and Nick weren't developed (they were), I was completely unable to relate to either one of them. This is primarily due to the fact that I'm neither a psychopath nor a narcissist.In truth, I hated this book from the get-go (when Bleecker ""escaped"") and kept right on hating it through to the very last page (I very nearly tossed the paperback into the trash after reading its concluding paragraph). The ending of this novel left me feeling queasy; to think that people this evil exist in the world is disturbing, to say the least.And so, that being said, you see that Gone Girl is being sold for a reasonable price on Amazon and even qualifies for free shipping, you:  a) Add the item to your cart. It's not really that expensive, after all, and you'll only waste a fraction of your life reading it.  b) Spend a moment considering the cost: ""The paperback is less than ten dollars, but the library's copy is free... If I borrow rather than buy, I'm  only losing hours, not dollars.""  c) Opt to read something else; there are waaaaay better books out there than Gone Girl.Answer: C, no doubt about it
Well, not trash bin, but definitely returned to my local library with a sigh of relief because I didn't spend a dime on it.Warning, spoilers. I WILL give away the ending.Gone Girl is a joke, readers. You'll need a good sense of humor (and of the absurd) to enjoy it. Flynn writes OK. She's like some chess players I met back when I used to play chess: good opening borrowed from some Grand Master, not-so-solid middle game where the problems of playing your own game pile up, total disaster in the end-game. This is the second (and last) novel by her that I read and both were destroyed by her disastrous construction of the final third, helped a lot by the inconsistencies in the rest of the book. In Gone Girl, Flynn gives us a psychopath (Amy) married to a doormat (Nick). She frames him for her apparent murder because he comes up short and is not Mr. Perfect all the time, and mostly because he cheated on her. Divorce? Never! Our Amy stages her own ""murder"" and then runs away. And it's perfect only because Flynn wants it to be. Everything that turns on chance (and most of Amy's plan revolves around chance), turns out Amy's way. Not because of logic, but because Flynn wants it. Amy planned long: she bought a car through Craigslist, far from her home. Where did she park it all that time? We don't know. How did she reach it by foot undetected by anyone at 8 AM? WDK. Under whose name did she register it? WDK. At one point she muses that if she's stopped by a cop the game is up because her ID will prove she's alive and hubby is innocent, so she doesn't have fake ID's with her, so the car should be under her name, so this should be easy to trace, but the cops don't do it. That's just one example. Another: Her hubby, a movie buff who supposedly knows a lot about movies, doesn't recognize the Punch and Judy marionettes from the classic film ""Charade,"" where a guy who's supposedly dead is killing men who wronged him. Another: Hubby finds the marionettes in a shed, together with a lot of incriminating items that Amy has left there for the cops to find. He has days to get rid of the stuff little by little. He knows that there is something even more incriminating hiding under the pile of stuff; he just won't touch anything but doesn't get rid of it. And of course it all comes back to bite him. The man knew by then that Amy had faked her death and wanted to see him executed and still did nothing: a doormat by grace of the author, who wanted such a character. He tells the readers he hates her; he wants to choke her, to smash her head. And when she returns home and cleverly confesses to him all she did, including murdering a man who helped her, and the cops can't touch her, what does Nick do? He stays with her because ""she can hurt him if she wants to."" When she announces she's pregnant thanks to Nick's frozen sperm (yes, we just crossed over into ""All My Children"" and ""General Hospital"" territory), Nick destroys the tell-all book he was writing and decides he'll be the best husband in the world for his Amy and the best dad for his kid. The End.Clearly Flynn loves her Amy. She's a tongue-in-cheek psychopath who can kill with the best, writes a mean Diary, misleads, deceives, plots, and enjoys a good foot-rub. But is it all possible just as Flynn wrote it? Maybe. Is it probable? No. The cops and the FBI have nothing on Amy who murdered her benefactor saying ""he"" kidnapped her and kept her for weeks as a sex-slave in his mansion. But she met the man in a casino (cameras everywhere) weeks after her disappearance! She wore a bad disguise, but that is a blot in her perfect plan. This woman will break her own bones to get back at a friend who didn't pay her enough attention, but immediately forgets two grifters who forcibly take all her money when she was in hiding: not even a hint of revenge. Nick will spend the rest of his life, or at least the next 19 years from the pregnancy on, worried that one of these days she will be dissatisfied with him and murder him or break him like she did everyone else close to her, but he's all right with that and nothing, nothing in the rest of the book has told readers that Nick is that much of a doormat. He's stupid at times and less intelligent than his wife all the time, but not suicidal. However, he wants so much to be around Nick Jr., he'll suffer a good dose of Abused Husband Syndrome just to be a dad.Abused Husband. There's role reversal, of course. Clever of Flynn. The psycho is female, the idiot who stays with the psycho betting his life ""for the good of the child"" is male. We know about women who stay in abusive situations because of their children, or despair, or lack of options, or love, or idiocy (he's not that bad; he really loves me; he beats me up only when I deserve it). Here, Flynn gives us a guy who willingly stays in a deadly relationship with a viper so that he can be close to the future bundle of joy. And he likes it.Gone Girl is a joke, and the joke is on all those people who paid for this book. The rest of us can smile at Flynn, congratulate her on her good fortune, and wonder what an outcry the blurb-writers who praised this novel (The best novel of the year!) would have raised if a contemporary male writer had made his hero refer to women as the t-word, the c-word, and the v-word (can't write the words themselves due to censorship) the way Flynn does several times. I have nothing against the words themselves; it's the perfume of hypocrisy wafting through the air that bothers me a bit. Enjoy.
I just finished ""gone girl"" and I am trying my damnedest to be reasonable with this review, but this is an incredible disappointment. Characters who are caricatures, laughable dialogue (I was giving this the benefit of the doubt...thinking that the author would somehow explain away the fact that her characters spoke in non-stop cliche, like an ""it was all a story in some bored housewife's mind"" scenario, but sadly, no), an utter lack of tension after the first half (what editor would accept that the ""big reveal"" occurs at the halfway point?), despicable people, logical ineptitude (Nick JUST got grilled over the ""murder scene"" with the detectives, yet he walks into another crime scene and starts PICKING UP items? I know this has no relevance in the novel's twisted sense of logic, but come ON), utterly incomprehensible structure (why give the reader so much insight into Amy's mind (from both Nick's perspective and her own) from the beginning? Because of this, I figured she was complicit from a quarter of the way in (the ""clues"" were so snide, there could be no other explanation) and it just got more boring from there...we, as the readers, know she's ""pregnant"" and then 30 pages later it's supposed to be a *shock* when the rest of the world learns that she's ""pregnant""; we know that he's having an affair and then 30 pages later it's *shocking* that he's having an affair, etc., etc.)...there's a great story here but I'll be damned if Flynn knew how to bring it together. I applaud the author for gaining such readership; that this ""novel"" could be recommended to lovers of ""The Secret History"" or compared to Patricia Highsmith's work (Janet Maslin, your opinions are not to be trusted), however, is offensive. After 100 pages, I was actually telling friends how fabulous this book is. By the halfway point I was questioning my initial opinion. Now, having finished it, I'm wondering how I'd wronged those friends who'd recommended it to me.
I have no idea why this execrable novel has garnered such great reviews. There must be more logrolling in publishing than in any other industry.Everyone knows the plot: Amy Elliott Dunne, who was immortalized by her writer parents in a series of children's books, one day goes missing.  Her husband, Nick, almost immediately falls under suspicion as being involved in her disappearance. Search parties are organized, the cops question Nick, clues indicating his guilt appear, Nick goes on talk shows, he is tried in the press, reporters camp outside his house and harass him, a diary of Amy's is found indicating he physically and verbally abused her. Etc. Etc. Etc. All this is related by Amy and Nick in alternating chapters.But guess what! Surprise, surprise--Amy hasn't really been abducted! She cleverly staged her disappearance by faking the crime scene and leaving clues--as well as a fake diary--the cops would find that would implicate Nick. (We know how clever she is because she reminds us ad nauseum throughout her part of the narrative.) Why did she do this? Well, it turns out she's a sociopath. A beautiful, albeit quite looney woman who is trapped in an unhappy marriage to a philandering cad of a husband.Sound interesting? It's not! It's boring! The characters are dull, one-dimensional, and completely unlikeable. You'd think a raving lunatic would spark a bit of interest--but Amy does not. Everyone she knows is beneath her contempt: Her chic New York friends, the salt-of-the-earth midwest types she meets when her husband forces her to relocate to Missouri prior to her ""disappearance."" Her parents. Everyone. No one escapes a snarky remark. This gets old quickly. And the cops who interview Nick are just cardboard cutouts of real cops--as if the author watched one episode of Law and Order to get a feel for how the police would investigate a crime.And then there's Nick. The only thing he can do is fall victim to Amy's evil machinations, meanwhile complaining what a harridan he's married to.Then, of course, there's the amateurish plot development. Example: After Amy frames Nick and disappears, she goes into hiding at an obscure camp with log cabins in the middle of nowhere. And then what happens to this clever woman who managed to frame her husband for her disappearance and faked her death by attending to every last detail she thought would help to cement his arrest? She allows a couple of two-bit hillbillies to steal her hoard of cash she managed to save up! Amy constantly reminds the reader how smart and clever she is, and how stupid is everyone else. So how does she allow this to happen?Amy then enlists the help of a high school beau (he also turns out to be a nut, by the way) who's always been infatuated with her. But to what end? To get back to Nick, whom she now decides has become the husband worthy of her. (She catches him mooning about her on various talk shows).Why did I keep reading? Well, despite the many flaws in the novel, I did want to find out what happened. I really was hoping for a killer ending--no pun intended. Yet another disappointment. The book just ends. Pointlessly. There's no AHA! moment, no one gets her comeuppance, there's no clever plot twist that made this whole ordeal worthwhile. Nothing. And I mean nothing!Gone Girl is a bad novel. It is not a thriller or a whodunit. It's an overlong dissection of a marriage between two uninteresting people, one of whom happens to be a sociopath--but a boring one. There is nothing to recommend about it. It is a complete waste of time and paper. I'm annoyed that I spent time reading it, and I'm annoyed at its publication. I am sure other, worthy books remain unpublished because this one managed to make it onto the shelves.Don't waste your time.
Just finished this and yuk yuk yuk. WHY did I even bother? These characters are just so not real. Nothing empathetic about them in the least. Hateful and absurd people. And that ending? Gross. I feel icky now.
I hated this book. The characters were unlikeable and it was poorly written. I finish nearly every book I start but even skipping to the last chapter didn't inspire me to read past chapter four. Not sure what all the reviewers were smoking when they reviewed this book.
It is hard for me to understand WHY this book is a best seller. By the middle of the book you don't like the main characters at all and the ending is just unbelievable. I thought it was a big waste of time.
I couldn't finish this book.  It was too cruel, too mean-spirited, and there wasn't a character in it who was even remotely likeable.  I love reading, and I felt I would be better served using the time it would take me to finish this book by reading a better one.
i kept thinking the story would unfold and lead to something, anything but ends up being a total disappointment. giant waste of time and soooo very sorry i continued to the finish. best left unstarted !
Let me start of this review by saying that I am an adamant Gillian Flynn fan. ""Sharp Object"" is one of my favorite novels. It gave me chills in the best way, and I loved the protagonist. After ""Sharp Objects"" I read ""Dark Places"". ""Dark Places"" was, in my opinion, not as good as ""Shape Objects"", but it was still quite enjoyable.After Flynn's first two novels I was excited to read ""Gone Girl"". There was so much hype around it I was sure the book would be unforgettable. However, I found ""Gone Girl"" to be utterly forgettable. To be fair I only read half the novel before I gave up and threw in the towel. I did not care about the characters in the novel, and I did not care for the plot. I did not want to read about a couples broken relationship. The theme of the novel, to me, was typical and overplayed.I work at a public library and have noticed an odd trend. Every patron I speak with that has enjoyed ""Sharp Objects"" has not enjoyed ""Gone Girl"" and vice versa. I feel ""Sharp Objects"" is more of a cult classic, while ""Gone Girl"" has more potential for success in mainstream society. I do occasion meet individuals that enjoy all of Flynn's works, but I do not meet them often.
If I could delete the last 40 pages of this book, I would give it 4 stars but the ending is so horrible that I cannot in good conscience give a higher rating.After all the hype for 2 years I finally broke down and bought this book. If only I knew Gillian Flynn...I would ask her for a refund (and for the 8 hours of my life I'll never get back).  I didn't just dislike the ending, I HATED it!  There were a million directions it could have gone - the one that was chosen was by far the worst choice.  I was prepared to like it as the beginning was interesting, I thought it was original, the twist it took was good.  But, and I don't say this often, the ending wasn't just bad, it ruined the entire book for me.Don't want to give anything away - although I'm pretty sure everybody and their brother has read it by now - but...if you haven't read it yet and decide to go ahead and read it, at least you've been warned!  I am not somebody who needs to have a book wrapped up in a nice little bow at the end...I was prepared to have bad things happen, but not the ending she chose.  Just tread carefully - and if you are one of those people who like to have a story end on a note of at least a some kind of decent solution then I highly recommend you steer clear of this book.
The book Gone Girl was absolutely the biggest waste of the six dollars and change I paid for it. It's trash. The actual story line is ridiculous and entirely too far fetched. Waste of time and money.
A waste of energy -- written as if for a college seminar, or simply to generate sales.  The characters are hallow, the leads and the supporting cast feel like they're teetering into caricature.  I would have enjoyed a less sanitized version of such a story.  The author (assume Gillian is a woman) isn't creating characters that one feels sympathy, nor are they interesting in their outrageous behaviors  The man makes no sense at all, and the woman is so cardboard like as to be unbearably poorly constructed.  Naif?  Insular?  I suppose this type of work rings well at the cash register but as serious fiction, it's pale and thin.  The insights that the author clearly takes pride in sharing (the attitudes of privilege, of perceptions of those with less than those of privilege, the cunning intellectual and basic word play and machinations of the Amy character) are sanitized, delivered in a clean white room.  Very little about this keenly structured book rings true.  The dirt is combed over and almost sanitized. Just because there are 'bad' things happening, doesn't mean the book is realistic or griping -- there is simply no grit, no reality in this type of writing.  Sadly, feels like a lightweight summer beach read despite what the author intends to be a shocking who-dun-it.
Revenge and loss of self worth seemed to be the focus of this depressing story.  Whatever happened to the inner strength of most people who have job losses and find new success in many amazing ways?
I found the writing style did not keep my interest, and the story line, well, I just could  not even finish this book. I think it is poorly written, and did not in any way hold my interest. Disappointing. I cannot recommend ""Gone Girl"" to anyone.
I felt completely unsatisfied with this book.  Not that life must always be tied up in neat little packages, but this was such a disappointment.  Much like J.K. Rowling's Casual Vacancy.  Too bad.
This book started off strong but soon became a frustrating disappointment.  The premise is good, but the story goes on and on and on and the situations become more and more absurd.  I stuck it out to the end, but by that time, I wanted my money back.
I cannot recall reading a book which dissappointed me more.  There is absolutely nothing to recommend it.  Much of the book was predictable; the rest was inconceivable.  I don't understand the good reviews but I certainly second the bad ones.
If you took out the f word and all its derivatives the book would have been 100 pages shorter.  Why??? Totally unnecessary.  Flynn either has a limited vocabulary or assumes the readers do.
Excruciatingly awful to read, completely unbelievable characters. I couldn't finish it it was too terrible..... From the other reviews I'm glad I didn't waste any more time reading this.
I just finished reading Gone Girl, actually forced myself to complete the book.  It was nonsense, poor dialog,insipid story line which was hardly suspenseful.I believe that real people don't act and think like these two did. (Hopefully).
I know everyone loves this book but ""eh"" I do not.  I found it frustrating an elementary. If I stopped when I wanted to and didn't finish, it wouldn't have made a difference.
This book really had me totally intrigued until the very lame ending. I hope the movie is better as I hear it has a different ending but this is the first and the last Gillian Flynn book I will ever read. What a let-down.
Wow what a completely lousy ending.  All that build-up for the author to just lamely give up and end the book without an actual ending!  I am sorry  I ever bought the book.
This book was depressing and morbid.  The main characters were no sympathetic.  However, not as bad as ""Dark Places.""  I will never get another book by this author.
I cannot believe I wasted 3 evenings on this book...almost stopped reading it several times- but thought gotta be a fab ending based on all the ""buzz"" this book has gotten. So much defied credibility . I mean seriously $200000+ credit card purchases which means easily available receipts & no one - not the police detectives not his expensive lawyer ever bother to go see if any of these sales people even remember ever seeing Nick. Small town I mean come on-there would be many who remembered her making purchases of specific items. I found myself talking out loud to no one- great big ""ah come on really????"" And then that lame sadly pathetic cheating the readers Non-ending. I only wish I had been reading an actual hard cover & not on my kindle. At least I could have thrown the book at the wall. Utterly frustrated reading experience- will not be reading her books again AND SO SO glad I did not purchase others as I was going to-based on the fuss over this when I purchased this. I am still angry an hour after finishing it- like the other reviewer said (&something I did not know) when Ms Flynn got stuck with no idea how to end it she just should have shelved it. But to each his own because it does seem lots enjoyed it- So again just one disappointed readers opinion- so please if you read this and disagree w/any of my review remember "" to each his own"" & happy new year all.
This is the most slow moving, and neurotic book I've ever read.  I couldn't stay at that pace after reading almost half I skipped ahead to find it totally outrageous.
The writer obviously ran out of words - ended abruptly and stupidly.  My opinion (such as it is), could have been a grand book had the writer given thought to ending.
Enjoyed reading it but found the ending pathetically thin n abrupt! Don't think Gillian Flynn is my kind of author. I gave it one star and that is with alot of grace!
This won't be a good review.  It's an opinion and nothing more.I read this book because I had a lot of time on my hands with the flu, but I had no idea of what it was going to be like.  Had I known, I'd never have read it.  Human curiosity had me wanting to read the ending; yes, my own stupid choice. Next time I'll listen more to my gut instinct!I might be the odd one out in absolutely disliking this book, but it's my truth.  I couldn't find any character to really empathize with, and for me that's totally abnormal.  I feel as if my brain was dragged down to a place where sociopaths, psychopaths, and extremely narcissistic people find their 'happiness'.  Never again do I wish to read anything so revolting, and yet, yes - a very small part of me could applaud the author for her 'power'.  It's not a healthy applause I give.After finishing the book I had only one question; one that will haunt me.  What kind of mind can write like this?There is too much ugliness in this world as is.  I'm going back to look at the beauty!
I read through only 3/4 of the book and just couldn't take anymore.  Whining and complaining over and over again.  Completely annoying.  Hope the movie is better.
I wish I had looked at the low star reviews instead of just the average rating before reading this book. What a waste of time! Started out slow but I'd heard how great it is so I stuck with it. Saw the ""twist"" coming a mile away. The book really started to fall apart after that. It's like the author didn't know what to do once all the pieces were in place. The ending was absolutely awful and both main characters were generally unlikable and became more so as the book progressed. The lack of justice at the end was not only unsatisfying but also completely unrealistic. There's just no way the police, the FBI even, would just say ""oh that's your story? Well that's that then!"" I think I could have forgiven the slow start and really the idea of the perfect crime was promising but there were so many things that were unbelievable and plain ridiculous. By the last quarter of the book I was pretty much just skimming it, hoping for an ending that would at least partially redeem this book in my mind, but no such luck.Save your time and money.
This book is rather disgusting. It shows a overly-dramatic, bleak, bitter, disgusting, superficial, and worldly view on the outlook of life, love, and marriage.
Flimsy handling of a plot that had potential. Characters are unlikable and unbelievable. Book's artless conclusion seems completely tacked-on and illogical.
To say that I detested this book would not be strong enough.  None of the characters are likeable or are redeeming in any way.  They all deserve each other.
Thoroughly boring. Couldn't care less about the characters. Disliked the format. Save your time and money. Wish I'd read this review before I wasted both.
Poor story line, reading the woman's diary felt like slugging through a teenage journal.  Ending is totally ridiculous.  Sorry I bought this on my Kindle.
This book was a fun read until about midway through and then it went way off the rails.  My book club decided  not to read it due to all the hype about the book and I decided to give it shot.  I was pleased with my decision to read it until is went south, way south. These characters were among some of the most despicable I've encountered as a lifelong reader. I was wishing bad things for all of these horrible characters and I was pretty angry with myself for spending time with these creatures.  I liked the concept of the changing narrators, etc.  It was a good idea that was almost a great idea. I will not suggest the book to anyone.  Nonetheless, Gillian Flynn is laughing all the way to the bank thanks to idiots like me who downloaded the book. On a side note, Neil Patrick Harris lauded this book in the New York Times Book Review this past Sunday and I wondered if he and I had actually read the same book. Oh yeah, he's got a part I the movie.  I won't be wasting time and money on that.
I thought this was the worst book I've ever read.  I kept waiting for it to get better and it never did,  I would never read another book by this author
Let me start by saying if you absolutely want to read this book. Read the first half and then throw the book into a fireplace rather than finish.  Such a big build up to have such a huge let down. Dont waste your money like I did.
After struggling to get into it,n the book finally had some twists and turns. The ending was not satisfactory. Lots of people loved it, I didn't.
First of all it could have been a GREAT book suspense etc. But the ending OMG seriously anyone who says this book is sooo great and amazing etc must think that being in a messed up relationship is cool! I read this book because it was recommended by my sister. I thought okay she has good taste. After I was finished, and from someone who reads quite a bit it was hard to finish this, I called her to say WHY did you do that to me. She started laughing saying someone told her to read it as a mean joke too. This book is about a deranged psycho girl who needs to grow up and realize everything isnt about her. She is not happy in her marriage and realizes her hubby is cheating and takes matters into her own hands. No, not like a mature adult by just leaving, and no, not like a bitter wife who wants to take more then half. Ohh no, she fakes her kidnapping then frames a friend that tried to help after her web of lies her for murder. But that's not the best part this IDIOT stays with her. Ohh the pathetic we really love each other BS. I will only recommend this book to someone who I don't like or who I want to play a joke on and make them waste their time.
I am so mad I wasted my time reading this book and didn't listen to all the one-star reviews.  My dissatisfaction with this novel is not just the horrible ending - it was everything.  Amy and Nick belonged together. There was no character development and the story was lacking suspense.  It is hard to get invested in a book when you despise many of the characters. Amy's diary from the beginning, was very predictable what the intent of it was - no mystery there.  This book WAS NOT engrossing,  NOT riveting, NOT clever, NOT well-plotted, NOT gripping, or addictive for me!!! I kept reading hoping it would get better, but never did.  There was no good reason for me having to have wasted my time reading a story about two lousy, self-centered individuals who were very perfectly matched!  If the author's intent was for readers to hate this book just so people could read and buy it to see what all the hype is about, Gillian Flynn succeeded!
300 pages into a poorly written story about socio-psychotic characters all looking for revenge, I almost stopped reading. This was a book club selection (not my pick) for June and I committed to read all book club books. There are good mystery books and good murder books. Gone Girl fails as both. Current social elements (unemployed professionals/return home to care for aging-dying relatives/bad parenting/childless marriages/unhappy marriages/revenge) seemed to have been stirred into an unwholesome stew of curse words and bad language. Maybe author picked situations, characters, ideas from a menu of what makes a great story. Where was the book editor. According to notes on the author, Ms. Flynn tried crime reporting early in her career. Did she twist all of her cases to create this trainwreck? Of the 24 members in the club, only three liked/enjoyed the story. The rest of the members pulled apart every negative this book contained for each one of us. Do yourself a great favor, save your time and money (library pick) for something better written, with at least a smattering of imagination and wit, intelligence and intrigue. Score: F-
I hated this book. It was incredibly unrealistic and dumb. Don't read it. The first half was okay, the second part/ending just made me angry.
Oh how I wish for once I had actually heeded the many warnings that this book has a terrible ending.  I was meaning to read this book for a while now and finally decided to purchase it yesterday. Yes, I finished the book in a day because that's how interesting and captivating the story was UNTIL the very disappointing ending. I have never been so infuriated with a book's ending than when I finished this book (and i've read the Song of Ice and Fire series). Do yourself a favor and just watch the movie. I have not watched the movie yet, but wish I had so I could have saved myself from reading this book. I know no one will actually take this review to heart (God knows I didn't, but curiosity does get the best of us). I don't know how Gillian Flynn felt satisfied writing that ending and what her affinity with one of the narrators was. It is truly unrealistic how one person can fool so many.
I am a very avid reader, all types of books, this book was veryStrange, the ending sucked, I was sorry I stayed to the end!
Sorry I even started it.  Plowed thru, but just not my kind of story. Very disturbing.  Won't read any more books by this author.
Have just finished ""Gone Girl."" Decently well-written ... nothing real; solid shock value.A movie will certainly be made from this book: A carnival ride that quickly turns monster twisted psycho. If that's your thing, you'll love ""Gone Girl.""It's not my thing.Every once in a while a book comes along that makes me almost want to quit reading books, for good. Wally Lamb's ""She's Come Undone"" was one of those. This is another. Disturbing and mean-spirited. Really wish I'd never read it. By book's end felt like I'd watched a sleazy marathon of ""Housewives of [City],"" complete with an overdose of jealousy and rage. Had trouble sleeping last night with the scum my brain had just ingested; the opposite of a fulfilling read. Unforgettable, for all the wrong reasons.--Update: Read The Light Between Oceans by Stedman.  Read The Kitchen House by Grissom.  Read Little Brother by Doctorow.  I read those in the past few weeks, after having finished Gone Girl.  All three were wonderful.
Starts out good, plausible, possibly engaging,  then devolves into a far-fetched and poorly-crafted and ridiculous melodrama.
So I try really hard with every book I read to be open-minded. You could even say empathic towards the author. I want to know what he or she is truly conveying with the book's message or plot or whatever. I have to say that Gillian falters on so many levels with this book that it's hard to give her even one star for a review, and here's why:Now, before I rip into this book, I should point out that I DID like some of it. The first part was somewhat promising, and the second part did carry some momentum, but then....well, think LOST. four seasons of pure TV brilliance followed by a fifth season of WTF? and then the sixth season slowly revealing the writers of that show never DID have a story, they just sat in a room and whiteboarded a bunch of questions without ever thinking about how to answer them. I mean, purgatory? Come on!!! Especially when you told SO many people right at the onset that the island WASN'T some middle ground place. And in a way, that's exactly what has happened with GONE GIRL. The build is interesting, the did he or didn't he played with in a clever way, then the reveal that Nick is not so innocent as he seems (I'll try to write this without giving away any spoilers, in case some of you still think you should read this because the NY TIMES says you should and oh yeah, Gillian's EX-COMPANY EW of COURSE gave it a completely unbiased ""A"" writing), but ultimately, the third section of the book just leaves you wanting something way more definite, more complete. And yet it's not. It's so Lost. It's incomplete in a very NON-COOL Murakami sort of way.Perhaps my main gripe is this: There WEREN'T TWO NARRATIVES here. You would be smoking crack to believe everyone that says that. I literally felt NO distinction between Nick and Amy's narratives. Sure Amy is all kinds of evil brilliant. But the same vocabulary and language Gillian uses to let us know just how COOL AMY really is, she uses that same exact language in Nick's side of telling things. I mean, both Nick and Amy used words in their storytelling that just didn't match the personalities we're supposed to believe each have. Amy maybe, but NICK? Come on Gillian, you can't qualify using big words in Nick's narrative by saying he was a journalist. I detected almost NO Midwestern to him, nothing of the sort. He doesn't feel like a Male character at all. He feels like a male character written by a female author. For this, Gillian, I give you complete credit. All you do is come off as pretentious sounding when you try to make Nick sound like...well, Nick.Speaking of which, the supporting cast of characters were truly stereotypes to the point of maddening cliche. And you using a very terrible cliche at the cabins with Jeff and Greta? I won't say how or why, but lets just say it's completely unbelievable. And disgusting that Amy, who is so completely manipulative and calculating, would let her guard down THAT much. Come on! Yet a few pages later, we are supposed to believe she rolled around in the trunk of a car JUST in case some police detective looked in there for hairs? Hmmmm. Uh, NO.I think the problem is that Gillian comes from a magazine like EW, who I do appreciate their reviews on things, but ultimately she can't forget her past. Gillian writes this book like she's submitting it for an review that's titled ""How to do your best to sound cool and write scary characters for a fiction book in 2012."" I can literally picture Gillian sitting up in some mountain retreat going over and over again sentences and asking herself, ""How can I make this sound cool and chic? I got an EW deadline coming up!"" That would've been ok I suppose if you weren't writing from TWO perspectives. Nick the Bar owner and guy who gets by on his good looks and who just happens to be a journalist in a past life doesn't make him Nick the dude who keeps a thesaurus in his pocket wherever he goes so he can talk like he's in the know. Gillian just shows that she doesn't know. At all. How to write a male character.Stick with the crazy, woman!I won't spend much time on the end of the book except to say that it is painfully obvious you talked many times to a police department on things (like how to get around a wiretap). It's especially not believable that Amy would know so much about police procedurals. I guess we have the internet to blame for that though. What's perhaps worse is the fact that you just end the book. I'm sorry, but believe me, the story WOULDN'T HAVE ENDED the way it did. Gillian owes it to her audience to at least TRY to give us a great ending, but instead, we're left with a maddening conclusion. A purgatory, if you will.
I hoped this would get better but it didn't.  I hated everything about this book!  Honestly it deserves 0 stars but I cannot post without at least 1.
I did not enjoy this book at all.  I thought the whole story weird.  I also do not like books so full of bad language..
I'd been avoiding this best seller because I didn't like the story summaries I had been reading. However, I was going away for a few days and thought I'd see what all the positive reviews were about with a quick read.I gave up one third of the way into it out of boredom. The  story and characters are flat, monotonous, and just plain unreal (please, my parents wrote children's books about me...in what world). Anyone living in the world of Nick and Amy would have slapped them early on, purely out of sheer weariness of their constant whining and weirdness.If you are looking to be morbidly depressed and bored out of your mind this book is for you. If you like to be stimulated, avoid this one. It worries me that so many readers found it so intriguing.
This book is probably the most psychotic thing I've ever read. It makes me want to never meet anyone new ever again.
Ok, I'm old. However, this author forgot to write the ending! How does this happen? I won't read her again.
I had to read this book for a book club I'm in and I hated it. I've decided I just don't like this genre. Both main characters are annoying and unlikable. I didn't care what happened to either one of them. I wasn't rooting for anyone. The entire time I just kept thinking...who cares, who cares, I don't care, who gives a...I guessed the ""big twist"" before it happened. I don't understand why anyone would want to read a depressing book like this. If you're looking to sit around and be engrossed in a depressing, pointless story then read this book. Like I said...just not my thing.
Waste of time!!!!!!!!! Do not buy this.An overall depressing read, not one likable character, the worst ending of a book ever and a very very flawed story of detective work and the justice system.I was reccomended this book by someone and really was hoping for a good read but was very surprised when it turned out to be a twisted, depressing, flawed story of a psychotic woman and a loser of a husband and their fall from grace. The ending seriously made me mad, it felt like a big middle finger from the author I would never recommend this to anyone who enjoys real literature
Bought book like everyone else because of the high reviews... I don't read a ton of books regularly but like books to keep me on my toes.. and this seemed to be one of them... Initially. I did finish reading it anyhow but midway through the book - the author shifts the story line by revealing almost too much... then the details supporting the revelation .. were all so unnecessary and ended up being a -not-sure-why-I-am-still-reading-this-book book. I guess it was just to get to the end ... but VERY disappointed since I was hoping the ending would somehow fix the rest of it..
The beginning hooked me in fast. I couldn't wait to see how the story would both unfold and how justice would be served. I have no idea how this book became so popular! It's awful! The writing is drawn out as it gets less and less believable. The reason I became hooked in the first place was because the author spun an intriguing web. It gets bad before it gets worse. The ending is the biggest disappointment. The author must've ran out of her ridiculous ideas because the ending is deplorable. If you like books that give closure to the story, don't waste hours reading this.
I'm reviewing the book not the movie. II might be alone here, but I hated it. My friend kept recommending it, so I thought why not? I kept reading it to the end because it was interesting and I was hoping it would redeem itself in the end. It personally bothered me that every other word or thought was f*** or sexually foul. There was an entire paragraph just putting in new phrases for male masturbation...really?  It certainly added nothing to my life. I feel cheated. Sorry...glad other people liked it. I wish I could undo reading it. Not a hater, maybe just not my genre.
Tedious.  Boring.  Unlikeable characters.  Part I is a cliche - a variation on a dream ruse, a cheap trick.  The author should have followed Elmore Leonard's advice and deleted those parts readers will skip.  It would have made a nice short story.  If you really must read this book, just read the first couple chapters in Part I (if you can stay awake), a middle couple in Part II, and then read Part III.  It's like a soap opera, you don't miss much by watching a couple of times a year.  One other irritant - the sister's name.  Go.  Annoying to have to repeat in your head.
Everything is a gimmick nowadays. Everything is designed for the 48 hour window. How many f-words do you need to enjoy your literature? Five? Ten? Three hundred? Well, they're all here folks, in what now parades as novel writing. Just open it up anywhere and you'll get your fill of what the American novel has become - a throwaway piece of trash that puts the ""writer"" on the ""best seller list"" and enjoins frantic ""writers"" from Hollywood to paste it up on the screen. I find this kind of nonsense unreadable. Life is too short not to stick to the classics.
My first book by this author. I didn't take to the story at all. I didn't like the chosen background. I could not recommend this book as a worthwhile read to anyone. I could not wait to delete it from my Kindle.There were some commendable qualities in the characters - the understandable anxiety of parents for the ill health of a child, the loyalty and trust of an old friend.The topic itself was a turn off for me. Such interference with nature seemed gross.I would not like to read another Gillian Flynn book.
I have been struggling with this book from the beginning because it is repetitive and just does not keep my attention.  Nick Dunne acts like he could care less about his wife and the fact that she is missing.  I don't think anyone would act like this unless they were the murderer and even then... I finally quit reading this book when Mr. Dunne said ""oh yeah, I have a mistress"".  I just don't care enough to keep going and see what happens to him or his wife because they aren't even likeable characters.
What is it about a lot of this contemporary fiction that is so worthless? After reading this long book, I could care less what happens to any of the characters because they are all so unlikeable. I feel gypped for wasting my money on this lame book that is rated so highly by so many readers. Don't waste your money. If you must read it, get it for free from the library and don't enrich a worthless read. I didn't get one thing out of reading this book.
I wanted to read when all hype of the movie came out. Normally I won't go finish a book once I see the f word more than once, but was I interested in the storyline. I even felt the ending was fitting. I would have rated this higher if not for all the profanity. I liked the story but I can't recommend the book w/o saying it is full of filthy language. I'm not a prude - but the f word that much is distasteful.
I read the first four chapters and did not like any of the characters. Life is too short to be wasted on a book where you can't make a connection with a character or the story. I skipped to the end and was glad that I didn't waste my time on the middle.The characters were unbelievable as real people and the ending was weak. Both main characters came across as self-absorbed from the beginning.
terrible book. so obvious, so predictable. as soon as you read one line of the diary, you know it's a fake. i can't believe they made a movie out of this book. i think this book is for children young teenagers, not adults.perhaps if i was a kid i would have liked it,but i have too much"" learned life's lessons.and walked a mile in these shoes "" and know better. this book was utter nonsense to me.
Starting out, this book read great. Thought it was gonna be a great read and the negative reviews were not true BUT once you start getting to the end of this book, it's absolutely terrible. You realize you've wasted all of the time you invested in reading this and you're left with an author just looking for a way out. Not worth the money for the book, I wouldn't pay more than $5 for this read.
Although the story was entertaining. It feels to me like Ms. Flynn made some changes.  Putting that much energy in writing Amy's diary and the treasure hunt and then having to have it end the way that it did with nothing more than a threat to the police???  I wont give anything away, but the story didn't make sense.  I don't care how well written it is, MAKE SOME SENSE!!!  I
Just like ""The Lovely Bones"" robbed us of sweet justice, so does this book. It takes you up the side of a huge mountain, making you crazy to reach the top (or the end in this case), and when you arrive you realized you've been cheated, duped, made a fool of for investing so much time and emotional energy.Shame. It's could have been a truly great book.
I am so sorry I wasted my money on this book. The characters are totally unbelievable and the plot is a joke-a sad joke- on anyone who spent money on this book. This is the first review I have ever written, but feel I should warn anyone else who would be swayed by the high star rating. I read it on my kindle, and kept checking the percentage of content because I was so anxious to get it over with.
I had seen the movie and said that I needed to read the book to get clarification of what happened. I guess I am just finding it totally unbelievable that someone could pull off everything that Amy did. True, she is a sociopath but I feel that you need to stay in the boundaries of what is really able to be done. And that Nick would stay. He's as messed up as she is!
This book came highly recommended and i found it so predictable and boring. i wanted to stop reading after 30 pages, but was encouraged to continue and still felt completely deflated when i finally finished reading. It took me very long to read because i did not enjoy it and in my opinion a never to read again. Has put me off the author too. don't waste your time.
I debated for months if I should buy this book.  i know every book has good and not so good reviews, however I wish I had gone with my gut and passed on this one.  Without spoiling the book, I will only say I was so disappointed in the ending that it made me angry that I paid twelve dollars for this read.  I felt I was ripped off.  I don`t know how this can be considered a best seller.
Doesn't anyone in today's world take exception to the filthy language and scenes set up in this book???  What happened to good, pure, wholesome literature suitable for anyone who wants to read a good mystery?Great story but couldn't stomach all the utterly disgusting language!!  I hope people do not really speak that way!!
Waste of my money. Every other description of Amy was of how beautiful she was...it was like, ok we get it, you don't have to say it on every page. The writing was juvenile and Nick was a complete idiot. There's no way what ended up happening would have happened in real life. Unbelievably written atrocious book and waste of my money.
I could not suspend my disbelief enough to even begin to get into the story.  The characters seem like caricatures rather than people, and totally unlovable caricatures, at that.  The last quarter of the book was beyond unbelievable - the events would have been impossible in the real world.  I will pass on Flynn's novels from now on.
I thought the book was very strange.  I do not like to read books with bad language in them, because that really bothers me.  If it came out to be a movie, I would not go and see it. The characters in the book did not seem believable to me. If you want to read a good mystery about a missing person, I suggest that one reads The Shack.
I hated this book. I found it unnecessarily filthy. But I kept thinking the suspense might make it worth reading. It is dark and depressing from beginning to end. There is no character to like. There is no satisfying resolution. I just don't believe dark and depressing automatically equals good writing. This book is way overhyped.
This book was more than disturbing: it was unfair.  There was no real closure for anybody and the ending was like a kick in the face, as if the writer herself couldn't believe anyone had stuck around to finish her horrible book.  I hope they kill each other in the movie, but I won't be watching it, so I guess it doesn't really matter what happens.
I was very sorry to have wasted my money on this book.  I stopped reading it aboout 1/4 of the way thru and then started it again later.  I didn't like the language - I certainly didn't like the ending.  How a man could have been stupid enough to live with a woman who not only had a twisted mind but was a murderer is beyond me.
this book was somewhat disconcerting to me as I listened to it on CD. My mind was blown at the popularity of it. The people in it are very unlikable, the story very unbelievable, yet it was so popular. I was, once again, reminded of how far I am from popular culture here in the US. Which I think is a very good thing.
Ii started reading this book because it was on the NY Times best seller list for 80+weeks.....i almost quit after several chapters because i didnt like the alternating chapter story but i kept going and once i finished it i wish i never read it. Terrible ending -she should've been caught somehow. Really disappointed.
The first third of the book drew me in, the next third had me trying to hurry through to get to the end because I wanted to just cross it off the list of read books.  I figured it couldn't get worse.  It did! I hated this books ending.  I think she just didn't know how to wrap up the characters so she just leaves it.  Horrible book!!
I read this book based on several personal recommendations. I enjoyed the book to a point. Several twists and turns in plot made the second half unbelievable. I finished the book angry with the ending and angry I wasted my time. Cant believe this was a best-seller. And don't count on me to see the movie either. UGH!
The story had a lot of potential throughout the book but the ending doesn't follow thru.  Very disappointing ending. It seems as if the book is missing some chapters at the end.  Once you get to the end, you're left saying ""whattttt???????!!!!!!"". If you decide to read this, prepare for disappoint at the end.
He said she said - he is just a dumb lovable guy until he is hated. She is just amazing until she turns sociopathic.  I wanted to read this book before I saw the movie.  I always give books a first pick over movies.  I wish this time I would've just chose the movie it would have at least been less time wasted
so many people gave this book great reviews I thought I would give it a try even though these popular bestselling books are usually not as good as everyone says.  I was right.  This book was good until the end.  What a bad ending.  I spent all that time reading this book and I felt so let down by the ending.
This was a tragic tale of two unhappy people. Amy grew up.thinking that the whole world revolved around her and never realized that was her major flaw. She was destined to bring.unhappiness.to everyone around her. What an unhappy story. I did not enjoy this story and would not recommend this book to anyone.
What dumb messed up people. A waste of time.
Written by an author who couldn't be bothered to come up with any semblance of an ending.  It's the first novel I've read where I didn't like any of the characters.  Just can't understand this being on the New York Times best seller list for so long.  Maybe I should write a novel if this is all it takes.
So much of this story is messed up; not in a cool way but in a way that when it ended I went ""What the hell did I just read."" Has a lot of ""mystery"" and crime solving aspects, but really the ending was awful. I was looking forward to see how she could end it and she picked the worst way.
I am so depressed when I read a book that wastes my time.  I love a book that moves.  This book was slow, the police missed clues even I could have figured out, and the ending was just plain stupid.  Maybe I'm supposed to like a book I have to think about.  NO!  I read because I love stories.  This one was a real waste of my time!
Predictable-pedestrian- don't really care what happens to anyone in it, except maybe the sister. I have no idea what all the shouting was about with this book.....the twist is broadcast by the first third of the book, and then the author just drops the ball on doing anything meaningful with it.
I can't imagine what others found so interesting in this book... but to each their own. The story is interesting enough until you get to the end... what a worthless excuse for an ending. Are you serious? The husband was pathetic and spineless. I can think of much better ways to waste your time.
I still don't understand why this book is so highly rated. The plot is contrived, the chapters ponderous and I didn't like any of the characters. I read the entire book and found the ending very unsatisfying. Finally, the authors way with words is uninspiring. I cannot recommend this at all.
The book had a very slow begining and I found it difficult to get through the first half.  Being part of a book club, I had to finish it, it felt like a job.  The ending was terrible.  I don't recommend this book, and it is not worth the money. I have read 99 cent books better than this one.
I totally did not expect the ending of this book.  It was a good book until the last three chapters.  I felt the author rushed to the end and didn't even address half of the book's story.  Sadly this could have been a great book.  I won't read anything else from this author.
About three quarters of the way through the book I had a suspicion of the way it would end.  I don't like books where the murderer goes free.  For me, that made the book on the 'sick' side.  The book ended so abruptly I wonder if there was more to the book that I missed.
What a waste of a read.  I was so disappointed in the story and plot.  I also got tired of constantly reading the ""f"" word in every other line. I love to read and have read many great books over the years, but this was a total disappointment and waste of time and money!
Started out ok. Was definitely a page turner until about two thirds of the way through, then it just got too over the top to be credible. The ending was one of the worst I've ever read. I would not recommend it. Wish I could get my weekend back. A huge waste of my time.
I hate when you read a book with an interesting story...keeps you up all night reading, and you get to the end and nothing, it just stops, there really is no ending to this book, it's like they forgot to add the last chapter or something!!! Not happy!
I saw all the hype about the book, the high rating, the best seller list and the movie deal, so I got it on Kindle.  I started reading it and less than third way through the book, I had guessed what was really happening.**** Possible SPOILER line....skip to the next paragraph...I don't know why but the two sides narrative was what gave the story away for me. If you pay close attention, one side of the storytelling was so insincere and trying too hard to be nice that you knew there is a motive behind it all.I was really hoping I was wrong, so I kept reading and of course, it turned out just as I thought. And by then, I really really want to know how the story is going to end, that part I couldn't figure out because by then, everything was so far fetched. I thought maybe, just maybe, there is a good exploding end to the story that made this book worthwhile.  Well, I flicked my finger on the screen and I saw ""Acknowledgments"", I literally thought something was wrong with my phone and I swiped it back to the previous page with my finger.  And there I was, oh wow, at that point, I can finally declare how much I hate this book, from the beginning to the end.  It's as if the author ran out of juice, so I better end this while I'm still ahead.  Really, that's the ending!  Yea, I almost threw my phone to the wall exploding!And I'm not sure if it's the author's intention but from the get-go I hated both Amy and Nick, they are both self-righteous, childish, pretentious and irresponsible individuals who truly belong to each other.  Go, the Elliots, Andie and Boney were all puppets with no soul. They were there to play a part because the author needed sidekicks, but you didn't care about any of them for crying out loud.  They don't need to exist and it wouldn't matter to the story line.  At least it didn't help me to like more of or dislike more of either of the main characters.  However, there is one person I really like in the book and it was Tanner. It was his appearance that got me through the second half of the book when I was so close to giving it up.  I was actually hoping for more of him in the story line, which of course I knew it was going to happen. But he added flare to the story for me.If you want a good book, try Inferno: A Novel by Dan Brown.  It's a much more rewarding read in my opinion.
It is a tradition that for Christmas I buy my mother-in-law, who is a voracious reader with a very sophisticated taste in books, bestseller books past and present. She always looks forward to them because so far I've had incredible luck picking books she has loved.I bought ""Gone Girl"" because a couple of friends recommended it, so I didn't bother reading before gifting it - mistake number one! A couple of days later I asked my mother-in-law what she thought of the book. Her exact words were: ""it is the most dreadful, horrible book I've read but I can't put it down because I want to see what happens and if it redeems itself"". At first I thought she was joking, but no, she wasn't. Then I got curious, how come my niece, who is a well read English teacher, and my mother-in-law, a well read and educated history major, could have such a different opinion? I read the book. The days I spent reading this book I would never get back, I am so sorry for that. It is patronizing, obscure, doesn't have one likeable character, and exploits human nature in an empty awful way. This book has no soul!A friend recommended reading ""Gone Girl"" followed by the words ""you won't be able to put it down"".  She was right, I could not put it down because I kept hoping to get to the part where I was not going to be able to put it down...I could not put it down because if I did I was never going to pick it up again...I could not put it down because I've never left a book half read, but if ever there was one, this should have been it. ""Gone Girl"" created a new standard for me: from now on if I don't like a book I am going to put it down feeling no remorse; and, next time I gift a book, I am going to read it first!As far as the ending is concern, if the intention of the author was to give the book a cheap horror movie wanna-be ending, congratulations!!  No originality whatsoever! I gave it one star because the option of ""zero"" is not available.Judith
I am so glad that I procrastinated.  I was about to recommend this book to all of my friends, and order more books by this author.  Then something happed that changed my mind: I finished the book.  This is one of the worst endings I have ever read, what a bitter disappointment after an otherwise enjoyable read.Early in the book I could not understand what all the fuss was about.  Okay, I get it, men are pigs.  Then the story took off and there were more twists and turns than a rollercoaster, more surprises than a funhouse.  I could not put the book down and kept telling my wife how good it was, insisting she had to read it.Then the ending.  The author is clearly talented so I can't understand why she couldn't come up with something better than this.  And it's not that I need a happy ending, I mean Hemingway and Steinbeck are two of my favorite authors.  But this was so contrived and unbelievable, and it's like the author went way out of her way to make the ending irritating just so it would stand out.  There are so many unbelievable, inexplicable incongruities that are overlooked because, presumably, the cops bungled the first case so bad that nobody will question anything else going forward.  And we're supposed to believe that Amy is now happy living in this hick town with her hick neighbors just because she now has a ""Stepford Wives"" husband?  Please, don't insult us.It feels to me like an ace pitcher blowing a no-hitter in the ninth inning, not because he lacked the ability but because he lost interest and just wanted to go home.  So close to being something really special, spoiled so quickly.  I'm sure the author knows she compromised an otherwise brilliant piece of work just to make it ""different"".  If I could say anything to the author it would be:`I feel sorry for you'`Why?'`Because every morning you have to wake up and be you.'  Ha!
I had to read this for my book club. At first it seemed like a decent enough book. But then it turned into something like a bad 1980's soap opera in terms of plot (think ""Dallas"" or ""Knot's Landing""). What a waste of time.
The novel dragged on until the end.  When I finally got to the end through many twists and turns, I learned how very self-centered and manipulative the ""girl"" turns out to be.  I like a novel much better when I admire the main character.
Sorry, not my type of book.  Heard rave reviews from a couple  of acquaintances and  decided to try it.  Understand the movie is coming out soon.  Maybe this will be one of those rare occurrences where the movie is better than the book.
I wanted to like this book, I really did. But it was too slow of a read. I love long Russian novels, and my favorite book is Lord of the Rings... but I just could not get through this book.  The surprise ending was sort of disapointing.
I cannot say enough about how bad this book was. I wish there was a no star option. The book is full of gratuitous profanity, unbelievable scenarios, and basic geographic inaccuracies. There is not a redeemable character in the book. You hate both Nick and Amy and never care for either.Go, Nick's sister is also a hard hearted soul with whom you never engage. Amy's parents are repulsive. Even the cops are annoying.  It is a poorly contrived book that does not deserve the exposure it is getting. There are giant convenient moments that make no sense throughout the novel. One thing I couldn't put out of my head is how does Amy get away with buying a car on craigslist and then driving it through at least two states with never having the car placed in her name or tagged? Seems like a hole to me. Also, Flynn's description of Hannibal is inaccurate. The downtown area has many shops that are still open and thriving. It is not a downtown area with for rent signs in most windows as Flynn describes. Although Flynn is from Missouri, the areas she tries to describe are nothing as she writes them to be. I live in Missouri and particularly in the areas the book tries to represent and her descriptions are laughable at best.Amy's plot against her husband is contrived and thoroughly unbelievable even by soap opera standards. The major plot twists are ludicrous and not even plausible. I have no idea why this book has received any acclaim. I would never recommend it to anyone. Please do not waste your time. This book is overlong and not satisfying. At the half way point the book should have ended and it would have been 75% better but still pretty bad.
Truly awful and astonishingly overrated. The writing is of the smug ""Look how clever I am"" variety, the characters deeply unsympathetic and annoying, and the hackneyed plot has been done much better by others. A waste of time.
I was disappointed in this novel after all the hype. It was a nonsensical story that was poorly written. I forced myself to finish it in order to discover the ending. It was painful and the ending made me dislike the story even more.
I am very annoyed with this story, in fact I was looking forward to seeing the movie but will fore go it.  It's one of those story lines when you stop at the end and say, ""that just sucked a few days of my life up for nothing"".
english lit major figures out a way to make money by taking ""scott thurows"" lame idea in ""presumed innocent"" and blows it up ten fold. read ""simenon"", if you have, read again.  much better than this muck
Love the customer review titled ""Gone Reader""I didn't even finish this book --- very rare for me.The world is full of people I don't like and have no interest in ""following"" already.These are particularly ugly, self-centered, vicious characters --- why would I pollute my mind with them?This book is my first experience with the author and I read it because it seemed highly recommended and I've been reading mysteries with great pleasure since my early teens. I wish I'd seen a few reviews like this one first.Initially, I was intrigued and engaged by this man's dilemma --- under suspicion for doing away with his wife and, while he claims to have done nothing, we are kept on the edge of making a determination. But then the book devolves into a sadistic and pointless game played out by two people I had absolutely no interest in knowing.Note to Flynn --- you have to make us CARE about your characters. They have to have some redeeming qualities or we end up feeling defiled for having been sucked in, as I did.Even in the most horrific stories (""Seven"" comes to mind) with despicable characters doing repugnant things, we're given SOME people to care about. In this novel, everyone's a turd.I wanted a shower after putting down the book 1/2 way.I skimmed the last chapters to be sure I was being fair. I was more than fair. The remainder was even more revolting.The one redeeming feature of this book?  I BORROWED IT FROM THE LIBRARY SO SHE DIDN'T GET ROYALTIES FROM ME!
I did not like the characters at all - arrogant, self-absorbed, mean-spirited, manipulative.  Was the purpose of this book to show how nasty people can be?  I prefer to read about characters with some shred of human decency.
I didn't think I would like this book and I was right, but out of curiosity I just had to see what had this book on the best sellers list for so long.  I still don't get it.  Kept thinking it would get better, but not.
I could not finish this book.  I hated the main characters therefore i just did not enjoy reading more.  Both the husband and wife are deplorable and made it hard to like the story.  I'm sure the movie will be better!
I'm sorry I wasted my reading over spring break on this book.  Neither main character had many, if any, admirable qualities. They truly deserved each other. I spent too much time reading this book--it wasn't worth it.
What the hell is wrong with this author? She clearly has issues, deeply rooted issues. I'm not sure how else a healthy, normal individual could write such a trite, awful, sadistic novel. What's even more appalling is that the book has so many great reviews! What's wrong with people?The plot line is boring and slow. The characters are not only unbelievable, but deeply, deeply awful and unlikeable. I was hoping they would die a horrible death by the end of the novel. Speaking of the end- that wasn't an end. It left you hollow, pissed off and just angry that you spent two hours reading this garbage.The author included the minutiae in every page, she never bothered to give a different voice to the two characters- they're both narrated from a single point of view, which is the author's....which is why, I suppose, she had to head each chapter with the name of the protagonist she was talking about. Otherwise, we'd be confused as to which character she's writing about, since they both sound the same.I too was pressured into reading this, simply because of all the reviews and the fact that ""the ending leaves you speechless""....it does, but not in a good way-instead, in a ""I want to gargle my mouth with bleach"" way, and then drive to wherever this author lives and smack her across the head with this damn book.Awful. Totally awful, undeserving of its praise. Never, ever, in my life have I read a book with more unlikeable characters. I hope she stops writing altogether. Do the world a favor!
The story started very slowly but I hung in there and stuck it out.  I REALLY wanted there to be some sort of twist and a BIG suprise, but there never was.  Just a long drawn out predictable book.  Very disappointed.
One of the worst books I have ever read. The only reason I kept reading it was because 2 friends said they liked it - the further along I got and the more people I asked about it reinforced my disdain for the book
Poorly written, self-absorbed compendium of cultural cliches with two thoroughly nasty characters who show no meaningful development.  It's embarrassing that novels like this achieve such wide success in America.
Waste of time.  Predictable and rambling.  Had it figured out after the first few chapters.  Was seriously hoping I was wrong and would be surprised at the end, but no.  I won't waste my time on this author again.
I don't know what the big fuss is over this book.  In my opinion, it was a stupid book, and a waste of time reading it.  Can't imagine the movie....don't care to see it; this story had nothing redeeming about it.
when I first started the book it was pretty boring. Iusually quit reading. this one did not get good until 3/4 of the war through.  Then it ended to soon. should have told us what was going on 2 years later
I just can't understand the hype for this book.  When I started reading it I just didn't find it interesting.  The author was trying to give insight and background to the characters but it didn't hold my attention.  I decided to look at some of the 1 and 2 star reviews on Amazon and found a lot of people didn't like, or actually hated the ending. So I skipped to the end and read the last few chapters.  Then I went back and scanned the book looking for answers to a few questions I had so all in all I probably read about 1/3 of the book.  It reminded me of an episode of Law & Order SVU. Some of the characters seemed like they were copies of real life people, Ellen Abbott = Nancy Grace, Nick Dunne = Scott Peterson with a twist, for some reason Amy's parents made me think of Leonard's mother on the Big Bang Theory!  DO NOT read any further if you don't want any idea of how the story unfolds.  As for Amy's character I find it hard to believe that anyone can be as cunning and manipulative and smart when it comes to thinking of every possible ""what if?"" (like rolling around in the trunk of her ""captors"" car) but at the same time make some simple, yet significant mistakes such as keeping all of the money you have in the world on your person at all times and making mistakes when staging the ""struggle"" scene.  If you're still interested in reading Gone Girl I suggest borrowing from a friend or the library and not spending any money for it.
If you're one of those people who agree that marriage is in trouble in our country and that getting married is a waste of time, you'll love this book.  I happen to agree that marriage, as a culture, is in serious trouble, but it is precisely because of the views of marriage presented in this book.  After reading this book, especially the unsatisfying, demented ending, I hugged my husband extra hard and thanked God above for 22 years of being married to my best friend.  There is no relationship presented in this book that gives a real view of married life.  Both Amy and Nick and Amy's parents are more caricature then character.  Ironically, I'd say Nick's parents' marriage was closer to the mark of what really exists on the unhappy end of the spectrum.  As for Amy's parents (I'm sorry but they take off to write another book about her ordeal - and these people are all trained psychologists?), do past middle-aged couples really walk by each other and give their butts a squeeze.  Thanks to the author for that imagery.  I must admit that I got an early impression that I wouldn't like the cynical take on marriage so I ended up skim reading a lot of this book.  I'm thankful I didn't waste more time because the couple of hours spent on it was too much.  One star reviews are for books that I wish I could get the time back I spent reading them.  This book is ""zero"" stars because I feel like I should be given my time back and then some.
[Some spoiler alert below.] When I commit to a book, I expect to like at least *someone* in it. Or I expect at least one of the really awful characters to learn something from his/her mistakes. The protagonists in this book are hateful, manipulative, petty people who never learn or grow, and the ending implies that they'll just continue (and pass along) their immature, hurtful behavior.  For someone from Missouri, Flynn sure made everyone there out to be a bunch of rubes. Can't run an investigation, don't do much during the day, only bit of excitement is the Ozarks.  Having spent almost 6 years there, I felt like she didn't offer anything positive about the state.But the biggest problem I have with the book [spoiler alert] is how the main character fakes rape/assault. So many, many victims remain voiceless because they don't think someone will believe them. And in fact, the victim is often doubted or suspected of not being entirely true. So WHY celebrate and go crazy over a book in which all the accusations are false? Moreover, the main character has done it repeatedly.  Portraying that situation in the media does a disservice to every rape/assault victim who hasn't been heard or believed.I wish I understood why people liked this so well. The writing at the basic level wasn't particularly strong.  Neither main character had any redeeming qualities. I finished it and wondered why I even bothered.
As most other reviews have said, great book.  Until the end!!  I found myself sloughing through the last 1/4 of the book, desperate to finish.  Needless to say I was so disappointed I wanted to scream.
Awful audible narration by these two. Attempts at gender and accents were poorly executed and distracted from the novel itself. Choose more carefully, authors! Don't let these bad actors ruin your story.
I hated it! Not real, too long, pathetic and badly written.. The characters were overdone and caricature-like. To me it is shocking how this novel can be on the best-seller list. Try something else..
This book was about two selfish people who hated each other.  Everything they did was to spite the other.  By the time I got to the end I wish they would have both killed the other and be done with it.
Unenjoyable. Flat characters with a plot so overtly trying to steer the reader one direction that the actual conclusion can be drawn from the first chapters. Distractingly implausible and meaningless.
Probably a great movie , but the story is for a much younger generation and is about two people who lack any modicum of emotional maturity.  I missed the point.  Or maybe the intent simply escapes me
Most of this book is tough going.  The characters are ridiculously unbelievable, as is the plot.  I can't believe I persevered until the end, but persevere I did, only to find the lamest ending ever.
Worst book that I have read in a long time.  Hated the characters!  Finished it just to see if it at least ended well.  Wasted my time.  Can't believe that they are making a movie from this garbage.
Disclaimer: I only managed to get through about 25% of this book, so this is by nature an unfair review, but take that as a warning. I'm not one to give up on books easily, but truly, life is too short to waste precious reading time on inept writing. Plenty of other reviewers have stated criticisms similar to mine, but I'll reiterate the main ones that I identify with:1) The writing style comes off as amateurish overall.2) The characters are unbelievable and poorly written (unreliable narrators are usually supposed to be convincing UNTIL you find out they are unreliable), and not just the  2 main characters. Virtually everyone we encounter in the first 1/4 of the book seems either like some someone from central casting or  is constructed of some contrived quirky combination of attributes that is too far-fetched to be believed.3) There is no one to care about. That can work in a really well-constructed story, which this was not, in my opinion (at least for the first quarter of the book). The only reason I read as much as I did was that I hoped I would get caught up in the suspense and at least enjoy the process of finding out what happened. Instead I got bored.Having read several of the positive and negative reviews here, I'm convinced Gone Girl is not worth the time and that  I've made the right decision by banishing it gone to the library donation box.
Don't waste your time or money with this one.  WORST BOOK EVER!!!!  I did read the whole horrible thing only because of the money I spent on it, but it really was a long, painfully ridiculous read.
So disappointed.  Heard how great this novel is and it didn't even capture me like most books in the free sample.  Was bored to tears and came back to check that I had sampled the correct book!
The first half of this book is so slow and silly.The second half is more interesting, but The ending is ridiculous. This was a slow boring read overall. I won't read anything else by this author
I was really excited to read this book based on recommendations from friends. I was so disappointed in the ending of this book and that I had just wasted my time reading it. HUGE disappointment.
Too strange for me. Not into sick manipulative relationship. Can't understand great reviews. Ended up sad at the end. Not everything has a fairy tale ending but just too much damage to others
read this book because our book club chose if for our monthly book.  I hated it.  I gave it away as soon as I finished it.  Didn't even want it in my house.  Clearly not my kind of literature
Book has quite a twist in the middle but the ending, borders on being abhorrent. It was as if the writer just gave up after the second half of the book. I hope the movie is better than this.
FROM THE BEGINNING OF THE BOOK I COULDN'T GET INTO IT.STORY WAS SO UNREALISTIC & BORING.............FAST FWD TO NEAR THE END TO SEE IF IT PICKED UP ANY.........BUT NOHATED IT
A mean hateful book, characters with no redeeming virtues. Equally hateful ending.Exciting, but so is watching ISIS videos of people being beheaded............and they take less time.
The writing is so bad, it's popularity numbs the brain. This book reads like a bad young adult novel written by an adolescent trying to emulate 2 grown-up she despises. One of the biggest problems I had with it was the near inability to distinguish between the voices of the narrating characters. Nick's descriptions & opinions are virtually identical to Amy's. Not because he's become like her over the years (which might have been an interesting slant), but because he thinks in a distinctly female way. (He's big on fashion & decorating details & broad generalizations.) They sound so much alike in fact I thought the plot would turn on both POVs being written by the same schizo character. Wrong. Too bad, it would have been better that way. Then there are the laughable attempts at portraying the ""sophistication"" of Amy whose idea of an elegant wine is Sancerre & Desi who sounds like a contestant at a George Hamilton impersonation rally. Worst of all is the oft-cited (non-) ending: the last third of the book reads like a compilation of notes & ideas for where the book might have traveled. It was like being given a loaf of bread & winding up with a mouthful of flour (bleached at that) & yeast. Yuccchh.Can't get much more dumbed down than this. I read it to see what the brouhaha was about. I'll pass on the film, thanks.
Don't waste your time reading this book.  The ending was horrible.  It's as though the author just got tired of writing it and stopped in the middle of the story.  What a waste of my time.
Would not buy another of her books....ending was really bad....she is a good writer but found myself skimming thru the pages until close to the end just to reach it and see what happened.
I thought it was shallow and very poorly written .. I had great expectations and was looking forward to a gripping escape ., I can't believe this had such good reviews and sold so well ?
I rarely finish a book with disgust, however the ending of this page turner was so unsatisfying I resent the hours spent reading it. My first Gillian Flynn novel and likely my last.
Good writing cannot mask a ridiculous story line.  Just as an example, and without giving away the plot:  a guy who is rich enough to own three houses (including a mansion in St. Louis's richest suburb and a Swiss chalet-inspired lake house on a private lake), who is socially competent enough to dine with friends every lunch at his country club, and who is good looking enough to be compared to a modern day Gatsby has been pining away for the main character for over 20 years, even though she ditched him abruptly at age 16 when they were high school classmates and even though she tried to frame his beloved mother for an assault she didn't commit.  The guy is so besotted with his teenage love, he has built a greenhouse dedicated to her favorite flower (Tulips!) and enshrined her high school tennis photo on his living room table.  For 20 years, he has regularly written her chatty letters (My golf game; my summer trip), and never once during the 20 years does she ever write back.  He then becomes the white knight in armor.  To say more would be to provide a spoiler, but it's downhill from here.Other plot twists are equally if not more implausible.  The author knows how to write and keep you turning the pages, but at the end of the day, you'll find yourself saying, ""Oh, come on......
I found nothing worthwhile about this book. i read it for a book group amd found it to be very juvenile. i do not recommend this book to anyone who is looking for a real mystery story
Too long, highly anticipated ending, a dud.  By the time I finished the book I really didn't care how it ended as long as it ended.  I give it one star for excellent writing skill.
How does this book get so many great reviews? It's so boring, the ""twists"" are so lame. I literally HATED all the characters and couldn't wait to just finish it.
Gone Girl has zero payoff.  The writing is very good, and Flynn had me captivated for the first two sections.  In the end, I was disgusted by the characters.  I want my time back!
An ending so bad I wish I could ""unread"" this piece of crap.  Biggest waste of time on Amazon.  I cannot believe people rate this as a decent read.Horrible.
I like the suspense but give us and ending will never buy another book by this author if I wanted to write the ending I would take writing courses at the local community college
I found the dialog stiff and contrived, a perfect match for the characters.  ""Gone Girl"" would have been better suited to a graphic novel format.  I am not impressed....
Heard great reviews on the movie and thought I'd read the story first. Now I don't particularly care to see the movie.The book seemed to be off to a pretty good start, but the wordiness of the narratives become tedious as you move further into the story. I pushed through the pain of reading because of the reviews that I'd heard from others; I'd hoped the story would re-engage my interest. Unfortunately, I didn't think that the characters were developed that well--I flat out just disliked all of them by the end of the book and the story just sort of unceremoniously exits all of the supporting players by the end.To be honest, I just did not like the story and the end was really disappointing. True, justice is not always served, karma does not always come back around, the good guy doesn't always get the girl (or vice versa), and happy endings do not always happen; but even tragic, disheartening endings can be well written. The plot of this story dragged out so long that the end seemed to be a lazy way of bringing it all to a close.Would not recommend a buy.  Rent, borrow or just go see the movie. Perhaps the story is better told in movement...but the ending would still suck (if it is the same as the book).
Very dark.  I found it to be a great disappointment.  I would not recommend this for anyone who really wants to read an interesting book...This is certainly not the one to buy!
I am confused by all the fantastic reviews of this book. Once I started reading it I discovered that the main characters (Nick and Amy) were both totally disgusting. I felt like the author was just jerking me around throughout the book from one chapter to the next in the way he alternately changed the readers opinion of Nick and Amy. The characters were really warped and the story line was totally unbelievable. I didn't enjoy this book at all and had to drag myself through to the end. The end was the most disappointing part. My goal for reading a book is to be entertained and this book left a very bad taste in my mouth. I am confused by all the fantastic reviews of this book. Once I started reading it I discovered that the main characters (Nick and Amy) were both totally disgusting. I felt like the author was just jerking me around throughout the book from one chapter to the next in the way he alternately changed the readers opinion of Nick and Amy. The characters were really warped and the story line was totally unbelievable. I didn't enjoy this book at all and had to drag myself through to the end. The end was the most disturbing. My goal for reading a book is to be entertained and this book left a very bad taste in my mouth.
I loved the book until the last paragraph. In my opinion, the ending was so bad it undid the rest of the novel. I'm sorry I read it. I've never said that about a book before.
This book may be well written, but the characters in the book are just vile. When I thought it couldn't get worse, it did. I could not recommend this book to anyone.
Takes over 100 pages to even catch you interest and the ending is anticlimactic.  Would not bother with the movie, once you know the twists why sit through a $7.00+ movie?
I wanted to read the book first, before seeing the movie, because movies often miss so much enjoyable detail.  I probably won't see the movie now, but it's probably just the right length and content after all the minutia of the book has been removed.The book started slow with nauseating detail, frequently spending a dozen or more pages to relate sidebar stories that barely added to the point being made, setting the ""scene"".  But conversely, the author would then gloss over many key points, such as explaining Amy's ""brilliance"" in only a few pages.  I liked the rotating perspectives between Amy and Nick, but the nausea didn't end, the unnecessary digressions went all the way to nearly the last page.  After a few chapters, I was intrigued by the premise and held out because the plot had been set and it was looking to be an ""Amazing"" finish.  It wasn't.  The plot was linear from the first page to the last.  And after so much detail, the end came rapidly, as if the author ran out of ideas or couldn't adequately wrap up the plot threads.  The book is a beautiful portrayal of two extreme narcissists and a psychopath, but other than that I felt it was a waste of time.
As a promise to a co-worker, I read this book. I do like the suspense and thriller genre, but this title was plastic and predictable.  I truly do not understand the hype.
weird book, starting with overly analytical self awareness, and ending with a psychotic bitch in control through a totally destructive, inappropriate mechanism......AWFUL
Although both characters have done some major wrong things, I felt that the ending was wrong on so many levels.  Some of my friends say that they both deserve the misery.
Friends had been reading this and it is listed as a best seller.  Why, I don't know.  It is a tale of 2 sadistic people and it never gets better and it never ends.
I got to be the only one that hates this book. I think I have read the same page 3 times now and I keep falling asleep :( One of the most boring books I have ever read .
It was hard to get into. I hate the ending. Two totally psycho people.  She said , he said. It's hard for me to give even one star but.......ok I would not recommend it.
From the beginning of the book I doubted if there was much to be excited about.  The ending was horrible.  I can't believe 2 individuals can be such idiots.
I'm not going to try to sugar-coat it -- this is one of the worst books I've ever read, and that's saying alot.First, the plot is so predictable! I knew the outcome almost from the beginning.Second, there's not a single character (other than the very minor character of the sister) who is even remotely likable. It appeared Flynn was trying to make sure she constructed the characters to keep the reader guessing as to who did what but, as I explained above, the outcome was so obvious that it was a wasted effort. More importantly, though, she tried too hard, creating characters that were despicable caricatures at best.How this got past even a half-rate editor is amazing. The writing style is poor at best, grammatical errors abound, etc. Yes, it's okay to bend and even break the rules for stylistic effect, but that's not the case here. Again, it seemed like the author was trying too hard to be something and, in the effort, she merely made matters worse.This book should -- and could -- have been so much better. As it is, it doesn't even merit the 1 star I had to give it to publish this review. Find something better -- it won't be hard to do.
For my personal opinion I was unable to read it or actually get through it, it was rather confusing and I got caught into the hype of the talk about the book and movie.
Warning - this review contains a spoiler about the ending.Gosh, I really hated this book!  I really hated the characters, Nick is a dunce who turns into a sociopath, Amy is a brilliant spoiled rich sociopath, Margo (Go, Nick's sister) is vapish, Amy's parents are pretentious, rich, psychologists who lose their fortune and have to take back Amy's trust fund to bail themselves out. The only likable characters are Nick's poor Mom dying from cancer and Nick's poor Dad living with Alzheimers, who is also miserable, but it's the disease's fault.  Plus, this book is sooooo long! 19 hours!  The first half is just listening to Amy & Nick whine.  I only finished this because I needed to find out why everyone else thinks this book is so brilliant.  Obviously, I don't appreciate good fiction.  While, it turns into a psuedo-thriller with a few surprises, it's pretty predictable. The ending is horrible!  These 2 miscreant sociopaths should not be allowed to have a child!  That poor child will need therapy for it's entire life! All I can say is that I would not have finished this book if I was reading it, I endured it because I listened to it in my car, usually while in traffic.
What a load of crap! I don't care that it's been made into a movie - DON'T read this book! The characters are so jacked up that I hated them all. What a waste of time.
I trudged through this book expecting a solution or earth shattering twist in the tail but was left very disappointed. Won't bother with anymore of this authors works.
The book was great until the ending.  The author did all of us a disservice by not having a murderer suffer the consequences of her actions.  I was very disappointed.
well written but so dark and disturbing that I had to take it outside and put it in the car when I was done - I didn't want it under the same roof with me as I slept.
I overlooked the typos, which there are plenty of.This was not 100% terrible, hence the one star. I did keep reading until I reached the end, the awful, unbelievable, how the heck do I wrap this up end.In the beginning, I sympathized with Nick. I couldn't stand Amy from her diary entries. I questioned whether I should be feeling this way when Andie comes about. I just didn't seem to care about it. I hated Amy the whole time, so for that, I give a star.The two thieves were mechanical, abandoned by the author, and Iwondered  why they never came back into the story. I also wondered why why why did Nick suddenly turn flat, sheepish and scared in the last section of the novel.  Here was this character that I was rooting for to nail this psycho to the wall, with his cheerleader sister and professor like detective on his side, and Flynn decides to strip his building balls of steel, and turn him into a weak character. It felt like the author gave up at the end, so she made her characters do the same.I felt suckerpunched at the end when you learn what Amy's hold over Nick is. Seriously? It's unbelievable that is what resolves Nick
If you like happy endings, do NOT read this book. The ending sucks! Made me want to scream that I'd read the entire book and was rewarded with that terrible ending
worst book I've ever read.very slow moving in the beginning. It took three quarters of the book to get an interest in the plot. The ending was very disappointing.
This was one of the worst books I have ever read. I feel like I wasted precious time upon completion of the book and would never read another book by this author.
Really good book until I got to the ending. What the hell worse ending ever!! Totally disappointed that the whole book was exciting until literally the last page.
Hate the theme, the characters, the whole thing. Sorry I invested my time and money.. I would like to throw my copy against the wall! But it's on my Kindle . . .
Did not like the end, there was no justice,closure to their lives, just plain hated the end, I was very upset after i closed my kindle, i felt a huge letdown.
I did not en joy this book. It was very graphic with total foul language thoughout! There did not seem to be much of a plot. I would not recommend this book!
I read this because it was recommended by a friend. She also loved 50 Shades, which I read on her recommendation and also hated. I should have known - ha!Basically, if you are just looking for a page turner to waste a few hours, go for it. It will keep you captivated for most of the book and then leave you with the same emotions about humanity you would get from watching Jerry Springer. Essentially, ""whaaaat? That can't be for real.""If, however, you want more from your books - compelling plot, consistent character development, clever/beautiful writing - definitely do not waste your time. The plot is contrived, there are way to many ""coincidences"" that make things work out the way the author wants and I'm pretty sure the ending was written to purposely piss off the reader/elicit a response. I don't like it when I can tell I'm being manipulated by the author instead of the characters, but I understand that most people don't look for that much depth in their reading.So, looking for a page-turner - might be worth it. But I don't see what all the hype is about.
The writing style was confusing, the characters unlikable, the ending depressing. I read it with my book club and everyone felt pretty much the same.
Difficult read because of changes in time, characters and direction. There are no redeeming factors in any of the characters or story. Ending is disgusting.
Most depressing and diabolical book I've read. I must admit I didn't know to much about the book. I bought it because of its rating on the best seller list.
The first half of the book was okay, but the second half was ridiculous for me. Did not like any of the characters and did not care what happened to them.
Gone GirlJust finished this book, in 3 days, quick for me, it is a page turner, but anything but satisfying.  The jerky, clever devices and switch ups became not only frustrating, but just aggravating.  One other reviewer said ""fiendishly clever"", which is one way to describe it, great detail and effort went into the plot, development of characters, [though some more fully than others, which is normal for novels, but felt inconsistent to me.]  We just discussed two things going on structurally in our book club.  One is back & forth chapters between voices.  That is so overdone and while clever, really annoying.  The second, not necessarily LIKING characters, or caring about them while being able to appreciate the work.  I didn't find anything interesting in a pathological liar that manipulates and blackmails people.  So egos are one thing, but this group was just a mess, as far as I am concerned.Wow.  I would not recommend it to anyone.  The writing skill is there, but no reward for this reader.
I had high hopes for this book because some of my friends liked it (and the movie). From the beginning, I disliked it (especially since I was reading it on the heels of another tiresome psychological ""thriller), but I hung in there, trying to lile it more. Just when I started to think it was OK, it became even more turgid, and the horrible characters witth horrible lives became more horrible, and their lives became even more horrible... which made it very difficult to suspend my disbelief. I decided to read it to the end, though, hoping all these miserable people would get their due, or at least hoping for the introduction of a character who was not a caricature of himself/herself. Fail. The ending was simply awful -- other than the fact that it actually ended, which was a blessing. (I envision a sequel in the works. Ugh.) The only positive thing I can say is that I didn't have to spend a penny to be this annoyed because I borrowed the book from the library. Don't waste your money on this unless you like cloying personalities who perpetually fall into stereotypes and terrible endings.
I don't even know why I finished this book. The story had so many predictable twists! I wasted my time reading this book full of cliches.
I really enjoyed this book for the first three quarters of thebook. I hated the ending and made me feel like I had wastedmy time reading it.
Did not like the book at all had a hard time following back and forth.  I have found with other people that have read it you either like it or you dont
Horrible, extremely slowly in the beginning of the book and the worst ending. I was so disappointed.  I was very surprised to see it get 4 and 5 stars.
The presentation was good. The idea behind the flow of the chapters solid. But the result? I had to force myself to read it all. It plods along, carefully setting the stage for each piece of the puzzle to follow and fall neatly into place. It was drudgery to read.  But if so many people thought it was great then at some point it would redeem itself. Right? Wrong. It was boring, depressing, unrealistic. Drawing the length out doesn't change the story from a dime store whodunnit. Every book needs a character that you root for. Even if the story is thin you can cheer for your person. There aren't any in this book that I cared anything about. They all deserve each other. So you are left with characters who are unlikeable, a situation that is never resolved, a plodding, predictable story line that is flat. The author's writing technique and use of language are good. But, the story itself is weak. It reads like a tawdry, daytime talk show where you think go ahead, lock them all in a room and let them finish each other off. Who cares. And you change the channel. Click.
A book about disturbed people with a depressing story. I regret reading the whole book. This books falls in to my top 5 worst books read ever.
Stupid, stupid, stupid!  I have not read a worse book in a long time but true to my long standing tradition I read it to the end. That was stupid too!
Terrible writing with an uncreative ""gotcha"" ending. I cannot believe how popular this misogynistic waste of time is with the rest of America.
The story hooks a reader with its deep first person point of view and alternating voices: well done, sharp, harsh narcissistic, neurotic. Extremes meet, dance, enact their own Venus Flytrap version of call and response, and then devour one another. Before long, the relentlessly self-referential rant in both voices, and both voices channeling the authorial voice, feels like the verbal equivalent of watching kudzu strangle a Sweet Gum sapling. It's a morbidly fascinating view into symbiosis as mutually-assured destruction; a cause for reflection, in a natural history of literary oddities sort of way. Difficult to sustain and nearly impossible to create character arcs with satisfactory closure. There is something too self-satisfied and self-referential in the way it self-cannibalizes its characters' stories at the end, announcing the sequels to come.Smart, sharp and harsh.But can a thriller continue to thrill when both main characters are such self-hugging antagonists?Not for this reader.
This book was recommended to me by a friend.  I had difficulty getting through the first couple of chapters (if you can call them chapters), because it just didn't hold my interest.  So, I put it down.  When I got together with my friend for dinner, almost 2 years later, I mentioned that the first chapters just didn't keep me interested.  He suggested that I give it another chance.  So I tried again.  After I pushed through the first  chapters, I couldn't put it down.  But, then, close to the end of the book, it ran out of steam for me and the story just went off the deep end.  It made no sense to me and the result just wasn't based in reality.  I can deal with exaggeration.  But, when logic and reality goes entirely out the window, I don't enjoy the reading.  Still, I finished it.  But, for me, a book could be great reading, but if it doesn't end logically or at least make some kind of sense, I can't recommend it.  So, I can't recommend this one.  I'm amazed that it is being made into a movie.  There are so many much better books that are movie material.
This book came highly recommended. It was a book club read--and that's the only reason I bothered to finish it. Predictable and ridiculous.
I don't usually write reviews for books or movies. And I hate writing negative reviews. But I had hopes for this one, based on the reviews it received. As a work of literature, it is pretty bad. Not only are there inconsistent grammatical errors, horrible fragments that chop up a single thought into illogical pieces, but even the actual writing is ""wanna be"" at best. It tries so hard and is so desperate to belong to something or to be seen as good that it comes off as unnecessarily and exaggeratedly moody and pretentious. It is redundant in its descriptions of irrelevant details so much so that you forget what the main idea of the chapter is. I made it through the first chapter. The guy character has a million thoughts a second, but none that has any meaning to the reader or the plot. Moreover, he is one depressed and depressing soul; it's tiring to read his thoughts. To add to that, he is also cocky, or at least, he comes off as cocky, ungrateful, and, in the end, pathetic.
well written, entertaining if a bit unrealistic as i went on but then the end? made absolutely zero sense. story full of holes. silliness.
Simply put - if I hadn't gotten this for free, I would've been really upset. Awful, just horrible and insane!
The book is well-written and was hard to put down.  The ending is disastrous ... I wanted to throw the book, but it was my Kindle, so I refrained.
Contrived plot. Contrived details. Author found it necessary to insert correct grammar points, yet used incorrect grammar in descriptive passages.
sorry but I found the beginning of this book to be very boring.  I stopped reading it.  I even came back to it and stopped again.  Just to boring.
I see from the reviews that a lot of people adored this book... I definitely did not. I've read boring literature. I've read great literature. I've read mediocre literature. This was just awful. From the time I read the first 3 pages to the time I got to page 112 I was bored. I was bored from page 112 to the end. Nothing about this captivated me. Nothing about this make me want to pick it up and read it. I honestly forgot about this book being on my kindle multiple times because it was just so bad. I would sit there thinking, ""I need a new book to read"" then remember I had just bought this one and hadn't finished it. There was nothing memorable. Nothing charming. Just a bunch of vague memories and nonsense compiled into an attempt at writing a suspense? novel. It honestly was one of the worst books I've ever read and that's saying something since I've been reading everything I could for as long as I could. I finished the 4th Harry Potter in 13 hours straight and it took me months to finish this book. Do not waste your money.
Am giving this one star because I think it had potential. I'd like to give a half. I don't want to give any spoilers but will say that I liked the idea of telling the story from different perspectives and including a diary as well. All of this kept me guessing and turning ""pages"" on my Kindle. The story was suspenseful and intriguing, but my praise has to stop here. Many of the plot twists were unbelievable and the characters were nasty and evil, hating each other throughout the book. And the language was horrible! The author had an F-word (or three or ten) on every page. It's like she was writing an essay that had to have so many words in it. Need another word on the page? Use the F-word! How bout some originality in the dialogue instead of resorting to that. Not to mention plenty of other words and disgusting references. This is entertainment?  Well it was for the first part of the book, but then things went from bad to worse.The ending was both unrealistic and sickening. I won't be reading anymore of her books.
Cannot believe this is one of the top selling books of Summer 2013. From the start the main characters (Nick and Amy) are annoying, self-absorbed hipster types, having an unfashionable move from NYC to small town America. The other characters are all so faceless and completely undeveloped considering their early introduction, Go in particular.For me there was no element of 'whodunnit' at all. I remember being about quarter the way through wondering what the following three quarters had in store. There are some good twists in the story and the writing isn't bad (though there are sometimes 'big words' put in for the sake), but the end - you cannot call it that - is just so lame. It was like the writer bit off more than she could chew and then tried to make it all go away by hiding in a corner and getting her fairy God Mother make all good again.As another reviewer said the story is like Swiss cheese with all the holes.To conclude: give it a miss!
I only finished this book because I was in awe at how preposterous this story was.  Poorly written and contrived.  Wouldn't recommend to anyone.
from the beginning to the end. I never believed the characters and felt duped from the beginning. I compare this books popularity to the appreciation of the mundane and the lowering of standards running rampant in society today, in the art world, with reality TV & with the endless talent show parades of one note un-remarkable performances.In so many of the online reviews the readers who liked this book feel the need to explain and even teach why the book is supposedly great but reading is a personal experience..you either relate to the story and enjoy the experience or you dont. No amount of dissection of the story and defending the author's motives can make another person like a book. I disliked the book so much and complained about it the entire time while reading it but forged ahead with fairness to the author and the hype. In truth i found not one likeable or believable character in the book. Even Boney came off as half baked to me. Now that it's over, I am so glad to be on with my life and rid of the thing.
One of the worst books I've ever read.  I kept thinking something amazing would happen at the end to redeem the story, but it just petered out.
After a very rousing recommendation from a few co-workers as well as high praise in various other magazines and websites, I decided to purchase this book. Having never read anything by this author, I wasn't familiar with her writing style and to be honest - I wish I had downloaded the sample and saved myself the money.Besides the jumpy and disjointed writing style that flits back and forth, my main issue is the fact that I do not care for Nick NOR Amy. I don't care what happens to either of them. It doesn't matter to me because neither of them are particularly likeable - and that is a major issue for me.Bottom line - if you can read a book and be ambivalent with the protagonist(s), not hold any true emotional attachment nor any care as to their peril (true or perceived), then this book is for you. But if you prefer to have a character that you actually care about and you want to follow their story, find another book to read.
can't bring myself to care at all about these characters, they're sociopaths.  why would i want to spend hours reading about them?  sick book.
I really wanted to love, love this book because everyone I talked to about it said they couldn't put it down. The author IS masterful at character development but the whole story  wasnt going anywhere until you realized, with a gasp, that you, the reader has been duped, none of the characters are what they seem. Yes, this adds to the depth of the writing, we were so easily fooled by the author, but this deception only made me scream even louder for the main character, Nick, to get revenge or at least vindication. So I kept reading, kept getting fooled, kept hoping that Nick would be granted a happy ending, all to no avail. Not that i always expect happy endings, but this story screamed for one. No way I can buy the end of this book!!! Is is like a fourth grader  who writes this crazy, long, involved fantasy story but has no idea how to bring it to a satisfying conclusion and just says ""It was all a dream.""  The ending just plain made me feel like I wasted all of my time reading any of this story.
This was definitely the fair-haired book of 2012, but everything's a matter of perspective.As an example of Post Modernism, this book is A++ with its seriously dysfunctional characters and no good guys whatsoever, so for people who enjoy Post Modernismor ""reality"" tv with all its let-it-all-hang-out drama, this book is wonderful.However, as mystery/suspense fiction, it's abysmal, a D or F; there's very little mystery or suspense, and of the couple, one is a whining narcissist, and the other is a psychopath, so it's really hard to have any empathy for either of them. They're so unlikeable that if I wouldn't have cared if both of them vanished off the face of the earth and would've thought good riddance. I hated the book because I enjoy mystery/suspense, which was what the book was marketed as, and I felt ripped off and wanted my money back.For the people who love Post Modernism or ""reality"" tv with its gory drama, this book was spot on, but those who enjoy mystery and suspense, not so much.
Everyone has their own likes and dislikes. This book was NOT for me. What a twisted, disturbing letdown. I hope this isn't made into a movie.
I listened to this on DVD. First, let me say the voice of Nick drove me CRAZY especially when he was doing everyone else's voices! I was so bored almost throughout the whole book up until at least one surprise actually came. I felt tortured by not only Nick's speaking of other character's voices but also waiting for something to actually happen that interested me. I don't think it ever came. I am now on the last CD and just pushing through it to the end. The surprises to me were minimal. In fact, I kept expecting something exciting to happen, perhaps how I would write it to make it that way, but that never happened. I really didn't find anything surprising except one part. I was severely disappointed in this story and can't wait til the end. No matter how it ends I am sure I will just be happy it's over. Maybe others think it's great but I surely don't understand what they found in it that was so thrilling. Also, both Nick and Amy were totally dislikeable characters. There was no one to root for!
Worst book I ever read.  I would never read another book by Flynn.  I would rather watch paint dry for hours.  No stars should be an option.
What a waste of time!  I am so annoyed that not only did I pay money for this book but I spent my time reading it!  I actually thought until about 3/4 of the way through that this would be a good mystery novel.  NO! NO! NO!  It is nothing but a hoax.  The ending is TERRIBLE!  If you read this book, you will be so annoyed with the ending or lack thereof that you will want to scream!  I am thinking the lead character, Amy, might have been based on the sick mindset of the author.  Her plan must have been to fool everyone into thinking they are reading a decent mystery book and then pull the rug right out from under them!  Actually the beginning 1/4 of the book is really, really slow....I almost gave it up and wish now that I had.  Then it picks up in the middle and you think maybe this will be a good mystery.  WRONG!  FOOLED AGAIN!  I rarely write book reviews but I just had to try and save someone else from making the same mistake.  I will never read another novel by this author/psycho  *@#%*!
This book was definitely not for me.  I didn't like the characters, not even a little, and there was no redeeming value to the story line.
Thrilling start, terrible ending. It's like the author gave up halfway through. Definitely won't be recommending this, even to my enemies.
Unrealistic ending, far cry from reality.....started well and just.....so disappointed in this book, cannot believe I paid for this.
What a bunch of poorly written crap and a complete waste of time.  At least I will be able to vent at book club about this waste.
I figured out the plot early on and hoped I was wrong. I wasn't and donated the book later. Disappointing, especially after all the hype.
It was very difficult to care about these characters. I hope the movie is better.  The writing left much to be desired, a great idea gone
Started out good. Writers block ruined the last third of the book. The ending made no sense and made all the characters weak and idiotic.
I have never gone from loving, to hating, a book so fast and so intensely.  The beginning is an interesting study of a marriage going wrong.  I thought the author had wonderful insights into marriage.  Then the book changes and turns into a wallow in everything that is wrong with modern entertainment.  What is our societies fascination with psychopaths?  It seems like today's writers (tv, movie, and print) think the only way we can hold someone's interest is to maim, sexually assault, or murder someone. Unfortunately, the victims are so often women.  This book takes that on that theme, with a slightly different twist, but no less demeaning to women or disturbing.  It feels like the book is written by two different people.  The first author, takes a sympathetic look at two people in a strained relationship.  The second author, feels a misogynistic shock jock. I kept reading because, as other commenters have indicated, I kept waiting for justice.  Now I feel traumatized.
Ugh...I  trying to make it through but barely can.  I'm on page 100 and nothing has really happened.  Not sure if I can finish this one!
Far and away one of the least interesting, most predictable books I have ever read. On the upside, it is better than the movie version.
I thought it shallow. The best thing was the depiction of a town in recession. The charactisation was distorted to accomodate the plot.
I am not sure how a person could dream up a story this weird. The two main characters especially the woman is certainly a mental case.
I would not recommend this book! I hated it from start to finish! Sick! Makes you want to wish there is no one like this in the world.
After 1/3 of the book I lost interest. One of the strangest books I have ever read. I hope there are no real people like Nick and Amy.
I liked this book when I first started reading it.  The characters are sweet loving people with a wonderful life ahead of them and then the wife goes missing.  But it didn't take long for me to HATE this story.  I hate all of its characters but the main two Nick and Amy most of all.  The fact that the author strings you along having you think one thing and then flips everything around is awful.  I kept reading the book thinking that there has to be something to all this but there isn't.  I was hoping that someone would finally kill both Amy and Nick and then I could be done with this stupid book. I skipped a lot of the chapters because most of it was boring nonsense and I actually threw it in the garbage when I reached the end.  Oh I'm sorry there is no end except for being left with the feeling that someone should call child protective services before one of these crazies killed their new born son. Do not waste your time - it will just make you mad.
I was looking forward to reading this book; but I couldn't wait to finish it by the time I was only half-way through.  It started out okay with the author's development of the character, Amy, a spoilt, rich girl who felt she needed to put up a facade in order to be accepted by the smart set and then had difficulty keeping  up this fake persona  once she had married the man she wanted.  We then saw  her husband's discovery of this deception and his subsequent decline.  After that it all got quite ridiculous and totally unbelievable - I wasn't able to relate to any of the characters  -  the married couple were both horrible, scheming people who deserved each other.  The ending was very lame!  It was as though the author couldn't work out how to finish the story so she let them both ""live happily ever after"" which was really weird, seeing as the whole book was about their intense hatred for each other!  Didn't add up.  Can't recommend this one at all!
Horrible ending I hated I wasted my time only to come to this tedious conclusion if it wasn't on my kindle I would trash this book!!!
One of the worst books I have read. I kept going waiting for it to get better also I am not a quitter. Why or why did I keep reading?
the device of telling the story through the eyes of two different observers was cumbersome and caused me to loose interest.
Worst book I've ever read!  Wish I hadn't wasted my money & time on it Won't be getting any more by this author. Pure filth!!!
Saw the movie and thought the premise interesting so decided to read the book. Very trite. Completely annoying book. Waste of time!!
This is an incomplete book. It has no ending. Think of a good book you have read. Delete the last chapter....that sums up this book!
I just did not like the book.  I did not like the ending.  It left you hanging. I probably will not read another Gillian Flynn book.
The psychiatric diagnostic category of ""As if"" personality disorder describes a person who lacks a grounded and integrated sense of self, and who, chameleon-like, puts on a personality like a coat that blends well with some set of expectations.  For the first half of this extended waste-of-time-to-read book, the wife (Amy) in this mess of a story is presented (via the contrivance of diary entries) as an earnest your woman who has longed for a love-match and has finally met a man (Nick) with whom she feels understood and very happy.  However, she appears to be functioning ""as if"" rather than authentically.  This is a long novel -- 580 or so pages -- with an elaborately detailed plot.  More than half-way through we are told that the diary entries were written as a ruse to fool the police.The ""real"" Amy turns out to be a psychopathic killer.  We don't have an unreliable narrator here.  We have an unreliable author.
Started out slow and then got interesting. But then it turned into one of the worst books I have read in a very long time. Skip it.
This book is just awful. It starts in awful and ends awful! Do not waste your money on this book!
There is nothing to redeem this book, unless it is how to stitch some cheap plot elements together with some unlikely and unlikeable characters and sell a million copies. Other reviewers complained about the ending. I agree it was bad, but at least it was over. Until you get to there, you have to put up with corny asides, pathetic and petulant characters, and bad dialogue. The plotting is so contrived I think Gillian Flynn must have done it on a spreadsheet, but then ignored all the unresolved consequences of her laughable sequence of events. And how many times (and why?) does she need to mention irony? It's like reading a novel by Alanis Morisette. This novel is as childish and stupid as its two cartoon lead characters. There is no point in talking about what the author did wrong. Everything about this book is wrong. If you read this book you have wasted the chance to read something else, which will almost certainly be better.
The writing is just so juvenile. Right from the beginning. Does not improve. Absolutely one of the worst books I've read recently.
The first half and the second half of this book are like two entirely different books. The first half is wonderful - eerie, suspenseful, insightful, great characterizations. You get the feeling that you're gearing up for some grand unraveling of a complex story.Then you get to the second part, and BOOM. There is no unraveling. There is no complexity. In the length of a few sentences, you are outright explained nearly everything, and you find out that most of the things you know to be true from the first part are outright lies. After this, the two narrators become completely unrealistic - they are caricatures, cartoonish and unbelievable. Furthermore, there is nowhere for the story to go after this point. The rest of the book is basically just waiting for one outcome or another. But wait - that outcome never arrives. No, the book just ends. Incredibly disappointing end for a book that had some great potential.
Bizarre plot, horrible language, weak ending. Do not read, and if you do, don't pay for it. I regret reading this book.
I wish I had back the time I wasted reading this crap!!This book was awful. Round and round it goes to no where.
I was having a really good run with bestsellers, so when I saw this one, I grabbed it without hesitation.  I remember reading the first chapter and was SO ready for a smart thriller/mystery...and then nothing happened.  The characters were completely one-dimensional, I couldn't even hate them like the author begged us to do...I just found them unrealistic and total bores.  I forced myself to finish the book mainly because I just couldn't bear with the thought that a best-selling author could write a book this monotonous.  And then, it just got worse.  I think I predicted the ""insanity"" part right off the bat.  Moral of the story: boring.  I see there are total opposite reviews here- you either love it or totally loathe it.  Obviously, I am of the latter persuasion.  No wonder it was only available in hardback...very smart on the author's part- get the money before word gets out and the public loses interest.
Great start but became silly and predictable very quickly. Female character was a disappointment. I  would not waste your time.
A great idea and well told story - but what a stupid, unimaginative, thoroughly unbelievable and awful ending. Two thumbs down.
Disappointing and dark.Suppose some like mental illness winning out - I'm not one of them.This was a waste of time.
The writing at the beginning was like a rich dessert...hard to swallow after too much.  The story telling was impersonal and done in huge writerly, self absorbed blocks that invited skimming to survive.  The plot really began to pick up toward the middle and for a brief moment I was hooked.  But as I anticipated an amazing twist of revenge by the husband as he would surely outsmart his deranged wife...pfffft.  The book simply...ended.  Frustrating.  Another complaint, why is it remotely okay to use the obscene/blasphemous phrase, j.f.c.?  Would people complain or cry foul if the f-bomb were connected to Buddha or Mohammed's name?  Much of the profanity seemed thrown into the work as if the author was saying ""I'm hip/badass"", and not really to enhance the story.  I will never read this author again, nor will I recommend her work.
The story line here has enough plot holes to accommodate several large trains.  The farther you read, the more you are required to suspend the common sense of everyday experience.  It doesn't take long for this to become laborious.  I found myself checking for the distance to the last page on many occasions.  I can't believe I finally finished it.There is no protagonist in the story.  No one to like, no one to root for.  The 2 main characters, one a psychopath, the other a royal fruitcake, are wholly unlikable.  All the other of the book's characters are cutouts, placeholders, and there is also nothing to connect with in them.The story line itself is utterly creepy and disturbing.  Perhaps the only thing more disturbing is the number of favorable reviews this book has received.With so much good reading out there, you'd be wise to avoid this one.  You've been warned.
I haven't written a review in a while, and I think other reviewers have said almost everything I could say about ""Gone Girl"", but the truth is that I do have something to say. This book, to me, represents everything that is wrong with the publishing industry today. High hype for what is a truly awful book, zillions in marketing spent to promote this garbage, and a book that simply does not deserve anything but a slush pile in some assistant editor's office. I hated the characters (especially Amy- I wanted to slap her), hated the ridiculous plot (think the shopping mall scene), hated EVERYTHING about this book. I just self-published my first book after a year of trying to land an agent, and much of the self-published work I read is just as good or better than the highly-financed, connection-ridden drivel like ""Gone Girl"". Oh, and in case you haven't heard- the ending is really, really, terribly bad.
This is a horrible book, with perverse but boring characters who are locked into trivial pursuits that only do harm to others, including murder.  The author considers her heroine to be very intelligent.  Well, she is very vindictive, but intelligent?  I did not see evidence for that, just a very nasty piece of work.  The husband is just an ordinary guy, who, unfortunately, marries a very narcissistic woman.  The author has a sick mind if she thinks this kind of writing is entertaining or interesting.  The reviewers also need their brains tested, or they need to go back to read good literature to remember what it is. My copy went right into the rubbish bin.Don't waste your money, your time, or your goodness on this not at all convincing tale.  Gillian Flynn needs to get her head sorted.  This is American trash at its worst.
Didn't enjoy the book, it had a strange plot that offended me and made it difficult to continuing reading the novel.
I got this book because it was so widely recommended. I wish I'd read Amazon's reviews first. I made it through the first 100 pages, barely, before giving up. These are the most revolting characters ever to make it to the printed page. Shallow, selfish, cruel and stupid. The writing is poor, the pace and plotting juvenile and the storyline ridiculous. What really concerns me, though, is the number of people who gave this thing five stars. I can't believe the American reading public could show such poor judgement.If you read a book like The Great Gatsby, which has some very selfish characters in it, you come away feeling that you've gained insight into what makes the tick. Girl Gone really does make you feel like you need a shower. For fun, check out the reviews on amazon.com UK. The Brits weren't fooled!
Seriously, the grammar alone is pathetic!!!! How is she the number one best author???? - REAL DEAL - Stephen King says. LOL... I just don't get it -- other writers work so hard to catch grammar mistakes, and this author comes along with the worst grammar, editing, run on sentences, as such, and ppl are raving. It BEATS me! How can anyone complain about ""editing, commas, etc....IF THIS IS THE BAR THAT GILLIAN HAS SET for the # 1 book....Amazon needs to stop the review system. Struggling authors get one review about a simple typo and their sells -- crash..this book has almost every comma misplaced...sentences that would make a English teacher cut her wrist....I found thousand of sentences in this book that are half the page!!! REALLY? Please, Gillian, you are a great storyteller -- but study sentence structure!! Thanks!! Comments welcome...someone else surely must feel the same way I do....
I hated the ending.  I read the book and was hoping that the movie ending would be different.  I hated the movie ending also.
Too much back and forth ""who done it"". No ending after all that teasing! Did not like it. I would not recommend it.
So much promise, so much hype, ending kinda left me angry.  The perfect crime, the perfect motive, the worst kind of fizzle.
This is a huge sensation, a best seller, adapted for film?  I was so looking forward to reading Gone Girl having heard it was one of those ""can't put it down"" reads.  Honestly I think it serves only to warm readers up to depravity with a light version of 50 Shades of Grey.  Full of nasty, unlikable characters, perversion, dehumanizing and cruel actions, vulgar language, a contrived plot and an unsatisfactory conclusion.  Had this not been selected for our book club, a session I am now LEADING I would have tossed it aside about three chapters in.  I slogged along although skimming over some of the final chapters, just to get it over with.  I am stunned it was such a popular or well reviewed book. It was tacky, tawdry, poorly written and totally unmemorable.  I'm glad I bought a cheap used copy.  What trash.
Shallow, offensive language and subject.  I kept thinking it would get better, but it did not.  I did not finish this book.
I thought the ending was a cop out and predictable. The rest of the book was great. Too bad the ending was such a let down.
I didn't really like this book for several reasons.1. Almost all the characters were unlikeable. Usually characters have something that makes you root for them or want to get to know them more - not here.2. It takes soooo long to get interested in the story line - literally 50% of the way through the book for me. I picked it up and put it down so many times over the course of the year and a half. I gave it one more shot when I heard it was coming out as a movie and finally at the point of getting 50% of the way through the book it got interesting.3. I think the ending was such a let down.I'm assuming when they make this book into a movie they will fix a lot of the issues that existed in the book. I have a feeling it will be the first time I've ever seen a movie that was better than the book. The concept was interesting but the writing was not great.
Just like everyone else I ordered a hardcover book and received a paperback. This is just dishonest advertising.
Nothing THRILLING about this book at all.  Was told the end was worth reading the book for.  Very disappointed all round.
It was a struggle to finish the book because I couldn't relate to either character. I have no desire to watch the movie.
One of the VERY few books I have ever rated below a 4 star. This one just wasn't for me. Complete waste of time to read.
This is the kind of book that is purposely written to set people on edge. Flynn is reaching out to the stereotypical bitter housewife that secretly wishes she could punish her husband for all of his incompetence.The book is sold on its twist ending. If you go into it assuming this, you'll be able to guess the ending within a few chapters. Basically, the author went for the ending she knew would get a rise out of people so her book would get more publicity. It's not well-written, and frankly, neither is the rest of the book. It's all based on getting attention and twisting the knife to get people talking.I'm the type of reader that adores a good mystery novel and a sick, almost perverted twist, but this attempt was such a blatant grab for attention that it drove me crazy.
Language was horrible. I felt like the entire book was a waste of time. Disappointed in myself that I even finished it.
Hated the ending. Felt like the author just got tired of writing or was being pressured by the publisher to finish up.
I'm having a bad time on Amazon these days.  I like mysteries.  P.D. James.  Reginald Hill.  Ian Rankin.  Dana Andrews.  Louise Penny.  Cozies that aren't too cute, Procedurals that aren't too coldly about body parts.  Remnants of Sherlock Holmes and Agatha Christie.  Unfortunately, the gross horror thriller has become the definition of ""mystery"" on Amazon, and this kind of pure psychological horror book obviously written to sell as a movie is recommended.  If this is your thing, it is a well-done version.  Not a bit of scenery or fun, just a thorough version of the most disgusting parts of the human psyche creating a thriller full of twists and turns.  Totally internal, totally horror, totally psychological.  Not particularly original, even, if you are old enough to remember reading Presumed Innocent without knowing the ending first.
I didn't care for this book at all!  The language was horrible and it really took a very long time to tell the story.
This ending...your kidding me! Never again... What were you thinking? Are the rest of your books like this? No more..
Bought it after my daughter said she loved it.  Really enjoyed the beginning, didn't think it really needed the heavy doses of profanity, but OK, they're a modern couple.  At first Nick seemed like a good guy who didn't really deserve sweet Amy.  But then Amy disappears and suddenly it becomes pretty clear than Nick is married to a sicko-psycho.  And the profanity gets worse, since that appears the only way that Nick can communicate.The ending was very disappointing—it made that old Glenn Close/Michael Douglas movie, Fatal Attraction, seem like a walk in the park compared to Nick and Amy's marriage.  I know the Kindle price was lower than the hard cover price, but it was still too much.  I agree that you shouldn't waste your money on it—I wish I hadn't!
I hated the book.  There was not a single character with any redeeming qualities.  Not even any likeable scoundrels!
THE MOST BORING BOOK I  HAVE EVER READ. I DIDN'T THINK IT WAS THAT SUSPENSEFUL. THE ENDING WAS MISLEADING I THOUGHT.
Hugely disappointing and unsatisfying ending.  I have no idea how there are so many 4-5 star reviews.  $7.99 wasted.
This book is awful.  It is taken me forever to finish because I have no interest.  Would not recommend it to anyone.
I don't understand all of the hype surrounding this book. I hate to trash it, because obviously the author took a lot of time and effort to write it, but it was painful at times to read. The writing is juvenile and underestimates the reader, in my opinion. The first few chapters were painful, but I muddled through, hoping the book would live up to the rave reviews. Sadly, it got worse, with unbelievable, underdeveloped characters, who all seem to use the same language, metaphors, etc. I don't understand the reviews claiming that the writing is good, but the ending was bad. The ending was no worse than the rest of the book. For me, the poor writing was distracting, and I found myself rushing to get to the end. How is this book getting so many good reviews?
I should have read the reviews more critically.  This IS a dark, twisted, sick book.  I kept reading, thinking that there would be some good, some redemption, some resolution.  Instead, Nick, a self-centered, immature, cheating husband is a very unlikeable, to say the least, protagonist.  His wife is a psycho who somehow meticulously plots against her husband, to a ridiculous degree.  This brilliantly sick person makes a class A stupid mistake, which she compounds with another stupid mistake, but creates and executes another meticulous plan on the fly.  The ending is abrupt and seriously disturbing. (Spoiler alert: They are going to raise a child together? Call Social Services now!)For some reason, I thought a best seller meant a good book. I wasted a lovely free weekend and contributed to this book's bestseller status.
Did not care for either main character, thought they were very unlikable. Plot wasn't that hard to figure out imho.
The book is garbage. A bunch of lies and a manipulative character that ruins people's lives and gets away with it.
Why is this book so popular?  All the characters a miserable weasels that deserve any misery that comes their way.
Gone Girl has a great concept... but my biggest problem with the story was the characters. The two main characters, the couple in the story, are both horrible people. Much too soon I realized I was rooting for neither of the characters and didn't really care what happened to them. I never found myself itching for the next plot event because the truth was I just didn't care. I finished the book because I hate leaving a book unfinished, but the truth is that the ending was just as disappointing as the rest of the book and was not worth reading.I understand why some people really like this book, I do. But for those who read to fall in love with the story and the characters, who are driven to read more by a desire to learn more about the characters and who hang on every detail... this is NOT the book for you.
I was very disappointed in this book, especially the ending. I only bought it because Ben Affleck is in the film, but sadly it is a movie I won't go see after reading the book. One aspect I didn't like was the few attempts to point out the correct grammar statements using I and me.  It was like reading the Unfortunate Events series for kids. Another aspect was the entire manipulation factor between the husband and wife.  Honestly, It's another book that I can't believe was published and seems to be so successful. It was very predictable. I knew what was going to happen after  she went missing with the description of the living room, way before the events were made clear by the author. Fortunately, it is a book that I could put down many times because it didn't keep me engrossed enough to want to read it in one day.
This was a real chore to read!  I don't know who edited this book but the story could have used a good cut of 100 pages or so. I fizzled out around page 120 and went right to the back. Too much flory dora adjectives to enjoy the story line. This was not meant to be a Joyce Carol Oates novel. A mystery has to move! This had a turtle stuck to it.  Also, I don't know if anyone caught this but when I read it I went huh?  On page 38 - the July 5th diary entry - Amy puts in .... ""shuffling out the door in my swingy tweed coat............"" in July a tweed coat??? Really??? There are many others if you are really paying attention. Could have had a much better ending if the book was edited besides being wayyy too long! (sigh) The movie should be better. It will hopefully be only 1.5 hrs long!  Guess the edit got done there!
This novel doesn't seem to be sure what it wants to be. I found the premise rather preposterous and somewhat offensive, in the way that narcissists are offensive. That being so, I gave up about a third of the way through, skipped through some of the rest and checked the end to see if it was worth my time to go back and see how the author gets there. It wasn't. To be fair, I couldn't make it through Bonfire of the Vanities either. I guess, as I move into AARP territory, I just don't have patience for amoral takers. ""Life is Pain."" This novel is based on the premise that people have the right to inflict infinite pain on others to create their own Happily Ever After. Sorry, I don't have time to even read about that way of life--I'd rather find something that offers joy, or is life affirming. Why wallow?
Waste of time. Ends up like a comic book of mysteries. Would not recommend it to anyone. Don't buy it.
Author rambles. Ending makes no sense. Would not recommend this book!!! One of the worse books I have ever read.
It did not hold my interest until close to the very end.  I would not recommend this book to anyone.Sorry.
Story line held my interest.  I will not read another book by this author because the language was so offensive
One of the worst books I've ever read. Can't  imagine how it stayed on the best sellers list as long as it did.
This is a horrible book, about an unpleasant, unhappy person married to a monster. It begins hopefully, but with such unrealistic hopes that it's apparent that these people don't know each other, or themselves, as well as they should. Amy, the wife, grew up the namesake of her parents' astoundingly popular series of children's books; Nick, the husband, looks like the perfect ""trust fund jerk,"" though in actuality he's a middle-class midwesterner. While they have their careers in New York, things go well, but when they lose their jobs, the marriage quickly devolves into frustration and the marriage becomes a battleground. Then the disappearance, the search tor Amy and for answers. The book ends in self-awareness, complacency and despair, with all the questions answered, but no solution.
I dont't say this lightly. My reading interests are quite varied, so I'm pretty patient with different writing styles. Reading this book was a waste of time. The plot is old, if presented with a different twist. The characters are dysfunctional without any compensating qualities. In fact I disliked them intensely by the time I finished reading. The story has no meaning, and by the end of the book, nothing has happened to resolve the problems of the main characters. The book has no ending. It just stops, as if the author got bored with the whole thing, and quit. I can't believe they made a movie! So why did I finish it? I'm an optimist. I kept hoping that there would be a sudden plot twist that would lend some meaning.
The first quarter of this book was gripping and I started off believing it deserved, and lived up to, all the hype.  But the further I read, the more I found myself checking wether this was really written by a woman and not a misogynistic man with deep-rooted hate for woman-kind.The gender stereotypes are so cliched its insulting, and the portrayal of fake rape and abuse allegations is nothing short of offensive.I read to the end partly in the hope that the book would be redeemed in terms of the storyline and its attitudes, but it just got worse and worse.  Political/feminist/moral objections asaide (and I have a hundred of them!), the writing and storyline tail off weakly as if the writer had simply run out of ideas.Save yourself a few hours and don't bother.
I really wanted to like this.  I saw coming attractions for the upcoming movie with Ben Affleck and & thought it would be really good.  I should have listened to another reviewer who said ""I hated the ending.""  Amen to that!  Additionally, I am not a fan of the back and forth narrative that the author uses. I feel like I wasted my time.  Never felt that way about a book before.  On reflection, none of the characters were likeable.  I am left wondering what was the real point?  The author includes at the end, a kind of ""made for book club discussion list of questions"". Those conversations would certainly be full of ""why this, why that."" There are better uses and books for my time.  This is one time where I suspect the movie will be much, much better than the book.
Most unlikable character ever! I don't find stories with such dysfunctional people to be entertaining. Sorry.
The unrealistic ending ruined the book for me - wishing I had not taken the time to read the book.
I must admit the only reason I selected this book was because of the great write-ups given the movie, even without watching it or having read any other of Gillian Flynn’s work. What a mistake. There is always something about a female writer depicting a male character in the first person that rings untrue, though this is less noticeable according to the talent of the writer. However, when it is incorporated with present tense, the whole effect seems to fly out the window. When you add the fact that the story switches frequently not only between a “his” viewpoint and a “hers” but also a “now” and “then”, the whole thing just becomes too hard to elicit interest.For me “Gone Girl” was a first, for – as an avid reader – I have never before discarded a book before finishing it.
I wish I could get back the time I spent reading GONE GIRL. Staring at a wall would have been a better use of it.  Maybe I could sue the major-magazine reviewers who talked this up?  I came to loathe both main characters. The schmuck is wimpy, needy, hapless and pathetic, and stays that way. The psycho is monstrously self-centered and vindictive, and ingeniously adept at manipulating people who like or trust them -- but collapses like a burst balloon when confronted with someone outside their ""comfort zone"" who genuinely has ill intentions. A book with too much cleverness and too little of anything worth remembering, and one of the most dissatisfying endings I've had the misfortune to encounter in a long time. I want my time back, and I want to scrub this book out of my memory.
Did not like the ending.  Was interesting at first until I got to the end.  I was disappointed in the ending
I hate this book. Which is really saying something, because I am a avid, life long lover of books- lots of different types of books, with different writing styles and plots and genres, and even if a book isn't to my taste or has some editing issues, I usually find some joy in the read none the less. I can't recall EVER actually hating a book. But I hate this one. I read it as a precursor to seeing the movie- but now I don't want to actually sit through the movie- it would be like getting a root canal...twice. I've read a lot of the reviews, and I respect them, and many see the genius or the art in this book but I do not- but I just ...it's just so...blah. Although I will say, it did garner a passionate reaction from me- so in that respect I suppose the author did succeed.
I did not like this book, at all. In any sense.  There is nothing redeeming about it, as far as I am concerned.I do not find the plot twist at all surprising and suspected it would be it a quarter through the book.  Any continued plot 'twists' were more outlandish than the last. The characters were poorly written and stereotypical to a point that any actions were very much like ""Of course s/he did.""- The psychotic wife, the stupid, naive and slutty mistress, the stupid bumbling husband, and even the parents, the police.I'm honestly surprised anyone found it griping or even exciting.I would recommend Kathy Reichs.  She's a bit formulaic but the stories are certainly interesting and characters more redeemable despite their flaws.
I have been trying to listen to this book for forever.... it's so .... un-interesting, un-appealing... there is nobody in the story that I care about at all. Thank god I didn't spend any money to listen to this book. Frequently along the way I ask myself ""why am I doing this to myself?"" This is how bad the book is.... I came onto Amazon to find out what the ending is so I don't have to listen to it anymore. I gather there is something about another pregnancy, but I don't care. The audio book is broken up into 15 parts. Each part is an hour or more. I am in part 15 right now, with about 54 minutes left to go in the whole book, and I don't care. I really can't subject myself to these horrible people anymore. I'm deleting it. What a relief to get it out of my life.
Two things are important to me in the books I read.  Characters that I can have some feelings for or about.  A story that I can believe or at least about which I can suspend my belief.  This book had neither.  The two main characters were so repulsive that I kept wishing one would at least do away with the other so that I would only feel half as bad.  The story was woven together with infinite care, but none of it rang true.  The story kept trying to convince me that Amy could create these foolproof circumstances to baffle everyone around her.  It only convinced me that she had to be surrounded by total fools to stumble around in such nonsense.  I'm a reader who is very easy to please.  I also finish every book I start.  Gone Girl almost made me forsake that last habit.
I was so disappointed in this book given that it has been talked about so much as a must read.  I did not think it was particularly well written but I was hooked to find out what happened to Amy.  In the beginning the story was clever with Amy spending so many years setting up her husband Nick but then the story started to get too convulted. In reality no one could do all that Amy did, then change the facts to say  she meant something else to finally getting away with murder after only a 4 hour grill from the police.  And the ending was just dumb.  I wanted some justice for one of the characters.  It was as if the author got tired of all her ideas and was getting mixed up and then just gave up with the ending.  I would not likely even read any more books by this author.
The book kept my attention at first. I think the only reason I finished it was because I had spent the money to buy it. I found the two main characters completely irredeemable, especially the wife.  It's hard for me to get into a book if I can't find some way to relate to the characters, and these 2 were nothing but liars, cheaters and totally self involved. I kept hoping the wife would end up in jail at the end of the book but she didn't.  I found the ending to be toally unsatisfactory, like watching someone commit more than one crime and go on living their lives without consequence, while those people all around them suffered. I would not recommend this book to anybody, I absolutely hated it.
Money I shouldn't have wasted & a journey I wish I'd skipped. Beware books with this kind of popular buzz.
I was curious about the story line but i'm so disappointed with how the story ended. totally waste of time
This book had received a very promising review from ""Entertainment Weekly"" so I felt justified purchasing it. After a very slow beginning, I finally began getting into the novel. It switched back and forth between the two main characters. First you would hear from the wife, then the husband and so on. The story became more and more implausable as it went on. I searched my very soul to stay interested. I decided that I had devoted so much time to this book that I must see it to the end. Then it ended. I seriously despise books that build up to what should be a blockbuster crescendo, only to end. I always feel that the author got tired of writing and just decided to end the book. I wished I had made that same decision, only several chapters before the last.
Very good story line. Terrible ending. The writer seemed lazy. They created this elaborate web of lies and deceit and built up this character to be so good at what she did that in the end I don't think the writer knew how to bring her down and she didn't have the energy to tie up loose ends. In the end there was a terribly unbelievable conclusion. It didn't offer closure or answer many questions. I hate that it ended this way because I enjoyed the plot and build up...but I was left bereft in the end. And I am even more shocked that the screen play writer didn't think to create an alternate ending for the movie. This was a waste of money and time furthermore, I wish I could get both back.
it is well written and I would give it one star for that. but everything else about this book makes me want to puke!  it is a horrible story. and the characters: a psychotic woman and her selfish,self-centered, husband who has no consideration for anybody besides himself; a clueless wimp sister; incompetent police officers; inlaw parents from hell; friends, neighbors, girlfriends, ex-boy/girl friends.  there is not one even remotely likeable person in the whole bunch! not one!  I cant believe there is not one decent person in the whole state of Missouri but the author didn't find any of them if there are. she tops it off with a totally unsatisfactory ending.  there are lots of books I have read that I wished would never end.  this one didn't end soon enough.
I actually got board and skipped pages, I was glad when it ended, won't read anything else by this author
I bought this as an audiobook.  It reads and sounds like it was written by a bunch of adolescents who got together, had a few beers, and wrote it together for a joke.  Maybe part of the fault lies in the narrators, who I couldn't bring myself to like, but they can't be blamed too much because what they had to work with was pretty sophomoric stuff.  I bought the audiobook on the basis of its great reviews and a plot description that seemed as though it might be interesting.  I kept hoping, waiting for the story and the characters to start becoming interesting .. plausible ... significant ... dare I say even worth listening to.  I kept waiting, hoping an editor would crash the beer party, take a look at this story and say, ""Hold everything.  This won't do!
So I read this book on a vacation and I admit it was a real page turner. I was totally rooting for the husband in the story and really was hoping for a stellar ending. In my opinion it ends in the worst way possible. I was pissed off and in a bad mood right after I finished this book. This book reminded me of the friends/family I have in my life who are with the wrong people , but they are never going to get out of those bad relationships. The people with the really sick, unhealthy relationships that are somehow still addicted to each other.I was expecting this book to be ""so good"" and really it just had a bunch of surprises and ended in a horrible way. Left a bad taste in my mouth. If I want depressing and messed up, I read the news.
Unfortunately, i believed the hype and praise and bought it.I read this book cover to cover very quickly.  It's an easy read and interesting.  However, I enjoy getting lost in my books, and that did not happen with this one.  The main character was just stupid.  What sane person would make the decisions he does, not once or twice, but continually?!  It was really disruptive to the flow of the book.  I teetered between wanting him to get justice and hoping he got exactly what his decisions deserved.  (Not a good place for a main character to be.)Finally, I absolutely agree that the ending was disappointing.  It doesn't need to be a happily-ever-after, but it would be nice to feel a sense of completion and satisfaction.  Not here.
This was chosen for my book club so I felt I had to finish it.  It was full of needless profanity. I can understand there are appropriate times for some crude language in a so called ""thriller"", but this was so over the top. I am very disappointed that a woman writer would have any of her characters use the ""c"" word. Disgusting. It would seem that someone as intelligent and experienced as this author could use a much broader vocabulary. Aside from all the filth, the story wasn't even remotely interesting. If you want to read a good thriller,try someone like Harlan Coben. Please don't waste your time on this.
What the other one star reviews said.There were so many missed opportunities in this book -- so many cliched characters, so many easy coincidences. The premise was good, and with so much of the story told in first person narrative it is easy to suspect everyone of anything... for a while. Then it just gets ridiculous. I think the author watched too many episodes of ""MacGyver."" Or the DeNiro movie, ""Cape Fear."" The bad character isn't just a bad character -- the bad character has secret super powers.My main gripe, however, is that the ending is beyond bad. It's as if the author got bored with the whole thing and just checked out. This book was not worth my time or my money. It ranks as one of my very least favorite books ever.
If people had told me that this was a ""guitly pleasure"" book or ""trashy"" or something, maybe I'd understand its appeal. However, everyone said ""good"". Everyone told me it was a ""good"" book. To me, that means it has quality and value. This book was so bad and so trashy and so stupid, its popularity is making me question humanity's capacity to distinguish between good and bad. I hated myself for finishing. Yes, as many reviewers said, the ending sucked. But, really, the whole thing was sucky. The first half was less sucky than the second. But the extreme suckiness of the second half tainted the first, making its overall suckiness considerable.
Really bad writing. Flynn never met an adjective she didn't like and decide to use in every sentence here. I can't stand the forced ""Gilmore Girls"" style dialogue that passes for witty. So many people recommended this book that I plunged on, wading through the pointless profanity, including a juvenile passage where one character rattles off a long list of slang names for male masturbation. Was this supposed to impress or amuse us or what, Gillian? By then the plot had sucked me in, so I kept reading. I shouldn't have bothered. It was easy to see every twist and turn ahead, except the ending. No one would have guessed she had such a mediocre ending in store for us. It could be a set-up for a sequel, I guess, but I sure won't be buying that.
Very disappointed in the ending of this book.  Feel like I wasted two whole days of my life reading it!
This book was one of the biggest disappointments as far as books go, in a long time.  I won't spoil it, but the ending was the worst ever and it actually made me mad and disgusted with myself: I wasted all my time with this book. I actually wanted to cry at my wastefulness...let's face it life is short.The premise was good I thought, so I started it up.  The first thing I noticed was the writing was very annoying, almost like the author was writing about herself and trying to prove how clever she is but sounding very annoying.  I stuck with it.  I'm a sport.  I figured it had to play out, to give it a chance.  I did and it didn't play out, it didn't conclude, it didn't do anything but make me very angry.  Don't waste your time.
I personally did not appreciate the twists in the book at all. While Amy seems highly intelligent, manipulative and evil, I doubt any woman who has truly loved her husband (at least she claimed so) could take years to plot her own disappearance to frame him by writing false diaries, faking her feelings, creating the appearance that he got rid of her by hurting and poisoning herself. It makes me sick to my stomach in the end to read about how she still has the gut to claim she loves him meanwhile threatening to throw him back to jail if he doesn't cooperate. The bottom line is, Amy is a manipulative and possessive b**** who enjoys toying people like puppets. And the author who contemplated such a story? I'd be scared if I were her husband.
I am glad I borrowed this book from the library because I would have been kicking myself if I spent any money on it. The beginning was very ""meh"" and boring. The middle got really good with some unexpected twists. The end of the book just flat out sucked. Everything was too over the top. Despite how much detail the middle of the book had, it seemed like everything was overlooked and taken at face value. Everything just coincidentally worked out, which just made the ending of the book disappointing and too easy. The book was entertaining, but when the ending sucks, it kind of makes the overall book not as good. I hope the movie is better. If you want to read this book, I recommend borrowing a copy from a friend or the library.
I HATE Amy and Nick. The book is well written, but god, the characters are just such awful people...
The book started off slow. Got really good half way through and then the ending...Well it was awful!
Worst book I've read in a long time. Hours of my life I will not get back. Who thinks of this stuff?
I am an avid reader and finally downloaded this book on my kindle.  What a HUGE disappointment!  I have never written a review for any book, but feel compelled to now.  The flow of this book is like a riding a bad roller coaster. Past, present, diary, past and back to present day.  This made the character development weak for me and I could not feel anything for this couple.  Other characters were brought in (the Dad) but added nothing to this story line.  The last few chapters are rushed.  I didn't even know if what I was reading was ""real"" at this point.  The ending left me looking for another chapter, angry and feeling duped by this author.  If you like soap operas with ludicrous story lines then this book is for you.
I couldn't waste my time with this trashy book. I unfortunately paid $19.95 (in Australia) for the soft back copy of this rubbish. It was smutty and badly written. I didn't think the language was modern and clever it just detracted from the story. I simply didn't care where the character had 'gone' and thought the brother and sister relationship sounded incestuous with her smutty comments about the brother's fifth wedding anniversary and the wife making comments about her husband being well endowed didn't add anything to the story. I gave the novel away to a co-worker, so at least I am not wasting paper.I read the back and didn't realise this novel was the basis of the new Ben Afleck movie of that name.
One star for being a time killer. This book had me excited, ready to dive in and savor it. This is about a four chapter book. Predictable, lengthy, and monotonous. Forced myself to read it based on the reviews and was semi interested in the movie. Wanted to read the Book prior to seeing the movie, now all I want is to erase this from my database. This book was a mixture of harlequin romance fifty shades of crap. Seems to be a book written for a movie, not the other way around. Need to waste some time? Be my guest, upon finishing it you will either( a) love it (b) think it was ok or (c) tell everyone what a great book it was except for the ending so you don't look like an idiot and secretly hated it. I vote for c.
This is my fourth Gillian Flynn book and I liked the first three. This one was, as my title says, a disappointment. I'm not sure Gillian should have continued the book when she ""got stuck"" at 82%. Her editor may not have the chops for this sort of writing. I feel like Gillian was pressured to finish this one and get it on the market before she, and the book, were ready. This, of all books, truly NEEDED a happy ending. Granted, that wouldn't have been as ""sophisticated"" or ""artsy"" or whatever they were going for with this ridiculous ending but it would have been a much more satisfying read. After struggling through so much impossibly horrible stuff, this book just needed to flush.
I bought this book over three months ago, and I found it extremely difficult to read because it was distasteful to read about a victim who is relentlessly being treated unfairly.  Little did I know then that he/she is never vindicated.  The ending was such a let-down after so much drama.  I felt the author copped out.  To take your readers on a suspenseful roller coaster ride in the hope that in the end there is some vindication for the victim only to reveal an ending that was not just anticlimactic, but unrealistic -- even more so than the events leading up to it -- and a bit idiotic (I mean who does that???), is cowardly.  I did not like this book, particularly because I don't like pointless books.
This book starts off extremely promising. Did Nick do it? Didn't he do it? Someone framing him? Very intriguing, and then...I will not offer spoilers here, but I feel the author had too many grand ideas regarding of how this book should play out and instead of carefully choosing she put them all together and tried to explain them away. I believe Gillian Flynn's background as a television writer for Entertainment Weekly was her downfall here. Perhaps too many episodes of Law & Order, Lifetime movies, and CSI. I know two other women who have read this book (one has already requested money back from her vendor) and thought it was one of the most overhyped books that's come out in a really long time.
While this book has been on the best seller list for a long time, I found it disappointing.  I admired the writing as skilled, but by the end of the book I felt like the two characters deserved each other.  That, of course, raises the question of whether the reader needs to like the characters.  I'm not sure I know the answer.  I only know that as I see it listed time after time on the best sellers list, I wonder if it is like the emperor's clothes and readers jump to join the crowd of other readers who have deemed it worthy.  All I know is that it did not inspire me to pick up her other books while other authors have.
This was one of the worst books I ever read. No sense of reality. I did not like one character.
I heard so many good things about this book and I have to say the author is clever and it is well written.  The perfectionist desires of Amy magnified due to her situation were very well developed and too many people do think a relationship to be good must be perfect.  But overall these people are so unlikable - I did not want to return to the book to spend more time with them.  I did persevere hoping for that murder/suicide ending - but alas - that did not happen.  It is a very popular book - so someone must enjoy this stuff.  I think the author is good - very good - but I don't like her stories just the same.
I listened to the audio version only to find out what everyone was raving about.  I still wonder.  The beginning was like a teenage chick novel, then the middle actually got me wanting to find out how it ended though I still disliked all the characters except Boney.  The end was the most disappointing I have ever read, even worse than Jodi Picoult's My Sister's Keeper.  Spoiler alert- I would have preferred to have him kill her and spend the rest of his life in prison. He probably would have been happier, too, even with the death penalty.  And the poor child with such a psychopathic mother.  Maybe that will be a sequel.  We know about children of deranged parents from other best sellers.
I started reading this book while on a trip to China and it started out strong (so strong that despite desperately wanting to get back home I almost missed my flight because I was so engrossed in the book).  This book, which starts out believably, deteriorates into this fantastical cat and mouse game that is beyond implausible. It's like the author made a bet to see how long she could string people along. NO ONE could believe this story.  The ending of this book is beyond unsatisfying I actually felt robbed of my time and money when I finished it.  I read this book in December, it's now April and I'm writing the review because I haven't forgotten how much I hated it.  Save your money.
I read this book as a library loan on my kindle.  My husband was very angry at the author when he read it.  She was dishonest in his opinion; holding information back and a few other similar writing ""strategies.""  I kept reading this book, despite his complaints but had trouble with the story itself.  These people are either stupid or not nice.  The ending was very depressing to me.  I ended up being very angry at the time I wasted slogging through the diary portion of the book.  I felt that I had wasted my time because of the lack of payoff at the end.  I really don't have much of a reason to recommend it.
Maybe some of the few pages that made the story will make some sort of movie I will never know
I read Gillian Flynn's first two novels and absolutely fell in love with them. I could not put them down once I started reading them. I could not wait to read Gone Girl. I wish I hadn't !! After reading this book the title should have been ""I'm Outta Here"".  The first part of the book was very slow and uninteresting. The middle had a great twist which perked my interest somewhat. Then Giilian just seemed to get tired of writing this book!!  She left us (literally like the title) saying ""your kidding me,that's it!! That's the ending? WTF"".  GF don't try and knock out as many books as u can in one year. Take a break and then come back with another killer book like your first two!!
This was the most hated book I could not put down.  I had to see what was going to happen but I didn't like myself for reading it.  The language offended me, the story line was SO depressing, I felt so sorry for the characters, it reminded me of so many families with mental illnesses that don't even know it.  I can't stop thinking of that child and his home life for the next 18 years, the psycotic person created by Amy's parents, and the man raised by Nick's parent's.  This sick mess will go on with their child and on and on, down the generations until someone gets help and puts a stop to it.  I don't think I'll read anything else by this author as I don't like depressing books.
i was unhappy with Part One, finding the motivations and actions impossible and the characters flat and one-dimensional.Part Two started off nicely rectifying Part One but quickly settled into The Plot Device which wags the tail of this tale.the characters switch and then become cliche and i mentally kept looking at my watch.finally after laboring The Plot Device far too long the book fizzles out to an unsatisfying conclusion.i didn't like any of the nasty characters and found myself sorry for wasting my time.reader beware, it's a book version of a lifetime network movie.
As someone who reads an average of one or more mystery/thriller books per week on my Kindle, I am utterly amazed that this book reached the top of the list of best sellers. I kept reading for the first 40% of the book because even though it was horribly written and completely boring I kept thinking there must be a reason so many people bought it. I was thinking that Gloria Steinem had written a soap opera. Finally it began to have a minimum of suspense, but it never reached the level of mediocrity. Then I got to the ending. At least I think it was and ending. Maybe it was meant as a teaser for a follow up novel. If so it is certainly one that I will not waste my money on.
After thinking long and hard about why I did not like the novel, please understand the wording and twists and turns were fun and enjoyable.  Could even relate to the way the protagonist and people felt at different points in the story.  Unfortunately after all the pages and getting through the changes that came, the ending was so ""dissatisfying"".  At the risk of spoiling the finish, I thought that the relationships and the struggles with character flaws were not tied together at the end in a way that left the reader feeling there was a purpose to it all.  To say anything else would spoil the end for folks who haven't read it - I may have said too much already.
Hated this book and the pathetic twisted characters.  I found myself getting bored to death.
Involvement with these two characters became impossible.There could not be a word of praise for the sick girl and her diary....and when her diary was revealed there could only be disgust at a mind so tarnished.The idiocy of her husband both in the beginning and the end of the book added to my distaste with this novel.I think the most serious review I can give is this:  Unfortunately, this novel ends with the opportunity for a ""formula seeking"" author to repeat the whole thing with different scenarios.  What a shame that other authors who bring a story to a climax, and then find another subject and inclination for a future book.  Dixl>
Unfortunately I did not find this book appealing - I had the Audible book. It seemed slow to grab my attention and I put it down several times. I had to force myself to continue - I figured it had to get better if so many people like it. When it FINALLY revealed a twist I thought it would be better from that point, but it wasn't for me! This concept just did not seem right. I kept hoping it would get better, but it never did for me. I just did not like the characters or the way the story progressed. And once I made it to the end I was SO disappointed! The ending made no sense. I hated that I wasted time on it – just did not enjoy it at all. I returned the book.
Did not like ending at all  Made the whole book a waste to me to have it end the way it did
After hearing all the hype over this book and movie I decided to give it a shot. I generally like sick and twisted thrillers/crime books, but this definitely is not going to make my list of favorites. The first part bored me to tears, but everyone said just make it to part two and it'll get better. Well, I can't say part two was much better. I had already figured out what was going on and I really had no desire  to finish the book. The only reason  I  did finish was to see if the ending was any good. Although I didn't predict how the book was going to end, I still thought it was absolutely terrible. A very disappointing book after all the praise I'd heard...
I purchased this book on the recommendation of a friend who said I had to read it, it was just so good. I will say it seemed interesting to start & kept me interested about a 3rd of the way through. Then the plot just got ridiculous. Neither protagonist was the least bit likeable & I found I didn't care what happened to either person. I plodded my way through it & some of the most foul language I've ever read in a book (seriously, who uses the ""c"" word that much?) only to get to an end that was the most unsatisfying end I have ever had the misfortune to read. I can't believe I wasted not only my money but time out of my life I won't ever get back again.
This is complicated!  The storyline was really creative and a page turner, but the language was deplorable and that is why I give it one star.  If the f-bombs were deleted, there would have been about one-third the volume.  Although the ending was disappointing, what else could you expect for two people who both were in the wrong (but I believe she was more than him).  Maybe the language was appropriate for the type of people those two were.  I would never have purchased it on my Kindle if I had known about the language; sampling books is a great way to get around that.
When I initially picked up this book, I was more engrossed in it than any book I've read in a long time. Couldn't put it down. But as other reviewers have said - the ending was a total letdown! It was as if the author couldn't figure out what turn the plot should take, so she just wrapped it up as quickly as possible. Very disappointing. I should've known, considering she misuses the word ""literal"" throughout the book. I almost put it down several times just based on that (and the characters are writers, so there isn't any reason why they would have such a fundamental misunderstanding of the English language). I wish I hadn't picked up this book.
Imagine reading a story that has good character development, an intriguing plot and rising action that keeps you at the edge of your chair. Then as the story enters the resolution phase, the good guy loses, the police fail, and the criminal, who is the embodiment of evil in every imaginable sense of that word, emerges triumphant.  In the end, all that we hold good and just in society is mocked while the criminal not only goes free, but continues to triumph over what most would consider impossible odds.  If you like this kind of scenario by all means read this otherwise well written book.  I do not plan to read anything by this author EVER again.
I found writing very juvenile.  I did not like the story being narrative becauce I found the characters extremely boring. I find myself skipping pages to get to a good part but I have not found it yet and I am 1/2 through the book. I bought the book because they made a movie from it and always love to read the book before seeing the movie. I know I will not see movie unless it comes on TV and there is nothing else to watch and I doubt I will be able to finish the book. I may just skip to the end since I already bought the book. I should have waited to buy second book from this author but the price was low so I will try and read that one next.
starts out ok, drags on, then for half a second there is the long awaited twist which gets the reader quasi excited, then it goes DOWNHILL from there. I think the author's use of profane language throughout the second part is an attempt to change the pace  which fails miserably. The second part drags on as well, makes no sense, then the worst  is the ending. I have to admit I was disturbed by how the author ended the book. I think she either forgot the stove on and hurried to end the book to get back to her cooking , or she is a bit of a psychopath ( i am leaning toward the latter), I cannot believe this book has over 14K reviews on Amazon!!
Most uninteresting and boringRead about a third.and skipped to predictable ending
I hated this book. I've been a reader for most of my life, since I was about eight when I started on Louisa May Alcott, andI'm 60 now. I read everything: Hemingway, Fitzgerald, King, Patterson, you name it. I decided to read Gone Girl because of the popularity of the movie. A few pages in, I hated the husband. A bit more into it, I felt if he hadn't killed her he was evil and deserved punishment anyway. Then I hated other characters. There is a frantic mess in the middle which resolves into a most unsatisfying end.I look for a character to root for in a novel, a likable person, a protagonist. There is none in Gone Girl.
I was drawn to this book by the amount of positive reviews it received, and read the first two-thirds of the book in two days as it was very compelling.  However, the ending is beyond creepy, but very sick and absurd (and extremely disappointing), that I can't rate this book anything but 1 star (and I would rate it less than if I could).  It's a little disgusting that people can actually think up of stuff like that ending, and I'm angry with myself that I actually paid for this book.  Hopefully this review will spare someone else his/her time and money.
Depressing novel!  What are all the raves about?  I guessed most of the plot early on.
Gone Girl is a multi layered novel.At its most interesting it has something to say  about the nature of romantic love and how we develop our best selves.It also explores the evolution of the false self when we fail to actualize our best self, and are simply trying to manipulate our loved one.Other major themes it explores encompass evil, manipulation, the gullibility of the public and the shallowness of the media gurus.At times it becomes a page turning, nail biting  who dun-it. Gillian Flynn has done a great job of tying all these themes together intoa very interesting book. PS. Shame about the film.
I did not like this book and, usually, when I figure this out within the first 80 pages, I stop reading. All the great reviews and numerous stars made me finish it. And not like it any better.It started out okay, but when the you-know-what hit the fan, it got very unrealistic. Both characters are psychos, they do unbelievable stuff to each other and the end is contrived and unrealistic.I'm trying to figure out why people liked this book? Besides having to be a creative and well-informed person, about mental illnesses to write such characters, I don't have much to say that is positive about this book.
never posted a review.  but this book , i don't know i think i must have read a very different book than everyone else.  I HATED  this book.  the writing was poor, the plot obvious and the ending (which i skipped to) incredibly disatisfying.  I judge a book on whether i want to keep on reading to find out what happen-i pushed-i really did-but could push no more.  the plot literally screams the outcome and the revelation of nicks weaknesses only emphasizes that he is not the problem.  would never recommend.  in fact i left my copy in the hotel room cuz i couldn't see lugging it back across the country to just toss it.
If you don't like what you've already written, just keep going and keep changing it.
I didn't want the book to end as it did.  My wish was for aboutten more pages.
I read several books a week, mostly non-fiction, but since joining a Book Club, have been reading their choices. This is one of my least favorite books of all time.  I tried to weed through the ""F"" words to get at the plot, finally scanning and reading the last part. which was the better-written section of the book.  It could have been good.  The idea was very good - telling the story from two points of view is an excellent idea. But - reading it was not an enjoyable experience.  There were no good characters to cheer for and the ending was left hanging, making the entire reading a waste of time.
This story was truly miserable. As in, it was a story about two miserable human beings who end up in a miserable marriage. It is well written. I'm not saying it is a bad book. But, a feel-good story it is NOT. There are a few twists and surprises. None of them pleasant. And the characters were completely unrelatable. However, I think that was the point. It leaves you scratching your head. It makes you think. And I guess that's good. However, if you are looking for a happy story or for characters that you love and want to be your friends, this book is not for you. Worth a read with a warning attached. Lol
Total waste of time and money.  Nick and Amy are two of the least likable characters in any book I've ever read.  I can well imagine how unlikable they are as portrayed by Ben Affleck and Rosamind Pike in the movie version, which I refuse to even see.  I don't know why I bothererd to keep on reading, but like everyone else, I was curious to see how this story would eventually end.  Major disappointment.  Gillian Flynn is laughing all the way to the bank.  This was the first and last time I'll read anything of hers ever again.
I have now read two of Ms. Flynn's novels, Dark Places and I just finished Gone Girl. Gone Girl labors on and on and on much as Dark Places did. It took over four months for me to finish this never ending tale of a sadistic marriage. I kept picking it back up having forgotten how boring and distasteful it was. I, like many other readers must be desperately in need of a good psychological thriller but surely this is not one. The meaningless ending made me think that I have read better short stories penned by high school kids.
after dealing with the unusual twists in who did what, that gets you switching who you are rooting forit was wierd some of the way the writing was done, I didnt like either charachter at one point but I stuck with it and was so frustratedwith the way it ended I felt like I had put in a lot of energy trying to figure this out and keep reading for what? I went back 3 times to see if I somehow skipped a page..I was like it cant end like that really? I must be wrong..I ofcourse did not reviews until AFTER I read the book but I agree with those that said Gone Girl is more like Gone Ending?
The brief book synopsis sounded intriguing, but after reading it I really don't understand why this book has been so popular. Basically it is about a very dysfunctional relationship between a man who is a self-centered, spoiled brat, and his wife who is a psychopath. The power struggle between them to control and punish each other, yet still in some strange way be attracted to each other, was pathetic and sick. And the ending was a total anticlimax! I would give this book zero stars if that were an option. It is my least favorite book that our book club has read in the last year or so. Reader beware!
Good story.  I guess.  I am having difficulty tolerating the voice ""actors,"" because the two readers are not actors.  They are (poor) ""readers."" Whatever you do, pass on the audio book.  Half the dozens of books I now purchase are audio. The two voices of GONE GIRL ruin a good book. Extraordinary poor interpretation. Their work, especially the woman's, is about the same quality as a High School English student's. If I were the author I would be furious at having to accept a totally amateurish rendering of my written effort. Hate to be a harsh critic, but this  work is not of professional quality.  KD
Gone Girl is so painfully slow and boring you just can't get through more than a few chapters before you literally have to start reading a different book.I forced myself to finish it desperately wanting it to have a great ending to make the effort somewhat worthwhile but everytime you think its starting to get good it just disappoints you more.I don't think I would have written a review if there had been any kind of resolution in the ending but I wouldn't want my worst enemy to have to suffer through this book like I did.
This novel starts well with a premise that is suspenseful.But by the end, I was completely snorting and guffawing athow absurd the whole thing is and what a moron I was forfalling for it.Sure, much of the writing is tight and just swell.But the manipulation of the reader is unforgivable, andthe number of reviews this book got! Someone either has a TONof friends or a lot of time on her hands for this many positive reviewsfor a mediocre novel.Don't read Sharp Objects. By chapter four an astute reader will yearn touse sharp objects on herself.
Started out so good.  But felt the author gave up on the story.  Super bad ending.
This was the worst book I have ever read.  I wish I had not wasted my money on it.
I actually thought this was a pretty good movie (I'm assuming the novel was similar), but the ending was so disappointing and so weird that it turned me off to the whole thing. The movie needed another 5 to 10 minutes, and I'm sure from what I've read here that the novel needed another 5 to 10 pages. As it was, I felt cheated of an emotionally satisfying ending. You don't need a happy ending, but as a writer, you must have an emotionally satisfying ending. Here it is: The woman made a mistake that reveals her as a psychopath. It's too bad the author and movie producers will never read my review.
It's usually the ending that makes or breaks a book. This book was really great, lots of twists and turns, you had no idea where it was going for a while. It has sooo much potential. I mean, this book could have been a *masterpiece.* People could be raving about this book. But it FAiLed HARD. Epically. The ending is not just disappointing, it's stupid and horrible and pathetic and it leaves a bad taste in your mouth. You end up right where you started. Why did I bother? Sooooo disappointed because it had so much potential! Don't bother. You'll be disappointed, too.Try again, Flynn.
Do yourself a favor and don't spend time on the laziest book ever written. Some novels take a few chapters to get completely sucked into the world of the book. I expect it, I'm not put off by that at all. With ""Gone Girl"" I kept waiting for that moment, but it never happened. Worse than that, the whole book seemed like a cop out. And the ""twist""? Well, that was the sorriest excuse for a resolution. It's convoluted, it's confusing, and it's not worth the money.Get another book. Any other book. Even Harlequin novels have a more grappling storyline and less plot-holes than this book.
What a colossal waste of time and money!  I could not get past the first two chapters, noting that both the husband and the wife were basket cases (especially her).  I skimmed through the book and was totally disappointed.  I bought this book based upon the raves and over-the-top reviews on it.  I will be donating this book to some charity for another reader to TRY to enjoy, provided that the reader can tolerate and plow through this awful book.  If I could have given this book a half star, I would have done so...
I found this book a big disappointment.  The more I read of the book, the less interesting I found it. I bought it--before it became a hype sensation-- because I was intrigued by the premise. Did the husband murder his wife or not?  Is he an unreliable narrator or not?  I don't feel the author pulled it off. In terms of her plotting, she took the easy way out by making both her lead characters as nutty as fruitcakes and toxic to boot.  Ultimately it's about two unlikeable amoral narcissists, both of whom may be sociopaths. One of them certainly is.  She makes him a better person my ass.
Simple and Sweet-Part One: I hate that guy...Nick.Part Two: I hate that girl...AmyPart Three: I hate that author...FlynnThe ending ruined the whole experience. All that time and energy, not to mention frustration and emoitional rollar-coaster to be left wiwith that?!?!Heard they made this a film- done by one of my favorite directors (David Fincher). Heard she 'author' Flynn wrote the screenplay and changed the ending...  and they say the masses can't make CHANGE happen..Read it if you want to chuck your kindle at something....
There are many angry female writers out there convinced evil American men are out to get them (except for those who are dumb enough to publish their novels) and this novel is merely a descent into typical post-modern radical madness. There is no ""war on women"" but there is clearly a war on men. And to think the writer has the audacity to write from a male point-of-view! But that's not the worst of it. The worst--the writing is horrible. You can find that out for yourself with the ""take a look"" feature. Don't waste your time or money on this mindless tripe. Read Winnie the Pooh instead.
This was one of the worst books I read in a while. They both deserve each other.
I have never read a book in which I got to the end and felt as if the author just got tired of writing.Here I am, spending hours quickly thumbing through the pages of this gripping tale of Nick and Amy, just waiting for Gillian Flynn to wrap this all up - delivering the final blow of justice that we as readers were craving and then it just stops.  I'm not exaggerating... this book just stopped. There is literally no ending.  It honestly made me want to punch someone in the face.  I am less upset about the money I spent on the book and more disturbed by the time I wasted on it.
Ms. Flynn has written a novel that is, indeed, a page turner. The story is original and engaging. Had I stopped reading before the last chapter, I would have ended it pleased--even though I predicted the first major ""twist"" only a few chapters into the story. Instead, the second ""twist"" at the end ruined the whole experience for me.I spent the whole book loving the character arc for Nick. He went from passive to empowered. That was his journey. Then in the last chapter, the author flips him right back to being a wuss. It was such a violation of his character.
From the very start of the book I was captured by the characters and wanted to learn more about them. With each chapter I wanted to discover what was going to happen next. The book is nothing less than a page turner that leaves you with the feeling of disappointment and regret! Regret that you wasted your time on what should have been a classic mystery novel.Flynn displays talent as a being able to write with eloquence. However, she disappoints by showing her inability to bring a story to fruition. The reader is left with a terrible taste of injustice and wrongdoing.
I am getting tired of all the ""dark"" stories, written about sociopaths.
It's like the author got bored and decided to just stop. Ending sucks so badly.
I got through about 19% of this book on my Kindle.  It took six months to read that much!  The story is slow and plodding. The characters are both unremarkable and unlikable. More to the point, their vacuous and vain in their own special ways. The story contains no message and it's not an entertaining read or one that you'll feel good about afterwards.  Book group members will probably have one question: How do I get the time I spent reading this drivel back?  Spend your money on something better.
Biggest waste of my time! I do not see what all the hype is about this story. Ridiculously long and drawn out. No great twist at the end like I had heard there was. Exceptionally vulgar and crude. Awful, just awful. I've watched better stories on Criminal Minds and Law & Order. This is just a stupid story about a psychotic woman who gets back at her cheating husband and then pins him down with her web of lies so that he can't ever get away from her. Ridiculous. Can you return books because you don't like them? I wish I could get my money back. My copy is going in the trash.
This is an unbelievable waste of time. I tried it twice and I couldn't take it. I had to stop and I just gave up on this book. There is probably one line in each page which will add something new to the story line. Everything else is just unbearable blah around this one line. So in principle, you should be able to get the story by reading one line in each page, but the problem is, you have to find it first. My wife was able to finish it, but she was not impressed either. She doesn't even want to se the movie. She said reading the book was enough. Can't take the movie too.
I hated this book. I did not like any of the characters. A little far fetched.
I borrowed this book from the library, and I am glad I did: I found the first two chapters tedious and boring. I didn't know, like or care about anyone I had met. I put down the book and discovered I had no lingering questions, no interesting in the characters introduced so far, no desire to see what happened next.I have been told that once I got a little further, I'd want to continue. I'm not compelled to find out.Plus, I've been told it's a ""throw it across the room when you're finished"" book, and I don't need another one of those in my life.
I think I might be the only person in the world to dislike this book.  I was looking over the other reviews and just can't see why people love this book so.  If I had to use one word to describe Gone Girl - it would be pretentious.  I don't know how many times I rolled my eyes while reading this.  Truthfully, this is not normally the type of book I would read.  I enjoy thrillers, but this is a little too dark for my liking.  I only read it because I decided to complete Amazon's 100 Must Read Book list.  I will say, that Gillian Flynn can really write a plot twist.
Flynn hit the jackpot by misleading readers rather than developing a novel with an innovative plot.  By creating a character who seems to have many of the characteristics of convicted murderer Scott Peterson she leads or rather misleads readers down a certain path that she reinforces by having Amy, who eventually becomes the missing wife, read books like The Wind-Up Bird Chronicle by Haruki Murakami.  This too offers some information for readers, but again, leads readers down the wrong path.  That's not good writing in my opinion.  That's a cheap literary trick.
One of the most ridiculous books I have ever read.  There was nothing to it.
I could not get this book on my i pad.  I go to kindle and all that is there is Wild.  I read that and do not know how to get out of it.  Sure have trouble.  My order shows I bought it but where is it.  I did that Dec. 26.  Could it have gone away since I did not read it yet?  I just bought American Sniper,  hope that downloads.  do I get credit for Gone Girl or how do I get it downloaded.  I am not a reader that sits down and reads the whole thing.  I am very busy and don't have a lot of time so just did not get at it.  Help me figure out what to do.
I've read all of Gillian Flynn's books - this being the last one i had to read. Let me say i loved the other two. This one... Come on!!! The entire first 60% of the book was GREAT! - I loved the story but then it seems like she just didnt know what to do with the ending to make it as significant as the rest of the novel.I got this as a digital library loan and i am SO glad i di - i didnt have to waste my money or ask for it back- now if i could just get back the time I wasted on this garbage.Next time...Try harder Ms. Flynn... Much, Much harder.
I thought this book was one of those great thrillers out there. to give due credit to the author it did begin that way, but a s the story progressed it became very unfathomable. I mean the ending was just ridiculous to the core. why would he not say his side of the story?  and he is willing to live like that for the sake of a child? if you think about it, it is a kind of reversal of roles where the woman is an abuser, but it just doesn't sit well. I wish the author would have thought of a better ending...after all this is just a work of fiction.
This book is really well written, very clever, and an intriguing page turner. However, I did not like it at all. The characters were written with plenty of description and depth but, I loathed them. They were shallow and self-serving people and I had no desire or care to know what happened to them. I like books where I can empathize with the characters, which is why I disliked this book. If it is not important to you to like the characters of the book, then you will probably enjoy this novel with it's intricate plot twists and unexpected ending.
Thank goodness this book was on sale. I wish I could get the time back I wasted reading this garbage. So vile and awful....and then to throw salt in a wound....the ending, was pathetic. Like air deflating from a balloon. I will not be getting anymore of her books.I also think the author has some messed up thinking. And not in the interesting way...more like she secretly hates herself and women.And anyone who spends money and time on this book.
I thought this was one of the worst books I have read in a very long time.
I was not impressed by the language. It seems these people could not speak without using the F-word or the B-word. If I had known that there would be so much off-color language and scenarios that seemed pretty raunchy, I would not have purchased this book. If this is a sample of her work, I won't be reading any others. Just tell the story with good old descriptive language. We that uphold good Christian values, will like it much better. Take out the filthy language, and the book would have been a lot shorter and I would have wasted less time.
This is one of the worst books I've ever read.  But, I did finish reading it anyway so I guess it wasn't totally bad. I got almost half way through before it even became a little interesting.  The author has a very poor writing style which didn't help in getting me engaged in the story.  I can't believe that this book is on the best seller list.  And as other reviewers have already mentioned the ending was not good at all.  In fact, I didn't even know I had read the ending until I was into the acknowledgments.  Don't bother with this one.
I looked forward to reading this.I wish I hadn't.There is not a likeable character amongst them. In fact, before I even found out what happened to her, I was hoping Amy *was* dead - which is a pretty extreme response to a literary character but she was THAT unlikeable. I stuck with it and got to the end and wanted to SCREAM. It made me physically react and not in a good way.I don't want to give away any plot lines but this was deeply unsatisfying, had very annoying characters and an infuriating ending.
I don't have the words to describe my utter disappointment in this story.
I read EVERY day and have since I was a little girl.  Frankly I did not care about any character in this book.  They were all horrible people.  To make a book good you have to care about at least one of the charactets....not happening in this book.  Perhaps the movie will be decent, however, I won't watch it.  I really don't think I have disliked a book more than this one in my life.  Big disappointment and waste of my money.  I wish there was a ""no star"" because it doesn't deserve one star...it should be tossed in the trash.
This book started out slow, I kept with it cause Hey, everyone loves it, as I kept going, the plot got more outlandish, ridiculous and far fetched for me to to ever be really interested. The writing was poor, and I didn't get as clear of an idea of what a character is like as I suppose the author would have liked, therefore leaving me with out being emotionally invested, I really didn't care what happened to either of the characters. All end all I ended up feeling cheated into buying a crazy book that was all hype and no substance.
Can't believe I wasted precious time reading this book - I'm thankful I got it from the library, and didn't also waste money.  Why anyone would give it more than one star is beyond me.  Not well written, completely unbelievable, and was crass to an extent that made me uncomfortable at times (and I am FAR from a prude).  I kept reading, because I thought it had to get better, considering all the great reviews and the references to a ""stunning"" ending.  Unfortunately, it only got worse, and the ending was anything but stunning.
Just finished this and I would consider it the worst book I have ever read.  I go through a lot of books and thought I would read a best seller.  Typically I read history, non-fiction and suspense books but thought, why not try something different.  As I got further into this mess of a book, I already didn't like the pattern of writing, but keep thinking something would break.  As I read the last page I actually had to go back to the previous page to be sure that was it!  Terrible, and if I could give it minus stars I would.
This is the worst book I've ever read.  I was tempted several times to stop reading it, but I have a policy of finishing books that I have started.  It is a shame, because the author seems to have a talent for drawing the reader in, but the plot is completely unbelievable and it is impossible to connect with any of the characters because they are so shallow and self-centered.  I cannot believe this book was on the NY Times Best Seller List!  I will definitely be more careful when buying books off of this list in the future.
I'm the type of person who has to finish a book no matter what.  That's the ONLY reason I finished the book.  It was so poorly written.  I didn't care about either character the entire time I was reading the story.  Nothing pulled me into the story.  The whole time I was reading I was thinking this has got to turn around right?  There's got to be something that pulls me into caring about what happens to these people.  It never happened.  Maybe this is one of those rare times where the movie will be better than the book??!!
This book goes on and on and on about a poor drunk woman.  She is extremely annoying. I wanted someone to kill her just so I wouldn't have to listen to her any more.  She spent most of the book drunk and throwing up or forgetting where she had been and what had happened.  It is impossible to have any sympathy for her.  Since I listened to the audio version, the best thing about it was that it was so boring that the droning on and on helped me go to sleep at night. I don't understand this book being a best seller at all.
Our book club is reading this book, and I received many emails pushing the book from Amazon, plus read many positive reviews about it.  But I have to disagree.  The writing style was juvenile.  The characters were so evil as to make them unbelievable.  The plot twists were either predictable or so outrageous as to be ridiculous, especially in the second half of the book.This book is trash, and I don't often feel that way!  I only stuck it out because of my book club requirement.  There are much better books available!
I just couldn't get into it and just gave up.  I almost never do that.
I read her previous two novels and loved them!! I was very excited to start Gone Girl.  It took nearly 200 pages to finally get interested and then I wasted another week hoping there would be a justified ending.  Instead, it was just uncomfortable.  There was no closure at all.  It was just confusing and annoying.  hope Ms. Flynn will revert back to the style she used in her other books.  I cannot recommend this book to anyone and when I pass it on to a friend I will encourage them to skip the first 100 pages.
Hated this book... Such a waste of time to read and very frustrating.
In the beginning, this book grabbed my attention as I read the husband's account.  However, it quickly became a nightmare that I felt I had to endure in order to find an ending with some sort of redemption.  There was not one character in this story that I connected with nor even remotely liked.  I did not enjoy the read at all, so it was a painful journey to get to the end.  And then, surprise!  The story ended when, it appeared, the author simply ran out of ideas or steam and became weary of her own tale.
Hate to say it but I couldn't finish this book. I do not believe I have ever done that before. I made it to about 41% and just couldn't take it anymore. I kept waiting for it to take off or for something to happen but it never did. Kind of like reading someone's boring diary that you have absolutely no interest in. I just don't get the popularity...I feel ripped off!  Hmm, maybe it is just too girly as another reader suggested.
I just really hated this book. The ending was just as horrible as the characters. I wasn't really trapped in the suspense at all. Once the characters were developed enough, you could predict more or less what their next actions would be.It also took me about halfway through the book before any real ""action"" happened. I only kept reading it to see what happened in the end and because this was such a popular book. However, if this was any other novel, I would have stopped all together.
I typically love mysteries, but this particular one was a huge let  down. I do not like the message it sent. The perfect little girl grown into ""perfect"" young woman can do horrible things to others to get what she wants and suffer no consequences, this is not the way life works. It brings up the point that people's actions have no consequences, which is not true and yet continues to be a thought process trend in our society. I sincerely disliked this book and would not recommend it to anyone.
Not sure what all the hype was about. Felt very formulatic and there were no surprises especially when you knew Gillian was trying to pull one off. I also hate when the author feels like it's necessary to explain the storyline. That means to me they didn't do a good enough job leading you to understand what's happening by their story telling. Save your money and pick it up at the library if you want to judge for yourself.
Did not care for this book at all. In my opinion not one of Flynn's better stories. I kept thinking it has to get better, but it never did. You know the ad for the vegetable juice where they slap their heads & say "" Could've had a V8""? This book made me feel like that. Only wanted to slap my head and say ""Could've had a Virgil Flowers"". Not a true mystery read, no mystery really, the characters are both unbalanced and need psychological help. For me it was a waste of time and money.
I absolutely loathed this book.  I give one star because the writer made her characters so odious and self absorbed that one must give credit for writing talent.  There was nothing sympathetic about any of these people.  The ending was totally predictable and annoying.  I really did not care one jot for what happened to any of the authors  creations.  While Ms. Flynn is unquestionable a talented writer, her choice of content is less than stellar.  I would never waste my time with this author again.
I was very disappointed in Gone Girl.  I read at least 50 or so pages and got bored (I have plenty of reading waiting in line).  To me it smacked too much of a sort of combination of the Peterson (CA.) murder and the Powell murder (UT).  I had read extensively the true news reports and stories of those 2 murders, so...  a rehashing?  No disrespect to the author but I don't see any skill in taking too many elements from a real murder story or stories, sticking them together and calling it a novel.
The story dragged on and on, and that is the only ""nice"" thing I can say about it. The sheer evil of the two psychotic main characters was way too much for me. The author uses lots of profanity and sexually crude vocabulary and this seemed a bit over the top. Hated the ending; left me thinking there would a sequel to Gone Girl, which I definitely won't be reading. Couldn't wait to be finished with this story and go hug little puppies and sing Baby Beluga to get the horrible taste out of my mouth.
I hated this book. Not only was the end STUPID but the beginning & middle were confusing. I felt the book was lacking any ""umph"". I scanned pages & pages just waiting for something to happen. The characters were dull. Amy's parents were ridiculous, Nick was a jerk, & Margot was oblivious. And Amy....oh sheesh, where do I begin? I won't post spoilers but WOW! What a piece of work. I'm not sure how this book became so hyped, but the movie was better (even though the ending still stunk).
The book started out quite interesting and then slowed down, then picked back up, and then finally crashed! It was a horrible roller coaster ride that I kept waiting to end!I kept waiting for the climax, the ""damn this is a good book,"" and before I knew it, it was over and I'm wishing I can say... ""Hey Gillian, can I have my $9.20 and the last 2 days of my life back, please?Advice to those who have not read: DO NOT BUY. CHECK IT OUT AT THE LIBRARY!
I hate when a plot uses a lie that later, MUCH later, is revealed to the reader causing him/her to need to think back over the entire story to reevaluate things based on the new knowledge of the truth.  It makes me feel tricked, and used, and frustrated to have essentially wasted all that reading time on a lie.  Additionally, I don't like any of the main characters which makes it hard for me to enjoy the book.  The writing is fairly well done otherwise. it's just no fun for my taste.
I picked it up for a quick summer read. The beginning was slow and badly written, the writing was better in the middle, a page turner, yes, in a sick way.  In the last 100 pages the author had so many satisfying choices for her ending and she could still set up a sequel.  Read it if you like to feel briefly horrible, but it is not substantial. It's an easily forgettable book. An airplane book.  A book to get from the library or used. Mine will be a used copy at the Good-will today.
This book is poorly written. Both main characters are not likeable, the plot is old and tried many times (and better) and the ending is no surprise at all. Why this novel is so hyped as a must-read is beyond me considering there are so many well written, suspense, murder mysteries out there. Take a pass on this one. And by the way, her other novel is no better. How these authors get published is amazing.
I usually don't write reviews but I was so mad that I wasted my time and money on this story I had to warn people.  Many people told me how wonderful this book was.  I liked the first two thirds of this book but the last one third was beyond belief.  I was left feeling angry after I was done.  The author writes well but the story goes off the rails.  It was like she gave up.  Please save your time and money. All the characters are unsympathetic and unbelievable in their actions.
This book sucked!  Did not like the flow of it, the characters, or the story line.  It had too many stories going on and could become complicated for someone who doesn't read much. It started really slow, i had to read the 6 first chapters before it even grasped my attention. Then as I continued reading, I just had to skip to the last 3 chapters because the book became so predictable that I didn't need to read anymore.  I would probably never read another book from this author.
Sorry I gave Gone Girl my time and my money as I am  believer in economic boycotting.  At first I was intrigued, then curious, then put off by how very unhealthy the story, plot and the relationships were.  I was about to cease reading it when a neighbor who had seen the movie told me it had a bizarre ending so I completed it.  I know there are sick relationships out there but no one needs to wallow in them.The only positive thing I can say is that it was well written.
A lot of profanity and crude language. Story was good otherwise.
I had been looking forward to reading this book for months. I was hooked the first few ""chapters"". I couldn't wait to see what would happen next. Once I'd gotten to the end of the book, I was so angry I had wasted my time. It was the biggest kick it the teeth. The worst ending I have ever read! I hated all the characters by the end. Not one was redeemable. I will never read another book by this author. If there's a movie, I will not waste my money. WORST BOOK ENDING EVER!!!
This book was really well written up until the end. Which was a complete key down. I felt like I just set down a book half finished. Could the author not think if an ending after all that twisting turning plot line? I had flashbacks of the list tv series and my utter disappointment in its ending and lack of closure. Only giving a star because I have to. If a sequel comes out I'm not taking the bate. Nor will I read anything else by her for fear of repeat disappointment.
I wanted to put this book down many many times - I continued as my friends encouraged me to continue to the end.  I did, and truly did not like any of the characters, and as much as the end of the book got more interesting, I decided I truly disliked both characters and really disliked the ending.This kind of book is not my normal kind of reading, a good  'who done it' is more my style,  But its popularity and movie says alot of people enjoyed it, good for you.
Read the book in 3 days, waiting for something to happen (kept reading because of the great reviews I had seen)  Never found anything redeeming about the story or its characters.  Even the ending is ridiculous! A murder and no punishment, really?  Are we supposed to accept the fact that this.man is such a wuss that he is willing to live with a sociopathic psychopath for the rest of his life
It's been a really long time since I really hated a book. This was a selection for my book club. I kept hoping it would get better. It did not. The book is negative from the start. Nick Dunne is a totally unlikeable and unsympathetic character.  His life made me feel depressed. It's clear why Nick's only true friend is his twin sister. I could go on, but I won't.  I'm just happy I finally, grudgingly plowed through it before our book club meeting tomorrow. Ugh.
I haven't been able to read past first two chapters, so boring
I don't know why I pushed myself to finish it. It was a chore!
I read the book to it's closing, so it obviously possessed enough suspense that I had to find out what was 'really' going on with these characters.  However, when I finished I felt let down and immensely irritated at the ending, these characters, the ridiculous story line and that I wasted my valuable time hoping sincerely that surely there would be a 'healthier' outcome for these two characters.  Disappointing.  I doubt I'll read Gillian Flynn's work again.
Hated the ending. Will not read another book from this author
It was a completely engrossing and well written book that just turned gross and unrelatable. I've never read a book that started out SO amazing and intriguing that simply ended up leaving you with a bad taste in your mouth. It was as if the author, who had a great plot, felt she needed to TOP her original plot with what happens at the ending. By the end of it I disliked BOTH characters. If that's what the author was going for, then she accomplished it.
I bought this book because it had been on the bestseller list for so long.  When I was reading the book I was astonished that it even made it anywhere near publication.  It boring, redundant, predictable with shallow characters.  It takes a clever, seasoned writer to jump from one voice to another, Gillian Flynn didn't make it by a long shot.I am an avid reader and will read almost anything.  This book didn't even fit in the almost anything pile.
Gone Girl"" was one of the most profane and vulgar books I've ever had the misfortune of downloading. Sadly, the free sample chapters do not reveal how low the vulgarity meter drops, and so I purchased the book based on the interesting writing in the beginning of the book. If only there were a rating system on books to alert potential customers to extreme profanity and vulgarity. I would never have purchased if I had known in advance. I can tolerate some bad language when it feels as if it is essential to the character development. But the use of the F word on almost every page became an utter nuisance and unbelievable. What a sad commentary on our culture if this is reflective of how people speak in our society.Additionally, the plotline goes from attention grabbing to ludicrous by the end of the story. I'm an avid reader and have not come across a more ridiculous book ending in ages.Give this a miss.
This was a really good read until the end. There was clearly a lot of tension and suspense between good, bad and evil going on which was a fun ride. However at the end it took a U-turn when the two main characters are BOTH portrayed as being equally sick with no resolution.  I feel like I wasted a good journey--just to end up at a dead end. Maybe I was disappointed because it was on a ""best mysteries"" list. I don't think it belongs in that category.
This book is written in a bizarre approach that wanders back and forth between the two main characters and confuses the timeline of events. I found it hard to follow, and I quickly tired of reading it.  It wasn't interesting enough to hold my attention.  I skimmed ahead to learn the end. I don't think an Amazon sample via Kindle--normally a great feature--is adequate to show the peculiar and confusing read that lies ahead. I'd give this a half-star.
This book started off very well.  One third way through the plot twists were riveting.  Half way through I was annoyed and by the end I regretted the time wasted reading it.  I had no sympathy or appreciation for any of the characters.  I was really rooting the the two lead characters to kill each other on the last page, but no they drifted off the rest of their lives.  After the reviews I was truly surprised.  I must be a different kind of reader.
This novel starts out very slow. The only thing that kept me reding was the language, which I thought was thoughtful and interesting. I certainly didn't care about the characters. About halfway through the book, the characters became so outrageous, and there were so many twists that it became a joke. I hated both these characters for their shallowness. The only reason I completed reading the book is that I am in a book club and I had to discuss it.
Dull, dull, dull...  where are all the clever twists and intrigue I heard about?  I thought the 'mystery' was very predictable, and even if it wasn't, I cared so little about the characters, they are so boring and unlikable, that I had no real interest in solving what happened to the 'Gone Girl'.  Finishing this book was a chore in tedium--have no idea what people see in it.  Would NOT recommend it to anyone.  Too many other great books out there.
This is a terrible read, I deleated a couple of chapters in.
Insipid story. Can't figure out what all the fuss was about.
It's not that it was poorly written, it's just that I didn't like it.....at all. We selected this book for a book club read based on the reviews and what sounded like an interesting premise. I won't give anything away, but I found the ending annoying. I was relieved once it was over & I could leave these awful characters behind. Dropping this in my library donate box, resisting the urge to put a post-it warning on the inside for the next reader.
The book format is not easy to read - there are no numbered chapters - so navigating in it is very difficult.  The main character is narcissistic and probably psychopathic, so some allowances for language must be made, but even considering this - the language was unnecessarily vulgar. The book ends abruptly with a ridiculous ending - one that seems like ...""well the book is getting kind of long.. better wrap it up.""  Absolutely hated it.
I wish I had not spent hours and hours reading this book. True, it's engaging in a ""can't put it down and want to stay up late just to read it"" way. But as someone else mentioned, it has foul language and gross descriptions, and after getting through all of that I would at least like a decent ending. The ending was horrible, in my estimation. I've never read a book by this author before and I doubt very seriously that I ever will again.
Despite the movie and popularity, this book is a bad read. I have read mysteries since I was a teen and have progressed through Sherlock, Father Brown, P.D. James and now the various Scandis. After about 50 pages, I literally flipped the pages. The plot is ludicrous and convoluted and all the characters are unlikeable. Why bother? The ending was not an ending at all. The writer is lucky to have found so many readers. The writing is dreadful.
I hate the way this book ends.  It's just not believable!  As a matter of fact, the last 2 chapters killed this book for me.  I kept reading thinking the book would get better, but obviously it didn't.  Saying I was disappointed is an understatement.  I want the $12.99 back that I paid for the download along with the day it took me to read it!  I know that it will never happen, so save yourself the money and time.  This book is not worth it!
I ordered a ""hardcover"" book but I got a paperback.
It was a good read though a little flawed, since the wife, who was supposed to be so brilliant, did a few very less than brilliant things.  As in, who opens a money belt containing $8000 in front of any one, much less strangers?  There were more dumb mistakes and I could let them go except it ended as miserably as endings where it was all a bad dream.  The ending just didn't match the overall storyline.  The writing was good and kept my
This book was a waste of my time.I was avoiding this book for some time and finally gave in to the rave reviews.Both of the characters were irritating and I only finished the book to find out what happened in the end rather than because I was caught up.  After reading all that time, only to reach an extremely unsatisfactory and stupid ending, I wanted to strangle both of the two idiot main characters. Don't waste your money.
I started to read this book so excited! I thought that this book would be one of my favorites, until it ended. OMG such a frustrating end! We all know that the perfect crime doesn't exist. This ""Gone girl"" apparently thought about EVERY detail to screw her husband and suddenly ALL turns to perfection to screw poor Desi. I think that this is the perfect story for a psycho... with such a crappy ending! Don't waste your time reading this!
What a bizaare story!  At first the obscenities seem to be part of a character response.  Then they become more vile as the story degenerates into a devious plot so twisted that the language and actions are unredeemable.  The setting and circumstances are believable but the depth of deprivity exhibited by the characters is sordid.  This is not an entertaining book and I sincerely wish I hadn't read it.  Very offensive and disturbing!
Never could get into the book.  The beginning was lagging.
The story began describing a wonderful, romantic relationship, and as events unfolded, it became clear that  Nick and Amy were both dishonest, self centered, scheming, nasty people that I couldn't empathize with at all, and that didn't cause me to care at all what happened to them. The entire story got more and more unbelievable. That, aside, it wasn't well written enough to make me take time to read anything else by Gillian Flynn.
Gone Girl started out with real promise, in fact a page turner. However by the middle it became a chore to read and only got worse. Neither character could elicit sympathy and the story went from intrigue to stupid. Can't believe it is a # 1 best seller but then look at the totally poorly written trashy Sades of Grey books. Read Hitch 22 or State of Wonder.
I had figured out the twist early on so it wasn't a surprise to me.  What was a surprise was that I kept reading past the twist as this book quickly went downhill for me.  I wanted to vomit at times as the main characters turned out to be terrifying, inhuman sociopaths...horrible, horrible people.  I feel dirty just from reading this book; like something crept into my soul and died...must go and find something cleansing to read!!
This book sucked. Being that it was a on the NY Times Bestseller List on my Kindle Fire, I really had high expectations. However, the humor was extrememly vulgar at times, and the ending was one of the worst I have EVER read.  It was worse than a blatant cliffhanger.  There was no resolution, and I was looking for more pages to read. The book just ended suddenly.  I will not read another book by Gillian Flynn. Very disappointed.
I believe this book is the worst I have ever read, the ending really was the sprinkles on top of stupidity.  The plot is completely preposterous, ridiculous, absolutely not plausible.  I am absolutely flabbergasted as to why this book has gotten any good reviews unless they are all friends of the author.  Unbelievable, baffling and just silly.  Please spare yourself the suffering.  Your time is worth more than reading this book.
I won't ruin the ending but after reading about 95% of awesomeness which is this book the ending was just absolutely terrible. Not so much that I was hoping for a certain ending, but it just fell flat on its face and the story wrapped up in a few hastily written pages.  It felt like she just gave up and ended the story. This was my first Gillian Flynn novel I've read and I must say I don't think I'll be checking out her others.
How did this book have almost 11,000 readers writing reviews and garnering more than 3 stars? One must conclude that a lot of money was spent by author and publisher and publicist to drum up sales. Awful book about awful people and truly awful final third that comes out of nowhere. I can just hear her publisher saying ""wrap it up fast, girl - doesn't matter if it makes no sense - let's advertise, advertise, advertise"".
This is an absolutely fabulous thriller.....until the end. After painstakingly developing characters, the ending felt as if the author suddenly became bored of writing and wrapped up the story with haste. In doing so, the reader is left wondering how such strong characters like Nick and Go could become such doormats to the psycho Amy. So disappointing.
I bought this book because all of the rave reviews expecting a jaw dropping end to the book.  Although the book has exciting twists and turns it starts out quite slowly and it has an ending that is so incredibly boring, a huge letdown.  It is like the book disappears into nothingness at the end.  Expect the book to be a nail biter in the middle of the book but if you expect a grand ending then you will be sorely disappointed.
Started out great, lots of fun, interesting stuff. Then.... nosedive. The last third, say, maybe fourth of the book was just .... so disappointing. And the ending! It seemed like the author had this great idea for a book but didn't know how to end it so she came up with this ""twist"" - i felt like i had filth on me when i finished. reminded me of that Woody Allen's ""Match Point."" That made me feel ill as well.
This book was recommended by a couple of friends. The characters are selfish, unlikeable people. It was slow to start.  I only finished it because I had devoted so much time into reading it and  because it was such a best seller.  I felt it was a total waste of my time.  I guess I like books where I can relate to at least one of the characters. The characters in this book are horrible people. Wish I would never have read it.
I was really looking forward to reading this book based on the hype. Biggest waste of money. The book just does not make any sense. I feel like the author,  had a clear beginning but no end. It was ridiculous. I didn't care for either character and couldn't care less if they were both stranded on a deserted island for eternity. They deserve each other. I hated the language and hated the misogyny. I wish I could get a refund.
Started off slow,  but quickly got to the point where I couldn't put it down.  A page turner that kept me wanting more--especially the ending! I definitely felt cheated.  The worst ending ever. If I had been reading a paperback instead of on my Kindle, upon finishing the book I would have thrown it across the room. I won't be reading any more books by this author. All the suspense within the book was negated by the ending.
If there were an option to give No stars, that is what I would select.Be warned...The book was filled with profanity and vulgar sexual content.  I attempted to read PRIOR to seeing the movie, but after a short attempt to read this book I stopped and I will not be watching the Movie either.Really wanted to see what all the hype was about, but in the end the vulgarity and twisted content was too much.
This is one of the most overrated books I have ever read. There are no empathetic or even sympathetic characters -- no one to champion and no one to care about. The book's protagonists are the most selfish and self-serving I have come across in a long time. As I read through the book my repeated thought was ""who cares."" I share many readers' enjoyment of modern fiction, this is just not a book I would recommend to anyone.
I think the author went over my head on a lot of things.  The book is so abstract and slow at first. And the only reason y inept reading was cuz my daughter kept telling me "" it gets better after pg 100"" pretty sad when I had to read that many pgs bfor it got kind of interesting. It wasn't a ""I couldn't stop reading it!"" Kind of book at all. And I think it's gonna b a big flop for Ben a flecks next movie!
I wish I had read the 1 star reviews before I fell for the hype. And I wish I could wash my brain and memory with bleach to get the stains out. Horrible writing and the ""psychology"" is worse. The reason I found it sucking my soul away is the absence of anyone to admire in the whole mess. The only characters who had moral integrity were the innocent townspeople; the contempt for them and their values was obvious.
One of those books you can't put down but really can't find anything good about it!  I found it too long; I did not like any of the characters in the book; and I totally hated the ending.  SORRY Gillian Flynn but I will not read anymore of your books.  I read this one because it was our selected book for Book Club and I have a perfect record of reading all of the selections but this was in the ""forget"" category.
Filthy words/book. Can't believe a movie from this book.
Like many others who were disappointed in the ending, I felt like I'd been punched in the gut.  I also felt stupid for wasting my time reading it.  However, the thing that annoyed me the most (besides the ending), was the constant drum of Amy, Amy, Amy, Amy, Amy--her name must have been written at least ten times on each and every page.  I just got sick of reading the name.  From now on, I'll hate anyone named Amy.
I bought it because I like suspense, and some friends recommended it.  I disliked the language (""f___"" is a word Flynn is obsessed with).  I only finished the book to see the outcome.  It was surprising.  But I will not read anymore of her books because she puts too much raunchy language in it, pretending to be literary.  She also thinks it's cute to inform us of what is correct grammar!  (not cute but obnoxious)
I listened to ""Gone Girl"" and I was glued to my iPhone for days.  It's the sort of book I never want to end...until it ended.  The ending is a cheap cop out.  How do you write a book with so much insight,  great dialogue,  laugh out loud observations and come up with THAT ending?  I was all set to give the book 5 stars sorry, I just can't.
The quality of a novel depends partially on the resolution to the conflicts that underlie the plot - and the resolution of this story was patently ridiculous.  Regardless of how well a writer can create characters and devise an interesting plot, if the resolution is so unbelievable that the reader no longer ""loses herself"" in the story, reading the book is a waste of time - and that's how I felt about this book.
This has to be one of the worst books I have ever read. Stupid story line, vulgar, totally unbelievable. I cannot believe it is on any best seller list. The only reason I kept reading it was because I was hoping it would greatly improve. That did not happen. Don't waste your money. I wish I could get back the hours I spent reading it.....
by  the first chapter I could tell who was the bad one.
I did  not like reading this story in ""diary"" format, he said, she said.  I never leave a book unfinished but it took me longer to read than most in books I find more interesting.  The characters were pretty sick.  But then that seems to be the theme of Gillian Flynn's books.  Not my favorite author either.  Only read it because of the movie reviews.  Have not seen the movie and when it's free I might.
Usually I read the reviews on Amazon before I buy and how I wish I had done it this time, but on a friends recommendation and swayed by ts best seller status I bought it on a whim. I hated it, the characters were quite ubelievable and really awful people saying horrible things about  and to each other to no real point,.  It is  badly written and I couldn't be bothered to finish it as it just a beastly book.
I'm sorry. I just had to make myself finish it. I hated the back and forth style of writing and I've heard her other books are really good. I'll try one more. I love to read but this almost became only the second book I couldn't finish! If I could give it a zero I would have but 1was the lowest grade I could do.  I'm sure that someone saw the good in it because they did do a movie but not for this reader.
Sorry I read through to the end.  Very unsatisfactory.
Could be a good book, who knows?  The copy that Amazon sent me was so minutely printed, I'm talking like 4 pt type, that I would have had a magnifying glass to read it.  I read a lot, and I've never encountered a book printed in such a small type font.  I guess Amazon had it done that way to make the book smaller, lighter, and easier/cheaper to ship, but if a book can't be read, is it still a book?
I didn't like this book at all, well maybe the first chapter then all of the characters become insane. I do mean all main characters and most of the extra characters .I wouldn't want to come within 5 ft of any one in this book in real life. I have never read a book where so many characters are so off the chart insane! I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone quite the opposite. It is just to much.
This book and movie did not live up to their reviews.
Very disappointed in this best seller.  I don't know if the writers of today need to use swear words because it's expected by the public or they need to fill space.  Where in the world do people use such language in such a cavalier manner?  Choose something else from the dictionary; I'm sure you and other authors can find some alternates!  That being said the story line was different and spooky.
Not enjoyable. Characters are grating. Just not my style. Story leaves a bad taste in the mouth...leaves you without resolution but not the ""cliffhanger"" type...more like a sense of hopelessness. You could argue that the characters got what they deserved. No one needs to read a story like this...Unless you like wallowing in your own self pity...then this book will be right up your alley.
I like books with at least one redeeming character, but everyone in this book was awful!  There wasn't a single good event that happened in the book after this toxic couple romantically met.  It reminded me of movie, ""War of the Roses"" where the couple had no limit to what they'd do to hurt each other.  I can't imagine the author being a well-adjusted happy person.  Who come up with this stuff?
I'm a big reader, like BIG reader. I've read hundreds and hundreds of books and not many times have I stopped readin a book til I was finished. This was not one of those times. Just could not get interested. The language didn't help. I read maybe 6 chapters, probably not even. So slow I couldn't take it anymore and gave up. Glad I didn't pay for the actual book and only got it on my kindle.
I read this on the recommendation of a friend.  The only thing I found good about it was the back and forth chapters by the two main characters.  Both the primary characters are despicable people who truly deserve each other.  I gritted my teeth as I read on.  There was absolutely nothing likeable about this story.  Hope her other books are better, but I doubt that I will try to find out.
Like some others before have mentioned, Ms. Flynn runs out of ""steam"" and plot twists three-quarters of the way through the book. By the time the end is in sight, we are simply annoyed at having been taken for a ride. Furthermore, her characters appear to have virtually no redeeming qualities, only vicious antisocial ones.  This book was a real waste of her [considerable] writing talent.
This is my first Gillian Flynn book and it will be my last the ending was a huge dissapointment  I was saying to people you have to read this you have to buy this all the way through and I just read the ending and I checked and checked thinking I must have lost some pages on my kindle but NO  please please please don't waste your money buying this book it is like ms Flynn simply gave up
Sorry, I had to put this down after only 11 pages; 5,000 adjectives and 10,000 adverbs. The writer seems to want to exhaust a thesaurus with each sentence. I couldn't get hold of the beginnings of a plot, nor could I imagine wading through 400 pages of descriptions of everything the writer sees, feels or does. The style convinced me I could never identify with this gasbag of a narrator.
Story had potential, but the characters - even the ""good"" ones, are so completely loathsome and their actions so completely unbelievable that you just end up hating everyone in the book.  The only thing worse than the characters is the ending which leaves you feeling sick, disappointed, and wishing you could wash off the residue of the awful journey you just wasted your time & money on!
I had wanted to read this book for quite awhile because I'd heard it was so good . After having just read Sharp Objects, which I could not put down, I was even more eager to read Gone Girl. However, I was greatly disappointed. I couldn't connect or care about any of the characters. I really wanted to quit the book but pressed on to see what was going to happen. I didn't like it at all!
Once again instead of checking the actual reviews, I went with the total, over 5,000, which indicated a four star book.Wrong.  Over half the people that read the book gave it a 3 star or less.  I kept waiting for the main characters to bereal people.  This isn't just dark, it's stupid. what a waste of money.  I hope I've learned my lesson with the amazonrating system.
I get what the author was trying to do with the ending; I really do. However, there were sooo many holes in the ending and the story that I just ended up rolling my eyes. What started as a really good book ended with some really stupid and contrived crap. I wish I could get my money back because honestly with the work the first half of the novel had it should have had a better ending.
Worst ending ever in a book.  I want my money back.
The book kept enough to keep you interested until it just lost all creativity and became boring. The ending is beyond disappointing. The only thing this book does is gives fuel for idiots to attempt to write a novel. It's was a complete waste of time, several moments of my life wasted on a book that should have been sent back to the sorry sap of a novelist and asked to be finished.
The characters never became real. Although they were both rather awful people you never liked or disliked them.The plot was weak and the whole book just rambled on without any suspense or drama. The author never got to a point and then suddenly decided she better end the book, so just created a really bizarre ending..I would definitely not recommend the book to anybody.
I didn't like this book at all.  It started off interesting...first couple of chapters brought me into it....then it was down hill from there.  I found both characters just dumb and immature.  Why did they marry at all?  The story wasn't what I expected it to be.  I saw this story as nothing more than 2 dumb, young people married to each other---playing games.  A waste of my time!
While the beginning of the book did draw me in and I read this in one sitting just to find out how it ended.  The ending completely killed the book for me.  It left me with no rooting interest in any of the characters, good or bad.  I was completely let down but the unrealistic choices all the characters made or were left with.  I wish the final 1/3 was a good as the previous 2/3.
I don't think this book was anything special. So the main chick is a nut. There I told you the story. I didn't find it exciting or a paged turner. So hot chemistry, no real action even.The only thing I enjoyed is the style of writing. Every other chapter came from the point of view of the two main characters. OH yeah, the ending sucks. Sorry Flynn don't mean to be so hard on yah.
My friends recommended this book.  The waiting list at the library was huge.  So it had to be worthwhile, right?  So wrong.  Yes it was suspenseful, but when I got to the end the only thought I had was ""Why did I waste my time?""  If you like suspense with plenty of twists and turns and don't care about the ending.  Go for it!  If you like happy endings, then I don't recommend it.
Even though there are people as manipulative, conniving, and evil as the woman ""staring in this tale, the book seems to be aimed at introducing readers to evil behavior. I read the book for a book club, and I wish I had not read it. It was not only a waste of time, but it was a really uncomfortable read.
I read this book at a good friend's recommendation, so I saw it through.  I found myself hating the characters and story line, and feel like I wasted my time reading this book.  Maybe the author's intent was to make us dislike the main characters, and if so she succeeded.  However, I couldn't find anything redeeming about the book.  I would not read anything else by this author.
I read this book cause all the hype with  the movie. I heard the book was way better, so I thought I would give it a read before watching the movie. Mistake! Wasted so much time! The story was a little slow in the beginning, then picked up and really had me hooked up until...... you guessed it, the end. That was the worst ending ever. Now I don't even want to watch the movie :(
I am 2 hours in and I have had enough.I have enjoyed some of the dialogue, but the story and characters are so unbelievable I can't listen any further. The author shows talent but has not developed the story or the characters plausibly.If you want to read a similar story that is light years better try ""In Cold Blood"".  It puts this book to shame.
I started reading this book and was instantly engrossed.  It caught my attention and I could not put it down.  Then as I got closer and closer to the end, the book got worse and worse. By the time I finished it I was so mad that I wasted my time and I wished I hadn't read it.  It switches at some point close to the end to become the most ludicrous and unbelievable story ever!!!
I would have given this book 0 stars if I could.  I HATED, HATED, HATED this book and feel like I wasted a little of my life by finishing it and can never get that time back again.  There were absolutely NO redeeming qualities of any of the characters of the book, except for maybe Detective Boney.  And then to have it end the way it did!  Inconceivable.  Don't waste your time.
I would'nt recommend it. The 2 protagonists/leads are 2 very disfunctional people and the ending is absolutely unrealistic. I don't want to give any spoilers but I thought that at the end you were supposed to want to talk about the book with your friends and that doesn't happen, I guess it might be good material for a thriller/dark movie. But I don't consider it a good book.
The characters are cartoonish and the plot details TVish.  It is not a clever thriller although it will surprise you once, about l/3 of the way through.  I should have read the reviews before my book club selected it.  At least I could have decided not to waste my $ buying it.  I couldn't give it even one star, but I felt I had to do it to post the review.  Sorry about that.
I don't understand how people liked this book.  It was odd, depressing, and quite unrealistic.  It was all I could do to finish.  The book accompanied me on a vacation, and I didn't bring an alternative.  My idea of a vacation read is not diving into a couples gross disfunction.  I don't recommend it.  There are so many great books to read, don't waste your time on this one.
Wow, am I sorry I purchased this book! How did a novel so misconceived get the notoriety this book has garnered? I kept waiting for something even slightly believable to occur to pull the book out of the tailspin of tripe the author was leading the reader on with her story, but no, no such turn in the tale. All I can is, wow, this is one really bad novel. Review by Tom Ford
I've never read a book so completely without any moral value. That this book has gained such such popularity is a sad comment on what we've become if indeed it is a reflection of who we are today. I found the first part interesting but what follows as we discover Amy's true character is appalling. The only one showing any semblance of morality is Boney, the police woman.
I thought for a moment I was enjoying this book and I read it to the end.  The ending makes me regret that I wasted time reading it.  Don't waste your time reading this; you will be upset w/your lost time.  She should have done a better job w/the ending and the book was getting a bit ridiculous, although, sadly I kept reading, hoping it would improve, which it never did.
This novel was utterly a waste of time.  Characters were shallow, superficial and unlikeable.  Plot was not interesting enough to finish the book.  I wouldn't recommend this to anyone.  Rather, if someone wants this kind of entertainment, watching it on cable tv programming would be more of a stimulant.Very disappointed, and feel it was also a waste of money.
Even though this comment will be lost among the thousands, couldn't resist the weakly cathartic benefit of writing it.  The success of this novel does not speak well of our collective intellect.  To say it was low brow is to pay it a compliment for which it is clearly unworthy.  If this represents the best of a commercially successful writer, then I surely must be one.
The ending of this book absolutely ruined it for me.  It was the worst.  I wasted time and money to read a book that, up until the last section, was actually pretty good.  Kept you on your toes trying to figure out what would happen next.  But, saying that the ending was awful is an understatement at best.  Don't waste your money or your time - you won't be satisfied.
I was recommended this book and thought I would like it but it's absolutely rubbish. Rubbish writing, rubbish ending. Skipped a lot of the early sections as the writing was awful. It became more fast paced and easier to read and I thought... Here we go. But there are so many holes In the story and the ending is so anticlimactic. I feel it's a genuine waste of my time.
This was definitely the worst book I ever read to the end.  The ending was a complete disappointment (the worst i have ever encountered) and I am sure that anyone who wrote a good review of this must have been paid to do it or a friend of the author.  Don't know how this got on any best seller list.  What a waste of time and money! NO Star is appropriate.  Girl, BOO!
Worst book I have read in years.  Figured it out in 2 chapters which are only 2-3 pages long.  Characters have no redeeming qualities.  Hated them all. I have been a bookseller for over 25 years and I am telling people not to waste their money. How can people like this book when there are so many  better books out there. Wish I hadn't wasted my precious reading time.
This book was a huge disappointment, but it's probably my fault because I didn't read the negative reviews before I bought it. It was entirely too dark for me, and it left me wondering who thinks of this stuff?  The characters and the plot were completely depressing! It definitely taught me to read both good and bad reviews before hitting the buy button on my kindle.
This is a convoluted story about two very disagreeable people. I am 75% through the book on my Kindle and I don't plan to finish it because so far it has gone from bad to worse and however it ends neither of them will probably get what they deserve.  I can't imagine why this book is so popular!!!
Started great about 50% in it became quite obvious where it was going it took forever to get there with endless mind numbing words, what they used to call claptrap, and ended with no ending what a waste of my time.  If you planto read this read something else.  I find myself really upset I took time to read this and I could have been reading something worth my time.
For me this story was a serious let down. The premise sounded good and it had a lot of promise starting out. Unfortunately, the ending was quite disappointing. It felt to me like a cop out and I found the main characters unlikable as well. This ranks high in my list of bad stories read. More than my money, I wish I could get a refund for my time spent reading this.
I don't care that the first part of the book is a set-up for the rest of it. It was boring. It was supposed to be a hook, and a hook should grab you and keep you hanging and wanting more.  If I had not been in a book club, I never would have continued reading it.  Also the language was coarse and unnecessary.  A good writer can find other words to convey the story.
I would have rated this book 4 stars if it weren't for its ending, which (and trust me, I'm not exagerrating) is the most unsatisfying of any book, of any genre, that I can recall reading. Well written, with interesting character studies and clever (though far fetched) plot twists -- all rendered moot by the slap in the face ending. What was this author thinking?!!
I really enjoyed the first half of this book....put the author's other two books on my wish list in anticipation of future enjoyment.Then I hit the halfway point.The book turned boring mid-way.  It took me a long time to finish the book.  And as others have said, the ending is just stupid.My wish list is now two items shorter.
If this isn't the worst book written, it is at least the worst book I have ever read.  All those words, oh my goodness all those words, and for what?  The characters are not someone we care about, their doings are a kind of pornographic version of living, and dismayingly, one finds in the end that neither of them has had the courtesy to die.  A real DO-NOT-READ.
For me to stay engaged with a book or a film, at least one of the main characters needs to have a redemptive quality. Something that shows they are capable of evolving.Not here. It only gets worse....and more ugly. And then, even uglier, filled with resentment and stuck-ness. All I felt after plodding through the last chapters was ""ick."" Mind trash.
For a story that could've ended in so many interesting, satisfying ways, this was a big disappointment as well as a letdown. It seemed like a cop-out to go in the direction of ""ooooohhhhh, see how dark and depressing this is!?!??!"" just so the author could, presumably, believe that's she's cool and modern. I won't read her other books, that's for sure!
I was ready to give up at page 30 but decided to keep going because of all of the good reviews it was getting...surely it had to get better. It did and then it got cliche and predictable. I willed myself to finish it only to be completely let down and turned off by the ending. I felt like I was reading a Lifetime movie...fun to watch, but would never read one.
I don't normally write reviews but I just couldn't sleep without writing one for this. I'm so annoyed that I paid for a book with no ending or an absolutely horrible ending. It's like she just gave up at the end and took an easy way out. Can't understand why this book has been on the Ny times bestsellers list. Truly wish I could get my money back for this book
This book is barely worth the effort to review it. The writing is okay, in places it feels he author is trying too hard and yet it reads like a teen English assignment. In part two, the plot finally picks up and garners some interest, only to reveal an abrupt ending that is frustrating and has no resolution and leaves the premise of the storyline unchanged.
This book is a rote action. There is nothing intellectually stimulating, imaginative, or surprising contained in the meta-plot or actions of the characters therein.Many negative reviewers are taking issue with the deviation of character behavior from real human societal and instinctual norms. This is not my issue. When reading fiction, I begin with a plausible suspension of disbelief. If characters behave outside of normal, that's fine. Fictional universes have fictional rules. Granted, the characters in this particular work are supposed to exist in a ""normal"" (i.e.- homogenized with our own mean correlation of reality) paradigm, but excessive normality in fiction makes for boring stories, so I was hoping for sharp deviation in such a popular work. I wanted to like it, but it is simply bad fiction.The premise was attractive. A murder mystery under the premise of a dissolving marriage is a pretty standard vehicle. Agamemnon, anyone? However, the added angle of two characters narrating their purportedly inevitable conflict through two separate time streams hooked me. Seems like an interesting thematic engine upon cursory inspection. Shakespearean, perhaps.The love affair was over quickly.Predictability and Pandering:As a psychologist, I kept trying to constrain the behavior of the characters to established scientific norms of human action causality paradigms (including psychological pathologies), but quickly found this model to be inefficient. Then it dawned on me. I should try to establish the author's intent and predict the behavior of the characters based on the ensuing causality cascading effect. Therein was the rub.""If I was an author trying to wring maximum shock value out of a meandering and stilted plot, all the while attempting to confound readers by drawing correlations beyond logical validity, what would I do?""Once I applied this formula, I was able to predict every subsequent action of the characters long before it was revealed by the writing. Being this ridiculously predictable kills a plot for me. If I know the characters as well as the author by page 30, the excitement is dead. This can be reversed by credible (in the context of the fictional paradigm) change in the context of causality, which, of course, never happens. By the end, I simply didn't care enough to have an emotional reaction one way or the other. Growth (for good or bad... or whatever) makes good characters. Twists used for over-wrought dramatic framing makes rote caricatures. This book sadly employs the latter.Clunky Application of Framing Theme:As Burgess stated, ""A good novelist should not preach, as sermonizing has no place in good fiction."" The ham-fisted structuring around themes of ""biased media"" and ""economic troubles"" was too creakily implemented. If done in a more nuanced and muted style, it could have added to the narrative. As is, it came off not as a backdrop, but as another poorly-written addition to a menagerie of two-dimensional antagonists. A good analogue would be a character stepping on stage to crudely shout his name at the other actors, only to exit and never contribute to the plot. Again, it's simply bad writing.Incoherence:If you let go of a ball while holding out your arm, it falls. This is a pretty standard logical correlation. In fiction, you can suspend or alter this through establishing exposition as to why it isn't so (surreptitiously if done well). This exposition is never done, or hinted at, but the suspension of logical causality is continuously employed. This comes off as an excuse as to why none of the characters in this novel grow, change, or simply alter in rational conformance to narrative pressure. The characters don't ""grow"", they simply throw out rote and predictable ""twists"". These twists are never foreshadowed in a manner that causes the reader to think. It's simply an engine to inject dramatic ridiculousness without the pesky details of narrative structure or thematic credulity. It played off like a cheap soap opera. If one puts pressure on the surface, one will quickly find that the empress has no clothes.Pandering:The unifying theme is that the author seems to be desperately grasping at what she thinks will shock her readership. Looking at the book through this lens imparts almost complete comprehension without even opening it. It's like a Mad Lib, where one simply has to paste the character names and scene locations. This may be a universal failing of the genre, but it's a monumental failing of this work. It's an endless cavalcade of tropes applied to a banal narrative. Lack of plausible causality coherence is occasionally lampshaded, but the author, for the most part, simply tries to cover it up with the aforementioned ""twists"".To summarize, this work projects like an insubstantial papier-mâché veneer trying to pass itself off as a legitimate, engrossing story. In this endeavor, it fails horribly. One cannot build a tower on a faulty foundation, and this Tower really leans. The unifying characteristic of sociopaths is a weak to non-existent sense of self, and an inability to find value in anything beyond external appraisal and validation.In this fashion, the characters aren't sociopaths, the narrative is.
Unspeakable. Just because you think you can write doesn't mean you should...or can. Forget the ending there was no beginning, middle or end. I've read a lot of really bad bad books, but this was one of the worst I've read. There was no character development, there was nothing.  Save your money, this was a horrible book!  'Gone Girl' should be just that....
I bought this book because it was at the top of many lists but what a waste of time and money. This is the slowest book I ever read for this kind of money. The narrative is fine but the story is boring and slow. A lot of fuzz in the middle for the same. the book  or outcome of the book doesn't change with or without all these pages.Very disappointed!
But this is a most unsatisfactory book.  The characters are not likable----perhaps one minor character, but other than that, no.  And the ending was not at all satisfying.  I assume we are supposed to think that the core characters get the fate they both deserve.  It didn't work for me.
While reading the first chapter of this book, I thought it was an excellent read.  By the time I was mid-book, I was stone bored, but decided since it had gotten so much attention, maybe it would get better.  Nope.  At completion, I decided it had the worst ending in the history of book endings.  Sorry I bought it, sorry I read it.  Don't waste your time.
It promised to be a good read, had potential but deteriorated fast. There was a build up and mystery but I do not like the writers style. A very average book. Wasted money, but not my time as I just flipped through the pages... Nothing captivated me. It is hard to believe the amount of hate and vengeance shown by the characters with no real lead up to it.
I couldn't get the first chapter.  Gillian has an incredible talent of alienating her readers. It had nothing to do w the characters,  but the writing style was so unbelievably pretentious and douchy it honestly just felt like hundreds of pages of the writer tickling her nipples and saying ""oh ya, this is good"" a horrendously self indulgent book.
To put all of your talent and power into the first half of your book and exhibit such poor control of your book's end can be viewed as running out of steam or, even worse, premature ejaculation. The ending of this book is one of the most deflating examples of writing I have ever seen.
With all the hype, and the fact that there was a movie made (I did not see movie) I was quite disappointed in the last 1/3 or so of the book.Thought in the beginning the writing and mystery were great, but it turned out to be quite dysfunctional.Don't know if I'd read another book from this author unless I got a 'review' from a friend.
I've read about a quarter of this book and I truly haven't picked it up again in weeks.  It does not hold my interest at all. I don't care for the unnecessary bad language. I guess the mystery about the book is what is going on? Nothing, nothing has happened so far! I won't trust Whoopie Goldberg's book recommendations again! It was a waste of my money.
I tried to read this during a snowstorm, but couldn't. It's that dull. I don't know what it is, but it's not a mystery. It's very slow. Most of the time is spent with the two main characters' introspection. She's vain, spoiled, aggressive and needy. He's compliant and emotionally checked out. They all drink too much and love using the ""f"" word.
You do not know how happy I did not purchase this book, I got it from the library instead.  It held you captive only to let you down at the end.  Which I can only say it really sucked. Why write something that was really truly outstanding only to write a crap ending.  You might as well started the book out with ""It was a dark and stormy night.
The author had a clever idea, but none of it rang true.  Are police really that stupid?  Does the medical community ignore donor rights?  The ending was very contrived and read like she wanted to write a movie script for a Lifetime movie - complete with the opportunity for a sequel.  I would not bother to read this book, nor another book by the author.
3 friends recommended this book, but I gave up 11% of the way through and skipped to see how it ended. Really glad that I didn't waste my time on it. Bitter and unhappy people trapped together in marriage. No thanks. There are so many good reads out there but this isn't one of them.
the end of the book was very disappointing - also my Kindle acted up the whole time I was reading this book - when I contacted Kindle they said they had had a lot of problems with this book on Kindle - WHY would they have not told me when I bought the book - I was super ticked off when I could this out !!! I will definitely not promote the Kindle!!!
While the writing was very good and sometimes beautifully phrased, there wasn't a single character in this book that I liked.  In fact, I intensly disliked the five main characters. The plots twists and turns showed great craftsmanship and the whole thing is diabolical, if manipulative.  But if there's no one to root for, there's no one to care for.
I started this book once, and had a hard time getting into it.  I left it for awhile, but decided to give it a try again, since it had such good reviews.  I did not like this book.  I did not like the characters. There was nothing to make me like the characters.  Most of the time it was boring.  I could not get into it.  It just didn't appeal to me.
I read a few pages of reviews that were great and it had a lot of stars. So i decided to read it. I didnt see all the bad reviews tilll just now. I coulve liked this book it had potential. I got to the ending and am shocked that anyone would leave a book like this. A complete waste of my time and money!!!! I dont see how this is on best seller list.
I have no idea what the fuss is about this book. I read it (not sure why I finished it) but had major problems with it. Tedious, gaseous, in dire need of pruning and editing, overly self-conscious and preening, trying to hard to be clever, jerking the reader around like a puppet on a chain, beating the reader over the head. See how ironic everything is? Grasping and leaping so far with obvious brute-force plot twists and an easy way out at the end. Let the characters dissolve into madness Where else is there to go with this saga?. Too much. Too over the top. Also, the book's giddy, light (a satire on the diabolical) tone left me totally cold.And the point of it? A satire on marriage? An ""unflinching"" and ""scathing"" look at the gluttonous media? A tear-us-all-down for the lives we invent for ourselves, each other, the world? The world is surely messed up, but a book like this gives one no hope in our redeeming qualities. I am surely not in favor of slapping a happy face on everything. But, even in the most depressing literature there is an incandescent sense of the expansiveness of the human spirit, a kind of light and hope that still rises even after all our miserable follies and mistakes, and the tragedies we invent and encounter. This book had none of that and its main characters, Amy and Nick, seem like cartoon characters, surely not real people.I don't hate this book as that would imply it incited some passion and feeling in me and this book certainly did not do that.  It was just a disagreeable spectacle I should have turned away from about 75 pages in.
Very good book until the end. Very poor ending
I don't understand what all the hype is about.
I am so sorry I wasted my time with this book.  The ending made no sense.  It was readable enough but not something I couldn't put down.  I kept reading due to the high rating.  Wow, was that a mistake.  This book taught me to read the negative reviews before wasting my time.  There are too many good books out there to waste your time on this one.
I don't know why I finished this book.  The F word turned me off at first (I never repeat books by authors who use it a lot) and then the filthy language only got worse.  I kept thinking the story would get better being it was on the Best Seller for so long.  Wrong! This was probably the worst book I ever read. I am embarassed to have finished it.
Bought this hardcover book as my development's book club is currently reading this.  I'm not even going to attend the next meeting as this was a story about two neurotic, self-centered people wasting their own lives with a bunch of nonsense. I'm not wasting anymore time with them! Sorry I read the book. Wish there was a '0' star rating available.
One of the worst written and developed or lack thereof stories,laced with crudeness that doesn't fit. Very simple. Hard to believe the ""good"" reviews. A total waste of money and time. Giving this book one star is more than generous.Wouldn't even make a good ""made for TV movie"".
When the movie came out with lots of praise for the book,  I decided to read it. At first I did not like it as too many details, too much conversation, and lack of interest in plot. Then it was ok until went to wood house & find credit card items. Then I skimmed as fast as i could read through remainder. Reminds me why I don't read pop fiction.
I am definitely in the minority, but I hated this book.  With that said, I believe it could be an acquired taste.  I want to be able to relate, or at least LIKE a main character, but this story offered no way to do so.  There was no true climax to me and though you were wondering what would happen throughout, the end was still a disappointment.
I got this book because people were raving about it.  I am totally perplexed by what made it such a great  book.  It was boring, the premise was not believable from the very beginning, there was nothing about the characters that made me want to learn more about them. If you want suspense give me a Linwood Barclay book any day over this author.
I don't know why I finished this book...probably so I would know if Amy ever paid the price---any price---for her despicable & horrifying behavior. I hated the foul mouth and the sick sexual descriptions. She doesn't...and Flynn is depraved.I don't recommend this book to anyone...and I could Mick myself for was to g the time reading it.
I have managed to get about half way through of reading and re-reading what has transpired in the minds of this mismatched couple.  It is plodding.  The only thing that keeps me reading it is the possibility that it might pick up a few pages later.  After all the stars it has received as a movie, I am very disappointed.Noblefriend
I couldn't finish this book fast enough.  Not my kind of book.  Could not figure out why Nick's father was even in the book except for the use of his house.  If Amy was so smart, how did she set herself up to be robbed at her rental hideaway?  Since I borrowed this kindle edition from my local library, at least I didn't spend any money on it.
I hated this book.  The beginning was slow but by mid-book I was enthralled until the ending which I hated and felt was totally unrealistic.  I could not symapthize or empathize with the characters.  I frankly didn't care what happened to them.  It was a totally unbelieavable story.  I wish I had the time back that I spent reading this book.
Did not enjoy Gone Girl - disappointing read.
Gone Girl insults your intelligence.  It's plot doesn't stretch credulity; it never even approaches it. It's character development is akin to Marvel's.  It's social commentary is cliched although there are some moderately interesting observations about the Midwest.I should have listened to my wife. This is one big waste of time.
I was so surprised that this book was so bad. I had read many reviews about how good it was and was anxious to read it.  It was wordy and rambling-  Once I start a book I usually stick to it, regardless of its quality, however, this one I had to send back .  I found myself skipping pages just so I could see what the author's was getting at.
I've never known of centipedes to be frantic. Just one example of the ludicrous, horrendous, and generally just awful metaphors Gillian Flynn is overly fond of in ""Gone Girl"". It's probably the single worst book I've read this year. It's actually on my list, along with ""The Lovely Bones"" of the worst, most overrated books I have EVER read.
Starts out really slow but gets very interesting.  I was hooked about half way through and wanted to finish it fast but I started getting annoyed.  Too many things were happening that were just too hard to believe and then it just ends.  I hate books that end that way, I need an actual finish to the story.  Not worth reading in my opinion!
I didn't see the movie because I always hear the books are better than the movies. If that's the case, I'm very happy I didn't waste $9 to watch this. Not sure why all the positive reviews. One of the most disappointing endings of any book I've read - horrible, simple, unimaginative ending. Wish I hadn't wasted my time.reading this book.
I couldn't wait to read this book because everyone was raving about it.The beginning was dull, the middle was wtf?, the end was stupid.It was overly dramatic, extremely contrived and neither character was developedenough for me to be interested in them.  They should have both died at the end.Don't waste your time.
Terrible book about a dysfunctional, sociopathic wife.  I can't see any redeeming value to the book.  The author should have her head washed out with soap.  If this is what passes for contemporary literature then I don't need it.  Sorry I wasted my time but I wanted to see what all the hubbub was about.  Disgusted!Leo nardo
- the literary darling of the summer.  Rave reviews.  Recommended to me by two friends.  URGH!@#$%^  I truly HATED it.  I read to escape.  If I want to hear about horrible people doing horrible things, I will watch the evening news.  If I want to read clever snarkiness, I'll go back to Jessica Darling Series - fun without the creepies.
I stopped reading this book after 1 chapter. The language is offensive and adds nothing to what a fictional book should be written for... entertainment.  This trash is indicative of the pollution of minds and culture as swearing is considered acceptable.  Young people cannot say a sentence with f-bombs and excessive amount of cussing.
I do not understand what the hype is about, this book felt like a lot of negative energy, characters for whom I could not develop feelings or interest. It was an innovative way of telling the story of the pairing of two personality disordered people, a narcissist and a borderline, neither of which is capable of a healthy relationship.
This is pretty much one of the worst books I have ever read.  Sorry, but it's true.  It would stop anyone in their tracks from ever getting married for fear of ending up with psychos like this married couple.  I do have one positive thing to say.  It is a well-thought out novel, but past that I wish I hadn't wasted my time reading it.
Manipulative crap with unlikeable characters
From page one, not a likeable person in the book.  Storyline rather predictable.  I read this just to see what all the hype was about.  That's what it is - hype.  Guess there's a market for this type story with so many people recommending the pornography and decadence of ""Fifty Shades...""  Time can be better spent elsewhere.
The story is far fetched to the point where I was exhausted rolling my eyes. It definitely started out very well but then it went off into never never land. I kept reading hoping that something was going to happen. Nothing happens, absolutely nothing. Then the book ends. I am quite sure I will never read another book by this author.
I read this book for my book club and found it to be written in an unlikeable style, with an increasingly implausible plot. I found it difficult to connect with any of the characters, their behaviour seemed unconvincing and I felt detached from them. Overall, I wouldn't recommend this book, however others in my book club enjoyed it.
The plot the author came up with was lame, unrealistic, and it dragged on forever. The characters were annoying and poorly developed. I didn't even ""read"" the last 50 pages, just skimmed through it to cross it off the list. Glad I didn't waste any more of my time and neither should you. I don't know how the heck this got published.
First of all if you read this and don't see the next moves coming from 10 miles away, I don't see how. Then there is the disappointing and horrible ending. I sure hope Gillian's husband isn't this cowering, pathetic man that she has penned. After all of the reviews and how fabulous this was supposed to be...ugh. Just disappointed.
This is one of the worst books that I've read this year!  With all of the media ""hype"" I was expecting much more!  I really didn't like the writing style of the author...very choppy...disjointed sentences.  I read at least one book every two weeks...many different authors and style of writing...couldn't get into this one.
Our book club read this.Only one person liked it. The rest of us had the exact same things to say about it: no redeeming characters. The book takes many twists, but at the end of the day you can only think these characters deserve what they get and each other. I feel sorry for offspring. what a waste of money & time reading this.
I am glad this book was a free library download. Most of the book held my interest during a long airplane flight but as time went on the characters became completely unsympathetic. As many people have said the ending was terrible. Books like this are the reason I don't follow best seller lists. I will avoid books by this author.
If you enjoy soap operas, you'll enjoy this unrealistic novel. The beginning started strong but the book fizzled as I kept reading. It really reminded me of a horrible storyline of  ""The Days of Our Lives"" or ""The Young and Restless"". Ridiculous. If you are an intelligent, self-assured woman do not buy this book.
Waited 2 months on a waiting list at my local library. A huge disappointment. It is sick and twisted all around. How can anyone think the end justifies the means. Am I being naive to think that wanting something, Amy and his baby, would allow justifying evil. I feel as if I wasted 415 pages. This book actually left me nauseous.
Why did I waste my time reading this book??
This is truly fiction and completely unbelievable.  I started reading this book over a year ago and I just finished it last week. I found it too drawn out and absolutely horrible. I've managed to read about 12 books over the last year but I was still unable to get through this one.  Not sure how it received such rave reviews.
I couldn't put it down.  The story was exciting and clever.  I loved the characters.  But the ending made me think that there was something wrong with my Kindle.  Surely there were chapters missing.  Nope.  It's like the author just decided to stop writing.  The end.  I've never been so disappointed with an ending of a book.
I generally order from Amazon when looking for certain book titles.  Amazon has pretty low prices for books!  I remember a long time ago someone telling me to look for a particular topic in a book on Amazon...I remember thinking ""no way! I'm not shopping for books on Amazon!""  Well...look at me now...a true believer!
I am a big reader, but I guess I just have higher standards? I didn't find much redeeming in this story. Yes, it was thrilling to read but the overall story is terrible. And the characters are rather messed up. But maybe that's the point. Just wasn't for me.
I didn't like  reading the over analytical  and descriptive  parts of the book. It dragged on forever.  I don't need to know color iof shoes or the mundane information that is added to a book to make longer reading.  I sat this book down many times tbefore I finished reading.  The ending was as if the writer was a sociopath
Friends encouraged me to hang in with the book. It would get better. I did read it entirely. I am so sorry I wasted my time. How can anyone write something so grotesque? I truly enjoy suspense but saving someone else's urine?! Always getting away with malicious shenanigans? Don't think I will be reading this author anymore.
A very long and drawn out read.  I read many of the reviews before choosing to read this novel and decided to go ahead and read it anyway despite everyone's negative comments.  The beginning was fine but the middle was never ending and the ending was a big disappointment.  Save your time and DON'T bother reading this story.
Did not like either of the main characters, would not read or buy a followup book if written and would not recommend this book to anyone I know.  It just went on and on, and while the wife's story was very sinister and conniving it was well thought out and amazing.  It wasn't enough to carry the book to a disappointing end.
I usually wait until the ""hype"" surrounding a new book is over before I read it.  In this case, I wish I had never bought it.  I am half-way through but have to put it down.  I have not done that with more than one or two books before.  It is not worthy of the time I have available to read.  Read the other reviews.
The book starts out slowly, with characters who are not very likeable, then picks up steam, then goes on and on and on before finally resolving, sort of. The characters never become more likeable and soon are totally unlikeable so that two thirds of the way through I wondered why I kept reading, so I just scanned the rest.
i am a minority of one.  I found this book full of needless foul language.  However, I will give the author credit for using the F work as 4 different parts of speech.  The plot was improbable and about a 1/3 of the way into the book, I was able to figure out what was going on.  I will avoidMs. Flynn's books in the future.
Absolutely an ""over the top"" fantasy story with too many holes!  Saw the movie, thought the ending was ridiculous and had to read the book to find out if Hollywood had ruined the story.  It hadn't.  The story was just too unbelievable.  Final comment - don't waste your time, there are much better reads to be had.
I hated this book; the characters are not well developed and are not in the slightest way, believable.  Despite reviews that said I would be surprised at the outcome, I was not.  The plot development is slow and laborious, it is clumsily written and could do with some thorough editing. I could go on by why waste my time?
This book made me stand up and take notice how this trash made the NY Times best seller list.What were they thinking that would even give this book the tiniest chance of making the ""list"".  From now on, I will find out more about the book, than assuming the ""NY best seller"" know good books.Very disappointing.
I was disappointed by this book. I thought this was supposed to be a thriller  it did not thrill me. I  did not like any of the characters they were not well introduced any of them  and were not well drawn. I am glad this saved me  from seeing the movie.
Can't remember the last time that I was so disappointed with the ending of a book! As so many others have stated, it was a great plot that went nowhere. I read it because i figured there must be a reason that it was on the bestseller lists for so long. The first 2/3 of the book was good. After that, it literally died...
Not a fan...horrible ending left you upset
This sophomoric attempt at a novel buries fine writing and fine sensible plotting in a morass of cliches. Characters are universally unlikable and even unknowable as the author strains credulity to create a sensational mess some have called literature.
It alternated between being interesting and being boring. I did finish heading it but skipped portions.  I hated the ending and wish I had not wasted my time.  There was too much profanity.  The ""F"" word was used way too often when it was absolutely not necessary and detracted rather than adding to the story.
Great writing with surprises that keep you trying to guess the next move. The climax to an ending that leaves you saying "" that's it? That's truly it?"" It was for lack of a better word.... Boring. If this is what a reader has to look forward to..... I do not plan to read any additional books by Gillian Flynn.
This chapter after chapter of ""you"" then ""me"" does nothing to prevent this novel from inducing yawns.  It was one of the few books I have read that I could call a page-turner (without reading them).  If you enjoy reading about other people's real or imagined dilemmas this might keep you awake.  I cannot recommend it.
I really disliked this book. Boring.....2 people at first in love, then throughout the novel they grow to hate each other more and more, each hoping to destroy the other.  Nothing changed throughout the book, except the hating gets more and more ferocious.  Very few other characters than the ""hating"" couple.
There was a lot of publicity over this book and my question is - Why?  This book was written with vulgarity when it could have told a mysterious story without it. Because of that I skimmed most of the book. Couldn't believe it was a best seller and it makes me mad that I spent the money. Shame on you Gillian Flynn!
I would give this a ""star-less"" rating if I had that option. Terrible ending.  The first 3/4 of the book was very suspenseful.  Then, I was both confused and disappointed by the totally unsatisfying and unrealistic ending.  It almost seemed as if the author's publisher was pressuring her to finally end it!
I wish I could unread this book - The book is divided into three sections, and the first section kept me on edge, wondering what would happen next - I read the second and third only because I always finish a book - this was terrible and totally unrealistic.  I found this to be totally predictable and uninteresting
This book is by a ""twisted"" author. Her stories are original but very dark.She tells them well but then does not know how to end them. Since the ending in this type of story is as important as the story, I feel like I have just wasted too many hours.How did this book get published?
Unless this novel gets better I'll never finish it.  On top of it's lack of immediate interest my Kindle touch 3C decides not to hold my place.  While reading this week it suddenly jumped back close to the first of the book.  When I tried to ""Go To"" it just wouldn't move.  That in itself is exhasperating!
Each chapter was devoted to the opposite person (husband & wife) but didn't flow well. Story evolved to a much anticipated ending which was extremely disappointing. This was the first book I've read in years that I absolutey hated. Waste.of.money!
Totally unsatisfying ending.  The book was great, but I was so disappointed with the conclusion.  It's like the author forgot that the deadline was tomorrow for submitting the final draft, so she just threw together an ending with no thought put into it.  Very unsatisfying.  I hope the movie ending is different.
When I read a book, I want to be able to root for someone. I want to learn something about human nature. There's no one to care about here and the only characteristic that these people have is sociopathic tendencies. I really don't run into people like this in real life. I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone.
This was a poorly written contrived book.  The only reason I finished it was it was suggested for our book club.  The person who suggested the book hadn't read it & only chose it because it was on the best seller list which goes to prove that some people will read anything!  Gone Girl was a total waste of money!
This novel started off great. It kept me interested and moved at a fast pace. But towards the end it greatly declined. The ending was so awful. I came away upset. I thought it was going to be a great mystery/suspense based on the reviews but what a let down. I would not recommend wasting your time on this book.
Sure, this book started out as an amazimg read but the endimg was the worst I've ever read! i can't believe an author would even think that ending was even vaugly satisfactory, much less that a publisher thought this waste of resources was justifiable! DO NOT buy this book! Absolute worst book I've ever bought!
Couldn't finish this one, so can't comment on the entire book. I can say, however, that it was painfully obvious that this was a female trying to write as a male, and I just couldn't get past that. Guys don't talk or think like the guy in this book did, and it was too annoying after about 40 pages to continue.
Horrible, rambling, repetitive and meaningless writing, pointless story, anticlimactic. I held on until the end because I wanted to see how it ended- sorely disappointed, an absolute waste of my time. This book is pointless and I'm sorry I was lured into reading till the end. If only there was a 0 star rating.
Was terrible , I did finish it, but who needs to read about a crazy gal and a husband that put up with it.  Just goes to show how messed up our court system and mental health system are.  May have just been fiction, then the author is crazy also.  I did finish the book, but 7 from our book club of 9 did not.,
I found this book to be very poorly written and the continual use of foul language was HORRID and so unpleasant. I started the book not caring for either of the main characters and finished it with the same feeling. It was a very unsatisfying book … too sad. Don't waste your time on this truly terrible book.
This is one of the worst written books I have ever read. Bought it based on the NYTS RATING. Very disappointed with the writing style. Liked the plot but the writing is so over worked. I also liked the trading back and forth in each chapter of character perspective. Just wish it was better written or edited?
Have to say I was very disappointed with this book, bought it for the high reviews and did not like it at all . I put it down so many times not bothering to finish it. But read the rest on hols as finished other books. Could have been a better book but the plot and characters did not gel within the story ...
The novel, is divided into three parts.  Part one was well written and presented in an interesting fashion,  Part two began to be somewhat bizarre but still interesting.  But I hated part three so much that it influenced the way I felt about the rest of the book.  I would never recommend this novel to anyone
I heard about this book on the Today show. Hoda Kotb recomended it. I had recently reviewed it and it did appeal to me.  However I decided to buy it anyway. Ihave read 81% of this novel. I can't do another minute of this. It is now GONE GIRL GONE. I don't care how it ends. Both Amy and Nick are BORING.
Worst. Ending. Ever. It completely negated any positive comments i would have had for the rest of the book. It makes the finale of How I Met Your Mother look good. Not wasting my time on best sellers anymore as they never live up to the hype.
I got to about page 150 and just stopped.  It was too insulting to me as an even semi-literate reader.  Characters unbelievable, plot stupid even for a mass-market thriller.  Writing insufferably cute.  The only good thing about this book is that the author will be able to pay her kids' way through college.
I just didn't like it.  Really disliked both characters from the beginning.  So many people had been so enthusiastic about this novel that I kept reading, hoping I would be, too.  If either of the protagonists had any compelling (or redeeming) qualities, the twists and turns would have been more engrossing.
On the positive side, this book kept my interest and made me want to keep reading.  On the negative side, I hated it.  There were truly no likeable characters and the ending was horrible.  The way the book was presented was interesting and clever, but the content was not worthy of the mechanics of the book.
Half way through I thought .. I'm hooked please don't end badly.. every part of this page turner gave promise to a brilliant end and not an obvious end cause there were so many ways it could of gone... I even thought oh there must be a follow up book.... is there?????? No just a bad bad end.. what a pity :(
Pros:Very witty and smart writingA page turner for the twists and turnsCons:Very hateful bookYou actually hate the characters equally at different timesVery terrible endingSome of the hate made me physically uncomfortableA letdown in the end.
So disappointed!  What a flat ending!  I could have gone several different directions, yet the author picked a non-closure, anti-climatic finish after a nice suspenseful ride.  I have four other friend who coincidentally felt the same way and we agreed it was very disappointing after all the hype and move.
I was so excited to start this book after so many positive reviews.  However, I could barely finish the first chapter.  The language is highly offensive and the story is just plain weak.  Total downer.  I can't figure out why this book was chosen as one of 2012 top books.  Do NOT waster your time or money.
I love to read.  I read a lot.  But I do not like to read books that have language like this, and would like to have it rated.  I do not know people who talk like this for which I am grateful.  I did struggle through it, and the story was interesting, and could have been so much better with proper English.
The plot is compelling but the characters are flat.  WHY does the author need to pepper every page with multiple obscenities? Clearly the intent is to create ""real people"" with flaws that propell them toward disaster.  They would have been just as real without their infantile reliance on vulgar vocabulary.
Toxic book wouldn't recommend to anyone!
Too many words for too little substance.
There was an awful lot of hype for this.
I cannot believe the loathing I had for this book by the time I finished it.  Ms. Flynn is a decent writer, but it doesn't matter because the plot is so ridiculous and the characters so despicable.  This really has got to be one of the worst books I've ever read.  There was nothing redeeming here for me.
This could have been a very good book, except I think Gillian believes she's Amy.The second half of the book and especially the ending is ridiculous.  So many better ways to finish a good start.Time to move on to a cleansing book of some kind.  I will not waste my money on the  movie, either.
Sorry I wasted my money on this one. I disliked it immensely. The plot starts out intriguing, then gradually devolves into the ridiculous. The two main characters are self-serving, self-absorbed and after a while, hard to take. If this is an example of the best writing that's out there, we're in trouble.
Fantastic writing but hated the book itself. Disgusting story that ends in a total cop out. Really? Both characters might as well have ""woken up from their nightmare"" at the end. Wish I could get back the time I spent reading this.
It was super stressful for me to read this book and that is the reason that I give it only one star.  I like a little stress like Stephen King's Finders Keepers but this level of insanity was too spooky.  I plan to avoid all Gillian Flynn books in the future as my heart doesn't need this type of stress.
I am  TRYING to find this book interesting.  I bought it because of all the ""hoopla"" about it..and the ensuing movie.  Easy to know what comes next all along.  I had looked forward to a GOOD read! This is not it.I am still amazed as to why both the book and the movie had so many accolades.
Worst book I have EVER read, too bad I can't give it negative stars. It is NOT suspenseful(maybe for a minute.) The plot twist was a joke, I think I feel asleep reading it a couple of times. The main characters are boring and predictable.
Afraid this one was a bit over rated. Not a fan of the content or the style. I love a good thriller, but this was psychotic and unsatisfying. With the myriad of writers out there, I don't think I will be reading this one again. I know there are tons of people that love this book. Just not for everyone.
A VERY HARD BOOK TO READ. STORY WAS UNBELIEVEABLE. POOR WRITING - NO SUSPENSE YOU KNOW FROM THE BEGINNING WHO DID WHAT.  NEVER WILL PURCHASE FROM THIS AUTHOR AGAIN.  ELEMENTRY WRITING AND THOUGHTS.  YUK. CANNOT UNDERSTAND HOW THIS MOVIE GOT THE RATINGS IT DID, MUST HAVE IMPROVED THE STORY CONSIDERABLY.
I enjoyed the book until it switched to just Amy and not her diary.  I thought the characters were shallow and unbelievable and unlikable.  I also thought their actions were way over the top and the fact that the author chose to pass the insanity on to the next generations was a cop out.  Don't bother.
If I could give less than a star, I would. I had the book figured out by the second chapter....but never figured it would have such a sorry ending, if you can even call it an 'ending'. What a disappointing waste of time. Hope the movie is better, but then, they'd have to come up with a bang-up ending.
It took me awhile to get a feel for the book, not really what I was expecting as in let-down. Ending was just that... An ending with no twist or turns or unexpected in you face explosive didn't see that coming event... Hoping the movie will be better and give this story a fresh light or new direction.
This book left me feeling like I wasted my time reading it. I am not much of an ending person but in thus case I am. It was okay in the beginning and then it got good. But towards the end it started to drag on. The end of the book was horrible. I would not recommend this book based simply on the end.
There isn't a likeable character in the book, it jumps from implausible to downright ridiculous, and the ending is unbelievable. I wanted to just stop reading several times  but was interested in how it would end.  I'm sorry I did.  I should have listened to my instincts after the very first chapter.
Did not like it. It was a challenge keeping up with the switching back and forth between the two narrators. A weird story that just kept getting weirder. The ending was so depressing. Couldn't imagine two people living under these conditions. Don't think I'll be trying any other books by Ms. Flynn.
Note: I highly recommend reading this author, amazing writing! The reason I gave it one star, was the fact that I was so depressed the whole way through. It's ok if an author takes you somewhere you haven't been in a while. This was a trip to the pit of despair. Left me angry, which was brilliant.
The charaters in this book have absolutley no redeeming qualities. They are a miserable couple that deserved each other.  After reading her book I would never read another one.  But if you want to be depressed go ahead and read it.
If ever there was a book that was proof positive that a huge majority of 5-star reviews was NO guarantee of a good book, this is it.Crummy characters and annoying writing made me give up way before the end because I could not have cared less about the people or what happened to them.
I didn't care for the book at all.  While reading it, I kept thinking the story would get better page by page, but to me it didn't.  The style the book was written in, one chapter about the husband, one chapter about the wife, to me, didn't flow or make for good reading.I hated the ending.
I really felt it was a book I could have definately lived very well without reading it.  Our book club had picked it after being suggested by our local library.  Now I am disapointed in our library and our book club.  I hope other readers see this review and don't waste their time on this book.
This book had the potential to be,very interesting; however, the author's need to fill almost every paragraph with foul language made it impossible for me to enjoy the story.  I would not recommend the book and I regret buying it.
I heard such amazing things about this book and I really don't understand why. I had to keep forcing myself to pick it up and read it. When I was finally finished I was so angry that I would never get that time back! Such a waste!
My experience with the book follows the trajectory of the relationship of the couple. At first I looked forward to a sharp witty book, but soon realized that the wit was, like the entire book, meaningless and empty. The story is told in first person narrative, alternating between two unpleasant, cliche-ridden, narcissists (more like cartoon characters), without relief. Perhaps it is meant only to show that there are vapid and/or clueless people in America, technology has taken jobs, and marriage can be hard - duh, who would've thunk it?  Now, give me a new insight into it, and make it good and make it true. Flynn does not accomplish that. The wit turns into mere contempt, and the lack of discernment and the caricatures become depressing. There is nothing to measure the madness against, no guiding intelligence, no morality. We are told about the mall and the homeless people living there, but it is treated the same as everything else - as a plot device in the infernal machinery, but I think was meant by the author to be a social commentary. Needless to say, because of the banal treatment, it fails.  Then the verisimilitude breaks down completely in the second half (and I can overlook a lot, really, provided it is worth it). Flynn's monster woman would never cozy up to people at the cabin site, and the whole Desi storyline was absurd; but the absurdities do not translate into goofy fun. I did not root for either narrator, of course, who would?  They are unworthy to read and, one would think, to write about. Then I was mad that I had been messed with and subjected to such contrived cynicism.  In the end, I just wanted to get their nasty, glib voices out of my head.  I was going to rate this a resentful 2 stars, an extra one for writing and structure, but changed my mind - those things are not good enough to make up for the deficiencies or the fact that It was soulless and I was left feeling hollow and empty.  The author was a writer for Entertainment Weekly, so i guess she still relies upon that show's kind of simplistic, narcissistic perspective.
After all the hype and glowing reviews, I decided to read Gillian Flynn's Gone Girl. I don't usually read books like this - and now I remember why.  While it's certainly a suspenseful page-turner that was, at least some of the time, enjoyable to read, I can't help feeling a little embarrassed for having picked it up in the first place.  This book has absolutely no literary merit or real substance at all.  With this genre, crime stories/suspenseful thrillers, most people probably realize what they're getting into.  It's like a cheap thrill - you want to know what will happen next, but by the end, you don't really care and the story will quickly fade from memory.  I realize there's a huge market for books like this, and I can see why some people would like it.  For me, it just doesn't work that well.In many ways, this book reminds me of one of those godawful TV movies of the week that used to be so popular back in the early 1990s - think Lifetime.  Its plot is just way too over the top.  There's not a shred of believability in this entire novel, and I don't see how anyone could relate to the two main characters, Nick and Amy.  They're not believable as real people, and they're just not likeable in the least.  I'm also kind of surprised this book was written by a woman for it's monstrous, hugely unflattering portrayal of almost every woman in the book, especially Amy.  The book is strewn with cliche after cliche, such as how New Yorkers behave in comparison to middle-Americans (they're all snobs who look down on the rest of the country).And the ending of the book is simply preposterous.  Just when I thought the story couldn't get any more ridiculously unrealistic, it does just that.  I have no idea what the author was thinking, but this is literally one of the worst book endings I've ever read.I hear rumblings that a movie based on this novel might be in the works. If that happens, I truly hope they improve upon the story for the big screen, which is something that rarely happens.
I really did not like this book.  I paid for it so I was determined to finish it, but I did not like the writing at all.  It felt juvenile and very simplistic.  The story was ridiculous.  Not believable.  How many twists can you conjure up to fit your story?  Not one good thing to say, sorry.
Horrible. I won't go into details as many of the others who gave it only one star already did. I just wanted to help bring the star ratings down in the hopes that someone else doesn't waste an entire weekend reading this like I did. Wish I would've spent my weekend organizing closets instead!
I'm sorry to give one star but the ending ruined the entire book. Overall the story was good although a bit long. But again, the ending was SO disappointing. I don't want to give anything away but it's was like expecting the greatest Christmas present ever and opening the box to see an I.O.U.
Such a shame so talented writer could only find the ""f"" word to express herself .  The movie will be perfect for Ben Aflack since that is the only word he seems to know. Totally stupid waste of time book.  Does not deserve the hype or being made into a movie.  I felt dirty reading it. Trash.
I am s reader my entire life.  I know this has been on best seller list and I know everyone loved.  I really disliked but I finished reading because our book club was discussing.  I don't have anything good to say.  It was dark..I don't enjoy reading about crazy people in terrible marriages.
one of the worst books I've ever read.
This book was bad. I have never hoped that all characters in a book come to a violent end. I had my fingers crossed that Amy(?) was killed by the rich guy and that the husband be found guilty and sentenced to death. And, that his annoying sister get life for helping, and for being annoying.
SPOLIER ALERT:  I figured she went missing ""herself"" immediately.  Actually liked the book quite a bit until the end....REALLY, THAT'S HOW IT ENDS?  I was dumb-founded......I literally stared at my kindle like ""did I just miss something""?!!UGH.....ACTUALLY MADE ME MAD!
Really awful book. Poorly written. Bland, unrealistic dialogue. Not one sigle likable character. About half way through, I decided I couldn't take it anymore and skipped to the end to confirm the very predictable ending. I would give it less than 1 star if I could. Hope the movie is better.
I forced myself to finish, hated every minute of it and i am a voracious reader. I will read anything and buy into any story but this was the most frustrating group of characters, nothing redeeming about any of them. No one in my book club liked it. No one had anything good to say about it.
i hated this book.  i hated the characters.  i hated the plot.  i hated the ending. i hated the writing style.  it is really rare that i cannot find anything redeeming about a book... this is one of those rare occasions.the characters are unlikeable - actually, that is a kind way of saying the characters that are (sort of) developed in this story are honestly the worst that humankind can offer - a sadistic, psychologically challenged (to put it mildly) woman bent on systematically destroying everyone she encounters (well, i guess everyone who can't be a pawn in her game) and a completely stupid, weak man completely ruled by fear. parents that are completely smarmy, naive, codependent and incompetent.  a police force that is equally dumb, incompetent, and predictable.  and ancillary characters that are hardly believable... because they are so cliche and, well, dumb.  are there that many stupid people concentrated in one place?  in one family? in one person's life?the only reasons i finished it were because (1) i didn't want the book to beat me, and (2) i had an ounce faith that this author would wrap the story up in a way that made sense.instead you get an ending that is honestly as unbelievable as the narrative.  do people in this world really settle for such lame existences?  who in the real world has enough time to be this crazy?  do people typically accept the fact that crazy people should and do rule their lives just because - ho-hum that crazy person is smarter than me?  do people hand over the next generation to psychopaths - because oh well, i am so powerless in all of this?good grief. go sell crazy somewhere else. this is one for the rubbish bin.
It took getting through to Part II of this book before it even got remotely exciting. I'm not sure why I even bothered continuing reading, except that it was all I had while on the treadmill. When, finally, it got good, it was only a huge letdown at the end. Definitely NOT worth your time.
Not my kind of read.  I do not like the alternating narrations that will tie in to the story line at some point.  This is the story of two psychos whom deserve each other.  I was disappointed in the book.  Maybe if I had seen the movie first, I would have found it a more enjoyable read.!!
I do not understand the hype over this novel.  I struggled through the first several chapters, then it picked up a bit, but the ending was yuk!  The way it was written just was boring, all the back and forth.  Watched movie after finished reading and it was worse!  Don't waste your money.
Had to make myself finish reading this book.  Thought it the biggest waste of time.  In fact, went back and surface read - how couldI be so out of phase with so many others.  Came to the same conclusion - wast of time.  Would like to hear from other readers asto their opinion.
Epic fail! The book had a few decent moments and I actually got excited about the big twist...and then pure failure came with the ending. Such a disappointment. Drags readers through a tale of misery just to leave them angry that they wasted the time wading through the disaster. Just sad.
I had such great expectations for this novel, and was so sorely disappointed.  The hype around it was so big.  I can't really say why I hated the book without giving things away.  I will say this - Flynn knows how to build up the tension.  But that's about all I can say that is positive.
I can imagine this item being treasured by the newly-literate (it even has a main character named 'Go' for them), but it drove me back to my Signet Classics collection as efficiently as a chatty Uber driver.Goodbye, Gillian Flynn.  I'm happy again.Caveat dumptor.
Hugely disappointing...2/3 of the way through the book, and it was easy to foresee the ending...great beginning, unique and in depth character development, only to descend downhill faster and faster, to a very predictable ending. Wish I had believed other reviews and not wasted my time.
I liked the very beginning but I hate the way it's written.  I finished it because I had paid $11 for the Kindle edition, I tried and I tried but it was an agony.  Confusing,not well well written (I am sorry),  it really left me empty.  I have a friend that tried to read it and gave up.
The guy deserved to go to jail and be sodomized for being such a idiot.If you must see the movie. Do not waste your time reading the book. I suggest something by Cruz Smith.He reminds me of the guy in Her. He should have committed suicide the first 10 minutes of the movie.
My book club chose this book and I dutifully ordered it on my Kindle. Read it on a road trip and must say it just may be the worst piece of fiction I've ever read. Horrible, non-ending, total waste of time and money!! My one consolation is at least it was only hours in the car wasted.
I hated every character in this book!
I had heard many people say that this was a really good book and trusted their judgement.  However, I did not like it as it jumped back and forth too much and the story was pretty u;nbelievable.  I guessed what was going on before I was half way through and I prefer being surprised.
I so looked forward to reading the book. I heard the movie was great.  This was the worst book I read in a long time.  One of my friends put the book down half way. Part 1 was confusing.  Part 2 was better.  The book ended badly. Nothing had changed.  The ending was an anti climax.
I found all of Amy's early entries annoying and refused to read them. When she finally wrote as real Amy, it was better. The story line was interesting for about the middle half of the book, but the ending was completely unsatisfying. I will never read another book by this author.
I would never recommend this book to anyone.  I will never watch the movie.  I kept on reading hoping that something would happen.  It didn't- nothing happened.I don't want to give it any stars!  But I can't submit without a rating - and I can't select 1/100 of a star.
This has to have one of the worst narrators that I have heard in a long time. He has an whining accent which ends up ruining the book completely. I would avoid this book for the simple reason that you end up hating the male character from the start, because he sounds so terrible.
The story started off good. It kept my interest, had a few twists, but it then kept dragging on going back and forth between the two main characters. The ending was HORRIBLE!! There was no closure...waste of my time in reading this. I will not read any more books by this author.
I really hated the main female character in this book. The male protagonist was so sympathetic just because his wife was just a complete psycho. I know this is what the author was going for, but I'm so tired of female characters falling on the weak or crazy end of the spectrum.
I couldn't finish this.  If I had to describe this book it would be ""Horrible man looses horrible wife and says stupid things"".  Sometimes I don't understand why people like things like this.I am looking forward to sleeping through the movie when somebody makes me watch it.
I have been forcing myself to read this book.  I find I don't care about these characters at all.  I am about 40% through and doubt I will finish it.  It has taken me more than a month to get this far.  I normally read 2 books a week.  I would not recommend this book to anyone.
I did not like It... I kept hoping that something would happen to change this but it never came... I read it till the end but suffered all the way. How can this be one of best sellers I can not begin to understand.
Hated this one. Not my kind of book.
Waste a lot of time for that ending.
Found the first half really boring ,pace picked up somewhat for the second half . The whole desi storyline was just too weird.  This book just didn't do it for me ,a struggle to finish it and the end was a cop out .am not encouraged to read any other books by the same author.
I waded thru the whole thing and was throughly disappointed in the conclusion .  I wonder if the news people who tout the book have even read it.  It is filled with coarse language and enough sexual garbage that I now need to take a cleansing shower . Don't waist your time!!
After seeing so many good reviews for this book, I expected much more than a set of characters who were not worth thinking about at all. The only reason I finished it was because it was the selection for my book group. I did not like the writing, the characters, or the plot.
I usually spend 1/3 the money on books that are great! Just sick that I spent that much on such a terrible read. Kept reading hoping for a big ending. Can't remember the last time I was so disappointed in a book!
I had an extremely hard time making it through this book! I am also upset that I paid $7.99 for it. What a waste of time. I don't like to give a bad review, but this book was slow and I feel like the ending leaves me wondering. I am not recommending this book to anyone!!!!!
The book grabs you right at the beginning but then throughout, you begin to dislike all of the characters.  Then I continued reading it because I wanted to find out how it will end but it just ends.  A lot of open questions.  Very unsatisfying.  I wish I hadn't read it now.
Was disappointed in this book.  Since it was on the best seller list for so long I was sure it would be good.  I did not find one character in the book I liked and the story line was a trifle unbelievable.  I did finish it because I thought it would have to end well.  Nope.
I was totally enthralled!  About the first 65% had me going... then.. slowly... the story line became weak.  It morphed into a kind of macabre and silly carnival.  Totally lame ending, if there was one.  Don't waste your time on this one; it is a set-up for disappointment.
This was the most annoying book I ever tried to read. (which I just couldn't finish) The book contains many nonsensical phases that soon become like fingernails on a chalkboard. I don't know what all the hype is about this book, but it is one I wish I had never picked up.
It started off slow, picked up the pace half way through then dragged on and on and on. That is until the stupid ending. Gees I hated this book. Every character was ridiculous.I couldnt wait for it to end and even thought about not finishing it.I hope the movie is better.
Waste of time and money. I think the author ran out of ideas and didn't know how to end it. Really, really bad ending. If there is a rate less than 1 star, that will be my rating . That's how bad this book is.
I realize that this will NOT be a beloved review, as this is one of THE hot books and movies right now.  However, I can't even finish the book.  I find the book to be a bit under written, the life they're leading is drab and horrible.  Just leave already, for God's sake.
After all the exposure and reviews the movie got, I decided to read the book. I didn't like the writing style but persevered and struggled through chapter after chapter....just to read the ending.... and what an anticlimax! Really, there are people like that? I hated it.
The book started off captivating!  About half way through I was starting to get annoyed.  There's just too many ""coincidences""!  The end was probably the worse end to a book that I have ever read......mostly because there really wasn't an ending.  Don't waste your money!
Hated the book! A waste of my time!
Very boring book with no substance.
just couldn't get into this book...
Why did I bother to read this book?
Worse book I ever read. Glad I didn't pay for it. Glad I didn't finish it. I hated all of the characters. I had the whole thing. I worked out what was happening at the disappearance. Terrible. Just terrible. I would have given it negative stars had that been an option.
I have never been as disappointed as I was while reading this book. Not even sure how this is a best seller.Mary Higgins Clark could write a better suspense novel in her sleep. I dont even want to waste any more time writing about how average this book was.
Truthfully, I wouldn't give this book any stars. This book has no literary value whatsoever. The structure is monotonous to the point of annoying. Why anyone in Hollywood would option this garbage boggles my mind. Neither of the characters has any redeeming qualities.
I was upset that I wasted. . time reading about such twisted characters.  I thought the writing was poor and I didn't like the format.Also the writer set you up for her next book by leaving the book without an ending.  Even with that , I would never read her next book
I did not like this book enough to finish it after reading 100 pages.  The writing was good, but the concept of the story was not interesting to me.  There was too much self-absorption  for me.  I will think twice before choosing to read anything else by this author.
Usually read only God-honoring books.  So sorry I ordered this one.  Didn't like the continual profanity, the personalities of the main characters, or the main theme of the book.  A big downer for me, personally.  Will thoroughly research before I order another book.
Read it.  Didn't like it.  I know how many people have raved about it and that's the only reason I'm reviewing it.  I read a lot.  I read good stuff.  This is awful.  Sometimes the emperor really doesn't have clothing..You don't have to read it if you don't want to.
If I could rate it one half a star I would.  I kept reading it only because many people told me it will get better, but that  never happened.  It was an effort to continue with it so I decided to give up.  It was one of the WORST books I have ever attempted to read.
This story was deceiving and resulted in an existentialistic outcome for the couple who were both lacking honesty, morals, and convictions.  All you could say was that they deserved each other.  I will read no more of her books as this was a very disappointing read.
I was very disappointed in this novel.  I found it disjointed.  My low recommendation mainly has to do with the filthy language, which could have been cut drastically.  That would not have changed the story at all.  This book is just not my kind of reading material.
Maybe I should not write a review...I tried hard to get into the book, but quit about one third of the way..  It was boring and going nowhere....There are better books than this...and not a waste of time.
Not worth reading. I kept on as it was for book club, but none of us felt it had any redeeming quality. Characters, plot, outcome were all as disappointing as the language. So unnecessary and distasteful.
If I could I would give this book a minus 5 Stars.I read this book with no preconceptions.  I'd not read Flynn before and I'd heard nothing about this book in particular.  It was available from the library and I wanted to test out Kindle library loans (which work great by the way) so I borrowed Gone Girl.From the very beginning I was bothered by the self-conscious posturing of both Nick and Amy.  Neither seemed quite real.  I couldn't willingly suspend my disbelief and accept them into my head.But I persevered, thinking maybe it would get better.  After all technically, Flynn is a decent writer.  It's hard for me to put a book down once I start it.  A part of me always wants to know ""So what happened next?"" even in poorly written books.  So, I read it through to the end.The 'Big' revelations and 'plot twists' along the way were not big at all.  They were telegraphed from the very beginning.  The only character that was half-way believable was Go, Nick's twin sister.  But worse than not being believeable, most of the other characters were written ugly to the core.  Well, Andie and the cops were not exactly ugly to the core, just vapid.For a novel to be successful, there have to be characters you care about, that you want to root for.  I didn't find even one in Gone Girl.My advice.  If you're like me and tend to read to the end, even when the book isn't very good, don't begin reading Gone Girl.  You'll be better off not looking into the cesspool these characters represent.
I thought this was going to be another ""War of the Roses"":  Dark, funny, quirky.  Instead, I found it to be dull, decidedly un-funny and depressing.  As a mystery-thriller, it was neither mysterious, nor exciting.  It was hard to like any of the characters.
Having read the first two masterpieces by Gillian I assumed this would be the same quality. If this had been the first book I read by her I would have put it down halfway through.  What a waste of time. I dislike it so much I won't even give to anyone else to read.
It was a compelling read in the sense that I wanted to find out what happened next, but I did not care for the book at all, and wish I would have checked it out from the library and not bought a copy.  You win some you lose some. I thought the novel was disturbing.
I won't spoil it by giving the details, but I will say, it's a slow start, a fire-hot middle, and an anticlimactic, non-existent, dead end. I wish I could get back every minute I spent reading this book!
Kept reading and reading and hoping something great was coming but not surprised at all and the whole book was very boring for me.  My neighbor encouraged me to read it as she loved it so everyone has different opinions I'm sure but I did not enjoy any part of it.
This was one of the worst books I have ever read. It is sick and twisted. I paid nearly nine dollars for this book and it was recommended by a friend which is why I trudged through the entire story. I kept thinking it might get better, unfortunately it never did.
Folks, someone has to say it:  there's a vast difference between good writing and crude language, so let's not confuse the two.  No one would confuse the experience of dining at a five-star restaurant with dumpster diving, so let's not pretend that the ""C"" word is a hallmark of witty dialogue.  Even if we are to overlook Gillian Flynn's lowbrow language, there is little to praise in this story.  Tone?  Painfully narcissistic.  A writer (disguised as a character) breaking off from the narrative to compliment her own brilliance is about as clever as a model immersed in her own reflection.  Characters?  Whining, unsympathetic, one-dimensional cartoon cliches.  Plot?  So far-fetched it can't be taken seriously, but neither is it funny.  If you want to read a novel that successfully blends an outlandish storyline with humor and satire then I strongly recommend  Naked Came the Leaf Peeper, a collaborative storytelling jamboree from Asheville, North Carolina. On the other hand, a story that is truly dark and sinister with a well-paced narrative, strong characters, and a compelling mystery is Christine Falls by Benjamin Black.  I exhort you to spend your time and money wisely!
The most annoying editing  ever...
Couldn't get past the bad prose...
Boring, first book I didn't finish
This one got round filed - boring.
I found this book grueling to read
This is quite possibly one of the worst books I've ever read.  I dislike the author's style and felt it was a rambling mess. I did enjoy the movie though, and I just can't get the rave about the book.
I don't understand why anyone gave this book such rave reviews. The middle of the story was interesting but the beginning was boring and the ending was terrible and anticlimactic. Would not recommend!
I was so very disappointed with this book.  With all the reviews I thought I would enjoy it.  I was wrong. The use of profanity was gratuitous.  The plot bothersome at best, and the ending was just infuriating.  Wish I could get my time and money I wasted back.
I'm 40 years old I've read all my life I love to read and I will read anything.  This is the first book ever I have hated!  I love a good crazy person or hating someone but these people I just could have cared less what happened to them.  Don't waste your time.
Read this because of all the movie hype. Total waste. Story just ends and no strings are tied up. Waste of my money and will not be reading any of her other books. Sad because it had great potential.
I can't believe how this story ended!  I read this book in 3 days and neglected my house cleaning. I couldn't put it down!! What a disappointment and waste of money!!! Don't bother reading this book!
Got to 60 percent of the book read then started skimming, then started skipping...couldn't stomach the silly story, the wordy wordy wordy wordy author who blabbed more nonsense than any of my living grandparents.  I wish I had never ordered this annoying book.
I did not like the style of writing and felt it detracted from the story, unnecessary sexual content that added no value to the Story.  I only finished the book as the plot was excellent.  This book was not yet ready for publication.  Her editors let her down.
This was by far one of the worst books I have ever read, I don't see how it has so many good reviews...I bought it due to the great reviews, however I was very disappointed, I would not have read this if it had been free if I had known how it would go and end.
Nothing exciting happened it this book until I was 50% of the way through. The next 45% was really good, but the ending was the most anticlimactic ending I've ever read. It's like the author just gave up and decided to stop writing. It literally just stopped.
I'm surprised by how popular this book has been. Initially it was engrossing but I came to hate both the characters and not even care what the ending was. The crude language and sexual references were also a disappointment. I wouldn't recommend this to anyone
This was an awful book. It was long, drawn out, too details about two unlikeable and disfunctional people. I'll never get those hours I spent reading this back. I almost quit reading several times throughout, but kept thinking it's got to get better. Wrong!
The characters are not likable; few people would stay in their marriage.  Their actions are unrealistic.  The guy, under suspicion, does things that nobody under suspicion would ever do.  I can't read this amateurish book about those distasteful characters.
For the life of me I cannot figure why this book is a best-seller. It's shallow, the characters are unsympathic and self absorbed, and the writing lacks richness and depth.  Don't waste your time.
The main characters opinions of what a marriage should not be, leave you feeling anxious and more than a little vulnerable. The plot line is contrived, and the ending propagates the idea that there is no justice in the world. No, I did not like this book.
I am forcing myself to finish this book. I found it very boring, but now I just want to get it over with. I had hopes it would be good since it has been on the bestseller list for so long, but I don't know why. My sister warned me, I should have listened!
I gave it one star because it was such a fabulous read all the way to the end. Then the author apparently decided she was done and just stopped.  End! Nothing!  Just ended it.  I thought I was missing something so I reread the last pages.  Nothing!  Over!
Rambling, generally BOREING,!!!!!
This book came highly recommended and, to say the least, it left me incredibly dissatisfied and disappointed. The plot was so basic and predictable I continued reading in the hope it might get better. It didn't. I would not recommend this book to anyone.
I did not enjoy this book as the characters were not like able and the story was pointless.  I read the whole thing hoping it would have some redeeming value but would recommend this.  The author seemed to thrill with ways for one human to hurt another.
Terrible.  Don't even bother.  I didn't even get past the end of the first section before I gave up.  BORING.  Don't waste your money.  There are much better mysteries out there than this one.
While Gillian Flynn is an adept writer, the story kept spiraling downward. I'm just not a fan of that degree of sociopathic behavior.If you are a fan of following people with deeply troubled psyches, then you'll probably think this book is great.
What a bunch of pulp fiction. I can't believe they are going to make this (or have) into a movie. The back and forth of these sniveling characters was tiresome, and then the book just ended with them both being miserable (sorry for the spoiler alert).
I'm sorry but these characters were the most unlikeable people I have ever been exposed to and the ending was so disappointingly flat and unbelievable...sorry, my high school students could do better.  I began skipping parts just so I could finish it.
I did not like the story line, the writing, and the characters in this book.  It was very difficult to read and lost my interest early on so did not even finish the book.  Very disappointing as I am an avid reader, generally reading 1-2 books a week.
My review probably is not fair as I did not finish it. I found it boring and just could not get into it. There are way too many books out there that grab my interest from the start. I have been reading books for about 55 years and rarely quit on one.
A fascinating psychological thriller which is hard to put down. Interesting exploration of marriage, trust and communication. Just fails a little when the plot is a little too glib and smooth especially the final denouement. A very good read however.
I will never understand why this book was on the best seller list.  I have never read a book were I couldn't  care less about any of the characters nor have I ever read about more self centered characters.  Don't waste your time.  It is not worth it.
Cheap, ""Teen People"" or ""Seventeen"" writing with the occasional glimpse into actual human psychology.  Don't waste your time. If you want real thrillers read the Harry Hole novels by Jo Nesbo, they're not perfect but far better than this. Amazing Amy should call Francis Underwood from House of Cards and they can rule the world together as the two and only competent people on earth. SMH. Yet I watch the show and finished this book as I grew in frustration with each new outlandish event and stop on the obvious train. Completing this book feels the same as the time I finished watching a season of ""The Bachelor"" with my sister asking myself, why was I so annoyingly entertained? Furthermore, did I just get dumber?The truth to some of the books underlying cracks on feminism (cool girl, bleed clean bleed clean) are lost in Amy's angry tone. Respect to the author for the noticing and trying however. ESPN commercials are the male tailored equivalent (drink, eat) just how things are, don't be mad about it just see through it.  Enjoyed the highlighting of how petty the ""dancing monkeys"" reference was. We all surely had someone in mind as we read it, the less people you could think of the better you've probably picked your friends.I should probably go buy a book on the economy now or some type of productive read, but what can I say I'm addicted to the genre, and will likely be back for more. Good luck to all in finding a fun read!
I can't imagine anyone giving this book more than 2 stars!It was mindless...did not keep me guessing, but made me skip entire paragraphs because it repeated parts of their thoughts over and over again.As for the ending....there was none!
I am not going to give any spoilers but I will say this book is trying to hard to have a surprise ending, trying too hard to be a movie.  The character of Amy is not believable towards the end of the book.  Or actually at any point.  Disappointing.
Not worth the read at any price.
Not worth reading in my opinion.
Didn't care for the book at all.
While the book is not poorly written, and the story immediately grabs your attention, I found the story to be such a downer psychologically that I can't recommend it. The ending left me feeling awful. The protagonists were headed for certain doom.
If you like a story that grows increasingly implausible, uses gratuitous vulgarity, features no hero or even redeeming characters and ends without conclusion, this is the book for you. This is an open wound sewn loosely and left unknotted to rot.
Novel novel, but not different enough to make up for the content. I had to make myself finish it. I didn't like Pulp Fiction, either, if that gives you any hint. I didn't like the characters and found it hard to empathize with anyone in the book.
Gone Girl is slow and predictable. I thought that the characters were poorly developed and just largely unbelievable. The end made me wish that I hadn't spent the time reading this book.
Very unbelievable story.  The really science and police policies were not at all taken into account when writing this book. It was just stupid and I couldn't wait to be done with it.  And that brings me to the ending...I will just say, Not Good.
Cult like following lured me in...One star is being nice. Predictable, not at all the ""unbelievable"" twist everyone made a huge deal of...and the end I g was as if the writer gave up. Reader is left with ""why?""...to several unanswered questions.
First half was an amazing mystery and I couldn't put it down! Then we get to the second half with a twist worthy of the most eye rolling M Night Shama-whatever movie. Took me another 2 months to bother finish reading just to say there, I'm done.
It started out pretty good and then went bad and never got any better.  The book goes on and on and has an ending that is just unsatisfying.  I don't know why so many people gave it excellent reviews.  Do yourself a favor and pass on this one!!
did not like this novel...could not deal with it until pages and pages..was going to delete many times...Will not read any more by this writer!Really depressing and no redeaming qualities in the charactors!Sorry did not like!!
I could not get into this book. So, I have put back on my ""to read"" shelf...this book has great reviews...I do plan to read..sometimes, when we want to read we must have the right book. My granddaughter loved the book. So, I must read.
It held my interest until the end but then it left me hanging.  I hate it when an author leaves it to me to finish or guess what happens at the end.  It left it open for another book but the author did not mention that there would be a sequel
After reading many reviews, I thought this book would be the best book I ever read.  I was wrong.  I disliked this book from the start.  I really can't put into words as to why I hated it.You will probably like it more than I did.
I couldn't finish it. I'm an avid reader and just couldn't get engaged in  either the style of writing nor the content..  I foundI wasn't alone in my opinion as several friends shared that they also abandoned the book before finishing/
Maybe it just wasn't my type of book but I was pretty much bored with this one.  I kept reading waiting for it to grab me but it never really did. If you are thinking about this one, I recommend you just go see the movie - less time wasted.
Over hyped mediocre book. The story is ridiculous,  the characters stupid and warped, the language atrocious, and the writing uninspired.Why this book is so popular is beyond me. Save your time and money for something worthwhile
Couldn't even finish reading it. Did not like the characters, so really didn't care what was happening to them.  The plotting may have been good, but the characterization was lacking.  My fault for believing the hype written about the book.
I kept reading hoping it would get better but this is not my kind of book. I felt I had to finish it  It was just creepy. I didn't like either character. I will not be reading any more by this author. Anyone who could think this up is sick.
Hated the characters.Hated the ending.Hoped for better.Really wish I would've liked it more because it had such good reviews but I had to check three times at the end to make sure  it was over. Total waste of my week......
Absolutely a terrible. Novel!,,
Crazy story would not recommend
I didnt like the ending at all!
The characters are Not likeable
I always finish reading a book; however, I found this book difficult to get into and did not like the writer's style.  It was so repetitious and appeared to be going no where with the plot.  I would not consider this book or recommend it.
Just a bad book.  Started off interesting and then it just got bad.  So much unbeliebable things in the story.  Not one main character was likable.  I wish I never read it.  What a waste of money.Definately will never see the movie.
Seems like everyone really liked this book. I did not. After the first few chapters I skipped to the end to see how it finished. I read for pleasure, not to analyze psychotic characters. I guess this is one for book club folks to discuss.
This us the worst mystery novel I have ever read.  It was so boring that I finally skipped the last 29% to the end!I would not recommend it to anyone.  There are many great mystery novels available for a fraction of the cost!
I found this book to be so frustrating; I hung in there in hopes of it coming together into something that makes sense.  Nope.  The ending was less exciting than a match being dumped in water.  It was, however, a great cure for insomnia.
I must have read a different book. this book was filled with hateful characters. Was hoping for a total wipe out at the end. No such luck. Is this good writing? I don't think so.
This book was awful. I'm quite mad I spent $8 on it. I positively hated the writing style of the author. Normally I don't mind books with flashbacks and a lot of jumping around but this was horrible. I couldn't even call it a good read.
I read this book based on the really good reviews other readers gave it.  However, I must have missed the entire theme of the book because I found it downright disturbing and uncomfortable to read.  I like a good mystery, but this was far beyond that in my opinion.  I didn't enjoy reading about how this ""should never have gotten married"" couple grew to so hate each other and the premeditated scheming on how they were going to kill each other, just was too much. Amy, the wife in this book belongs in a mental & psych ward.  When I finally finished this book, I felt absolutely wrung out.
Why on earth is this book a best seller? It is poorly written and reads like a high-school essay. Very disappointing to say the least!
Anything I have to say would include spoilers and I really do not like dwelling on the negatives.  The sister was very likable.  Maybe this is one time the movie will be better than the book, not sure I'm interested enough to find out.
Unlikeable characters! I couldn't stand the husband but was curious as to what happened to the wife. (spoiler next - so stop reading now) The wife is not dead and she was worse than him! They deserve each other and it's a good thing!!!
Like many other reviewers, I found the ending so abysmal that it completely overshadowed the good points of the book.  Apparently she was as exhausted as her readers and decided enough was enough before she actually finished the thing!
This book was very hard to get into as it jumped too much, but in the middle it started putting things together. However, the ending was horrible. This was the first book that I have read by this author and it will probably be my last.
Didn't like the characters all the way through the book.  Thought they were both narcissistic and craved attention. Even with the twists and turns it was hard for me to keep reading because I didn't like either one of the characters.
I'm not looking for glowing happiness in the books I read.  But I do expect multidimensional and complicated personalities.  There are no characters with any realistic redeeming qualities in this book.  No justice.  Waste of my time.
Our book club read this book last month and the opinion was split.  Some loved it and others hated it.  I was so upset at the ending, I wanted to destroy the book.  The characters are lunatics and so are the individuals that read it.
Characters you love to hate!!!
Book was too dark and twisted.
Terrible! Did not like at all.
Barely worth the time to read.
I was totally bored and thoroughly disappointed by this book, especially after all the hype. I also easily guessed the ending. i have not seen the movie, but this may be one case where the movie may actually be better than the book.
So dissapointed in the long, contrived, slow buildup to a less-than-spectacular ending.  For this book to work for me, it must get me to suspend disbelief in the plausibility of the evil plan.  I tried, but the ending eliminated it.
The beginning of the book was captivating but that didn't last to the end.  Eventually everything just fell apart and I ended up disliking everyone and everything in the book.  I didn't expect a happy ending but this was just awful.
'Gone Girl' started out well but descended into a silly book.  To be fair, I only read 1/2 of it.  I just couldn't get through it.  It got some good reviews but I did not think it was well written or imaginative at all.  Just silly.
The characters and plot in this story are so badly contrived that the book crosses the line into idiotic and infuriating. This is what passes as a best seller these days?????
Gone Girl started out promising, but the promise quickly dissolved into a ridiculous story with a lackluster ending.  I am honestly surprised it received such strong reviews.
Much too slow.  Took me forever to get 'into' the book.  I wanted to toss it so many times but hate wasting money so I continued to read.  I would never recommend it.  The ending was....well.. it had no ending.  A waste of my time.
Hated It!!!  Started off slow, Pick up in the middle, Ending was the worst EVER!!!!!!! I hope the movie is better, I heard the ending was rewritten for the movie, Thank God!
What waste of time. You can skim the first half. No characters of any interest.Read a few pages after that then the end is skim again.I was looking forward to the movie, but after this stinker of a book, not so much.
I didn't like the way this book kept moving from past to present every chapter.  It was annoying and made it difficult to stay focused on the storyline.  Can't understand why this was such a runaway bestseller.  Wasted my money.
By the time I got to the ending, I wondered why I ever read this book.  I definitely will not see the movie and I really like  Ben Afleck in movies.  It was a sick ending.
This book is for someone who likes twisted, preposterous plots and who doesn't mind graphic language.  I read it because I had friends who loved it, but it was not for me.
Knowing it was a best seller, I thought it might be worth a try.  OK, I stuck with it to the end.  Good start. But it just got progressively more far fetched and unbelievable.  And no fun reading.  Sorry I wasted my time on it.
Nothing about this book was ""Amazing""! It was too long and drawn out, the characters were unbelievable, the ending was terrible and I would not recommend this to any person on the planet. Don't waste your money or time.
I am an avid reader. This was one of the most difficult books to read. I struggled to get through it and was so disappointed when I got to the end. I felt I had wasted hours of my life. Don't waste the time or money like I did.
None of the characters are likeable. They are selfish and self-centered. Unfortunately I kept forcing myself to read thinking, HOPING, the plot would take a turn for the better. Didn't happen. Total waste of my time and money!
Terrible, predictable storyline. Written in American. I felt set up and manipulated - you can see the obvious clues a mile off. It's an 'Oh my god, and 'Awesome' book. Uses catchphrases that are not English.Couldn't finish it.
The unusual contrivance and methodology of unfolding the story is at first of interest but the second half of the book is nothing but a let down..A very over rated book.
I had to add to the one star reviews to up its count.  I agree with every one star review written.  Mediocre story telling and horrible ending.  Don't waste your time...
sorry, i was thoroughly BORED
Why did I read this bullcrap?
Did not finish the book as it was not to my liking. I guess the author's style was just not something I usually enjoy.  I don't like a book with too many f-bombs.  I think a book can be just as good without the foul language.
Not my style of writing!  I continued reading because it was selected by my book club.  I considered it an insult to my intelligence.  I will not read another book by this author.  This is one of my few negative book reviews.
The first half was depressing, and the second half was totally ridiculous. The only redeeming thing about this book is that it really makes you appreciate a good story.
I really can't remember if it was the 1st, 2nd or 3rd person.  It was sad that this narcissistic(sp?)  couple were going to bring up a child in such a sick environment.Many of my friends didn't care for it but some did
My daughter and I are reading bestsellers and then watching the movies, rating them individually. As far as the book goes, I would have quit reading it if we weren't doing this book club, that's how much I disliked the book.
I have to say I was pretty disappointed in the ending to this book.  It was very well written and definitely drew me in but I hated, hated, hated the ending.  I would not recommend it, personally, but I'm sure many loved it.
I bought this book because of the high ratings and amount of people that have read it. I was so disappointed! This ranks as the number one worst book I have ever read!
Hope the movie was better than the book. Contrived, shallow characters. A million details did not make me empathetic. The conclusion of the story left me feeling cheated because it was dissuaded my suspension of disbelief.
I found this a very hard book to read.  I had heard the movie was thrilling; however it did not come over in the writing style of the book.  I did read it all the way through, but at the end I felt it was a waste of time.
The details are pointless and exhausting.  Anticlimactic and irritating ending. Not a mystery, just a ridiculous string of characters and situations. No aha moments.
There is not a single character in this book whom I could sympathize with. They are all awful, although one of them is absolutely horrifying. I do not like happy fluff and, it turns out, I do not like evil fluff, either.
Gone girl is one of the most depressing, disappointing sick books I have read in my 78yrs!  I kept reading hoping for something that would be sane to be said. Sick!
It just finished without any justice at all. Such a disappointment. I felt like I was  being led to a terrific ending with justice  but no, just a godfather ending.
Difficult to follow...unreal story and characters... Overall not worth the time or effort to read ( much less watch the movie)! Some would call it a psychological thriller but it's neither thrilling nor understandable!
So many people told me to read this so I finally got a copy for my Kindle. It took me over a year because I just couldn't get into it. When I finally did for a chapter it changed again. I did not like this book at all.
the only reason i can fathom that this book is on the best sellers list for so long is that the ending is sick.  the story is contrived shock value nonsense.  as a reader, please know there are better novels out there.
Why would anyone want to read a story like this. I read for enjoyment and this book was not enjoyable at all. The only reason  I finished it was because I paid good money for it and I was punishing myself for doing so.
Ponderous. Contrived. Juvenile. An obviouschoice for a Ben Affleck movie . Did not even finish it. Trying to figure out how I can get my $ back from Amazon.
It has taken me almost a year to read this book. I kept putting it down to take a breather from these self- centered low life people. I do plan to see the movie and I wonder what drew so many people to read this book.
It is said that the children of psychologists are nutty.  This is the story of one, with a dissatisfying ""ending"" that left me wondering why I hadn't quit at page 13.  It is well-written, but not a good read.
I wanted to like this book - I love stories in this genre, the writing style was very good. Several friends raved about it, but it just didn't do it for me - I found it very predictable & couldn't make it to the end.
Just not well written.  Immature male ego...won't buy any other work by this author.  Disappointed in the rating review as I use these as a guide for selection.
Book seemed very promising, but the ending was a HUUUUUUGE disappointment, like the author ran out of anything else to have the characters do and just said ""OK we'll stop.....HERE""  UGH-what a waste of time!
A lot of TV hype talked me into trying the book.  I quit at 10% as, for me, the books bones aren't even bare.  I didn't realize it was a romance, my fault.  However, it'll also be my fault if I continue, so I'm out.
I was really looking forward to a good thriller, after it getting massive reviews in the papers as well!! I don t know what ye are reading but this particular read was dreadful! Very badly written! Almost amateur!!!
I can't believe how overrated this book is!  The first part was ok but it quickly became almost laughable- the story line was so lame. I didn't really care to even finish it. I am so glad I didn't pay for this book.
Disappointing book. Gets interesting at first then starts to fade. I honestly felt frustrated with the characters and empty when I finished... like that's it?? Wondered why I started reading it in the first place!
No clue why or how anyone could enjoy this book.  Absolutely horrible ending!  I was riveted throughout, only to be gobsmacked by the awful, wretched, pitiful ending.  Do NOT waste your precious time reading this.
The author lied in an interview about writing an alternate ending to the movie. Saw the movie, which was great but didn't like the ending so I bought the book to see how the story worked out. Rip off. Same ending.
I  did not like  the  way  it  was  written.  It dragged  on. Once  I  got  to  75% I  only kept  reading  it  to see how  it  ended. Terrible ending. The  book  was a waste  of time. I hope  the movie  is better.
I didn't like this book at all.  It started promising enough, but is probably the darkest, most depressing book that I've ever read. I like happy endings, and if you do too, I wouldn't waste my time if I were you.
My sister loved it, my niece, my best friend but I find it just dragging.  My friend gave me the ending thinking that I would want to finish it but if I hadn't had to pay for it I would never read another chapter.
This is a suspense story without suspense. Every plot twist is laboriously telegraphed.The story is implausible, and the characters are banal.I bought it for Book Club. Avoid it if you can.
Why has this book done so well. The characters are unlikable, the plot predictable and the writting far from mesmerizing. Oh and it is sooo slow. A good thriller needs pace this has the speed of a garden molusce.
like many people today time is precious and reading this book was a waste of time! ending very bad. sorry for negative review but time I will never get back.
I didn't like it at all, skipped parts of it.  Didn't care for the writing style, disjointed, weak plot, can't understand why it was on the best seller list.
I didn't like anything about this book.  It is the first one I have read of hers, but because my book club chose this I read it.  No one in my club liked any part of the book.  I would not recommend it to anyone
I kept reading this book only hoping it was going to get better, only it never did. The story dragged on and on only to come to a rushed ending. I wish I could get a refund on the time I spent reading this crap.
This book is absolutely vapid and amoral. What  a waste of my time. Weak and not believable. Don't waste time on this useless story. No redeeming qualities.
One of the worst books I've ever read.  I kept waiting for it to get interesting.  It didn't.  My 8 year old granddaughter could have written a better book!
Did not care for this book.
A REALLY BADLY WRITTEN BOOK
Did not care for the story.
I know this was a big seller but I didn't like it and thought it was a waste of time.  Just my opinion but I thought it was one of the most negative and hateful things I'd ever read.  Not a plot that I enjoyed.
Because this has been on the best seller lists for over a year, I was pretty sure I would enjoy the book.  My problem is that there is not a single character I cared anything about and it's way too dark for me.
I give this book 1 out of 5 stars because of the plot and the characters. The two main characters, Amy and Nick, are struggling in their marriage, and by Nick searching for Amy, both characters learn things about one another that they thought could never be true. The thing that upset me about the characters the most was that they were such bad people. In every situation that they faced they did not think about what was right, but what they wanted instead. Another thing is that the beginning and middle of the book is really slow, there isn’t any action and plot until you get towards the end of the book.  I do not recommend this book to anyone, unless you love to read about twisted and morally wrong married couples. This was one of the worst books I have ever read. The fact that they say horrible things about Missouri as well is not okay. Overall, it was a horrible book do not read it.
At first, the story is engaging, although the writing isn't fantastic. Eventually, I found myself shouting in frustration at the ridiculous plot twists and unbelievable characters. And then it ended. Terribly.
This book came highly recommended on a Facebook book reading page so I tried it. The language is awful and I hate the ending!!!! It's like no ending at all! Just I'm done with this story it's to long. The end!
This book was intriguing, interesting, couldn't figure out how it was going to end, but neither could the author.  Dud, let down, tired of writing this book ending.  Awesome to the last chapter, last line yuck
The book drew me in only to be completely underwhelming in its conclusion. A five-year-old's nonsensical drivel would have been more entertaining to read.
I only read this book because it was a book club selection and would have closed it after 30 pages.  I objected to the language and it was money misspent.
The book stinks. Read only the first two chapters. The inner dialogue of the male protagonist is clearly written by a woman; the words are too feminine.The book itself arrived in superb condition.
Well. I read it quickly, but carefully, and it did not leave me satisfied. The author tries to accomplish something a bit different with the back and forth perspectives, and while that was a bit interesting for a while, it became stale. I found the characters mostly not believable. In fact, at the end, I thought all the  primary characters lost their ability to convince me anyone would behave as they did... even the parents and the sister. The secondary characters never lifted off the runway. ""Amazing"" Amy would have been much better left to the pages of her fictional world. No spoiler here, but by the time I got to the last few chapters I was laughing... and laughing derisively. Oh, no... I thought, dear Author, .. don't go there. Aw geez.. saw that coming and it's so trite. What is trumpeted as a super twisting novel with surprises that will cause the reader to 'duck!' is really a predictable  bunch of words and an extremely feeble attempt to enter the minds of some messed up people. The author did not do her due dilegence in understanding mental illness or a truly sociopathic mind. I won't bother reading any more from this author. Time not well wasted; money not well spent.
I was extremely disappointed with the ending.  In the beginning I thought I would get other books by Gillian Flynn, but I am worried that she will have the same type ending and I don't want to waste my time.
Right now, I forgot who did the narration - but I (and everyone else I talked to) did not like this book. In fact, I would not recommend it to anyone and think the ""hype"" did the public a disservice.
Did not like the author's style of writing.  My bookclub did not like the book, found all of the characters dysfunctional, the repitition of words to describe body parts when one word would convey the point.
Story jumped around too much.  ""Gone Girl"" herself, seemed very strange.  I hardly ever read the end of the book to find out what happened,,,but I did this one.  Did not read the middle.  Awful book.
This much hyped book was a disappointment. It was a descent into madness involving characters that I did not care about.  Some parts crude. Yuck. To me, not clever but depressing with no redeeming qualities.
This book started off interesting, had good character development, then got a little disturbing, and finally at the end had you saying seriously???  HORRIBLE ENDING.  Wasn't realistic and did not make sense.
Not one likable or sympathetic person in the entire book. Can't understand why it gets 4 and 5 star ratings, or even 2 stars for that matter. Pure trash.
Not for me. I hated wife after reading 1st chapter and wished she was dead. I'll probably be the only one who didn't like this book and I'm ok with that.
I had to stop reading this novel because, after reading a good portion of the book, it just seemed to be going nowhere.  Back and forth in its timeline turned into what I thought was a big waist of my time.
I honestly can't understand why people thought this book was good. It was so incredibly predictable that it was insulting. And the ending was just so...not good. I really wanted to like it, I just couldn't.
Even if you edit out all the various tenses of the ""f"" word it would still be objectionable.  How did this ridiculous book ever make the best seller list!  Is it possible to return this Kindle Book?
don't read it. save your money terrible terrible ending. waste of time If I  could give it zero stars I would. But  Amazon  won't let me :-(
I was disappointed. The story would have been okay, but there were no likeable characters in this book..not a single one. This is one of the few times that I can say that the movie is better than the book.
I hated this book--the characters, the plot, the senseless evil and violence. Amy was nuts and her husband was spineless--the ending was cobbled together to get it published. Not worth the time or money!!!
Horrible. Ongoing repetitive. I literally shook my head upon completion. I forced myself to finish it thinking it had to get better. Terribly mistaken.
Worst stpry I ever read, terrible concept.  Worked in creative writing department in college and this was on the same level as those stupid students trying to write porn.  Did a woman's libber write this?
The ending was terrible. I couldn't put down the book bc I had to know what happened to Amy. I just knew she had to get repaid for the damage she had done in the end and she doesn't!!! Very anti-climatic!
A boring narcissist marries a one dimensional psychopath. I kept reading in the hopes that the book would end in a murder suicide; I was disappointed.
Manipulative claptrap. I hated this book. Simply dreadful. It took me three tries to finally finish it and I did it only because a friend asked me to.
This was one of the worst books I've read in many many years. Skipped to the end in case something interesting happened. Worse than a bore- irritating
I hated this book.  The story was horrible and the characters were detestible.  You felt for Nick then you felt for Amy, but both are horrible people!
Like others I was baffled by the ending. Â«Finish your book, Gillian, our vacation starts tomorrowÂ» said Mr. Flynn. She should write a new and plausible ending for those of us so extremely disappointed.
disappointed in the ending
Worst book I've ever read!
It was a waste of my time.
Strange story that never makes you feel good. No happy times no anticipation of what's next. Didn't enjoy reading this I labored to finish then the ending well at least it was consistent with the story.
I wish I would have listened to my friends when they said it was a waste. Don't buy it! If you feel the need to read it. get it from the library then you won't feel so bad that you spent any money on it
What a waste of time.  The first 4 chapters were enchanting.  Downhill from there.  I can't believe this bookis so popular. Every ""Gone Girl"" reader I know shares my opinion.  A ridiculous ending.
I found the story line a copy cat and couldn't wait for the the last page and ending.  The ending was a total let down and was glad when I was finished with Gone Girl: Not a novel I would not recommend!
I read this book and as a consequence wasted a few good hours that I will never get back.  One star is being generous and only because 0 or negative stars are not available.  I fail to see why this book has gotten such good ratings.Overall the book takes twists and turns, mostly unbelievable, with characters completely unlikeable, that do not add to the story or the plot.  The author writes well, which is the only reason I kept reading, hoping for closure.  And while there is a ""sort of closure"", it is so contrived that it just left me feeling very disappointed and irritated that I spent this much time with this book.  After a while I felt that I was in a late night commercial.  That is, that I would get to a point in the ending of the book expecting it to be wrapped up, but no ""Wait there is more"".I can not recommend this book at all, and have suggested to my book club not to choose this book.  Two other people in the group had also read it, and they indicated that I was being too kind in my criticism. :-)Disclamer:  I did not buy this book, but read the e-book on my Kindle from the library.
Well written and interesting for the first half. The psycho bitch became overwhelming and there was not one sympathetic character.  A waste of time.
It was okay.  Gave my husband nightmares.  Twisted and unrealistic ending.  Had to push myself to finish it.  I never not finish a book.  Doesn't, give me a good feeling about how people stay together.
The two people at the centre of this story of deceit are both Horrible and deserve each other.There is an absence of morality which is disturbing .I do not enjoy reading about such unredeemed nastiness
This book is a simple read for simple minds.  There is nothing to ponder.  It was written in a way that only considers the surface of the characters, even though it tries to discuss the psyche. Boring.
Absolutely hated the ending.  Not realistic at all.  The rest of the book leading to the last few chapters is so good.  It's like she gave up on writing a great ending.  Hated it is an understatement!
I quickly got over the authors way of writing. Using metaphors and similes for every description got old real fast.The ending was atrocious and pretty much made the hours reading this redundant.
The plot is so twisted that it becomes Perils of Pauline. The characters are so archly drawn each would understand the previous reference. The irony is so deep it becomes dull. A tedious read at best.
What starts out as an intriguing mystery novel quickly falls apart. Be prepared to suspend disbelief-- nothing in this story is even remotely believable. Big disappointment after all the good reviews!
Too much profanity.  Story line was good, but profanity was distracting.  Would have been a great novel otherwise. Couldn't get but half way thru. May finish it at some time just to see what happened.
After reading many of the reviews I almost did not purchase this book. I wish I hadn't!! The story was entertaining but the ending did not make it worth the read! Very disappointed I wasted my money.
I hated this book so much. Every character was unlikable. Once the twist was uncovered half way through the story I knew it was a bust for me. The ending is unbelievable and outrageous, in a bad way.
People complained about the ending but I can't give my opinion on that because I only read the first half. It was so god awful I couldn't waste any more of my time on it and I hope you don't either.
I thought this story was too slow moving, too long and too drawn out, complete waste of my time spent reading it.  Very disappointed in the material as a whole and the ending as a complete let down.
Bleah... I couldn't care about Amy or Nick. This book was just a waste of my time. I can't figure out what so many people saw in it. Oh, well, some folks like chocolate ice cream, some like vanilla.
IF I HAD IT TO DO AGAIN, I'D NOT READ THIS BOOK......ITS THE MOST UNS.ATISFYING BOOK I'VE EVER READ AND ILL SKIP THE MOVIE FOR SURE.......THIS WAS NOT MY TYPE BOOK.....I EXPECTED IT TO BE BETTER....
Not what I expected the beginning was good, however by the end I couldn't wait for the book to end! The ending is horrible! I would watch the movie before I read the book I'm sure it is way better.
Had a very interesting start and a horrible ending. Was nothing like I hoped or expected. Should have been a actual kidnapping book. Not one that the wife set up and faked. That's a horrible thing!
There was not one character in this book that I could attach myself to and like.  The book was so dark and evil and the ending a hugh disappointment.  Wish I had not wasted my money and time on it.
Ho hum boring, old-school, hating-on-the-women, dressed up in some fancy guise of a new mystery/thriller. Is Gillian Flynn a man? If not, what happened to that poor girl? Did she have a mean mommy?
Forced myself to finish the book.  Was really disappointed with the ending and much much of the f word.  Don't waste your time reading this one.
I tried reading after people recommended but I found it tedious and just didn't get the mystery or what the story was.  I would never recommend.
 Gone GirlI""  I don't like Amy.  I don't like Nick.  I don't like this book.  Too much energy on two people I would never want to meet.
Clever concept, but this book is a complete insult to the reader's intelligence. Thankfully got it from the public library. Ending review here...not wasting any more time on this very flawed work.
Maybe a sequel or a prequel is ahead.  I really wish I'd not read it.  Certainly won't see the movie.  Well written once I got the hang of it but the 2 main characters are dreadful and detestable.
Book was supposed to be in very good condition...but the binding was not attached to the book. Had to glue it back together as pages were starting to fall out. BUT the book itself is a great read!
Her books seem to be getting less intriguing.  Sharp Objects was AMAZING, Dark Places was alright but this.... very shallow characters, the kind of people you'd feel the urge to slap in real life.
If you love drama and bad love stories with annoying conflict then you will love this book. I happen to enjoy books about positive relationships. This was royally messed up and fairly predictable.
waste id tine.  Didn't like any of the main characters---they should akl be GONE!!read the rntire book -only because I paid for the silly thing and I kept hoping it would improve---ir didn't
And one star is generous.
Terrible. Gross. Garbage.
Couldn't get into it.....
a very disappointing book
I continued to hope as I turned each page that this story would have a different ending. I feel cheated of the hours I spent reading this book.
Terrible book.  Nothing redeeming about the characters or the story line.  I did not care one whit about these people or what happened to them.
This book was recommended to me by several friends. I did not enjoy it much and felt the book could have easily accomplished the entire story with half the pages. I will not be seeing this movie.
Do not waste  your time with this novel.  It takes 600 pages of dealing with a mentally ill psychopath for the book to end.There are no heros to identify with and the ending unsatisfactory.
I enjoyed the book until the ending which made it feel like a total waste of time. Author should have realized that after all the build up this ending would leave readers speechless in a bad way!
This book is terrible. I got through the first 50 pages and didn't connect with any character. I'll see the movie but am happy to skip the book. P.S. I really wanted to like it but it was a dud!
Ending disappointing. Very vulgar language throughout. Not what I expected at all :-(More of a weird twisted personality/relationship book than a murder mystery.I would not recommend
I really, really hate it when I waste my time because life is precious.  What I am left to ponder is what type of a person would write something like this.  Now THAT is something to think about.
a book should make you feel something after you have read it.  i'll give flynn that.  i felt sorry to have wasted my $ on this one.  bizzare at best.  nick and amy are two sick psychotic messes.
I absolutely hated this book.  It was evil and left a bad taste in my mouth.  There is no way she could get away with all that.  How could there be a more selfish,sick twosome than Amy and nick.
Started reading this book and as other reviewers have said originally suggested it to others however by the time I finished I had to got back to those same people and say no way,  waste of time.
Don't waste your money or reading time on this book.  It was my first ""Kindle"" book so I was excited.  I kept reading and reading waiting for the plot.  The plot (and subplot) are beyond belief.
The book was so wordy.  Crazy people doing crazy things.  Not interesting but actually quite boring.  Couldn't wait to finish the book and then never have to read another story from this author
Somewhat interesting until about 70% in, then it was totally ridiculous storyline. I will not throw down to see the movie after reading this.
Selfish,manipulative, two people who are on self destruct. Will not read another of her books. Wanted to stop reading it after one hour. Only reason I finished it was because of the book club.
Fascinating, haunting, inspired writing  from one of the great novelist's of our time maybe of all time, with such brilliant phrases as ""his smile was like dial soap"" well f- me right.
I hated the plot. All the major characters were unlikeable and  the only reason I finished the book was because I was hoping the ending would justify the time i spent reading it. Disappointed.
I gave Gone Girl a one star rating  because there was not a lower rating. The story moved at a snails pace with uninteresting flashbacks about the main characters who were wholly unappealing.
Terrible book!I hope I don't even give it another thought.... What kind of mind thinks like this? Gillian needs a bright light in his life!
I specifically ordered a hardback because I wanted a HARDBACK. Received a paperback. Now I have a credit on PayPal and I'm not sure how that works. So.... The purchase didn't go as expected.
I wish this book was "" gone"" .  It was long and I thought the cops this story were dump. My the end of the story you think both Nick and Amy should be shot. I did not like this story at all.
I didn't care much for this story. It was too frustrating to read about innocent characters getting framed or hurt over and over, and the ending was absurd. I did not like the ending at all.
I rushed out to get this book at the library the second I read a review that said ""the ending will be like a punch in the stomach""As I read through the book, I was annoyed by the terrible writing style. Could not believe the conversations the police were having. Totally unreal and would never happen in reality. I thought that maybe the author had a purpose for making some things nonsense. That it would all come to an ending that was creepy or Hitchcock-like.In fact, I came up with so many possible endings as I was reading the book, I scared myself!But to have it end the way it did was anticlimactic and poorly written.No imagination what so ever.The author introduces you to so many characters and subplots, there is room for really mind blowing endings. But so many loose ends, I think the author couldn't keep it all straight herself, so how could we??I would sum it up as a long story that drones, is weird,weakly thought up characters, goes nowhere and ends with a phzzt. Nothing. waste of time to a boring ending.
This book drags for half of it has a very short peak and becomes a total looser for an ending.  Don't waste your money or time on this one
Kept flipping from wife to husband without a continuous story and was frustrating to read. Ended  strangely without resolution or conclusion. Would not recommend as I found it very boring.
It was really good until I reached near the end of the book.  I was very disappointed in the ending.  In my opinion it wasn't realistic enough of an ending to make this a believable story.
The worst book I've read in the last 12 months. Make that the worst bookI have ever read.  Never take best seller list for granted.
All I can say is, don't waste your time.  It took a while to get into the story and then the end was horrible.  How in the world did this book make it onto the NY Times Best Seller list?
I kept reading hoping for it to improve,  Got to the end and still not worth it.  There wasn't a character in the book who was likable.
Wow I hated this book. I couldn't form any kind of attachment for any character, because they all just sucked as people and I like to have at least ONE person to root for while reading.
I really did not like this book.  It only got interesting in the last 90 pages and then not so much.  I doubt I will rent the movie and I certainly told my husband not to read the book.
It was a weird book. I didn't like the way it ended. It was to confusing back and forth from each of the character and didn't make much sense.  I stay with authors I like and not Flynn.
was really looking forward to this book. as soon as I started to read it, I hated the main people. juvenile , hateful and whiney. it read like a high school diary. I want my money back!
This book was the most boring frustrating book I have ever read!  I got about half way and then went to see the movie hoping it would be better.  Wrong!!!! Bad bad bad is all I can say.
Read this for our book group. Don't understand how it got to be a best seller. So many much better books out there. So predictable that it got very tedious before I finally finished it.
Badly and childishly written.  Unbelievable characters. Stupid plot. A suspense novel that is not the least suspenseful.  Cannot come up with anything good to say about this awful book.
hated every character.  terrible peope.  life is too short to read about the miserable made up lives of evil, lying individuals.  a disturbing peek into a world i prefer to never know.
The premise was interesting, but the writer's craft was seriously lacking. Surely this novel could be written without using the f word on almost every page. The writing felt very lazy.
For a while, it held my interest, but then it began to skip from one improbable situation to another, and the ending was ridiculous and unbelievable. Also felt the writing was stilted.
Ugh, annoying, loathsome, whiny people doing terrible things to each other. Not my idea of a good read. Sorry I wasted my time on it.
The device of the two narrators only disclosing part of their knowledge was annoying through the bulk of the book, The denoumnet though not in itself violent, foresaw lives of gloom.
This book was a waste of my time.  There were no redeeming qualities in any of the characters, the writing was stilted, and the depth of exploration of each character was repetitive.
Gussied up soap opera passed off as literary.  A calculating money spinner that's otherwise meretricious.  For soap opera fans only.
Thought it had potential to be a great story but it ended so badly I regretted even reading it ... Worst book I've read in a while !
Yuck. I hated every character.The descriptive sequences were extremely boorish. I've tried 3 times to finish. After reading other reviews about the horrid ending, I think I'll pass.
The polt had many twists but I didn't like how the characters jump around from past to present expecting the reader to be dragged along (unwillingly at times) through the backstory.
I could not be unhappier about how this book ended as well as the back and forth between the protagonist and antagonist.. ANNOYING!
I wouldn't recommend it
Did not like this book.
Did not even finish it.
Although the writing was intense, the ending was so bad I feel I totally wasted my time!  What happened; did GF have a medical emergency and have to wrap it up in 50 words or less?
The ending was suited to the story.  They were both crazy and psychotic.  They deserve each other.  It was all I could do to finish the book and the best part was that it was done.
The book is about educated authors, can't they come up with better language than the ""F"" word to express themselves?  I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone I care about.
This book was so hard for me to get into. I found it boring in the beginning and maybe by 2/3 of plodding my way through, did it seem to get more interesting in the aspect of I wanted to know what really happened as you don't really know what is true. The author wrote things that the male lead character, Nick, would think or say that I have never heard or imagined before and it was very shocking, disgusting, and plain revolting.  I never knew people (or a man) could think that way and I am in my early 40s and love Stephen King!  This author totally made me cringe with the way she wrote him and not for other people telling me the book was good or the fact that the movie of this book will be coming out soon, did I finish it. I also hating the ending as no one got their comeuppance or justification ever made. I hope they tweak the movie so it'll be better than the book. I know I'm in the minority with the rating of this book but it was nothing I'd recommend unless you'd like to be irritated and waste your time.
I heard this book was suppose to wonderful but I was very disappointed.  There really is no conclusion to the book.  It just ends.
how this book got amazing reviews im astounded. if you chop the book in half and read from the middle onwards it makes a half decent book.the end is very very dissapointing.
Too much swearing and vulgarity. Story went on with repetition of subject matter that did not add to suspense but detracted from it. End was unsatisfying. No ""aha"" moment.
I am so sorry I spent money on this book........Horrible ending, I thought it was good than just ...... Waste of my time..... would they even want to make a movie out if this,,,,,
hyped up book, did not deliver, prose was stilted and unnatural.  story was full of holes and the ending was so bad a threw the book in the trash because that's what it is.  TRASH
Don't waist your precious reading time. Starts out great. Story line goes really dumb and stupid in the end. To bad it could have been better. Get real. This is just a dumb ending
What a waste of time. Slow read, seriously ignorant message. Not even worthy of further comment. I would not recommend this book.
I wasted my time reading, Gone Girl. It is hard to believe the book was a best seller. I kept thinking the book would get better.
Totally regretted investing the time to read this book only to be completely let down by the ending.  Felt cheated by the author.
It is a shame that I never received this book even though it states that I did. Instead I received the book ""Dark Places"" by Gillian Flynn, in its place. Too funny.. Not.
I thought I was going to read a good book because of the reviews I had read but I thought what happens in the book was so unrealistic and dumb that I can't even give it one star.
I would love to red this book, but I am not going to pay more for a kindle edition of the book than I am for the paperback.Pricing for kindle books is out of control!
Seriously? NYT best seller? WHY? The writing wasn't horrible (some of it I found very good actually) but the story was! Just like the other readers who hoped for an ending that justified the good reviews I was completely ticked off that the story just stopped. No clever wrap up, not even a poorly written wrap up, the thing just stopped in the middle of this ridiculous story. This plot had so much potential and she delivered one good twist in the tale that had me thinking it might turn out to be a good book after all, but then it gets absurd, gets more absurd and then stops right there. I can see why she got stuck while writing it but she should have persevered, left it on the shelf until she came up with a way to end it properly. I am so disappointed and wish I had never bothered. I am certainly no literature snob and can usually find something redeeming about even the most mediocre of books, but this one....It was a waste of time and money and I am seriously bewildered by all the good reviews.
Read this last month and cannot remember much other than it wa predictable and nothing new. Sorry folks, I'd like to come away from a read a bit more intelligent or entertained.
Don't start reading this book!  Just don't!  I was totally sucked in after reading the sample.  Yes, it is a page turner with lots of twists.  But for the time invested in reading, the ending is... poor.  Poor plot.  Poor resolution.  Poor character revelations.  Just POOR.  I am ok with a book that does not reslove everything or maybe leaves you with some questions - that is NOT the case with this book.  After all the detail in the first three quarters of this book, the end is rushed, unbelievable and completely unsatisfying.  If you feel you want to read this book, put your name on your local library's list.  Read it for free.  Don't waste the money to buy it, but even worse is wasting precious time reading it.
The first half of the book was boring, then there were some interesting twists that pulled you in to keep reading but the ending was pointless.  Very disappointed in this book.
This book is predictable and dull. I hope her other books are better. I am disappointed but will give this author another shot.
Overwhelming and unnecessary use of the F word.  ""Part one"" dragged on until I almost didn't care about the characters anymore, I just wanted to get on with the story.
I enjoyed the book and all the plot twists..that is until I got to the ending.  ARE YOU SERIOUS? That was one of the WORST endings I have ever read. Thoroughly disappointed!!!
This book was so disappointing, I can't understand how it has been rated so highly. I kept pushing myself to carry on reading it but when I got to just over halfway I gave up.
The book turned out to be very different from what I expected.  Even though there are thousands of readers who have enjoyed this book, I am not including myself in this group.
I very much disliked the characters and I hated the ending.  I wouldn't waste my time or money on another book by this author.
My first Flynn novel will be my last. Easy to read and much too easy to follow and predict... except the horrible ending. I would never guess that it could be that imbecilic.
Bad ending, filthy language adequate writing.  I think that the only reason this one is on the best seller list is due to the money the publisher poured into the advertising.
I was gripped from the first page and could not put the story down. Fascinating characters and twists that I didn't see coming. Would love to see a continuation of the story.
This story drags and over uses the f___ word! If you are looking for a book that will make you question marriage. This is it.
I agree with the reviewers who thought the first half to two-thirds of this book was FANTASTIC. It was suspenseful, gripping, well written. But the end...oh the end!! It's like the author decided she was too plum-tired to finish the book properly, much to the crushing disappointment of MANY readers! It was just plain gross! And the grossness was utterly without meaning. If you're going to make your readers feel like they need to scour themselves in Lysol there should at least be a purpose behind it and there simply wasn't. It was bad, so bad! I'm certainly not saying things should have wrapped up nicely/happily ever after with a bow on it (and that's not what I was expecting). But for pete's sake, there was no real resolution...I got to the end and thought, ""THAT's the end?!!?! Are you KIDDING me?????"" It felt totally unfinished. And now I wish I had never read it. I'm pretty sure that wasn't the author's intent but blech! What a waste of a potentially fantastic book.
Horrible book.  One of the worst I've ever read. Would not recommend at all.Why on earth it was ever made into a movie, I'll never know.  I have no desire to see the movie.
Disappointing after all the movie hype...dysfunction...mental illness...psychosis...creepy in a childish way...my least favorite book in along time...maybe I am just to old!
This book just sucked.  I am so glad I didn't go see the movie.  It was so unrealistic.  I know there are some crazy chicks in the world, but really.  Don't waste your time.
The intrigue of the story flat lined with the ending.  I must have missed something because I never expected this dysfunctional couple to stay together.  Is there a book II?
I was so excited to finally read this book. I was disappointed. After only a few chapters, I correctly guessed the twist no one was supposed to see coming. I hoped for more.
Weird and too graphic.
Not worth all the hype
Didn't like it at all.
No ending, a non-book!
Hated every character!
Several people recommended this book last summer, so I was eager to read it.  However, I am sorry I wasted my time and money.  The story is told in alternating chapters between husband and wife, both of whom seem to be selfish, spoiled brats. The characters were loathsome, foul-mouthed, and twisted, and it was impossible to care whether Amy was dead or Nick was guilty.  Go, Nick's twin, was the only slightly interesting character because hope remained throughout that she would turn out to be more than one dimensional and better than her brother.  Alas not.  Yes, there were plot twists, but they were totally foreseeable, and there needs to be more than plot twists to sustain a book of 400 pages. The book lacks mood, description, wisdom, and seems amateurish in style.  I can't even say it makes a good beach read.  I continued reading because I had read so many positive reviews and had hope right up to the end that something would redeem the book.  So disappointing.
I couldn't believe it wouldn't get better, but I was really wrong! I will not be likely to read another book by this author.
So boring I had to skip large pieces.  Vile people, I didn't care who lived or died.  Stupid ending.  Do not waste your money.  I haven't seen the movie, maybe it's better.
I tried several times to read this book. I even tried to listen to it on audiobook. Still couldn't do it. I'll try to watch to the movie. Maybe that will hold my attention.
I couldn't get into it.  I tried.  I know many people loved it.  Some loved most of it, not the ending.  I ended up giving my copy away, when I couldn't get past 100 pages.
This is an obvious sign I don't like a book when my mantra is: Am I done yet? Do yourself a favor and do not read this book
It was a silly. Book. Maybe this is where it wants the fifteen words so I will add another few to see if it goes this time.
The book was contrived, and I predicted the outcome immediately.  New York Times? I think their reviewers have lost a step.
The book doesn't breathe. The characters do not come alive. I'm close to 200 pages in and I'm bored. The fact that this book was a bestseller is totally confounding to me.
I finally got to the end and it just left me feeling like I wasted my time. There was so much jumping around it was hard to follow and the ending left me without closure.
No one could possibly live with a woman that was so deranged whether she was pregnant or not. He also couldn't possibly live with himself knowing his wife killed someone.
Well written book but the author gave up at the end. PLEASE, do not waste hours reading this book. Trust me, you'll get to the end expecting closure, but there isn't any.
Hard to stay focused on the plot. Way too many ""F"" bombs throughout the book for my taste. Just not my cup of tea.
Did not like this book! Very poorly written and unbelievable.  I only read it because it was our book club choice for Oct.
Could not get into the characters in this book.  I read a lot and this one just didn't do it for me, cut to end half way through as had enough of the way it was written.
This book is a sophomoric bantering between two pitiful characters. I read to the end, hoping the plot would improve but not so. I will not waste my time with the movie.
Quite possibly the worst book I've ever listened to.  Wish I had taken the bad reviews to heart.  The book was s l o w  and terribly boring.  The ending was ridiculous.
Maybe its because I'm not a New Yorker with super wit but I found the whole book extremely boring. I pride myself on always finishing a book but this book took stamina.
Not my style of writing at all. Would not recommend to my friends.  Perhaps a book for younger generations... too much vulgarity and foul language for my sensibilities.
Story started out very slow and boring, then picked up in the middle.  By the end of the book it had become boring and a real ""downer"".  Would not recommend it!
I listened to almost all of the first CD and found it too boring to finish. It might get better but you sure will need a lot of patience. Not worth the money, for sure!
Hated this book.  Hated the characters.  Hated the ending.  Huge waste of time.  Ending was frustrating and I felt like I wasted too many hours of my life reading this.
I did not like this book at all.  The characters were sickos and not at all likable. I would not recommend it to anyone.
A horrible story line with detestable characters, everyone in my book club hated it and would not recommend it to anyone
Poor grammar. Unresolved inconsistencies. Dark psychosis. However, it was much better than the movie. I wish I had read this before I saw the movie - or best, instead.
I can see why some people love this story. But for me, it's just too disturbing. I don't regret reading it but I won't no reading another book of this author for sure.
I thought this would be ""scary"". It was such a page turner book. Took lots of twists & turns. It made you think about what was going to happen next. Not scary.
The story started ok but got so terrible with a very disappointing ending. Don't waste your time reading the book. May be go see the movie. The movie got good reviews.
This much hyped book was a big disappointment to me.  The plot kept me reading, but the characters (with the exception of the sister) were superficial in the extreme.
This is the worst book I have EVER read! I want my money back!!! NEVER EVER AGAIN!!!! STUPID! There is no other word for this! This was the biggest waste of time....
I hated the characters. There was nothing likable about them.  I wanted them both to lose, but the girl the most and she came out the victor in the end.  Irritating.
the book was great until the end. It made the rest of the book a total waste. Don't bother reading the book unless you want to be completely disappointed at the end.
the book definately throws you for some loops, did not expect the way the story went, however the ending was horrible, ruined the book for me. dont waste your money.
I have never written a review of a book before but felt I had to regarding this one.  I read many books and after reading the reviews for Gone Girl, I decided to purchase this for my Kindle.  I can't remember the last time I couldn't make it through a book because it was incredibly boring, but Gone Girl was just that...BORING!  After making it through about a third of the way I couldn't stand it anymore and had to give up and purchase another book.  This book was a truly painful read, the characters made me angry and I could not relate to any of them.  This is the first time that the reviews of a book have let me down.  Gone Girl is a gone book for me!
Justice is not served in this novel.  The story is good but the ending is awful  unless mutually accepted angst and anxiety is the pillar of a relationship for you.
Hate the ending! I hope I never meet two people this self absorbed. Life is meaningless lived this way. Gillian Flynn must be the most cynical person on this Earth.
This was the worst book i have read out of the 85 i read last year.Boreing-slow-never came alive.It was a chore to complete, constantly hoping for a change in pace.
I have seen this book on the best sellers for a long time and when I heard they were going to make a movie of it, I thought, "" hey, if Ben Affleck thought it was good, why not read it?"" I  didn't particularly like the way the story jumped back and forth between the two characters, especially when they were on two different timelines. I will say that the author did a fine job of making you hate the characters. I like reading books where I like at least one of the main characters. I was rooting for Nick for most of the book and that kept me reading, but he sorely disappointed me at the end. I kept trying to figure out how he was going to redeem himself and he doesn't ! Hopefully Hollywood will change the ending in the movie. I would recommend that you wait for the movie release ( Ha!, the old Nick would love that!)that way if you don't like it at least you only wasted a couple hours of your leisure time
I read the book.  I was disappointed.  I saw the movie and was disappointed again.  This is a contrived story and not worth the hype and attention it has received.
I really did not like this book .. at all.  It's been awhile since I read it .. but I was so disappointed.  I know it was a huge hit ... so maybe it's just me.  ??
This is not even beach or airplane reading. Badly written, truly awful story. I bought it because some people ""raved"" about it....It was money badly spent.
Not my kind of book. Hated the plot and the ending. That's why using the New York top ten list can be so misleading.
This book is a disgusting waste of time centering around a sociopathic woman and her ridiculous husband, infidelity and a fake death scheme...it's all too much and badly written at that. Police procedure and a basic understanding of how the judicial system actually works is just thrown out of the window for cheap, disgusting thrills (which quite frankly aren't that thrilling) and seriously no one in this novel was likable besides Detective Boney. I only finished this mess because I finish every novel I start but I will never read anything by this author again. It's a wonder that some folks get published. Save yourself the misery and skip this!
The book was really slow at the beginning and wasn't holding my interest at all. Terrible book. I saw the movie hoping it would be better, but it's just horrible.
I feel yuck at the end of reading this book. There's no plot just a psyched wife framing her husband. I expected atleast a good ending  but disappointed there too
The characters are two dimensional and don't come across as real. The writing is just OK. The plot is unbelievable.
Can't figure out how to end your novel? Don't! Just stop writing it and publish it unfinished.This book represents several hours I'll never get back.
Great first half and downhill from there. By the three quarter mark, I didn't care what happened to these people. Even with that the ending was a disappointment.
This book was so good, keeping my interest UNTIL the end - what a disappointment.  I will not purchase another book by this writer.  Spend your money elsewhere!!
Very disappointed with entire book. Ending was the biggest dissapointnent. Writer started strong but storyline became weak once into the second half of the book.
Self absorbed to the max!  The only book I've ever read I wish I could blot from my brain and return for a refund.
Had to stop reading, this is the most boring book ever!  Can't believe I actually paid for this. An Amazon rip off
It was wild on the way it was written.  I am an avid reader and I had trouble reading the odd descriptions they placed in this book.  And the ending?!  Really?!
This story started out so well - an exciting tnriller but disintegrated by the middle and finished with a very disappointing ending. Not worth the time invested
Book is too, too weird...hard to follow......unable to put any of it together..  I agree, very strange...weird..cannot imagine making a movie of it..not at all!
Stupid book, couldnt get into it, stopped reading 1/2 way in, then later decided to come back and finish it. Now I know that the whole book is, in fact, stupid.
Far-fetched and over-long. The author keeps piling on new plot tricks, unlikely revelations and, of course, sex scenes. No character in this book is believable.
I am an avid reader; however, I never take the time to write reviews. After reading this book, I had to make an exception and write a review. I really disliked this book. The first half of the book is slow moving. In fact, I almost gave up on it. However, half way through, the plot takes a twist and the story becomes very interesting. Regretfully, it has the WORST ending possible for a story like this! At the end, I felt that I wasted my time reading this book. I recommend that you not make the same mistake! I guess some readers will think that the plot is ""artsy"" or ""creative""...I though that it was a very disappointing story!
It started out really good but I hated the ending.  I totally was in love with the book until the very last part and then I hated it.  So wouldn't recommend it
will probably make a good movie, but found myself betrayed by Amy and really felt bad for her in beginning but after I learned what she did I was actually mad!
I tried, but failed to read this book.  I found it disjointed, rather silly and the characters unbelievable.  I gave up after about a third of the way through.
Depressing and disappointing depiction of how a couple reacts to stress. Unrealistic. I will not see the movie. Why so popular? Sad example of today's society.
this book went back & forth so much I couldn't follow it.  it did not hold my interest I would NEVER recommend it
What an annoying piece of rambling crap. I hated the story, the delivery, the style. What a waste! Don't read it.
I was so anxious to read this most talked about highly recommended book ....I hated it, found it depressing and repetitive  I was very disappointed in it BLAH
A disappointing read.  With all the hype I thought this would have been good.  I can honestly say I am glad I didn't waste the time or money to see the movie.
A disappointing read
Didn't care for it!!
The ending = 1 star.
Couldn't get into it
Did not enjoy at all
BORING BORING BORING
I read the book on my Kindle and was captured right away.  The story line was interesting from the beginning, although I questioned whether I liked any of the characters at all.  I heard there was a big twist at the end, but who knew the twist was that the story just stopped.  There wasn't an ending, there was no wrap up, there was no plot twist (at the end anyway)...nothing.  It just STOPPED. I gave this one star because the beginning of the story was interesting enough to make me read through to what I expected to be a very good ending.  Oh well.  Save your money.  *By the way, one of the reviewers stated that the author admitted she had no ending and that her editor had to help her finish the book.  Really?  I thought when writing a story one knows of the ending and works through the story toward that ending.  Can't imagine how the book was published in the first place.
Too much back and forth between time periods and characters.  Very difficult to stay with the story line. I kept waiting for it to get better but it doesn't.
I know, I know it seems like everyone loves this book but I just couldn't. The characters seem flat and lifeless, like you've seen them in 18 thousand made for TV movies on Lifetime (not that I watch those....) Maybe it was just me but I could predict what was going on in every part of this book. It is supposed to be this crazy what is going to happen next book but it just seemed old and tired to me. If you are an avid reader I say stay away from this one. Also I won't give it away but the ending made me want to chuck this book off the plane I was on at the time and maybe I would have if I wasn't reading it on my Kindle. I can understand a book that is just easy and fun to read (I love the Jack Reacher books) but when the ending is so horribly bad and irritating like in this book it just seems to have nothing to offer except regret that I wasted my time reading it.
The book was very slow and didn't get interesting until about halfway. The end didn't seem like an ending.  I am sorry I wasted money and time on this book.
One star is actually too much. This was the dumbest book I have ever read. It was obvious from the beginning and had no ending. I'm sorry I wasted my money.
I could not like any of the characters.  I asked three friends if they enjoyed the  book and all three said the same thing.  Disliked all of the characters.
labored writing who cares about these unattractive characters.? give yourself a break and skip this book. i would not lend it to my most book hungry friend.
The book was suspenseful until the last 1/2. It took a turn that was predictable then unpredictable and went totally out there. Was completely disappointed.
Total waste of time. This is probably the most horrid and pointless books I have ever wasted my time readingg.
Just does not move... I had a difficult time following the plot line. I set it down and came back to it several times hoping things would pick up....sorry.
completly absurd..if these 2 people were so brilliant how could they have been so stupid?I am sorry I wasted my time reading and reviewing this trash
This book what to say....I tried really hard to like it but I just couldn't get into it. I would read a chapter or two and think what the hell is going on.
Not sure why this was a ""bestseller"". The characters were not likeable, the story line was depressing and I had to force myself to read to the end.
I wish that I could give this book less than 1 star. I absolutely hated the ending. Don't waste your time...you will be totally disappointed by this book!!
This was a very disappointing mystery/thriller. The entire plot was lame only to be surpassed by a terrible ending. It was a total waste of time and money.
Disappointing to me.  Didn't like either main character.  First half of the book was tough to get through, then it picked up, but the ending was terrible.
I forced myself to read the book because I was told it would get better. It didn't. Was the first book I've read in years that I feel was a waste of time.
This was another messed up, mentally ill woman who may have been smart on the grade list, but was a ding bat in understanding what makes life worth while.
I agree with the other ""one star"" reviewers, so won't write a long review.In fact, would give zero stars if that was an option.Just wanted to repeat that THERE IS NO ENDING.Many said they hated the ending. Yes, the book has a last page. But no ending. It's like the author couldn't decide on an ending, so she just stopped writing.First 1/3 of the book is interesting. Second 1/3 gets really interesting and story becomes exciting and you want to see how it ends. Then it totally goes downhill. Last 50 pages or so: ridiculous. Then in the end, the story is so full of holes, it's ridiculous. Stupid police and FBI, gullible public, blah,blah,blah. It's like somebody else wrote the last pages and the non-ending.As others have said, I'm not interested in reading anything else by this author.
This is the first novel I've deleted from my Kindle. I don't want it to infect my others with its grime, grit and slime. The first half was clever and engaging, fine for a ""beach read"" and kept me clicking forward quickly. But the second half and especially the ending put the book on my ""worst ever"" list. It seems as if the author was under pressure to produce another best seller, started out strong and then ran out of time.
I thought this was one of the slowest most predictable book I have ever read! Almost gave up, but did finish It and It never got better. Just my opinion!
I really didn't like this book. I did make myself finish it only because I paid for it and to find out how far these two very unlikeable people would go.
I hated this book, it was good until the end.  I love murder and mayhem, but always want the bad person to get theirs in the end.  I was so disappointed.
Boring. Bad writing. Not impressed only good part was knowing Amy got her way! She was amazing in the story.
I have never hated a book before. This is my first. I couldn't WAIT to get through it. Our book club picked it and I felt I had to read it since I was hosting. I ended up doing a lot of skimming. I'm a person who is simply offended by the ""F"" word. I first decided to listen to it. Bad choice. Every time that word came up (and it comes up A LOT!) I felt like I was being slapped in the face. I quit listening and thought if I HAVE to read this book those words would be easier to gloss over if I had to READ it. I couldn't focus on the story enough because I was dodging words that are offensive to me which were several times a page. Thank goodness that experience is OVER! I'll never read another Gillian Flynn book EVER again. I would think someone as creative as a writer would be able to create some other way of conveying such intense feelings.
I decided to finally read this book after it seemed to do pretty good on the charts. There are two points of view, Nick's and Amy's. At first, I wasn't too sure what to make of it. Towards the middle, I was really wishing that I hadn't started the book. (Of course, I finished it)**Spoiler**While I like the mystery behind it, I don't care for reading in the mind of a psychotic. It sounds harsh, but I can't relate to Amy because of this. I find myself so sick of reading in her point of view, and then when Nick begins to cower and is caught in a landslide by her 'announcement', I just wanted the book to be over.**End Spoiler**If you aren't looking for 'normal', this is probably the book for you. Just be aware that while it is a whirlwind of a book, don't expect it to be your average love story.
An over-rated book. I thought it would get better as I read along, but it did not.  I did read it to the end, but would not  recommend it to my friends.
One the slowest, dull, stupid books I have ever purchased.  I wish I could get my money back on it.  Don't waste yours.  Get in at the library for free.
This book gets you so hooked, it's a page turner until 3/4 of the way through and it becomes so unbelievable that I ended up hating it! So disappointed!
Totally unbelievable and annoying quite actually ! Sorry I wasted my time . Really disappointed and surprised because of all the attention this book got
The characters are tricky liars who are self absorbed and ugly to each other.  The author went to a lot of creative trouble to tell an unpleasant story.
I am very sorry I purchased and read this book.  While I found the author's method of recounting the story of Nick and Amy interesting, I found the characters unlikable.  The use of the ""F"" word became offensive because of its overuse.  It isn't productive to recount my dislikes about the book, but, like many comments about the book, I could not put it down -- this is not because I was so taken with it, but because I could not wait for it to be over!  I would not recommend the book to anyone; however, for those who like suspense and stories about truly manipulative and evil characters, this story has made an excellent movie judging from the reviews I have read.  The ending reminded me of the kind of resolution Rod Serling might have contrived.  The reader (or viewer) is totally unprepared for the ending. I could NOT believe it!
Didn't like this  style of writing.  Tried and tried but couldn't get into this book...will wait for. Obie.
Tedious to get thru. Drags on forever. Don't put any effort into this book, it will take forever to finish.
When I got to the last page I wanted to throw the book at the wall.  I am sorry I bought this book and I won't be reading anything else by this author.
This book had my interest all the way. Then I got to the end and felt totally let down. I am sitting here wishing I never read it. Huge disappointment.
It started off really slow the it kind of wheeled me in but then it just turned into a depressing love story. I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone.
hated all the characterswanted them all to die!almost threw my kindle across the room when i realized i had just read the endpathetic
too much profanity!
Didn't like ending.
Sad, psychotic book
Not my kind of book
I've not finished this book....it just did not grab my interest.  I heard it was very good but not for me.
Once the reader realises that Amazing Amy is behind her own disappearance, the plot moves towards the ridiculous. Ridiculous then becomes predictable.
It was boring. No one lives like that. Or hopefully acts like that. Drug on and on. Where was the excitment? Won't waste my money on the movie either.
I didn't like it from the get-go. I kept it would get better and it didn't. It w as almost sci-first. Don't think I will read any other of her books !
The book was painstakingly detailed until the very disappointing end. A whole lot of build up, a lot of wrongs never made right and no satisfying end.
Horrible. Wouldn't have finished it if it weren't for being in a book club. If you took out all the f bombs then the book would've been half as long!
Downer!  No more Flynn for me.  Writing style was annoying. Finished the book only to try to dugout WHY it was a best seller. Couldn't figure it out.
Although I couldn't put it down, this book left me wanting to punch the author in the face! Such a terrible I satisfying ending! Really disappointed!
This book had me staying up until the wee hours of the morning, rushed home from work to continue, read while blow drying my hair and then I reached what was the last page of the book, where is the ending??? Feels like the author ran out of interest. Worst ending I've read in a long time!
I couldn't put the book down. But when it ended the first word out of my mouth was -- dumb. A mockery of marriage and family. Don't waste your time.
I did not enjoy this book at all, guess it's not my kind of reading. I feel like I wasted a couple nights on this nonsensical read.My opinion.
It's rare that I read a novel and end up thoroughly disliking the main characters. The story ran off the rails, in my opinion. It was disappointing.
There are books that keep your attention and stimulates you to read more and more. It is definetly not the case in this one. I read 20% and give up.
The characters in this book were annoying.  I couldnt finish it.  No wonder it didnt do well as a movie.
I really did not like the book.  This is the first book I've read by Gillian Flynn and will be the last.
The first part of the book is a slow read about the usual ""cheating husband suspected of killing his wife"" story. I could not like either character - thinking she deserved to be killed or he deserved to be left.  The second part brought some life to the story and it was intriguing to learn all the planning she did to frame her husband and cause problems for her other victims.  She is certainly a psycopath, yet she is believed to be innocent of the real murder.  It was unbelievable that the book ended with the husband moving back in, knowing she was quilty, and the reader is expected to think they will live happily ever after. I am amazed this book remains for the 3rd week #1 on the best seller list. I also do not like this style where one chapter is about one character and the next is written about the other.
I would give it no stars  It was too slow moving, I would of stop reading but I like to finish a book incase it gets better.This one did not.
A friend recommend this author and book to me. But this book was so crazy, I couldn't ever finish reading it.  I really waste my money on this one!
Compared to the majority of books I read, which are in the top 10 from week-to-week, I hated this book.
Couldn't get into the book. I honestly didn't even finish reading it. Just not for me. I even tried to watch the movie couldn't get into it either
First it read too slow while the ending came fast.  Second, found it difficult to read because had to work to hard to decide who was telling what.
What a disappointing ending.  It had great suspense and good momentum, then nothing at the end.  The ending left me unsatisfied, to say the least.
Book was to complicated and story was to long.  I guess I am not happy with the authors writing style.
This was a huge disappointment. This is a story of a toxic relationship between two horrible people. I do not understand why this was so popular.
I would not recommend the book.  It left a bad, dark feeling.  I did not like the characters, Go could have been interesting with more about her.
This was recommended to me by Amazon and I was very disappointed in the plot, the characters and the novel as a whole.  No more from that author.
I think this is possibly one of the worst books I have ever read.  I succumbed to the ""hype"" and finally downloaded it to my Kindle.  I am 1/4 through this terrible prose and stopped as I realized I don't like the book, don't like the characters, and really find no reason to finish it.I have many 5 star books in my reading collections and this, by far, is not one of them!
didn't like this at all.  not enough to it  it took forever to get to the story.no good at all.
I read 30% of the book, could not get into it, so I watched the movie, weird.  I had heard so much about the book and movie, I was disappointed!
Took so long to get into the story.  Put it down so many times.  When it became interesting I was about to stop reading. Didn't like the ending.
I don't know about the movie, but the  book was a lot of narrative and not much conversation.  The twist at the end is what I expected.  Boring.
Started out intriguing and interesting. Ended up unsatisfactory and unbelievable. Sadly feel I wasted my time and could have been better written
I wish I could give this book ZERO stars.  I can't even believe I finished it.  What a waste of time.  Bad, dumb, stupid book....the whole book.
Why this book was on the best-sellers list for all those weeks puzzles me.  In the beginning of the work, I couldn't tell one character from another, their voices were so similar. Most of the minor characters are undeveloped to an alarming degree.  As a lover of great literature, I find nothing in the novel that warrants the praise it's received. Some of the scenes written were described much better in other works of fiction. For example; the scene where she is extorted is reminiscent of the Brad Pitt scene in Thelma and Louise.  All that's missing is the sex and I'm sure that would have been thrown in if the author thought it would move the story along.  I won't be seeing the movie and I'm really sorry that I spent the money for the book I did (even though I waited for the paperback.)
I hated the characters too much to finish the book.  On my Kindle touch, I kept looking in the lower right hand corner to see what % I'd read.  Was I near finished? Noooooo ...  THAT is a bad sign.Plus all the alcoholic beveraging annoyed me.  Do people from NY really drink THAT much ... THAT often?I can't stand neurotic, self-centered, egomaniacal Gen-Xers who obsess over themselves and their dysfunctional relationships/marriages.  B-o-r-i-n-g.Don't like 'em in real life, and sure don't like 'em in books.Get over it!Are Nick and Amy the contemporary version of ""George & Martha""(""Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf?"")?I don't know and I don't care.Did Amy live or die?  I'll never find out.Moving on to something more interesting ..Sorry.
I had a hard time finishing this book and really didn't find it as good or exciting as it was advertised to be. I found her to be rather crazy.
Just finished and I am left with an unsettling and wrong feeling. This book was very interesting up until the last 20%. The ending... Uhhhh. :(
Tried to read Gone Girl but couldn't get interested enough to read the whole book. Couldn't get interested in the characters or the story line.
Too wordy, actually bored kept skipping pages.. Didn.t like it at all.  Why was this book on the best sellers list for so long?  Depressing!!!!
I hated this book.
Didn't like at all
The concept was very interesting and hooked me but the vulgar language and pervasive crude sexual references were unnecessary and disgusting. I'm a 43 year old woman who hasn't exactly lived a sheltered life and I've been married for 17 years. The way sex was described in this book make me nauseous. Is Gillian a wannabe 17 year old virgin boy?? That's how it's written - pathetic.This plot of this book was like a beautifully presented meal but with a long, curly hair on top. Why do authors think they have to be so crude - ugh. I had to know the ending (plus I couldn't get a refund) but hated myself for it. I'm going back to the young adult genre where I don't have to worry about being mentally - verbally and sexually assaulted or reading the ""f"" word every other minute.
I could not stay awake ! So very boring that I skipped through most of it !! I simply don't understand these ratings.. and I'm an avid reader!
It took to long to get to the point and the ending ugh! Like a bad car accident I had to finish in hopes of the wow factor that never happened
Hard to let go of this book although none of the characters are particularly sympathetic. Great book to discuss in a Book Club on many levels.
Didn't like the book at all!  Draggie and weird.  Wish I hadn't bought the darn bookie.  Money wasted!  Doubt I will waste money on the movie.
Several ""friends"" told me to read this book, but were enigmatic as to why. Turns out they were playing a big joke on me. Just like the author was! At the onset I found the concept of this novel intriguing - a suspect condemned by the court of public opinion - there's a lot of this on TV today. But then, when 1/3 of the way through the story, I found that everything the narrator had been telling me was false, I felt tricked, manipulated and insulted. About 50% through the story I regained some interest and decided to finish it, but then toward the end I got bored with all the repetion and annoyed by the way the character, Amy, kept addressing me as ""you"" as if she knew me. The ending was totally beyond reach, so far-fetched I could not believe it. Sorry, this is a big NO for me.
Based on reviews I thought this would be a very good book. It was awful. Do not read it. Worthless.
I don't know why I kept reading the whole darn book, it was slow and I didn't like the author's writing.  You could figure it out who did it.
I have no idea why this book was so popular.  It was grotesque and obvious.  By page 100 I knew what happened, by 200 I surmised the rest.  These were hideous people.  After page 100 I found myself skimming.  It was tedious, too long and I wanted it to end, never a good thought for a book.. . I have read books where each sentence could be read even a second time because it was so rich.  I finally got to the gross ending and glad it was over.  It the last time I read a book that is a ""best seller.""  I will stick with the classics.  Blah.
Hated, hated, hated the ending.  Very unclimactic ending for a very engrossing, edge of your seat read.  Nothing really resolved at the end.
This book had a REALLY Slow start, I couldn't get into it at all!  It finally got my attention and got good...but the ending was HORRIBLE!!!
I was actually going to give it 4 stars but it somehow didn't register!Suspenseful ,engaging , thought provoking - a good holiday read
Save your money.  This book was awful. Start was promising and then it declined rapidly. After a while it was tedious. Ending, what ending!!
This was one of the most disappointing books I have ever read.  I should have realized with all the hype that it would be awful, and it was.
Skipped lots of pages because ""same o same o""-------wanted to know ending.  GUESS WHAT----there isn't one!  Awful book---awful people!  ICK!
Could not get thru it - I did not like the style of writing or the story theme.  I lost interest.
well written but a very disappointing ending that seemed extremely unrealistic. Also, a lot of bad language and some amount of graphic sex.
I wanted to read the book after I saw it was Number 1 on the best sellers list. However after reading it I did not care for it at all . JMJ
I'd have given this zero stars, but the Amazon protocols don't permit it. I gave up after the fourth page. Gimmicky, badly written rubbish.
What a crappy ending!!!! That has got to be the worst let down I've read. Not something I'd recommend, unless you just want to waste time.
I found this book extremely tedious and shallow.  I would not recommend wasting the time it took to finish.  I did consider not finishing.
The story was not believable.  The book had a very unsatisfactory, disturbing ending.  The language was vulgar.  I would not recommend it.
There was no justice for the poor man who was married to a psycho...very bad ending...no closure...raising a child of the same mindset :-(
Not quite sure how/why this is a best seller.  The first half of the book was fabulous but then...I can't even describe my disappointment!
Reading this novel was like having a tooth pulled.  I kept expecting it to get better but it didn't.  Characters lacked depth and what was offered was poor character development.  You know nothing more about each character at the end as with the beginning.  I only finished reading it because it was a gift and I know I will be asked how I liked it.  Hated it!  The author has a very psychotic personality herself or she is delusional.  Chapters of 1 page, who needs that?  I can only think of two other books that have disappointed me like this one and again I finished each thinking they would at least get better and did not. The conclusion was truly a sorry, misplaced ending.  Story so totally out in left field it cannot begin to be accepted as believable.
Absolutely worst book I ever read!Waste of time.Written for intellectual capacity of a first grader!Just simple garbage
One of the worst books I have ever read. Author must be a little unstable herself  WEIRD! WEIRD!WEIRD! Nothing enjoyable about this book!
Just could not  get into it - I put the book down after the first few chapters. Was not for me!
This review is to stop people who might be like me from buying Gone Girl.  I like books where I can identify with at least one of the characters and at least one of them has a redeeming quality.  This book has no characters like this.  They are bad people and made me sick.  I don't use the word hate often, but here goes... I hated the plot, I hated the characters, and I hated the ending.  I was actually angry when I finished reading it.  What bothers me most is that there are a whole slew of people out there that liked this book.  I still wonder what kind of sick twisted mind could come up with something like this.  My apologies to the author for being so candid, but I really found it to be extremely unsettling and wish that I had never read it.
The way it ended just left me wanting for new, yet uninvented expletives to shout in expression of my disappointment as to how it ended.
Hated this! I should say, up till the end. I mean, really?! I need some closure and this book lacked a proper ending. Very disappointed!
Hated the ending!
I hate this book.
Dumb lazy ending!
Very disappointed
I found the story difficult to follow, going back and forth from persons perspective to another, The first time I didn't finish a book.
Book makes as much sense as its characters!  Kept reading hoping it would get better but unfortunately, it only went from bad to worse.
I certainly hope the movie ending is better than the books! Disappointed!! One more chapter would have helped to clear up a few things.
I could not finish this book. Hated all the characters. Got about half way in and decided that I had better things to do with my time.
The author thinks this is a clever mystery but it is unbelievable junk. Sex control is not to keep you entertained unless you are sick
The whole novel was weird. The main character, the wife, was ""sick"" (in the head) evil and conniving.  Did not like it at all.
Thought it was a great start, hooked me in but then it got tedious and unbelievable. Very silly, disappointing  and fulfilling ending.
What a disappointment ! Its a never ending and many times boring plot with the most pathetic and disappointing ending I have ever seen.  It's as if there is no  ending.  I don't know how this book ever got published.  It took me forever to read it because it was so boring.  It was a complete waste of my time and money.  I want my money back!!!!!!!!!
These are the worst characters I have ever read in a book....Amy is a spoiled, awful person and her husband is a cowardly idiot.  For the author to not do right by their characters is cowardice.  Anyone who enjoys reading about someone purposely making people's lives miserable is not normal.  I hated it and can't believed I finished it....truly the worst book ever.  Nothing inspiring or hopeful.....just two sad people playing a game.  REALLY DESERVES NO STARS BUT KINDLE WON'T ALLOW NO STARS.....UGH!
Style is not a substitute for lack of story. At the mid-way point of the book it goes completely down hill and becomes unbelievable.
A thriller of sorts, it was not thrilling.  The one star covers the alternative point of view chapters.  Otherwise, it was oversold.
Unnecessary ,sick and boring book. Almost a plethora of quick, useful phraseology sliding along a piece of cardboard. Waste of time.
A terrible book--do not know what others see in it and a Movie ?????I'm sorry I spent my birthday money on it.JoJo
Anyone who had the misfortune of buying this garbage should get a full refund plus a penalty. My first and last read by this author.
I bought the book so I finished reading it even though it was very poor writing.  It was so boring that it took me forever to read.
Wasted time and effort, left feeling cheated. Disappointed, glad i didnt waste money on the movie. Seriously, not impressed at all.
I did not like it. Two nasty people with few redemming features. I ended up not caring what happened to them. I disappointing read.
Interesting start, but this book seriously ran out of ideas half way through.  A Feeble, unsatisfying and somewhat implausible end.
Glad I didn't finish the book.saw the movie and it was nasty. Should of been rated x. Ending was stupid. Left you waiting for more.
And after all the ridiculousness that happens in the story, the ending was a complete dud.  What a waste of time.  Not recommended.
Slow and tiresome.  Predictable.  I have no idea why this book is getting such rave reviews.  It's over priced and a waste of time.
Nothing redeeming about the characters, so-so story line that has been done repeatedly but this time it NEVER ends.  Just when you think it is blessedly over, the author drags out another trite ending. . ad nauseum.  I threw this book away after finishing (FINALLY!!!)  because I would not inflict it on anyone else.  Everyone I have talked to about the book has negative feelings and remarks.  Save your money and your time, there are too many great books out there to waste either on this one.
I didn't like this book at all!! The language is senselessly vulgar and the plot is dumber than the ending. Don't waste your time!
Self-indulgent, sophomoric writing for maximum shock-appeal. I read it only because I was stuck in a snow storm with nothing else.
I read a lot, and this is the worst book I have ever read.  What a horrible fiction, I can't understand why it was ever published.
This book leaves you hanging in mid air.  It has no ending, you form your own opinion to see who kills who first.  Terrible book.
The ending of this book was absolutely awful. I seriously wasted my time reading this  I do not understand the point tote ending.
This book was beyond strange. Story line has Lots of twists, but unrealistic. Found myself scanning pages just to get to the end.
I don't like the main male character.  I won't spoil it but I was disappointed by his behavior and chose not to finish the story.
Too long and a little boring, especially if you have already seen the movie. It's almost like reading the script from the movie.
It was a very depressing book.  There was no redeeming factor for that sick girl. She ruined a perfectly reasonable human being.
I wanted to read the book before seeing the movie. I loved the book but HATED the ending! What a disappointment - anticlimactic!
Not a good read, perhaps a good movie to watch, but not a good book. I found the ending quite pathetic and somewhat predictable.
I was so disappointed! Not how I was expecting the book to end. Very flat. Might not want to read any of her books in the future
Hated the ending. To much vulgar language. Did not metro my attention all the way through. It was a but down pick up later book.
very depressing.
Too unbelievable
I did not like the story right from the beginning. I always try to finish what I have started but this one was a real struggle.
There is no one to root for in this story. By the end you just want it to end. Terrible ending but overall fairly well written.
Disappointing!  Not sure if it was because the lead female character was so disturbed.  A lot of hype and was a major let down.
Tried to finish for over a year. . I know I'm in the minority about rating but not my favorite book.Male role very whiney
didn't like the characters from the start so...........waste of my time and moneycan't believe I read the full book
I felt that the book dragged out and was not very interesting. Severely disappointed. Too much hype around the book in general.
For more than a quarter of the way through I  just wanted to quit reading it. I was not liking the forced direction it was taking. I felt manipulated in a very negative way.I purchased this to read quickly so that I could then see the movie. The preview s looked good.The story was awful and so was the dialogue and characters. Why would you write a book where theirs not one likeable character in it? I subsequently heard that the movie sucked as well so am not going to see it. I have never disliked a book this much.And I very seldom dislike any book.  I also noticed that the book had one general direction up to 50%of book .It then changed direction completely..It wasn't a well woven story.
I was wandering thru Amazon's Book Dept looking for a new-to-me author and a book(s) that sounded like stellar reads.  To my great disappointment, I purchased Gone Girl.  At about half way thru, you pretty much know what the rest of the book will sound like - page after page after page of the author listening to herself talk in her head.  My head's screwed on pretty straight - I enjoy and benefit from ""role model"" stories - and the two lead characters, well, all the characters, as a matter of fact, are people you and I would not want to meet in a dark alley - let alone hang out with.  So, actually society's losers - definitely not ""role models.  Why would I want to jump into the sewer?
I really hated this book. I just wish i woud have realized it before i bought it. First off, i grew up near Carthage, Mo, the location most of the story took place. First off, they got the location horribly wrong. Carthage is about 3 hours away from the Missouri and Mississippi Rivers, not right outsidd the door. Plus, they depicted Carthge as a run down hillbilly town, which is further from the truth. Carthage is a beautiful town with gorgeous houses and mansions. I hated that all the facts were wrong about Carthage. Next time, do your research on the town before you write aboug it. I won't even go into the horrible ending to this book. The story is long and not worth anyone's time.
The ending, after all that happened, the ending was a cop out. Read the book and the ending was totally unbelievable.  Really?
I couldn't stand the writing. I couldn't get into the story at all. I think I made it like 5 chapters before I simply gave up.
I finished the book and was sorry I hadn't made better use of my time. Too bad such a good writer developed such a loser plot.
I just could not get into this book very boring long drawn out to much past info just all around boring don't waste your time.
There is not one saving quality in this book: a woman even worse than Satan and a spineless, ball less man. Yuk, what a waste.
This should have a genre all of its own - emotional crime thriller. Didn't enjoy it at all. The ending was even more baffling.
Hated this book. Bored to tears. Took me a year and a half to plow through and it end like that! Amazon I want my $$ back! Ha.
Did not like this story at all. Hard to get into story line at beginning. Both husband and wife terribly manipulative. Awful.
I think there is a name for people like the heroine in the story: Bug nuts crazy. And his character was just as shady. Aeh...
The book was really detailed and kept growing and growing.  Good character build.  Great story up until the end. Too abrupt.
The font size in this paperback is way too small for the average reader.  I returned it and found one with decent size font.
This storyline was completely predictable and not at all suspenseful. I really don't understand all the hype surrounding it.
GOOD writing....horrible resolution of plot.  Some feel it was a waste of time for a long read.  I agree.  WASTE OF MY TIME.
Do you want to spend hundreds of pages reading a book that leaves you feeling like your finger nails have turned to vomit, the oxygen has left your heart and there is no hope for anyone?  If so, then this is the book for you!  The characters are damaged and evil, consistently underwhelm,  are completely unrealistic, and are repeatedly disappointing.  Why would any author choose to create, live with, write about such useless garbage?  The icing, if you can stand to read this long, is at the end when the author advises her real life son to hold off on reading this book for a little while and stick to his kid books.  Are you kidding???  DO  NOT  BOTHER.  Gone Gillian.
I was enjoying the book well enough until the last pages.  I was and remain horrified at the ending.  It changes how you view Nick, a character we were supposed to have at least some sympathy for.  But then he allows a sociopath, Amy, to ""win.""  I'll use the word win so as not to reveal the ending if you are still enticed to read the book.The start of the book was iintruguing.  Anyone who thinks this is a murder mystery wasn't paying attention to what they were reading.  It was clear Amy disappeared on her own.  I was intrigued to find out why and entertained when the reveal came.  And then the ending.Nothing good to be taken from this book.
Did not like this book at all.  By the end I couldn't care less about what happened to her or him.  Complete waste of time.
I can't fully rate this book.  Having a hard time getting interested in it. I need some quiet time to get involved in plot.
When I began this book, I had great hopes. And the book did not let me down. It would have been the best book I've read all summer, had it not been for the ending. Anticlimax is putting it lightly. I'm so frustrated right now at wasting my time. I got so involved in this book; so involved in the characters. I couldn't wait to pass it on to my other book-loving friends. Yeah, well...now it's being donated to Goodwill. No one should have to pay for this book...for this ending. And I'm not a fairytale - all must end well - kind of a girl. I love a good twist and turn. But this...I feel led along, and led astray and led...in the end...NOWHERE. Don't waste your time.
I could not believe all the hype about this book once I actually read it. There is just NO WAY that most of the events in this book would ever happen! I can't tell you how many times I rolled my eyes in disgust throughout this novel, due to the plot holes and the gross, lewd parts of the book. Why do some female authors feel the need to compete with male authors in a ""gross-out"" and dirty-word contest? I read this to the end only because I kept thinking that there MUST be some great plot-twist or surprise in store for me, since so many readers liked the book. Sadly, it was just pure crapola all the way to the end. What a tremendous waste of my time...and YOURS!
Wish I hadn't read it. I am totally at a loss as to why this would be a bestseller. Shouldn't have even given it one star.
I could put it down and did!  Life is too short to read a book that seems contrived of TV drama sitcoms and news articles.
Like the story.  BUT far too many curse words.  Every character has the same foul mouth--not realistic and very offensive.
very slow in the first half,,, picked up half way through,,, thought it might b a good read but the ending was terrible,,,
Didn't like her type of writing, a lot of 'nothing'.  Ditzy ending.  How smart could she be when exposing her money belt??
I didn't buy the storyline. I hope it made for a better movie, I was very disappointed in the novel on almost every level.
This book was a let down from the start.  Had to make myself finish it.  I kept thinking  it would get better.  It didn't.
Pointless, bizarre and poorly written. I read it through only because someone I knew thought otherwise. Depressing really.
I don't see why everyone likes this book so much.  I thought it was a drag, not an enjoyable read, few redeeming features.
I couldn't finish this book - finally gave up on it around page 75. In my opinion, Flynn comes across as a real amateur; instead of being able to build a suspenseful story that is engaging, she seems distracted by listening to how her cutesy, clever words sound to herself.Good story tellers are not hung up on such beginner-level ""Look, Ma, I'm a writer!"" such things.Extremely disappointing. I will not be trying out any of her other books.
Something for everyone I guess but this was not for me.  The writing was fairly good and I was hooked trying to figure out what was going on only to be disappointed by one of the worse endings ever.  Ending aside, I found this book to be dark, twisted, and disturbing and wished I hadn't wasted my time or money on it despite all the rave reviews.  I'm an avid reader and open to new experiences but this is one journey I would not recommend to anyone.
This story started out depressing and went downhill from there.  I would not recommend it at all.  It is a waste of time!
Upon advice of friends, I started reading this and really couldn't find any substance to keep me interested - gave it up.
I give it a 4 1/2 stars.  I thought it was very interesting to read.  It was different and not what you might had expect.
The book has some striking observations on relationships, but the storyline is incredible and at times simply ridiculous.
Horrible ending! It was like the author just got tired of writing and simply stopped. Completely wasted 2 days of my life
Quite peculiar and so very unbelievable. Just kept flicking pages to see if it improved but unfortunately it just didn't.
Very overrated.
Too depressing!
I would give this book less than a one star. Since they made a movie of it I thought it might be good............WRONG!!
The movie was good, but the book format became too boring. Happy I saw the movie first. Gave up trying to read the book.
This is the first book I have ever read in which I have disliked the protagonists, as well as the peripheral characters.
Hated it ,.........who writes this s***. I hope for certain that there aren't people in the world like these characters.
Very disappointed with the books ending; felt like it was poised for something creative, only to end up letting me down.
The book is dark place, where you hate all the characters and it leaves you feeling dirty. I would never read it again.
Purchased this book while traveling, and was disappointed with the author’s effort. The first part was too long and dragged on in parts with repetitive dialogue. The second part was better, but this evil genius who planned every move and every counter move gets bested by Billy Bob and Sally at the hotel lodge she was staying at, really Amy, you’re the most wanted person in America and you’re making new friends like its summer camp. The ending was just pointless and the plot holes were enormous, yet were ignored by the author. Why didn’t Nick just leave, who cares what the public would have thought? What a spineless hack, terrible book.
The most longwinded boring book , I figured out the ending early and it w.ent on forever. Glad I did not see the movie
The story itself may have been good but I could not get past the poor style of writing the author chose to tell it by.
Don't know how the movie was but this book is BORING, not written well at all.  Do not recommend reading before movie.
Hated the book. I was bored and there wasn't one single character that I cared if they lived or died! Movie was worse.
Not worth my time or effort.  If there WAS anything good between the beginning and end, the way it ended cancelled it.
Skipped to the predictable ending couldn't read every chapter it was ridiculous and repetitive and what else can I say
Hated it. I may have read it too late, and had inflated expectations due all of the hype. It took me months to finish!
I have no clue how this book got such good ratings. The ""plot twist"" is predictable and the writing is average. If you're into another tween book posing as adult fiction go for it. The first half of this book depicts an idiot living in her fantasy loving relationship and the second half describes an adult tantrum. To think this story could be remotely plausible is insulting to readers who enjoy a good plot and a real twist.
Horrible read! So boring! I had to skip through most of it. The ending was crap.  I hope the movie version is better.
Not very captivating.  I finally skipped to the ending. This may make a good movie with the right actors.  Good luck.
I was very disappointed I had heard such good things about this book and my expectations weren't met very predictable
Might see movie to see what they do with it.  I read the whole thing and boy was I glad to get thru it. Waste of time
Did not really care for this book writer used the f###  word so often I was sick of it.  Plot too easy to figure out.
I couldn't wait to finish the book because I thought it might have a redeeming ending, but the ending was also awful.
This book is way over sold and proves that most readers are not very demanding of an author .I finished this book through mere persistence and cannot figure out why so many people are buying this story ...My wife could not stand it after about 75 pages ! A big a waste of time and a real statement about a women' s mind ; where did this author come up with such a mentally sick character.SPOILERThe ending third is so weak it is pathetic writing !The second half is predictable and who is ever going to believe the ex- boyfriend' s character !  No man would ever stay with such a person !
First of all, I truly love reading a great murder mystery. However, having said that, I resent investing the money to buy a book as well as the time spent reading it only to have the author stop writing before finishing the story. Without giving anything away, this story could have ended a couple of different ways fairly quickly. At first you w as my to hate Nick, then you equally want to hate Amy. Mr Flynn could have vindicated the most-aggrieved spouse while at the same time condemning the guilty one in another couple of chapters. Needless to say, I will not go see the movie. Zero stars for such an abysmally scrappy ending.
I will give the book one star because of the fantastic job of marketing; hype and hyperbole have marked a black hole of literary worthlessness.  I find the nearly 1,000 5 stars remarkable, and can only conclude many reviewers in this category are not familiar with psychopaths and sociopaths, much less narcissists, and have a fascination with them.  Frankly, they aren't very interesting, nor are they creative and mercurial.  Neither are Nick and Amy.  I simply could not read this book more than half way through, although I do loath failure to finish something for which I paid so much.  Well, for those that do like it, enjoy.
What a horrid, awful, worthless story.  Writing was decent, but not a good read.  Do not recommend at all to anyone.
Such a dull book. Took a month to read and when it started getting decent, it ended stupidly. What a disappointment.
Terrible ending!! So sorry I wasted time reading this! Hope the movie is better! The ending ruined the entire book!!
While I respect the writing, I detested each and every character for various reasons. Didn't like the ending one bit
Characters are very UN· Likeable- story takes forever to get into. Once u do, it is interesting, but not fulfilling.
I thought it would get better but it didn't a waste of my time and effort.  Won't read any more books by this author
I like wizard writing as much as the next person, but this book stymied me from the beginning.  After a few chapters I realized what it was -- both Nick and Amy were charactures of something trying to resemble real people.  To say that they both represent the worst of a ""me"" generation, pleased with themselves, impressed by their brainpower and skills, and somehow, of course, different (read ""better"") tgan the rest of the humans running around the planet.  I must be getting too old, but reading such self-absorbed drivel just put me to sleep, where I dreamed of good writers writing worthwhile things.  Sigh.
This was what I call an ugly story about ugly people and their ugly lives.  That, along with a really gratuitous use of the f-word, and dumb sexual references that were completely unnecessary, made the book really unlikeable.  And I'm not a person easily offended by language, etc.  She's not a bad writer, and there were parts that made for compelling reading, but she seemed to want to shock and offend - an immature choice.
I read 50% of the book waiting for something interesting to happen.  I put it down and finally picked it up to finish, because I paid for it!  I didn't care for the style of writing, as if you were reading a diary. [?!?] I kept hoping to find something to keep me going...  I just finished the book and am at a LOSS as to why people liked this story?! It had a HORRIBLE ending!  This story just left you hanging with a LOT of loose ends! Most of this was boring?! I'm confused?  I just expected a better story!  I'll not be reading anymore 'recommended' books by celebrities and do more in depth research of reviews on my own!
It is a sad book.  It lets you with a bad feeling because it is extremely disgusting. I do not recommend this book.
I did not like this story at all.  After all of the hype, it was a great disappointment.  They deserved each other.
By the end I wished they had both died in a fiery car crash. What a weird miserable story of miserable human flesh.
The book starts out ok, but then reads like a slow paced soap opera. There just is not much substance to the story.
The book did keep me guessing but, these are truly sick people. I don't like them at all , even the murder victim.
A little long, the money belt problem does not hold up with her character and the ending was really dissapointing.
Boring. Too long. Filled with pointless words. Should have been an 100 page  book for the the actual content. blah
Although the first half of the book was interesting and intertaining the second half was mundane and slow moving and not at all believable,which a mystery who-dunit should be.  The book was 100 pages longer than it needed to be and the detectives were made out to be idiots on both cases.  I do not recommed this book.
I kept expecting this book to take an amazing turn and really blow me away. Then it ended. Don't waste your time.
Terrible book.  Too much back and forth. Does not hold you interest. Would not recommend to any one to read this.
I had heard so much about the book that I wanted to read it.  I did not care for the book, especially the ending.
Weird, kinda stupid, made no sense maybe the movie will be better. Don't understand how this was so highly rated.
Loved  it until  the end and then  wanted to throw my kindle against the wall and break it into a million pieces.
Hated it wished she did die! And then he goes back with her!! Hated him, her, and the book! It turned my stomach!
If only I could give less than a star. The most basic premise (man's wife disappears, man is accused of killing her, chaos ensues) isn't bad. Flynn's writing isn't bad: she's actually quite good.Unfortunately not one character is remotely likeable, and the big ""twist"" was not only predictable but disappointing. In a good thriller there's at LEAST an anti-hero to root for: in this story both main characters are nasty, selfish, manipulative narcissists. It's a couple hours of my life I'll never get back, and even Rosamund Pike (who is FABULOUS) isn't enough to get me to watch the movie.
I bought the book, read it and then felt as if I needed it out of my life as quickly as possible.There are no people like this married couple. There are no marriages like this marriage. I am not naive.....I professionally deal with people's problems every day.  The book does seem to start well but then takes an endless spiral all the way to it's depressing finish.  I felt embarassed that I had read this stuff.  Without getting into a deep psychological, analytical review let me just say, ""how on earth are people giving this 5-4 star reviews?By all means keep reading but not this.
very confusing
Awefull ending
Horrible book.
Not that great
Stay away from this one no sense of any useful thought or adventure  didn't : hold reader attention nor interest
Flower writer, did not like any character, did not like being fooled with writing in diary, did not like ending.
please see my remarks I may have goofy this book up.I forgot where I was with this book.Please advise.Thank you.
Awful and very confusing..Did not like the ending..I can not imagine how they made a movie out of this hot mess.
I read for two key reasons....(1) enjoyment  (2) education.I do not read ""critically acclaimed"".......""literary marvel"".....So from the two standpoint of my reading....This book was very disappointing. I was, many years ago ...in a toxic marriage...I do not enjoy reliving it through a novel. There is nothing enjoyable about the story...there is not a lot that is intriguing ....it was far too depressing to pull me along to actually want to continue reading.From a literary standpoint...the lady sure can write....but, alas...that is not what I read for .
This is a great read, until 3/4 of the way through.  The characters were very interesting, the plot and all its twists was exciting.  And then, nothing.  I don't want to give away anything, but when I read a book, I expect AN ENDING!!  Not a cookie-cutter everyone gets what they want and all live happily ever after ending; I love it when writers take me by surprise - but this book just ends, and I seriously turned the last page and kept looking for missing pages, thinking my copy must have been damaged.  But nope.  Just over and that's it.  Very disappointing and feels like I just wasted my time.
I had great difficulty making myself get through this book.At the end of the book I was sorry I wasted my time.
Could not finish - did not like the main character. Don't know what all the hype was about. VERY DISAPPOINTING.
The ending suxed!!!!! I would give it negative points if I could!!!! I'm so upset I wasted my money on this!!!!
It started slow, was a little better in the middle, the end helped to make it the worst book I have ever read.
The book was well written and kept me wanting more.  The end made me want to punish myself for having read it.
Awful story after all the build up on the movie, the book was terrible, could not finish it it was sooooo bad.
Did not enjoy! I thought the ending was terrible! So much detail in every chapter for such a crazy conclusion!
Really expected a lot, but was unable to get beyond the first boring chapters.  Perhaps the movie was better.
This book is disgusting.  It is a book of lies between two people who are married. It is frustrating to read.
I am really glad I only spent $2 on this ebook because I squirmed and cringed as I forced myself through it.
i was very disappointed since I didnt like the sstory line plus the fact that the sexy part was too explicit
I had to get through 45% of the book before I literaly forced myself to read on.  I did not like the ending.
I should have known it would have too much bad language.  I just got rid of the book, and only read a tiny bit into the second chapter, but by then I had tolerated more offensive language than I would normally begin to tolerate in a whole book.  Yikes, is all I can say.  I don't care if the types of characters in any book would speak such language in real life; I am looking for an intriguing story, and in my world, I don't use that language, nor does anyone around me.  The story line is not worth that intrusive dialogue.  Reading about crude people is not attractive, either.
I didn't like the characters, you didn't root for or feel a connection to any of them.  Disappointing read.
I found this book really hard to read and get into. Made it to about 10 chapters. Haven't touched it again.
How this became a best seller is beyond me.  Talk about 2 unlikeable characters!  They deserved each other.
Too much gratuitous swearing for my taste. I felt like the ending was anti climatic for such a big buildup.
Amazing book for the first 80% of it, the ending is just absolutely awful. I think the author just gave up.
Book starts out great. I was really hooked. Pretty good writing and a very original concept. Too bad the author had absolutely no idea how to end her story.  I have a friend who said at one point, she threw the book across the room.  Also, many useless characters who we never hear from again, after making them seem integral to the story i.e. .Neighbor).  I was going to purchase Flynn's other book, until I was near the NON ending of this one.No thank you! This is a $2.99 book value, not $12.99. Save your money and borrow it from the Library, or just skip it.
i was eager to read a good mystery book when i came across  one of kindells best sellers which is to be known as a great fiction, dazzling millions already around the world. im not exhagerating whem i say i couldnt even make it through half way. the books first chapters are intreaging though all after are boring and too descriptive. i cannot reccomend this book to anyone except for individuals who find excrutiatingly long goingnowhere novels interesting. sorry to dissapoint... this is just my personal expirience and i just thought my review just ought to be out there
I THOUGHT IT  IMPOSSIBLE TO HAVE SUCH SCHEMING CHARACTERS  SUPPOSEDLY MARRIED AND IN LOVE. VERY PERTURBING
It was real hard to get into, and the end sucked. I don't know why everyone talked aBOUT IT BEING SO GOOD.
Second time ordering book. Ordered it in hardback both time and received paperback both times!  I give up!
A really clever idea that the author, with much work, has turned into a boring slog from beginning to end.
It's as if the author couldn't think of a good ending, so she just quit..right in the middle of a thought.
The narration was HORRIBLE!! I spent $30 on this item and couldn't listen longer than the first half hour!
If there was an option for a minus star then that's what I would give this book.  It doesn't even deserve a half a star.  We chose this book at book club because of the big hype around it as to what a fantastic thriller it was.  Whoever decided that this book was a thriller needs to look up the definition of thriller.  I was utterly disappointed. As were the rest of book club.  What a load of tripe.  This book doesn't deserve to be published!  The editor and publisher need to find a different occupation because they clearly don't know a good book from a bad one!!!
I downloaded this book one night because EVERYONE was talking about it and EVERYONE was recommending it. I was rolling my eyes by the end of the first chapter. The characters are unlikable, the prose is weak, and anyone who'd ever taken an introduction to creative writing course saw the Mack truck sized holes in the plot. I think this book is one of those that people only talk about because it has a big (totally predictable) plot twist and it makes people who've read it feel ""in the know"" over people who haven't. I wish I had my $12 and three hours back...
The author needs to get a job.  I read this for a book club of 12 women and we all, except one, thought it a complete waste of our time. The story is gruesome, sick, and pitiful.  I am sorry I wasted precious time when there are other books to be enjoyed
It may have been praised by a lot of people. It may have been in the top for quite a while. This is why I bought it. Big mistake.Maybe I did not major in Literature, but I did a LOT of reading at my life, after graduating a Language high school. This book did not raise any of my interests. The plot was boring and I was not at all interested in finding out how it ended. Actually I was...I jumped directly at the last pages.There are other books, more captivating, that will not make you wonder through the minds of a mentally-troubled woman.
Yrcyfchg hg h hg hgfcgf hgcytcfycfycfycyfcyf gym t tf tf yf. Gf yigchgvygvvygvyf hv. Y guy hg hg hg hg hv
Predictable storyline and lead characters so void of humanity I couldn't care less what happened to them.
Not a good choice. I did not care for the book, nor did I feel like donating it when finished reading it.
This book was recommended to me as a good read with a poor ending. I decided to read it anyway.  It was a story with a different angle.  It was interesting and intriguing at times, which held my interest, for awhile anyway.  About half way through, it began to drag on like a soap opera. I contemplated not finishing it, anticipating the poor ending. I was not expecting the typical Hollywood ending, but I was hoping for something, anything, but it just dropped off into oblivion.  My own fault for the disappointment as I was given the heads up before reading it.
Stupid ending
Disappointing
OH MY GOD GET TO THE F$*%ING POINT.THIS CRAPPY BOOK HAS GONE ON AND ON ABOUT NOTHING.  Here is a sample of the garbage you can expect out of this POS.Walking into the store I decided I needed paper towel.  Reminding myself of that time I went to prom in high school I also bought paper towel that night.  Searching frantically for the paper towel aisle, i was disappointed when I didn't find the brand I needed.Now carry on this horrible little story I just wrote for 19 more pages and this is about as exciting as this book gets.
Unfortunately. this roller coaster ride of a ""who done it"" falls short of expectations for the characters, while given detailed back stories and are meticulously drawn, are so unlikable that it is difficult to empathize with them or care about them.  Even worse, I came to despise all of the characters.  They were an odious lot.  For this reason I chose to quickly read through the pages to get to the denouement and be through with this novel that was replete with contrivances and unlikable characters.  In my opinion this novel belongs in the horror genre.
So many good, or humorous stories to read, I won't waste my time on this one. Hope to get my money back.
Maybe I should have read this book 40 years ago when I was in my 20's!  I might have understood it then.
This book started out to be one of the best books I have read in long time. When I was about halfway into the book I told all my friends they have to read it because it is so amazing........then you get to the end. I actually could not believe how it ended. I will definitely tell those that I recommended this book to not waste their time. Such a shame beause I was totally hooked until the last page when it became so ridiculous I thought it was a joke. I stayed up late into the night to see how it ended and now I'm just sad that I missed out on sleep!
Did not care for the direction the story took. Not my kind of book. I deleted it when half-way through.
The ending ruins it.  I was actually angry at the end and regretful that I put my time into reading it.
I would not recommend this book to anyone. It really sucked. So predictable . Nick and Amy were so sick
Good story line.  Didn't appreciate the swearing.  Would have liked a better ending with more closure.
Unfortunately, I stayed the course and finished it.. Should have stopped when I started to get bored..
Terrible ending - totally ridiculous. Borrowed thru library  -  soooooo glad I did not waste my money.
The print is very tiny. Even with a magnifying glass, it was difficult to read so I returned the book.
This book was boring, I can only imagine how bad the movie will be!  The book was never ending dribble
I have wasted to much time reading this. I just hope someone reads this and saves there money and time
This was one of the worst books I have read in a long time.  I only began to read it because it had been recommended to me.  The story itself is rather interesting and intriguing until you get about halfway through it.  It becomes apparent that the author has some ulterior motive in writing this.  Perhaps she has some scorn for men for some reason.  I will not reveal the ending but it left me very annoyed that I had wasted any time reading through the whole thing.  Don't waste your money on this book unless you like trashy vindictive novels.
Easy to figure out this book...I don't see what all the hype is about....not worth your time reading.
Sorry I paid for this one.. Can't see how it was made into a movie. Would not recommend it to anyone.
I will give it 4 stars as I COULD PUT IT DOWN!  A good read...not great!  Too many plots to sort thru
This is a ""SICK"" book I will never recommend to anyone!  I hope I can soon forget it!!!  Strange one!
Everyone raved about this so I thought I'd give it a try. It's lame. I guess I had too high of hopes.
I will say this: Gillian Flynn is a fantastic writer.  Gone Girl kept me reading to the very end, where I was left hanging with my mouth wide open.  This is it?  Are you kidding me?  This is the end of a story I spent the last couple weeks making time for?  The ending was absolutely horrible and so disappointing! The writing was superb.  The story kept me reading.  But, the ending ruined it for me and I will not read another of her books because of this ending.  Sorry Gillian!  You need to write better endings for such awesome stories!
Boring, hate the ending. As a result, will not see the movie, nor read another novel by this author.
I did not like it at all.  It took a long time to get into it and then it cut off without an ending.
What all the other one`s said. Blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah blah
The writing I liked. The ending made me feel like I wasted a lot of my time, time I can't get back.
A vulgar novel about a narcissistic couple who thoroughly deserve each other. A disappointing read.
Read the first few chapters and the last few of the book.  Don't waste your time on the rest of it.
The beginning is confusing and I feel like I am reading the wrong book. Not as good as I was told.
I hated this book. Hated the characters. Couldn't champion any of them. Good writing but...sheesh.
Absolutely hated the premise of the whole book.  Read it if you want to get angry and depressed!!!
Very slow moving story.  Got about half way through and finally gave up.  Hope the movie is better
storyline was intriguing, the writing had too many explicits and ruined the story, not necessary .
I rated this book low because of the horrible ending and the morally corrupt antagonist, Amy. I absolutely hated Amy once her true character was revealed. It's difficult to believe that she could be such a hideous person and still escape consequences. The protagonist wasn't much better. The exposition and rising action was good and keep me reading. However, the climax and resolution left much to be desired. I'm disappointed that I bought this using my gift card. The most expensive kindle book I've bought was a waste.
Awful ending
I found this book boring, much too long and too much introspection for unattractive protagonists.
Not sure what the fuss is all about! A twisted story full of self-centred thinking boring people.
Reading Gone Girl make me absolutely crazy.  What was going on?  Just when I figured that the characters were settling down a little bit, off they went into nutsville.  I found that I was talking to the author as what the hell was she doing with the readers.  I didn't read the last chapter because I new I would take the book out in the back yard and burn it.  My husband was laughing but I was not.  Terrible read.  Would not wish this book on anyone.  In case you didn't get my point, I do not recommend this book.
And wanted to beat the living crap out of both the main characters within a half hour of reading the book. By the end. Yes, I made it all the way thru somehow. I hated the characters even more. Hated the author. Wanted to send hate mail to those that gave it good reviews and wanted to disown the friends and family that suggested I read it.
A waste if your time if you read it.  Unbelievable characters especially Amy.  Poorly written, dumb ending, so save yourself time by not bothering to read it.  If you are sceptical about my opinion of the book, scroll towards the end of Amazons reviews, where Amazon have conviently put the many one star reviews.I also surmise that the number of reviews (1,500 approx) indicates how many people are angry they wasted their hard earned money on such trash.  Gillian, you should not be proud of this one.
The book sucks. What was the author thinking? A big waste of time and I read only 100 pages. Boo
I hated all the characters.  They had no redeeming qualities, making the book a struggle to read
NOT MY KIND OF BOOK! CONFUSING, SWITCHING BACK AND FORTH BETWEEN PAST AND PRESENT OF TWO PEOPLE!
I finished it, I had to force myself to finish.I'm not sure why it gets such good reviews.
The book was really hard to follow!!  Then the ending was so bad I'll not even go see the movie!
I made myself finish this book only for it to finish with a sick ending. I wish I never read it.
This book started off strong; thus, I was tricked into buying it.  What a waste of time and money!  The plot is utterly predictable, up to the point that it should have ended.  It seemed like the author tried to then tack on a surprise ending; and another; and another!  Each chapter is more ridiculous.  The writing is corny, the characters clicheed, and worst of all, the plot seems to be a weaving of several different horrid real-life crimes.  I have no idea how this book got on to the best seller's list.
Gone Girl did more than disappoint me, it disgusted me. The characterizations left me with a sick feeling of the depravity of human nature. At one point, I felt Amy would be brought to justice and yet that never happened. That she got pregnant and the book ended with Nick staying with her is a truly sad commentary on human nature and what motivates people. This book is terribly disturbing. I have read Flynn's other books and admired her style but she lost me as a fan with this book. It truly sickened me.
I wanted to read it before I saw the movie. Now I won't waste any more time watching the movie.
What the heck!!!!!  I had to actually make sure I didn't miss pages at the end.  Worst ending!
I do not appreciate books laced with vulgarity and potty language! Shame to spoil a good plot.
Noot worth reading.... no story, no intrigue, no excitement....a typical broken marriage......
I got to the point with this book that I couldn't put it down at the end. And then came the ending. I had to go back and read it over again because I really couldn't believe that was it. There were so many ways she could have gone with the end and this was the worst of them. Just came off to me as lazy on the part of the author. So sorry I ever bought the book. Don't think I'm at all inspired to read any of her other books. Can't believe that with this ending, the book was even published.
This book was suggested for our book club and I purchased it so that I would be prepared.  To say that I was disappointed in it would be an understatement.  The language was foul and I am thankful to say that I know no one who talks this way in ""real life.""  The people were without exception completely unlikable and I ended the book not able to identify one character about whom I cared.  I read many and varied books and there have been few that I disliked as much as I disliked this book.
I could not wait to finish this book--only did so because it was our book club selection. The characters ( except the police personnel) were all in various stages of psychosis and I do not enjoy spending my time in that milieu. The other annoyance for me was the somewhat gratuitous overuse of profanity--perhaps I am too discriminating but I got no personal benefit from this experience. I do acknowledge the literary skill of the author but would like to see her talent put to better use.
I saw Gone Girl on so many best of 2012 lists that I got it and read it in one day. And I was left feeling totally confused. Confused about why people reacted so strongly to a book with so many one-note characters, so many completely implausible plot points and an ending that defies logic.  Confused as to whether or not this was written by an adult. Confused about what type of novel this was exactly - part crime thriller, part psycho drama, part soapy trash-lit. But all disappointing.
Thot I was reading ""Fargo""  The New York arrogance for the Midwest! Horrible ending!
Not finished yet, I always have to finish a book but having a very hard time doing this one.
This book us a No good, waste of time bad language. Don't read it really it is not worth it.
The plot is interesting. I would rate the book higher but I did not like the foul language.
Canceled it because couldn't get it to go to beginning!  Hope I'm not being charged for it!
Not worth the hype. I don't recommend this book. Very easy to read, but not worth the time.
Weak plot, weak characters, badly written.  Don't know what how it got to be a best seller!
I enjoy realistic books with interesting characters and a good story line. This is not one of them. It begins interestingly enough when the wife disappears but then turns RIDICULOUS.  The main character uses a wine bottle to make it look like she was sexually assaulted - give me a break. And the ending is even more ludicrous.  The book was bad anyways without an ending that makes you wish you had been reading a pleasurable book this whole time. Won't read this author ever again.
I cared nothing for any of the characters, and there was no ending. The book just stopped.
This was a disappointing read!  I was looking forward to it, but the book did not deliver.
Very disappointed with the end.  Long, drawn-out book to have such a disappointing ending.
I did not enjoy the book.  The language was awful and none of the characters were likable.
Gone Girl is a very long and drawn out story.  And to make matters worse it has no ending.
Not very interesting .Lacked continuity.Didnt hold my interest. Maybe the film was better.
The most redeeming feature of this book is that it WAS compelling enough for me to get all the way to the end of it.As for everything else... it's a crappy story, about crappy people, doing crappy things to one another. Characters with zero redeeming personal characteristics, behaving badly. If that's your thing. You'll love it.It's selling really well, so I guess there are lots of people that are fascinated by the vapid and the self absorbed. Sad.
Main characters are deplorable.  Forget about plot twists.  Every supposed twist is seen coming well in advance.  I understand why some people say they feel like they need to shower after reading this book.  It made me feel the same.  I understand the need to rinse the filth off because these characters are so disgusting and the writer, by proxy, is too.  If you feel the urge to read this crap, borrow it from someone and save your money.  I definitely want my money back.
Oh how horrible.  I really tried to read this book.  I started out reading every word and pretty quickly started skimming.  It wasn't long before I was turning multiple pages at a time just trying to find where ""the good part"" starts.  I couldn't find that part anywhere in this book.  After this complete waste of time I'm convinced you can buy your way onto the NY best sellers list.  I'm just glad I borrowed this book from someone and didn't actually spend money on it.
it was very hard to follow too much back a d forth had a hard time keeping it all related
Everybody said it was such a good book but I found it to be a little too explicit for me.
I couldn't even finish this book. I found it hard to follow with the flip flopping between the husband being in the present and all the wife's parts being in the past. The Dear Diary entries from the wife is was really killed me, they are so whinny and drawn out. I thought that the pace of the book might pick up once I got farther in so i skipped to the middle of the book. I was so wrong, it was still so painfully boring. Do not waste your time or money on this book.
I cannot believe that I finished this book.  I weep for America that this drivel is considered a bestseller.  Garbage.  I wish that I could go back in time and unread or stop myself from picking it up.  Even worse that I just finished ""Heart of Darkness"" last week before this one.  The juxtaposition of classic literature with this nonsense in my brain in making my head hurt.  Do yourself a favor and go visit the public library and read something of substance.
I read one chapter and quit.  In all the hundreds of books I have read in my lifetime, I have never quit like this.  I hated the writing style and could not figure out where he was leading.  After the one chapter, I scanned through the second one and read the chapter titles and found that this book was going to be boring. I should have given it more time but with all the wonderful digital books available, why bother trying to read a book that I would find boring.
I ordered this book months ago and I thought that I was going to zoom right through it, NOT THE CASE!! This book is a drag or perhaps I just haven't given enough of a shot. I can't believe the writer finally got the story going and then it just stops!!??!? This was the biggest waste of time reading this book. I am so annoyed right now. I will not read another of this writer's books because I won't waste another moment of my life for nothing to happen in the end.
I thought I would never get through it and found myself counting the pages till the end.
I cannot believe this is on the best sellers list.  Very weird book.  What am I missing?
I did not find this book engrossing at all. Matter of fact, I was forcing myself to read hoping something would happen so I couldn't put it down. I could only get to a couple chapters past Amy's disappearance. It was not getting any better. I found Nick boring (only thing intriguing would be when he would say 'it was the X lie I told' but not enough....and Amy is uninteresting, guessing she would play head games throughout. Nothing good to say, not a good read.
I hate this book. None of the characters have any redeeming qualities. I don't know why they made it a movie. Maybe Flynn wanted people to feel this passionate about it. Good for him on being a good writer in that capacity. However, I probably will never read another book by him and I don't recommend the book. It pissed me off and put me in a foul mood. Who wants that? I wanted to throw my kindle out the window. I don't think I have ever hated a book so much.
Do not know what all the hype was about this book. And the ending was a disappointment.
Didn't like the book, the author dragged out the story. Won't read another book by him.
This book was awful. Everyone I knew loved it so I felt compelled to finish it, but it was not worth the effort. I read about a third of it initially and gave up even though it had rave reviews. Once the hype of the movie hit I figured I misjudged the book. It had its good moments, but the majority of it was just bad story telling. I can't advise to not read it because I know my opinion is in the minority, but for me personally it was just a bad story.
I hated the ending so much that I wish I didn't waste all that time reading this book.
Difficult to read w/all the going back and forth........and just a plain terrible plot
The ending was real stupid, it was a great waste of my time. I wish I'd never read it.
I didn't care for either of the main characters. Reading it was like eating cheetoh's.
I never finished it and thought it was slow moving. It didn't keep my interest at all.
The book was ok. Hard to get into and staying into it. I wasn't a big fan of the book.
Ridiculous.  Characters are all completely unlikeable. Ending is obvious and painful.
I had a hard time getting through the entire book.  It just didn't hold my attention.
This is the 1st book I have ever read where both central figures are  UNLIKE ABLE!!!!
I can say it was disturbing at best I won't be going to see it at the theaters at all
Not sure what all the Hype was about, Characters were not likeable-story predictable
Not my type of book, boring, not sure how a movie could have been made on this book.
There were some good twists and turns in this novel, but no redeeming characters!!!!
Was a page-turner at first but was soon to be disappointed....what a waste of time!
I couldn't get into this book. I never connected to the characters, especially Amy.
I did not care for this book.  It did not make sense and Amy was crazy and abusive.
Could not care one bit for either main character.  No sympathy for husband or wife.
I did not like it and probably won't go see the movie since I hate the way it ends.
I was tempted to read this book for months but it kept catching my eye on the Kindle lists so I finally went for it, even though it was a little pricey. I should never have done it! This book is awful! I kept reading because the plot was good and I kept thinking that the ending had to be worth it... It was not. It just ends in a very ridiculous  way. I would love to get back my time and money. Please don't bother with this book.
Just finished this book and am outraged that i wasted the time reading it!!!!  it ends leaving the reader so pathetically unsatisfied and infuriated at the characters and ultimately at yourself for having suffered through to the end, hoping for some conclusion and finding NONE.
I was disappointed in the ending.  It was a 400+ page book and I was underwhelmed.
I really can't rate the book because I couldn't even get past the first 3 Chapters
I thought this book was terrible. I was very disappointed. Would not recommend it.
although the back and forth worked well in story,the ending of the book was awful.
Over rated
dumb, dumb, dumb. Had it figured out immediately. The guy SHOULD have killed her.
Good book! I dont care for the format it was written. Def want to see the movie!!
Started out with great promise..was beyond belief by the end. Very disappointing.
I just could not get into this book, I never got past the second chapter.  Sorry.
This was the worst book I've read in a long time.  I don't know what all the rave was about but it sure does make one wonder about the caliber of the readers who placed it on the best sellers list.  Why did I finish it?  That's a good question--wanted to see what so many people were talking about.  A smart move on my part would have been to burn it in the fireplace.  It was dark, sadistic, twisted and oh so stupid!  Amen.
This was one of my least favorite books. Too much thinking and not enough action
I felt like I wasted my time on this book.  I can't fathom why a movie was made.
This is one of the worst books I have ever read, and I have read thousands. There is no character in the entire book that I cared one wit about, and would not have been upset at all if they all bit the dust. The ending was as big a letdown as most Steven King books.
I hated this book.  I thought the main characters were stupid and unbelievable.
Did not get past chapter 3 in this book.  Hated it!!  That's all I have to say.
Super slow! Could not get into it. Got really bored of hearing their backstory.
Was such a let down, great build up but then turns into a hard slog at the end.
Probably the most boring book I have ever read.  Read 40% & had to give it up!!
What an awful ending.  This book sucked!  I won't bother with the movie at all.
I thought it was horrible. It was very slow to start and had a horrible ending!
Three Words:  Stink - Stank - Stunk.  Not a single redeeming virtue in ANY character in the book.  Further, the author plays with the reader and ends up giving him/her a sucker punch at the end.  I truly dislike dishonest authors.  Even mystery writers play fair with their readers while not revealing everything up front.  But this author does not.  Nothing to see here...nothing to  like here... move along...
The novel was amateurish at best.  What drivel.  Obviously publishers will print anything anymore.  This is one writer who is burned out or hit the rails with Gone Girl.  The book was dim and dull; I felt as if I was reading the diary of a couple of 9th graders.
I couldn't stomach the language.  After 25 pages of more F words than I could count, I put it down.  It's too bad, it seemed interesting.  Really?  You need that much language to convey your point and I doubt that individuals that are as successful as the two individuals in this book use such language.  Trashy!  It's almost as though the author was trying to see just how many swear words she could fit in.
I don't understand the rave reviews for this book. Every character in the story is manipulative, degraded, or morally bankrupt. The plot is preposterous and the outcome was predictable halfway through. Amy is portrayed as a fanatically detail-oriented and goal-driven Machiavellian genius but somehow can't hold onto even a low level job. I finished the book but it was a relief to escape from it at the end.
I did not like this book. Very negative, with no upside as far as I could see.
I was very dissapointed by this book.  So much hype & I was left dissapointed.
Good writer, interesting story.  But Gillian Flynn once again, for titillation or for who knows why, adds all sorts of vulgar additions that aren't even necessary for telling a good story.  She's wasting her talents, at least in my book.  I won't recommend her to anyone unless she starts singing a different tune and gets her (otherwise unique and interesting) stories out of the trash heaps of humanity.
It has been a very long time since I've declared after finishing a book 'what a waste of time', but that was exactly how I felt about this book. I didn't like any of the characters, and  the second half of this book was so far fetched  it was ridiculous. I can appreciate the suspense and mystery of the story, but that is the extent of anything positive. I truly would not recommend this read to anyone.
I know it's super popular right now, so I'm obviously in the minority, but I thought this book was very foul and crude. I don't need the f-bomb every sentence, and crude references to sex and body parts in order to get that a character is gruff. The relationship between the main characters is sick and twisted, too. The book left me feeling sad and hopeless, not delighted at the telling of a good yarn.
hard read  and i never  got interested in it so i stopped reading  it halfway
Sorry I did not like this book.  Just did not like the story or how it ended.
Don't like any of the characters so it is really hard to care what happens...
Worst Ending Ever! Felt totally ripped off for wasting all that time reading!
stupid moronic,  started great , ended insulting and condescending to readers
It took me longer than usual to finish this book. The book started well, but about half way in, I realized that the main characters were so unlikeable that I didn't really care what happened to them. The ending was especially unsatisfying. It was just like an M. Night Shyamalyn movie, and I don't mean that as a compliment. I'm just glad that I got it from the library. It certainly wasn't worth $13.
Horrible...plot was so dumb...can't believe they made it into a stupid movie
It was horrible  only reason I read most of it was because I had paid for it
Really didn't like the flow of the book, movie much better which is unusual!
Oh, dear, what can I say!  I didn't like Amy by page 25 when she disappeared, so I stopped reading and skipped ahead to **************************** SPOILER ALERT ************* SPOILER SPOILER SPOILER ************** SPOILER SPOILER SPOILER **************************page 369 when she returned, read to the end and could see I was justified in not liking her from the start.  A preposterous story.
Am I supposed to believe that in the 4 months since this book has been available for purchase on Amazon, that almost 3300 people have written a review and that they seem to be mostly positive? I do not believe this for 1 second and Amazon should take a closer look. Scams like this one make it very unfair for authors who have their work reviewed honestly and have built their rating over time.
The book had some interesting twists and turns but the ending left me flat.
Didn't like the characters or the ending.  Would definitely not recommend;(
Very well written, hated the people and sorry I wasted the time reading it.
Wow, does this book ever suck!!!!  I thought I was going to read a crime novel and I got a relationship novel about two loathesome human beings that are a waste of oxygen.  Reading  this ongoing self involved woman's thoughts made me think I'd like to murder her myself. Her husband is pretty disgusting on his own, the two of them make you wish humanity never crawled out of the swamps....
I did not like this book at all.  Tried three times to get into it, basically forcing myself to read it, and I just couldn't do it.  The most I got in was about 70 pages.  What a waste of my time.  I hated everything about it, but mostly the writing style.  So pretentious!  Ugh.  Every time the main character called his sister ""Go"", made me want to scream.  The book just sucked.
I read a lot of books dealing with abuse, sad lives, etc. The further into the book I got the sicker the relationship became and both seemed so sick to me. For some reason as I read it it became clear I wanted to just quit reading it and toss it out. Would not recommend to anyone. I told my daughter she could take my Kindle and read it when I finished. Now I would tell her don't bother.
What a disappointment! I compare this book  to a 43 mins CSI episode- no need to think...it's done for you (albeit, haphazardly). The author was so engrossed in creating a clever monster, that she forgets to develop the other characters' brain power.  As for the plot it's filled with discrepancies. I only give it one star because of all the wonderful ratings, it got me to buy the book.
I hated this book. It seemed promising at first, though even the sane part of the plot never really pulled me in. The plot was so dramatic I kept reading with the expectation the book would grow on me, but it just got worse. The characters were too over the top and not believable or relatable. The author was obviously going for shock value but tried too hard. The ending was just awful.
didn't follow any specific path and was so boring, I couldn't  stay awake.
Awfull story ... Don't bother ..... A lots of things without explanation !
Hated it.  All players were ones no one could like.  Sorry I purchased it.
I hated the characters in this book, therefore it took me forever to read.
The ending was horrible, and it jumped so much that it was hard to follow!
I thought it was a stupid book - and don't know what all the hap was about
This book was so bad, do not waste your time reading it, you will be disappointed.  The writing style seemed juvenile and the main character made flaws which points to development issues. This writer should take up another line of business.
Very slow to start, haven't gone very far in book, just can't get into it
I hated all the characters - they were so unappealing. The story dragged.
Very disappointed, the style was repetitive and I didn't like the ending.
An easy and quick read. I felt it was a bit over the top and unrealistic.
It was work to read this book .  tooo much reflection and back and forth.
could not follow the story line.  worse  book in a while. loved the movie
As a feminist I hated the first half of the books...I read some views after part two, which promised a good twist, but it was rather predictable. The ending had no climax....would have been better if she had the baby and the father disappeared with it and published his books anyway. Otherwise there was no point to the story...mostly full of chauvinist women hating propaganda.
poorly written with a lazy ending. do not waste your time on this ordinary book. the plot was interesting enough to get me to the end but the let down was disappointing. one of the worst books that i have ever read.
Started out interesting but then just became ridiculous. The end was a big let down. The worst part was throughout the book the author used a :placenta of weird adjectives to describe scenes and feelings. At one point I almost stopped reading the book. I didn't need 6 phrases to describe a man doing his business at a fertility clinic. Will never read from this author again
Horrible!  Starts out ok.  Great writing?  How about the F-word on every page? This is a downer book with no redemptive quality.  All the characters are evil with no positive turn around.  The ending is horrible.  I would not recommend this book to anyone and I don't know how it's been on every best seller list.  I'm glad I downloaded it from the library and didn't buy it.
Second worst book I""ve ever read.  You don't want to know the first.
Book drags on and on with the shocking ending happening all of a sudden.
Having hear so much hoopla about this novel, I bought the books a forced myself to read more than 100 pages. I found the story tedious and the constant time shift within the relationship confusing. The characters were no captivating and were generally ordinary and uninteresting. Why this book is on the best-seller list is a complete mystery to me. I just don't get it.
I was disappointed that the author chose to use such terrible language - on nearly every page. What's wrong with using words like 'messing with you' instead of 'f$&@ing with you'?! The main characters were so unbelievably twisted and that the reader is left with a bitter taste caused by their evilness. The author is definitely creative, I just did not enjoy the book.
forced myself to finish, but still ended as expected from the beginning
Terrible book. Why a best seller? Beats me .I could not even finish it.
There are must better books to read, don't waste your time on this one. Can't understand why it has been on best sell list for so long. I was taken it by all the reviews, and deceided to read it, ended up skipping most. Perhaps just not my kind of book. I want to like the characters.  For me there are many much better books and too little time to spend on this one.
Lame. Sorry I wasted my time. Gaping holes in this tightly knit story.
This is a really dumb book.  I am not sure why I am even finishing it.
Not  for me. I had a hard time getting through it and eventually quit.
Terrible condition. Waste of $8 bucksExpected it to be brand new
I did not even finish it, I thought it was awful and a very hard read.
It was not a fast moving novel.  I got bored trying to get through it.
I bought this book as part of a workplace book club and I figured out early on what was happening. I feel like it meandered through meaningless days that really slowed the pace down. What was the point, had no definitive climax just sort of poofed out....blah n bleech. Generally disliked every character. Oh well, at least I don't have to sit through the movie.
After reading sixty percent of this work I gave up hoping that something good would result and the reader would be lifted out of the depression that the author had created. The plot contains all to much of the issues that we are bombarded with daily by television, tabloids, and therefore news media. This is one movie that I will not waste my time or money on.
An awfull book. Certainly one the worst book I ever read. A totally disabused vision of the USA y a totally disbused author. Th retirement house smelled like chicken bbroth broth and piss. How bad can anyone write thecliches used a million times.The guy's wife has been kidnapped and he feels like a ""third teer speaker in a lousy convention"". Really bad.
I was so so disappointed with this book I had read such great reviews about it but I just found it not much good at all!! It was very slow from the start, at times the author seemed to totally drift away from the main theme and it was just so easy to figure out from basically the first few chapters what the ending was going to be and I hate that in a book.
This is one of the worst books I have EVER tried to read.  There is not one likable character in the entire book; they are either psychopathic or just weird.  The ending makes no sense.  I am just sorry I wasted my time with any of this author's books.  Gone Girl is the second book of hers that I have read but I will never, ever read anything else by her.
What a waste of time...a very contrived story.. the ending is ABSURD.
I found it contrived and poorly paced. Good narrative style, however.
Sorry. This was a huge fail for me. Just fell well short of the hype.
did not like this book at all!  the ending was such a disappointment!
Do not recommend because of excessive bad language and dark content.
this is the worst book i have read in a long time. i was going to put it down several times but decided to force myself to finish it. it was written like the author sat down to write and did not remember where they left off. hard to keep up and difficult to stay engrossed. i like a book that i dont want to put down. i could barely pick this one up.
Disliked all the characters and quit reading. Better books to read.
Didn't finish it.  I guess I am not a fan of Flynn's writing style.
A lot of hype, but not nearly as good as the more developed authors
What a waste of time and money!Hopefully the movie is better.
i bought this book solely because my friends talked me into it, they told me how good it was.  boy, was i disappointed. from the first page i could tell it wasnt gonna be good but kept reading in hopes it would get better, well half way through i stopped reading, just couldnt get into it, too slow a read,not suspenseful, i actually hated it.
Terrible
Hated it
Negative
Terrible
Predictable. Unsatisfactory ending. Obviously leading to a sequel.
This book is disturbing.  Very well written.  But very disturbing.
Should have read 1-star reviews before even starting on this book.
It took me a year to read this book.  Very boring,  in my opinion.
I guess it was not what I expected.  Too glib.  Did not finish it.
This was, without a doubt, one of the worst, most depressing books I have ever read.  The two main characters were completely unsympathetic, Amy completely psychotic,.  If this book is an exploration of contemporary marriage,  then our society is in much worse trouble than I could ever imagine.  Give me John and Olivia Walton, any day!
Always remember best-selling books often have no literary value.  Writing is horrible, story line is far from intelligent, and story-line takes you nowhere.  Rarely do I force myself to finish a book so poorly written, but did so at the request of a friend in order to evaluate and discuss.  Do not waste your time or money on this book.
A nasty book about nasty, sociopathic people, wreaking havoc on every other person they come into contact with. Narcissism gone wild. And the ending is completely unsatisfying. Don't know what anyone found to like about this one. Her first, Sharp Objects, was much more satisfying, though pretty disturbing and frightening characters.
Too much language. I couldn't get through more than two chapters.
Just don't. Ridiculously juvenile. Save your money and your time.
This is by far one of the most disturbing stories I've ever read.
I MOST DEFINITLEY DID NOT LIKE THIS BOOK, I DIDNT LIKE SWITCHING WHAT EACH CHARACTER WAS SAYING CHAPTER AFTER CHAPTER. I WOULD HAVE LIKED IT BETTER IF IT WAS JUST PORTRAYING ONE CHARACTER, IT WAS VERY BORING AND DID NOT HOLD MY INTEREST. REALLY HAD TO FORCE MYSELF TO FINISH READING IT. WOULD NOT RECOMMEND THIS BOOK FOR A GOOD READ
The story seemed to be almost prepostorous in that one person could do all the things she did and got away with.  Also, the ending was hard to believe.  I do not think her husband could become so docile.  Further, the authorities became aware of his innocence and her guilt.  Thus, all he ahd to do was cooperate with the police.
I wasn't a big fan of this novel.  This book came highly recommended to me by a close friend, but I was wholly unimpressed.  First, the subject matter of the novel was too dark and depressing for me to be able to enjoy reading it.  Second, the majority of the book is written in the first-person narrative style, which I dislike.
Boring! Took too long to tell the story. Would not recommend it.
Did not like this book. It ended as if it was just out of pages.
I thought it stunk. I didn't even finish it.I wasted my dollars.
Wasn't crazy about the ending.  Plot was too far fetched for me.
Hated this book. No one character  had any redeemable qualiities
It was a ridiculous ending. I don't recommend this book at all.
I thought the book was boring.  I had a hard time finishing it.
I had trouble staying with it.  Seemed to jump around too much.
Most depressing bit of writing I've encountered in a long time.
What can one say about a book that has a plot that makes no sense and has a million holes in it, characters that have bizarre motivations that render them unlike human beings, and an ending that is laughable and improbable?Oh, I know what one can say, ""It's junk.""  Don't waste your time or money on this book.
I really tried to like this book. I just can't, sorry :(. I know the movie is coming out soon and Ben Aflec plays the husband but...  It was an easy read. Felt choppy. I will give the movie a 2nd chance but not the book.  Forget the book justness the movie and I never say that. I always prefer the book over the movie.
Save your money - they live unhappily ever after.I don' t believe the ending - one of these psychos is going to kill the other.  Why didn't the author go ahead and wrap it up for us?  No way they are going to live together until they are 90 years old.Won't waste any more money on this author.
This was one of the worst books I have ever read  Very boring.
I don't get what all the hype was about.  It was a stupid book
It was a great book!  It will hold your attention  to the end!
I didn't care for this book at all.....would not recommend it.
the characters were so self absorbed and the ending was awful.
Didn't care  for this book, couldn't get into it. Very boring.
Sorry ! I didn't care for it. Poor language,I could do without
did not lile books skipped thru pages just to see how it ended
I didn't really like this book - way to unrealistic and wacky.
One of the worst books I've ever read. Do not waste your time.
I couldn't wait to read this book. It must be great, I thought, because it's  been on the bestseller list for what seems like ages.  Well, reading this book was like root canal.  As a matter of fact, I'd RATHER have root canal!  Terrible characters, ridiculous story, boring, boring, boring.  Don't waste your time.
How this book stayed on the NY Times best seller list for so long, I will never understand. It takes so long for the plot to develop, that I found myself losing interest. It was a chore to keep reading it. Definitely not a page turner. Will not keep you up late at night. In fact, it is a great cure for insomnia.
Am I the only person who recognizes this ""thriller"" as merely the recounting of the Scott and Laci Peterson marriage-murder?  So the first half is essentially non-fiction but then the story turns into this sophomoric, Nancy Drew  murder mystery.  Not sure who the intended audience was but clearly not for adults.
I'm not even a chapter in and I hate all the characters all ready. AND what's with the angry sun...you have been seen...this is so derivative...maybe the author calls it foreshadowing but I call it 'calling it in.' You know what? I don't care what happens to Amy. Or her husband or his sister.:( dags
I wanted one or the other to kill each other so it would end.
I am so sick of these Millenials.  I am sorry I read a book about them.  Who cares!!! They are worse than the ""me"" generation.  I believe that this book is the product of one of them and written by one of them.  It is as a better mind than mine said ""full of sound and fury signifying nothing"".
Most of the one-star reviews seem to focus on the ending. I didn't make it that far, though for curiosity's sake, I did wonder what happened to Amy, so I read the last few pages just to find out. I suppose I can understand other readers' disappointment with it. Having said that, with the exception of those last few pages, I never made it past the first quarter of this novel. Perhaps it's just not my style, but in the end I just didn't care about any of the characters. Only a quarter of the way in, I really didn't care if Amy had been kidnapped or murdered or whatever, and I didn't care if Nick was such a terrible person that he could have carried any of it out. Both Amy and Nick, and Nick's twin Margo, are all self-absorbed millennials. Amy is a perfectionist, Nick is a dreamer, and Margo is fiercely loyal. Those are the only characteristics that I could identify, and they didn't create any connection with me.Furthermore, I'm just priggish about language these days. Epithets, curse words, and foul language can advance a character's personality, but some of these newer novels are like many of the modern movies we are subjected to--gratuitous use of unnecessary words, particularly the ""f-word"". Believe it or not, many of us in today's society have a larger vocabulary. I think it shows a lack of writing skill in all media that characters cannot express themselves without using it. This book is a good example of it.The concept of this novel sounded like a book that I could love, but I never connected. I cannot understand the rave reviews.
This book...Started ok, I forced myself through most of it. I cannot get over just how bizarre this book actually is. I can't decide who is crazier in this whole story-Nick or Amy? There really is no ending. Didn't like that. Won't read the second if there is one...Don't waste your time and money. Seriously.
I wanted to read this book because it is getting a lot of good press and supposedly will have a movie made.  Unfortunately, I was quite disappointed in the book.  I felt the writing was immature, the storyline weak, and I did not like or sympathize with any of the characters.  It might be better as a movie.
It is hard to describe how poor this book is written. The characters are despicable, and not in an interesting way, but in a way makes tou just beg that they both die and the book will end.
Are you kidding me?  What a crock of yuck. Boring. Blah, blah blah...back and forth, ""Amy"" then ""Nick"" then ""Amy"".I gave one star because I did read it to see how it ended.  It did end. FINALLY  I smacked my forehead and thought, ""what a waste of my brain cells"".  Ugh
Could have been written tighter and a bit more sophisticated
Just didn't like it, stopped reading after the 3rd chapter.
worst book I've read and had a hard time getting through it
Hate books with ""NO"" ending - was too weird for me.
I could not get into the book. I deleted it from my kindle.
...so...tell me again why I was supposed to like this book?
Good writing terriable ending ,main characters are crazy!!!
Too predictable. I lost interest half way through the book.
too long and drawn OUT. Cant imagine movie being any better
I barely made it through a 1/4 of the book....too much bad, vulgar language. Really disappointed. If I could have given it 0 stars, I would have. What's more disappointing is my children's school librarian suggested it to me. I even asked her if it would be considered an ""R"" rated book due to the language & she said NO. If you are ok with the F word every other word...then have at it. The vulgar language was really unnecessary. Sad to see that this is ok language in our society. Besides the language the characters weren't very compelling....trashy actually.
Was given this as a gift.  I can and do read anything and everything, but this was intolerable.  Never held my interest, didn't care about the characters.  Read a sample before buying
I feel it is an insult to the reader and a great waste of my time to read things that so go against my grain.  But, I may be in the minority.  I hope I am for the sake of the author.
To long
What ??
Did not like the ending. The quality of the book was fine.
Terrible, disappointing ending. So sad I wasted my time :(
Having a hard time reading it - does not hold my interest.
Soooo disappointed that I bought this book! Ending sucked.
Hated this book....Strange story!  Didn't like the ending.
I think this may be the first time I have ever read this author and probably the last. Hopefully the movie is better than the book. I found it to be incredibly boring and fell asleep every night after about 10 pages. BTW, I love to read and will usually stay up way too late if a book is good.
I really don't know how this is one of the best books. I started reading this book and found it so boring, I put it down. A while later I kept hearing people rave about the book, so I thought I'd give it another chance and, I just could not get into it. When does it actually get interesting?
This novel was painful to even finish. I thought it was incredibly predictable and the character development was HORRIBLE. You have no empathy for either of the main characters, in fact they are downright unlikable. I just was not impressed with this book at all and would not reccomend it.
The characters were initially boring and dumb and then descended into being outright evil to amazingly sly and foolish.The first half of this book dragged and the second half dumped the reader into the filth of some awful people's minds.Cannot understand the appeal on this one.
What a stupid horrible ending!!!!! Don't waste your time!
Suspense....and sick. Too graphic and too violent for me.
didn't care for this story.. especially the way it ended.
Very hard to follow. Lost interest a third of the way in.
story line was interesting but too filled with the F word
I had to read this for book club. While I acknowledge that it is well written, the sheer evil and language in this book really unsettled me, would not read again or recommend.
The characters are very shallow.And does no one find the characterisation of the midwest beyond the pale? I was surprised to see the author thanking her Missouri family in the acknowledgements. I'm surprised they will let her in the door.Surely the film is better. It can't be worse.
Couldn't read more than a hundred pages, even then I pursuaded myself to read those because the reviews were so positive. Terrible language, extremely slowly developing plot, very negative emotionally. Can't understand positive critics at all. It's not  even 'disappointing', it's awful.
Boring!  Both wife and myself gave up after one chapter.
Story just plain bogs down and doesn't hold my interest.
didn't like the way it was written....received a refund.
I have ordered but received  nothing, where is nny book?
Very foul and offensive language, that ruined it for me.
I thought it was a pretty good story some of the things were a bit outlandish but still decent until the end who the hell end a story that way and who would honestly act like that. Wish I wouldn't have spent the money or the time in the book and I should have just watched the movie.
I do not know how this made it on the best seller list. This is one of the nastiest books I have ever read. This Author has a fascination with pornography and the ending leaves you hanging. I would not recommend this to read and I will not read any other books by this Author writes.
Good book until the stupid ending.
Poorly written. Not very original.
This book was actually plausible until the last fifty pages. Then it just became ridiculous. The characters do reflect how writers and the media today are self absorbed, think they have power and think they more important than others. Maybe this is characteristic of the author too.
I actually did recommend this book half way through. Now I am adamant to NOT ! You read first half and think  how clever the author is, then you realize  you have been played just like the main character. Never read a book that went from 4 stars to 1, but that sums up the book.
The seller did a fine job of delivering the book, just as ordered.  But the novel itself was poorly written and plot was not plausible or the least bit entertaining.  I'm sorry I wasted so much time making my way to the end.  Skip this one, but buy another book from the vendor.
I had to put it down...way too dark and, well, obscene.
If the book starts off boring I'm not going to read it.
I found this book very hard to follow,and just too sad.
I read this book in 3 days!  I wanted to finish it before the movie came out and someone ruined the ending .  What a waste of my time.  The worst ending of a book ever...and I have read hundreds of books.  I also have  no desire to see the movie anymore. Very disappointing.
I couldn't even get through first 100 pages.  I'm an avid reader.  I like mysteries and they have to get me right in the beginning.  The book has to keep moving, not too quickly, but enough to keep me interested.  This was too wordy....too descriptive...not enough going on.
I never write reviews. That being said, this was the worst ending to any book I have every read. Such a let down and this was the most expensive book I have every purchased on my Kindle! I want my money back! I will not read another book that Gillian Flynn wrote or writes.
Got through less than 25 pages , what a waste of time.
Don't waste your time unless you like twisted and mean
I had goosebumps...because it was so terribly written.
I could not get into this book. I really really tried.
When I finished this book, I was so angry that I wasted my time reading a story about 2 people with absolutely no redeeming qualities. DON'T MAKE THE SAME MISTAKE!
This isnt what I like to read as a mysterous and thrilling novel.700 more pages kept me wasting time reading it.I prefer the style of the novel:Before I go to sleep.It was the first one thrilling waking me up how interesting and captivative a novel could have provided.
I had heard so many good things about this book.  It started out so promising, and there were many nights I stayed up to continuing reading it.  But it all just fell apart.  It ended horribly and I can honestly say that I utterly disliked the whole book because of it.
Just about the worst book I have read in many a year.
RedundantPoor story lineVery disappointed
Disappointed!! Too confusing. Enjoyed the movie more.
Did not finish this book. Just could not get into it.
I don't understand what all the fuss is about with this book - I hated it!  It was so boring and I couldn't  have cared less about the characters.  I only kept reading it cuz I thought the ending had to make up for the rest of the  book - I was wrong...awful ending.
I thought it one of the worst books I've read. It is well written, but the character of the wife is so reprehensible, that if she would have been struck dead, I would have cheered. Sorry I wasted my time reading it. It left a really bad taste in my mouth. C.A.G.
Horrible ending.  Not interested in seeing the movie
I just didn't care for the story line or the ending.
I hated the way it ended.  No justice just addiction
I ordered the hard cover but received the paperback.
Built well until the ending which was disappointing.
I did not like the book at all - some of the puzzles were intriguing, but all the characters were thoroughly dislikable, so it was not enjoyable for me.The condition of the item was excellent, though, as was the shipping time, and I appreciate that.
The worst book I've read recently. The story line was just shocking situations that were not realistic. It was just dumb!! Reading it made me feel angry at society that such trash is so popular. I'm in my 20s and I couldn't stomach this ridiculous story line.
Lousy writing.  A waste of time.  I was intrigued at first, but the writing was so full of cliche, I read it VERY quickly just to see how it would end. And the end just feels as if the author was out of ideas or maybe just tired of Nick and Amy. I know I was.
I like the method of his writing/story telling but the actual story was screwed up. Awful book. I am disgusted that someone even thought this up! What a way to give people bad ideas about how to handle marital discord. The author needs some serious therapy.
I did not enjoy this book. It was slow to start, then mostly you heard from the two characters alternating chapters talking about what they were thinking and the ending was very uneventful. Disappointed since they made it a movie, thought it would be good.
no credibility .  Borders on porn.  Not a good read
Stupid book, stupid ending, waste of time and money
I was intrigued by the premise but I felt the book was ruined by the excessive amount of swearing and graphic sex scenes. I got half way though, but couldn't bring myself to finish the book. Take out the vulgarity and I think the book would be very good.
Just awful, ever finish a book and think, wow I just want my time back. Yep, that is this book.  It is different, don't get me wrong.  But it is about two selfish people who concern themselves with nothing else.  There is no joy and no hope in the book.
I was surprised when I read this book,or I should say the first chapter.  It was so poorly written and slow.  I'm amazed at it being on the best seller lists and so popular.  I was sorry I spent any money to buy it.  For me it was completely unreadable.
This is a well written book that I'm sorry I spent my money on.  I hated the characters, and wish I hadn't fallen for the good reviews of the writing and paid more attention to the reviewers who wished they could erase the characters from their memory.
This horrid story can only be written by a clinical psychopath. She knows little about the damage people like Amy do to their children.alot of hype,but a waste of time. What troubles me more than the story is the author'ssickness in writing this.
stupid
Creepy
boring
a bore
Boring
the ending bugged me.  I refused to see the movie.
Could not get into this book. Quit after 50 pages.
Great service, but I did not like the book at all.
This book kept me on edge but it is so disturbing.
had hard time reading  movie must have been better
i hated it second half just unrealistic and stupid
Boring, I fell asleep so many times while trying to read this book I didn't know if I would ever get through it. To me it was a terrible waste of money. The book did not flow well and just about the time you thought it may get interesting, it didn't.
Horrible, horrible book with horrible, horrible characters.  Lord, please don't let there be real people like this.The only reason I continued to read it was because I had purchased it and couldn't stand wasting my money by not finishing it.
I didn't like the people, it was awful from beginning to end. Five other readers agree with me. I do not understand how anyone could recommend it.
I normally don't put a book down, I did this one.
I had to make myself finish this book.  Hated it!
The book was better and even that wasn't so good.
This book was terrible. It's a waste of my money.
I threw this book out after reading it, even tho I usually pass my books on. First time I ever thru a book out. Hated the ending, felt duped after spending all that time reading it. Do not understand what all the hype was about-hated this book.
While the story is only slightly engaging, the characters are ALL disappointing. It's okay to have a dark story and darker characters. But without one single glimmer of light, why bother with the story. I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone.
note;  My email address has changed to annbarron27@gmail.comThe story started out to be interesting and fairly well written.  By mid-point the writing had deterioratedto fifth grade level and the plot read like a comic book.
This is one of most unsatisfying stories I have ever read. The characters are totally in unbelievable and the storyline, while superficially imaginative, is predictable. My advice to other potential readers is don't waste your time or money.
The worst book l have ever read. I can't believe they would make a movie from it..l won't waste my time or money going to the movies to see it.
don't like diary like books. it was so boring at the beginning that I did not even give another chance to continue reading. can't  understand how this came to be the bestseller and best book of the year. hoping that movie will be better....
Thought the book was not as good as anticipated.
I don't think I've ever disliked a book so much.
Disappointing, especially after seeing the movie
I didn't like it at all. Is give it a half star.
The book was so good until the ending ruined it.
This is one of the worst books I have ever read.
This was the weirdest , psycho book I ever read.
I truly thought the ending would have spectacular, clearly separating the characters.  At least not leaving you still in the middle of their  twisted lives. I couldn't put this book down, but getting to the end, just left me disappointed.
Neither one of the main characters were like able.  The plot had twists and turns, but all the turns made the characters and the story line more perverse. The only reason I finished the book is because I was reading it for a book club.
I gave up after several attempts. This story line just couldn't hold my interest. I thought the author was creative in setting the story up by telling each character's story individually but it became confusing bouncing back and forth.
It's too depressing and ugly for me.  Would the violence and shock ever end? It was too much, too many twists and turns and too Unbelievable.I didn't enjoy it and was very disappointed because I expected a good read..
I hate when authors write mysteries and assume the reader will believe anything. The ending got silly and the language is atrocious. I hope the screenplay is written better and the plot improves for the movie. Will not recommend book.
I started reading this and was very put off by the overwrought prose and couldn't decide whether or not to continue. Other reviews convinced me to forget it. A lot of hype and lots of trees killed in the name of self-indulgent excess.
Really frustrating plot. Didn't enjoy it at all
Took too long to hold interest, was a slow read
Terrible dribble. I wish I had never read this.
Well written, terrible story, more awful ending
took too long to get to the bones of the matter
VERY DISAPPOINTED. PERHAPS THE MOVIE IS BETTER.
Disappointing read. Depressing and unrealistic.
Gone Girl should have been about 100 pages long. The first half is fluff, in my opinion. Having said that, I did read the entire book and then sat back and tried to figure out why I didn't close it after the first couple of chapters.
The beginning was slow moving but a friend encouraged me not to stop reading it. The activity picked up and the intent of the characters became clear. I do not like stories that the author does not bring closure to. I feel cheated.
I did not enjoy this book at all and in fact- I was angry with myself for purchasing it. I also was upset that I actually wasted time reading it. The characters were among the sickest, most self-absorbed people you could ever meet.
I felt this was ""over the top"" with swearing....I was looking forward to reading it because the reviews were so great.  Nothing referred to the obsessive use of profanity.  I may have been well written, I failed to see it.
This book is for middle aged women who move their lips when they read. Predictable and awful and the ending was the worst of any book I've ever read. This book left me wondering why I read it. Shaking my head and feeling ashamed.
I didn't like the way this was wrote, from different peoples perspectives. I found it too slow moving, and it bored me so much that I didn't come close to half way through. This is a book I never finished, for lack of interest...
Based on all the other 1 star reviews - ditto!
The ending was awful!!! Was very DISAPPOINTING
Worse book I have ever wasted my time reading.
Did not like it at all.  Depressing and scary!
I have not had a chance to read the story yet.
If you like a book with an ending keep moving.
I'll start this by saying that I don't like mysteries but I do like Rosamund Pike so I though I'd read this before the movie was released. I only got 1/3 through the book before I wished both main characters were dead.Too wordy.
Ugh. Why is this book so popular?  I don't get it.  I didn't care about either character and didn't care who killed whom.  I didn't relate to anyone at all.  Some friends said she killed him, some said she didn't.  I don't care.
Why would you write about such sick creatures? Although this has been on the best seller list, I have yet to talk with anyone who liked it. It is a throw away. I like to read something informative and uplifting - this is not it.
I wanted to love this book.  I wanted to LIKE this book.  The writing is great.  The story is AWFUL.  I am including Spoilers, FYI.The man, Nick, is kind of a pushover, I didn't find him to be this horrible or crazy jerk like some of the other reviews implied.  He was just a guy that pretty much found out that him and his wife were not compatible, and went and did a jerky thing.The woman, Ann... SHE IS CRAZY.  Finds out the husband is cheating, stalks the couple (okay, understandable).  Plots, for MONTHS, to frame him for murder.  Sets the stage, and OH YEAH, actually INTENDS TO KILL HERSELF to just drive the framing of the man home.  She manipulates all these people, ends up murdering someone herself when she changes her mind, and then everything works out in the end DESPITE her.  That is crazy, the fact that this is a best-seller disturbs me.Seriously, the writing is pretty good, I did not suspect the husband ever, though (I felt like the wife just walked out because the guy was so unhappy which implied that she was unhappy, too).  The story is AWFUL and the ending is ABSURD.
It's possible that this is the worst book I have ever read.  Smug, with a plot so contrived it seems ridiculous, tied up with characters that aren't worth spitting at.  So, so bad.  If this book were a person I would slap it.
Preposterous plot and truly unlikeable characters. What a waste of my time.I read a book a week and have never been impelled to write a negative review.Disliked this book so much I removed it from my Kindle.
I know I'm probably one of the few who will say this but I couldn't pay attention to this book.  To much blah blah blah and took too long describing ever little nuance and thought.  Just dragged and I couldn't  stay with it.
Did not like this book. Don't like the fact that each chapter was the opposite persons point of view...was never a story of both together. Then the ending was stupid. Actually, made me angry that I wasted my time reading it.
The writing was amateurish, the characters were ridiculous caricatures, and the last third of the book is a hurried, undeveloped, simplistic mess.I kept waiting for this book to get better, despite my gut instinct that I liked neither the main characters, nor the author's writing style.  Unfortunately, the ""big surprise"" really isn't that unexpected and every opportunity to develop this novel into a great read seemed to slip by.In all honesty, it felt like it was a non-edited version of a writer's workshop crime novel.  This cannot be what passes for good fiction today, right?I'd give it zero stars if I could.
Part I is extremely slow moving and trivial.Part II is still slow and boring but it does offer some character development.Part III is good.Skip Part I and just read the last two parts and, it's an ok book.
Not my style of storytelling. Too convoluted.
It was the worst book I ever readCyndee
Only read a couple chapters......too boring!!
A unrealistic fiction. A total waste of time.
Didn't like this book or either character.  There are many other quality books to pick from.  Keep looking, don't choose this one.
This book had a horrible ending. Where's the justice?? It  scary to think someone could actually get away with this type of crime.
I hated this book.  She was a totally manipulative person and not the kind of person I like and want to be around.  I read it because it was my book club book of the month otherwise I would never have gotten through it!
The storyline was interesting and compelling.  However, the language was awful.  I consider any author who has to resort to the constant use of such bad words lacks the vocabulary to be an excellent or even good writer.
Pathetic ending. He killed, she killed. I want to kill myself after reading this book. I don't get it. I thought for sure that my copy was missing pages. I feel a little dumber for having read it. Waste of time & money!
The ending was terrible!!!
Slow read, strange ending.
I did not like this book at all.quit it many times.but as i paid for it, i eventually finished. The whole story was a mess, and i hate it when they keep jumping from one to another.  She just is not my style of writer.
would not read anything else by this person.
Not what I expected. Extremely disappointed.
Just awful. B-grade American psycho-rubbish.
When I started the book, I found it quite interesting and unique. The ending feels like a gotcha.  Hated it,  I would not reccomend this book to anyone.  I feel like I need to shower to get the awful ending off of me.
Is there less than one star? Oh how I hated this book. I figured out the entire plot on the 10th page! The characters were one-dimensional and just awful people. I have no idea how this book became such a phenomenon.
Language was so foul, it was almost unbearable to read.  There was nothing admirable about the two main characters.  The only reason I finished reading it was I couldn't imagine the ending of a story so convoluted.
Absolutely disliked this book.  It was trash and I could not believe it was on the best seller list.  Would not recommend it.
After all the hype I was excited to read this book but I was very disappointed with how the story ended. Not worth your time.
The story started out well but the more I read the more I realized what is he leading up to until I decided that was it gave up shut the book and could read no more why was a movie made of this book good question
Predictable, Awful. I can't believe I spent money on this. I'm so disappointed! It took a while to get into, and then halfway through, I predicted the outcome, and it was pretty much the worst ending ever!!! ugh.
horrible ending...maybe the movie is better
I didn't like it, just couldn't get into it
I have nothing good to say about this book!
The use of the ""F"" bomb in every sentence made the book almost unreadable. Make me think the author has a limited vocabulary. Story line was good,not overly believable,but choice of vocabulary ruined it.
Unfortunately I am one of a few I guess who totally disliked this book. It was hard to grasp what was actually happening and the ending was terrible. I skipped a lot of the nerative as it was to wordy and slow.
This book had a good beginning and middle to get you interested, but the f word was was not needed every paragraph. So I tried to ignore it and kept reading... What a mistake ....awful ending and waste of time
Didn't care at all for this, hurts to turn the page but yet I continue to, rambling of dysfunction.Finally listened to my inner self and put the book down. What a waste of time I'll never get back.
At first, I was engrossed in the book. There is a lot of suspense which drew me in. Soon it became evident that the author was just a suspense junky. Why try and develop any characters when you can just make everyone crazy?The main character is so unlikeable after the first section I wished I could reach into the pages and shake her. After the initial twist when you find out what time of person she really is, everything is quite predictable.People had compared this book to She's Come Undone by Wally Lamb. I was intrigued since that is one of my favorite books. There is no comparison. Wally Lamb has great character development and the reader begins to sympathize with even the most undesirable characters. Gone Girl cannot be compared. This was a waste of my time. I cannot believe so many people like this book. Then again, people enjoy Harlequin Romance novels, so I guess I shouldn't be surprised.If you want to finish a book and be frustrated and annoyed, this is the book for you.
Never should have wasted the time and money on this one.  Total  waste I figured out in the first few chapters who did what and why. Not a believable  story.  The spoiled little rich girl and her pitty party.
Worst book I have ever read.  I don't know why I kept reading it until the end. I will try to skip the movie!!!!!Thanks
I thought the book would get better but it never really picked up. The ending wasn't at all what I thought it would be...
Trash
Awful
Now that anyone can have a blog and a public identity and share their message with the world, what would yours be?  I gravitate towards people who send a message of love and compassion.  Gillian Flynn, in Gone Girl, does just the opposite.  Gone Girl is filled with foul language, hatred, fear, shallow characters, and derogatory material towards both women and men.  While all of these elements can be used to great effect in literature, skilled writers generally use them as a counterpoint to some other message, or to accurately portray a character or time period.  In the case of Gone Girl, these elements are the message.  There are no likable characters in this book.  There is no redemption.Gone Girl is the story of Amy and Nick Dunne.  When Amy disappears on their fifth wedding anniversary, all evidence points to Nick as the murderer. Through multiple plot twists and shifts in narrative point of view Flynn keeps the reader guessing what happened.  As tempted as I was to give up on this book, I was also intrigued by Flynn's manipulation of the plot.  I was curious to see if the book (and characters) could redeem themselves in the end.  I needn't have bothered, and neither should you.  The ending was worse than all the rest of the book put together.If you are still on the fence about reading Gone Girl, then know that Ms. Flynn spent much of her writing career as a journalist for Entertainment Weekly.  This may explain why the characters act like spoiled rich people who are completely out of touch with what it is that makes us human. Don't waste your time on Gone Girl - there are thousands of excellent books out there that will teach you something about the real world, books that will test the limits of your compassion and stretch your brain with new ideas.
I don't even have the words to describe how much this book aggravated me. The ending was so anti-climatic that I regret reading the book.  Maybe the movie will be better..but I just don't see that happening.
Dissatisfied with the story......Evil wins.......couldn't reccomed with any confidence.....know I am in the minority....but that is how I viewed it.......also is the cursing really important to the story????
Slow read with an ending that disappoints.
A psychotic novel about a very sick woman.
Well written raunchy story. I 30% into it the first time & quit due to its foul imagery. At the encouragement of a friend, tried again & made it to 50%, only to give up for good. It's simply a ""dirty"" book.
The only reason I will give this book one star is because I couldn't put it down through most of it. Unfortunately it had the worst ending of any book I have ever read. I'm sorry I wasted my time and money'
this book came looking like someone read it while wiping their peanut butter sandwich fingers on the cover and the pages themselves look warped, like they got wet. can't even use it not as a Christmas gift.
Horrible ending. Waste of time. A lot of errors throughout the book. It's unfathomable and an utter disappointment. Wish I could get my money back. I mean, I seriously can't believe I paid for this idiocy.
I read a lot of fiction.  Gone Girl was so hyped before the release and seems to be selling very well.  I am unsure how I got through it.  The story plot line has been in todays news so it is a real topic fictionalized (I hope) - wife disappears - husband main suspect (look at those unrelated Petersons).  The book does switch between different time periods (I personally do not mind when an author does that as long as the transitions are smooth - I didn't like the tranistions in the book).  The case of the missing wife is built against the husband but I just wasn't buying it - it was piled on and on and got annoying.  I wasn't surprised with much of the story - it was predictable which not having read another book by this author, it shouldn't have been.  Another big problem I had with the book is I didn't like 1 single character, no one was sympathetic - they were mean, selfish, completely self-centered and completely unrelatable.  And the relationship between brother and sister was creepy.
If you rated this higher than I did, then you never have read Connelly or Sanford!  I read another of her books and felt the same way!  If you like this type plot try Louis Bayard, he has style and class!
Drivel, pure and simple!
I am so mad that I spent $12.99 on this book. I have had to re read the first 20 pages several times and still can't get into it. Save your money and frustration and go buy two or three enjoyable books.
That was the worst ending to a book ever!
it was a weird story - very disappointed.
Plodding. Predictable. Disappointing read
It started out OK but by the time I finished it, I was sorry I ever read it.  It seemed to go on forever -too wordy. It wasn't my type of book as I don't like depressing or mentally sick stories.
I personally did not enjoy this book at all , it took over half of the book to get into it & the ending was such a let down.Unfortunately it came highly recommended & I was really disappointed.
I have read books with bad endings and sad endings but this sick ending topped them all.  I actually felt sick when I finished this book.  This is the first and last book I will read by this author.
Stupid story. The plot and the story telling was jumping from the two main characters. There was far too much digressing from the story line. It was the worst put together story telling I have read.
This is one of the most depressing books I have ever read. Yes, I understand that marriage can have its bumps, and I also understand people can be crazy, but this was a no win situation.  Very sad.
This book is crazy. I can't believe I read the whole thing. I guess I kept waiting for something to happen that made sense. There was no closure at the end. It left me feeling like ""What the heck!
I realize, that this book is waste of my time after 1/4 of this book. In this book is nothing, what can I catch it and read to the end. I don not understand, that this book is the bestseller.
The events in this story strained credulity, even for a work of fiction.I share other reviewers' opinion the ""resolution"" was very unsatisfying.Definitely not my cup of tea.
The descriltion made the book sound fast paced and exciting and it was anything but,i thought it was really stupid and i cannot understand why it is on the best books list,Amazon i cannot trust u!
Very disappointing, a waste of my time:(
I could not get interested in this book.
Did not particularly care for this book.
didn't like it, skipped thru most of it.
Very hard to hold interest in this book.
Good start but truly poor ending. Avoid.
I read this through to the end because I finish everything I start and hung on to the notion that the end would somehow make it worthwhile - it DIDN'T.  Will probably be a Hollywood blockbuster.
I really wanted to like this book but I just couldn't and the ending is terrible. I had no sympathy for either of the protagonists and it felt like I was reading a bad Hollywood script proposal.
For being on the best selling list for so long figured it must be good.  Cannot perceive how it  ever got there.
I never finished this book, because I just could not identify with the characters or the story. I very rarely become so disinterested with a book that I just stop reading it. Gone Girl is one.
While this book was very easy to read, it was disturbing. The story was very unnerving. The writing was simple and the plot just kept getting more and more unbelievable. I do not recommend it.
What? The book started off slow, and I'm a fast reader (I mean I read trilogies in two days) and then the middle got great but this ending? I'm not sure how this made the ny Times best seller
The story was okay however I did not enjoy any of the characters. The energy radiating from this book is dark and creepy. I feel like I need to scrub my mind.  Not a recommended read from me.
Only 1/3 of the book was worth reading.
To slow not very good incredible ending
Yes, the ending was very disappointing.
To disjointed overall at the beginning.
Terrible!!!  Was great till the ending.
terrible cant believe they made a movie
Read about 3-4 chapters, terrible book.
Sorry to disagree but this was a waste of my reading time. I thought the story line went nowhere and the ending was awful.  I would not recommend it to any of my friends who read regularly.
Horrible ending and I disliked a lot of Amy's diary. Could have been written a lot better and more creative ending. I feel cheated and I feel like I wasted my precious time on this book.
Did not enjoy this book.  Waste of my time. The start of the book was slow and hard to follow only to turn into having the reader become interested only to then leave the reader hanging!
First, let me say this is my first time ever writing a review, however I felt compelled to do so after reading this book. I am a mom of two small kids. I never have time to myself but I heard about this book and took the time to read it and am so disappointed that I wasted my very limited spare time on this book. I was so in to this book I could not put it down and was anticipating the ending as I could not wait to see what happened in the end. Well what I got was a whole lot of disappointment. I mean the beginning and middle are fantastic but the ending of this book is pointless and leaves you wondering what the author was even thinking. Horribly written ending with no resolution.  The last 20 pages I was saying something better happen here and when it didn't, I couldn't believe this book ever made the best seller list. Horrible, Flynn...horrible. Would never read another one of your books!
Not a bad book.Well written with lots of twists but the ending was anti-climatic and a huge disappointment.I hear the movie ends the same but it sounds better than the book.
This was a very exhausting book.  I  just wanted this book to be over. It wore me out emotionally.  I can't figure out why the ratings were good for this book. I would not recommend it.
Did not enjoy at all.  Hard to finish.
Totally unsatisfying & terrible ending
to slow --decided to read another book
It started off slow and ended horribly
Actually I resisted awarding one star.
How can anyone like a book where the most distasteful character ever gets the last word and thinks she has won? At least it was a quick read so I didn't lose too much of my life to it.
My wife bought this on my account so that she could read it when we went on a long flight to Asia. She could only get half way through it. I wish I knew how to return a kindle book...
Could not believe I was at the end.  The book did remain 86 percent complete.  I am sure the author is a lovely person, but I was very disappointed at the way the story just stopped.
I did not like the language or sex acts.  A very disturbing book that I would never have chosen to read.
Poor writing, poor story line, too much repeating.  Why is this a best seller?  Not a good book at all.
Stupid--made no sense--waste of time.
I didn't like the ending of the story
Well written but just a bizarre book.
this book had lots of twists and turns, however I was not impressed with the story line. So many people have recommended this book to me, and i am not on board with all the hype.
This book was so boring that I couldn't even read it. I had to stop and a couple of week later pick it up again. The ending was also awful.The 2nd worst book I ever read.
The ending was horrible. Like the author ran out of steam or brains or anything.or was thinking gee if I want a movie,,I better have an ending where patrons walk out disgusted.
Early on it was easy to tell Amy was still alive and had planned something. I just didn't know how sick and twisted it was.  There. are better books.  Better stories than this.
Decent original premise,but changes his mind about the direction several times without cohesion. Unsatisfying, unbelievable and  unsympathetic characters--wanted them all dead.
Not a book I would recommend at all.
Uninvolving throughout, dire ending.
I can't get this to sync on my phone
So much hatred for this book.  Only decent uses for this miserable attempt at a novel...1. Kindling2. Wiping my a$$...worth risking a paper cut buttWell that about sums it up.  This book sucks.  For many, many technical reasons that I don't even have the time to begin to delve into.  Having read a review that claims the ""twists"" in this book are reminiscent of Hitchcock...not only is he rolling over in his grave, but he is single handedly orchestrating a zombie apocalypse in order to bury that critic along with Flynn.  All the trees that have been turned into this pile of gypsy poo...I weep for you.Oh.  So you framed me for your murder then killed that other guy and made us a jizz rag baby?  Well ok then here's my balls to keep in your handbag next to your dagger and the jar the contains my soul.
The book is a very slow read in the beginning. It get good in the middle and then just winds up being about a mentally abusive wife manipulating her husband. Horrible ending.
I gave up on this book.  Too slow moving and introspective.  I didn't like the any of the characters.  I know its made best seller lists ... why is a complete mystery to me.
Not well written with a ridiculous story plot.  At first, I was very intrigued and then the story really got ridiculous and unbelievable.  The ending was just really stupid.
i know! let's flip it this way. i know! let's flip it that way!  i know! let's make her xxxx. (spoiler removed) i know! let's make him xxx. (spoiler removed)  gimme a break.
I would never read a book by this author ever again. When I first started reading the book I was bored. All the little tiny details and all the never ending ramblings. It just dragged on with little to no excitement. I continued to read the book only because I was curious about what really happened to Amy. But I felt like I had to force myself to keep reading. It did FINALLY get interesting in the second part of the book. But by that point I had already wrote this author off. I was intrigued by the plot and then was really eager to find out how Amy would get caught. And then she didn't and then the book just ended. Like the author ran out of ideas. All I could say when I finally reached the end was ""WHAT?! That was the stupidest ending there ever could be!"" That sums up in one word what I think of this book - Stupid.
There were so many clever things the author could have done with the set up of the plot but she chose to throw all those options away. I'm sorry I wasted my time and money.
Liked the book until the end. No one should get away with murder. No innocent child should have a psychotic mother who is a cold blooded murderer.  Very disappointing read.
Stupid plot. Hope movie was better.
It Was to in believable at the end.
very disappointing, terrible finish
It left you with too many unknowns!
I'll NEVER read any other book by this Gillian Flynn.  The book felt like pages were missing from the end, I even went back to check.. It was a waste of time and money!
This novel started out well, but the characters had no redeeming qualities as the story progressed.  The resolution was hard to take.  I found it to be a waste of time.
I found this book to be long winded and both far fetched and predictable.It dragged on and on and the ending was dreadful. Give your readers a bit more substance.
I guess at first I was intrigued by the plot, completely thrown off by the ending with the exception of Nick's line ""because every day you have to wake up and be you.
I really looked forward to reading this and finished it quickly. No likeable characters, terrible ending, and just not what I expected. Anyways, don't waste your time.
Very boring in the beginning. The middle had me interested and then seems to end as odd as the entire book. I would not recommend this book. Will not see the picture.
After reading this book I actually wonder what all the talk was about. Hated the ending. Absolutely hated it!  I work in a book store and I never recommend this book.
It took me forever to get into this book and then I did and then it went on and on and on. I kept reading because I could not wait to see how it ended. Disappointed!
The main male character is irritatingly predictable, and annoying,  the ""cops"" are also.  I can't even force myself to get through this book, it's god-awful.
Too many fulgar words.and actions.
I could not stand it pass 50 pages
I found this book very depressing.
Did not enjoy, maybe movie better.
Interesting storyline....Horrible, Filthy language. The Actions of the characters were morally disturbing. Definitely not appropriate for young adults or teens.
Popular book, too graphic for us.
Very difficult to get interested.
Ending was such a disappointment!
did not care for the plot, period
Boring and lifeless.  I kept waiting for some semblance of a mystery.  I wish that I had seen a negative review before I picked up this dreadfully awful book.
Started well; ended pointlessly. Too bad. Could have been great, but was merely as if the author couldn't figure out where to go with the story and gave up.
Like music can set your mood, reading novels enters moods and ideas into your head. This book contained ideas I do not want in my head- I didn't finish it.
I hated this book. I hated the main characters who were both horrible people and I was angry when I finished the book that I had wasted my time reading it.
Twists and turns that keep you hooked...I was ready to recommend this to everyone I know until the book neared the end. Now I can say....I hated this book!
There is no happy ending there is only a christened couple that hat/ lobe each other.  Ok So I can live without a happy ending but the ending is just sick.
Awful, irritating, ridiculous.  The ending was bad but it was a bad ending to a bad story - if you can call rambling nonsense and idiocy a ""story.
I did not enjoy this book enough to even finish it!  Horrible!  Unknown authors just can't hold my interest, perhaps because they don't know how to write.
Unable to get intere s ted in it
Great storyline - stupid ending.
I am not sure what all the hype is about this book which is supposed to be better than the movie. I will definitely save the money and not see the movie.
Very slow to start with but I did make it to the end but the two main characters were so horrible I didn't really care what happened to them in the end!
Boring and slow. I actually skipped pages looking for anything exciting. Did not like any of the characters  nothing about the characters were relatable
What a complete and utter waste of time.  The first 1/3 of this novel is ""teenage girl silly"".  The last 1/3 is beyond impossible.  I suppose it's a ""girl book"" but shame on any critic who alledges this to be a good read for any intelligent person.I read about 200 books a year and my friends tease me about what an easy critic I am.  It is extremely rare for me to be so disgusted.
I did not like this story line.
I wasn't fond of the story line
the writing was tight but the subject was just a total waste.  I guess I just don't care for such destructive dysfunctional characters in my books.
Got the sample read and just didn't get hooked so tried audible. Just kept falling asleep and going back to relisten. 5 stars for replacing ambien.
I agree with the one star reviews.  To accept this absurd story and ending the author was trying to shock us. It was an insult to our intelligence.
i dsliked this entire book.. this story was not written well at all.  very predictable and the ending was even more predictable. bad writing period
Anything interesting or clever in this is completely undone by the ending.  It's so bad it rendered the rest of the book a complete waste of time.
Couldn't get to the end fast enough. Vulgar writing style. Sorry I wasted my weekend reading it. Don't know if I'll bother with seeing the movie.
Could not get through the first two chapters.  The male character is so obviously written by a woman that I did not find this character credible.
Ditto as all the other "" I'd give it no stars if I could""  What a ridiculous waste of money and time. It's in the paper recycle bin now.
People whose taste I like enjoyed this book, but I couldn't.  I want that time back.  I don't really even want to use more seconds to write this.  Ben Affleck perfectly cast though.  Stony.  Unemotional.  Dull.
I read 2 Chapters and gave up.
Very disappointed in ending!!!
good story, disappointing end.
Worst book I ever read.  Author couldn't figure out how to end the story, so she just quit, midstream. That is not being creative. It is lazy.
Loved the way the book started; grabbed your attention right away!  The characters were interesting, the writing  was good.  I had downloaded the sample on my Kindle and was intrigued enough to purchase the book but, boy, did I get taken!!  Once it got to the middle, it seems to have gone off the tracks.  The characters became almost cartoonish, the story became ridiculous and completely unbelievable.  The ending was almost bizarre, as though the author just threw up her hands and wanted to finish writing quickly so she put down anything.  A HUGE disappointment!  Felt I threw away my money!  Will NOT buy anything else from this author.Pat in Southern CA
This story is laced with betrayal, manipulation, and sadism. Definitely is not a feel good story and made me feel disgusted after reading it.
Cant believe I stuck with it to the end and wasted all the time when I could of been reading a good book.  The ending was a slap in the face.
Filled with filthy language often for no reason except to be there. Lying and deception was the norm. The. Book has no value for the reader.
I have never read such a sick book and struggled all the way through - the author's mind must be completely addled to think up such rubbish.
This book was given to me as a birthday present and I really tried, but . . .The rest of the one star reviews say it all!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
All these twists and turns and complicated issues all wrapped abruptly in a pretty little bow. I'd like the time back I wasted reading this.
This book is one of the best for 2012? I wish I didn't bother. If you love miserable people who live in a resentful world, you'll love this.
I hadn't read Gillian Flynn before Gone Girl,  and did not know anything about the story plot beforehand.  I read the book for my book club and after finishing it sat and thought about the terrible moral implications of the decisions made by the ""hero.""  How sad that this book, which is so popular, is about psychological abuse, murder and blackmail with no consequences suffered by the perpetrators.  I can truly say I will not be reading any more of Ms Flynn's books. There are too many real selfish, delusional, murderous and psychotic people in this world who never pay for their actions without having to read about them as entertainment.
I did not like the voulgarity
Worst book I have ever read!!
It's a hard book to put down!
Wish i could return this book
Read book and then saw movie.
I did not care for this book.
Too much F-word for my taste.
it was dumb, but I did finish it,  hoping it would change, it had a bad ending too, first book from Kindle choices I did not enjoy, sorry
This is a well written totally dark book.  I didn't like either character and the thought of them raising an innocent child is monstrous.
Drawn out and predictable. Weak character development. Total snoozer. Only finished it to be sure I wasn't missing something. I wasn't!
Never connected with any of the characters.  Hated them all.  Never felt the build-up or the tension the story should have had.  Awful!
Started out great and then just got depressing.  Sorry I just couldn't get past all the profanity and anger from both main characters.
I only finished the book to see what could happen and I was very disappointed with that also..and then called my friend to tell her...
I was very disappointed in this book, and cannot believe it was rated so highly. The story is odd, the characters are odd, and it has a very odd ending. I know 3 other people who read this book and didn't like it either. I have seen the author on all the talk shows promoting her book, and hear all the ooo's and aaaws, but this book is strange.
This book was just weird and I hated the ending. I wanted him to be free of the wife in the end and for her crazy self to go to jail.
This book started out good, got bogged down and was slow in the middle, and then picked up toward the end.  But (the dreaded but...), the big disappointment was the ending.  Not every book has to have a ""rosy"" ending, but this book ended horribly.  My immediate thought as I finished the book was ""now that was a big waste of time.""  It was as if I had a bad taste in my mouth for awhile after finishing the book.  I have read books before that I didn't care for, but could understand the hype.  This book, I don't understand the hype at all.  I'm much relieved that the book I am reading now is wonderful -- just what I needed.
Didn't like the book at all.
Did not receive this book !!
Good read. End disappointing
Worst ending I've ever read.
Hated the ending  it dragged
This not my kind of book its all over the place.I cant seem to even remember what it was about,would not buy this author again
Seriously???  That story line was completely imposable far out reaching. What a complete waste of my time and energy. Ridiculous!!!
Not worth the time.  You know that you're reading fiction but the story line is so ridiculous it's comical.  Like a bad soap opera.
First 2/3rds of the book were intriguing, last 1/3 was irritatingly stupid!  Come on "" best book ever ""  I don't think so.
The style of writing was confusing and aggravating.  I stopped reading half way through the book.  I was very disappointed in it.
Gone Girl: Very slow and not much of a plot.  Unfortunately this is the first book I read by this author and now I am turned off.
I read this book because I had seen that it was rated as one of the best sellers right now. Also, I had seen that other friends had read it as well. I was very disappointed in the book though. The story itself was very interesting and kept me reading but the ending made me not want to recommend it. It is hard to read a book and then come to the end and feel as if the entire book was not worth reading. The author did a terrible job of creating an ending that tied up the book and I have a hard time believing many others would disagree. I was very disappointed in this book and would not recommend it.
Really disliked the ending.
A dear friend of mine sent me this book and I really thought it was going to be good.  It started out pretty good than got even better with Amy's story and then boom! It crashed downhill big time.I can honestly say I never liked or had any sympathy for any of the characters. Amy herself was beyond hateful. Nick was not quite as bad, but certainly had his flaws.It read as if the author did not know where to go with the story and just wrapped it all up in a cheap shot.The ending was a huge disappointment. Was this the Rosemary's Baby for the new millennium?
Book took several chapters to discover whatwas going on and then went downhill fromthere. Did not enjoy at all.
This book was highly recommended to me by the owner of my favorite bookstore.  She warned me that I may not like some of the characters, but I assured her that if the story were good, I was good with that.  She failed to mention an even bigger offense--the book had no real ending.  Throughout the entire back and forth between the two narrators they hint, and allude, and coyly promise bigger things to come.  The book is full of moments when one of the two main characters subtly drops a morsel into the narrative, and it made me eager to find out what it meant, what was next?  Each chapter gets more intricate, and I kept thinking that she would have to come up with something mind-blowing to cover all of the twists and turns that the book unveils.  You can imagine how horribly disappointed I was with the ending that wasn't.  The ending was flat out RIDICULOUS!!!  It was not in keeping with the characters, their motives, and it was sorely lacking any comeuppance.  In short, don't bother--a fairly intriguing premise was ruined by a pathetic ending.
I heard that the movie was really good so I got the book.  It is taking me forever to read it because it is really boring.
Interesting, but the characters were so disagreeable that whether they lived or died made little difference to this reader
I think I'm done reading Gillian Flynn books, this one was a waste of time with an ending that ""wasn't"". VERY DISAPOINTING
I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone. It plan sucked. All the media hype for nothing  .please don't waste your money.
I wanted to like this book but it started out kind of slow to me...then it became somewhat predictable...then I debate just stopping but rule that out because, ""it has to get better since it has been so highly rated & recommended right?"" How wrong was I! After finishing it I am just mad I spent the time to read this...such a horrible ending...although not predictable...but maybe that's because most authors, I would think, would want to give a satisfying ending for their readers!! It didnt even have to be one a reader would be rooting for completely...just anything other than that!A few days later...OK, I was a little upset right after putting the book down. I still think this book is a stinker, but after thinking about it more...it's not the ending per say. It's the characters. I could not identify or like a single one of them if I tried. Including the diary entries. And when you don't like any of the characters how can you like any ending? I still would never recommend this book. Save the $10 and the time....
This book had me interested, even figuring out the who dunnit until the 49% point on my Kindle. I should have stopped there. The rest of the book was a huge disappointment and the ending was lame. This is one of the few times I ever felt like I wasted my time reading.  I almost feel like it was 2 different writers or written at two different times. The first section is tight and all of the pieces made sense. The second section does not tie to together and the characters become moronic. I don't recommend this book for anyone and wouldn't even lend it someone.
I mean really, who lives their lives like this????  I was so disappointed in the ending that I was then mad I spent all my time reading the book in the first place.
I have no idea why this book got such rave reviews.  The writing is mediocre.  The story is predictable.  Don't bother.
Long winded drawn out, I skipped to the middle and then to the end, not a book I would recommend, just not a good read.
Wow, I can't believe this book made it to the 'Best Seller' list and is being made into a movie.  It was a really warped story about two pathetic people and their very dysfunctional families. I have to believe that many of the five-star reviews are written by marketing people from the book companies that create interest for not-so-great stories like this one.From the beginning the writing style drove me crazy.  It was like being in someone's head hearing what each of the two main characters were thinking.  Plus all the (writing in parenthesis) throughout the book made me crazy.  This isn't storytelling, it's a dialogue from two really sick and dysfunctional people.About a third of the way through I was so disgusted I skipped to the end of the book.  The ending is absurd ! !  I can understand why the writers of the movie decided to change the ending.I wish I could get a refund for this thoroughly disgusting book.  After attempting to read this garbage, there is no way I'd waste money seeing the movie.
Picked it up by accident but couldn't put it down. Thrilling, intelligent, tight plot.best read in a really long time.
After finishing the book I felt manipulated by the author.  I like twists and turns in the plot but not zigs and zags.
One of the worst books I read...not one redeeming character! Bad plot... Wish I would not have believed the reviews...
Wait, what? Did the secretary who fetches coffee for the actual author write the end of this book?The beginning was slow. I kept reading because everyone claimed the movie was great so I figured the book had to be even better. The middle was entertaining and twisted. I was enjoying the story line and held out hope that Nick would be wiped clear of the accusations and framing done by Amy, and that Amy would finally suffer the consequences of the framed murder and actual murder. What I didn't expect was for her to somehow impregnate herself with lab semen and they become a big happy twisted family.We're supposed to believe the cops, the sister and Desi's mom just didn't care anymore that she framed Nick and killed Desi? We are to accept no justice served to Amy for the made-up stalking, rape, and beatings from her high school friend and boyfriend? Where is the rest of the book? I feel like either the author checked out or there should've been a sequel to finish this twisted tale.
Just can't bring myself to read more than a few pages at a time and have lost interest in Gone Girl by Gillian Flynn.
Too much filthy language.
A lousy novel ... I thought I would never finish it.  Why spend the time on a thououghly unlikable hero and heroing.
Worst book ever. Not just the ending, but the writing. Filled with annoying theatrical metaphors.  Waste of my time.
This was the most disjointed book I have ever read.  I'm glad to see I'm not the only one who didn't like this book.
I liked it until the last 20 or so pages.  In fact, I disliked the ending so much that I was sorry that I read it.
Worse book I ever read the woman was as crazy as a bed bug to put it nicely should have spent a dime on. The book
Although I think Flynn is a talented writer, I thought this story was terrible! Very disappointed with this book!
This book was too long & reading it was a waste of time. I kept reading hoping it would get better but never did.
this book is on the best seller list, but I did not like it. Did not like the fowl language and hated the ending.
I had a real hard time getting into girl gone. I like books that grab me from the beginning.It was dissapointing.
Interesting story, very vulgar.  I will not read another book by this author.  My friends did not like it either
After reading the reviews, I thought this would be a worthwhile book.  Nope, not at all. Don't waste your money.
WHAT A WASTE OF MY TIME.
Crass. Terrible writing.
This book is not for me.
Didn't keep my interest.
I got a soft cover book.
Did not like the ending.
Was not my favorite book
Really hard to get in to
Did not really enjoy it.
Didn't like at all.  Found it boring  and to much changing from one person to another. do not recommend at all.
Wasted my time, hated the ending. Why is this going to be a movie? Don't read unless you like depressing books.
This could have been a great book, but the language is so vulgar it made me feel disgusted!  Very dissapointed.
Story of 2 amoral people , who manage to garner publicity and entrap some good people in their messed up lives.
There was too much of the F bomb.  The story did not hold my attention.  It also was unbelievable and a downer.
Terrible book. Do NOT waste your time or money. I read a lot of books and this one is one of the worst, ever!
it was long and drawn out and no one even attempted to solve amy's whole story even though it  was so absurb.
So this is where we have gone to entertain.  Destruction of the male and roboting the female.  In the end it is nothing more than the dime store romance,just a little bit more involved.  Very well written just so dehumanizing.  The author needs a good dose  of Anna Kaenina then some Bronte.  It still comes down to are humans either good or evil in the core.  This book chooses evil then raps it in fake reality.  How sad that our entertainment must now shock and awe rather than caress and glow..
Was hard to get into.  It seemed to move back and forth.  Used the F word way too much.Not recommended
Very hard to keep up switch from one line in story to another.  Just a dumb ending would not rate this book.
The hype? I expected a well written- good read with characters. This book is a mess. Why make this a movie?
Not much to write about.  I will finish but................what a drag it just goes on and on and on and on
The book is so bizarre.  A side of human nature that i do not want to ever consider polluting my brain with
This was the worst book I have ever read. This book was a waste of time. I would not recommend it to anyone
It has an idiotic plot.
disappointed at the end
Not my favorite reading
Shallow, obvious. Kind of a waste of time. Took me forever to get through it, I just kept putting it down.
I found it hard to read and follow at times.  Plot was scary and upsetting.  I cannot recommend this book.
I had debated about purchasing this book and should have listened to my gut.  I am not a fan of Gone Girl.
This book is terrible. It is boring, it is not well written (from a reader's point of view. Not worth 2.99
Interesting concept for a story, but not one that I would ever purchase again -- get it from the library!
I can’t believe that I spent almost $13.00 on this book. Is there a full refund or an exchange available?
This is an abomination to writers and movie producers. Not only is this movie badly directed, badly written, but it was badly acted! The actors in the movie were bland and couldn't act their way out of a wet paper bag. I felt like I was watching a high school play it was so bad. The movie is drawn out, bland, boring, and how it got as good a rating as it did just shows how stupid, how easily amused, and how tasteless people have become. It's amazing how many people rated this movie over Transcendence. In fact I can say this is probably one of the worst movies I have seen in a very long time. Everything in the movie sounded, felt, and projected itself as fake and bland... If I could I would literally burn the master copy and leave this as a book and not a movie. I feel the movie has destroyed the book... Anyways people wake up! This is crap! Who paid the people to rate this movie as even good?!
If you want a shred of positivity/happiness left in you, then try to avoid this novel/movie by all means
Reading this book was a total waste of my time. I wish I had the time back and this book out of my mind.
It had some intrigue at first but lost it along the way. I finished it only by skimming my way through.
Have read so many more books better than this one! ""Revenge"" on TV is so much better than reading this!
Boooring - I should have known better since it was written by a female author I was not familiar with.
It started out well but the ending is so lame!  The author could have done a better story line ending!
Twisted and unexpected
Didn't like the ending
Worst ending possible.
It is terrible writing
I did not like this book, I just don't understand all of the hype at all.  The story is weak at best.
This story lacks of the literary coherence that makes a novel a work of art or just a good book. It seems that Flynne knows a lot about how to hook reader's attention. In fact gone girl is just a sequence of special effects. Junk food for the spirit. After the first part I lost my pacience and jump from one paragraph to other skiping pages to get to the end. For those like me who still like a good story and appreciate an honest work, this is totally a fraud.
Can't believe I spent my time on 555 pages for that wimpy ending.  That is time I'll never get back!
Disliked it so much that I never finished it & gave the book away. That is a rare occurrence for me.
Do not, I repeat, do not waste one dollar or one minute of your life on this godawful mess of a book.  Horribly written, absurd plot, inane characters and utterly unworthy of your time.I feel real anger toward the author of this book for her apparent cynical and manipulative approach to writing and publishing.  It's as if she read an article entitled ""How to draw in the poor ignorant masses and make them think they're reading an intricately plotted mystery.... when all you've done is concoct a mishmash of characters and event without any meaning whatsoever.""  UGH!!!
I love a good mystery.  This wasn't one.  As a matter of fact it sounded like a defense lawyers dream for Drew Peterson, whose fourth wife is still missing while he is on trial for the murder of his third wife.  It is disgusting in dwelling on the sick mind of a missing woman and hardly the making of a good mystery. The one star is for the writing ability of the author, who may be able to write a good book in the future, but this is not it.
hated this book......
I did not care for it
hard for me to follow
hard to get into it..
It was such a slow read.  I hope I like the ending. This is irritating.  I want to read the end
Found it to be without substance.  I couldn't get thru it so maybe it improved toward the end.
This book was boring and a total waste of my time and money.  I would not recommend it at all!
the ending of this book is completely nonsensical.  the author was either confused or lazy.  hello??!!, how about the police ask if amy has recently been at the fertility clinic where the semen is being stored ?  why didn't nick show the frozen vomit to the police?  how do the police not put amy on trial for murder when they know that she lied about so many things in the past, and that everywhere she goes she claims people are stalking/assaulting her?  there is so much damning evidence against amy that the police totally dropping the case is not believeable.  a farfetched ending wouldn't cause me to write a review, but such lazy, silly writing warrants a warning to possible buyers of this horrible book.  how is this a best seller?  reality television has more intelligent plot development than gone girl.
I loved this book at first.  One of those that you don't want to put down.  It is a clever story and well written.  THEN YOU REACH THE END.  Did Ms. Flynn have someone else write the ending?  I have read books with lousy endings - but this is the ONLY book that the end made me ANGRY.  What a waste of time and potential.  I agree with others it seems Ms. Flynn did not take the time to make a proper ending.  It is not a matter of not liking the way it ended - it is the fact that the last two chapters are lazy writing.  Seems the author was more concerned with her editor's deadline than taking the time to make a complete story.  She should have shoved this into a drawer and waited for some inspiration.My advice - skip it.  If you must read it - purchase it second hand so you don't feel cheated.
I honestly don't understand the appeal of this book. How does it have 4 stars? Did I read a different version? While I have several issues with the book, the main one is that neither character is sympathetic or likable. You really don't care what happens to either one, which is a major flaw in a book dedicated mainly to what happens to the two lead characters. The plot ""twists"" are telegraphed early in the book and come as no surprise. And all that is before you get to the ending, which is even worse. The ending is so unrealistic & just plain bad that you are frankly frustrated you wasted your time reading it. This is my first review of a book on Amazon & I do not enjoy panning authors work, but when one has such high reviews & is such a disappointment, I feel the need to raise a red flag.
hard read.  very confusing.  maybe the movie is better but I returned this book after 1 day.
Ridiculous story with a very disappointing conclusion. As reader, I feel completely cheated.
Very confusing book to read. Did not like it one bit.  Just saw the movie and felt the same.
Sent me softcover :(
Disappointing ending
I don't understand how this book was chosen as one of the best books of 2012. I thought it was awful, and I'm really sorry I wasted my time and money on it.I figured out the ""big mystery"" very early in the game and just kept reading to find out how the author would manage to unravel the mess (not very well). The worst thing about this book was the characters. There was no one in the book to like, never mind to identify with. Each one was more disgusting and unpleasant than the other.This book seems to have benefited from a great deal of hype, and to my regret I fell into it as well. I'm going to read the reviews more carefully next time before reading something that is so highly touted. Interesting that it got more ""bad"" reviews on Amazon than on Goodreads!!!
I enjoyed the whole book until the end.  Worst ending ever.  I don't recommend it at all.
Nick is the cheating husband and Amy is the psycho princess and one of them should die. Unfortunately neither one dies and the author decided to write a ""psychological thriller"" and it just wasn't very thrilling or psychological to me. The book is written by flip-flopping between Amy and Nick narratives; after a few chapters I was truly tired of the format. I always finish what I start so I read the whole book. There was no big ending and no triumph of good over evil or evil over good (it sometimes happens). It was like someone slowly letting the air out of a tire - eventually the air's just gone kinda like the title.I'm an avid reader of mysteries and I read at least a book a week and I have to try different authors. This one didn't work for me.
There is a really good reason why almost 3,000 people gave this book one star.... it totally sucks!!!!!!! It starts out somewhat intriguing, and just goes downhill from there. By the end, I just felt sick. But hey, that's just me. If you like something thats totally depressing and has no redeeming value, have at it. Personally, I just wanted to take a shower and wash it right out of my brain!!!!
The worst book I have ever read. I could not stand the characters. Dysfunctional! Yuck!
_Gone Girl_ takes many of the little contemptible, cruel, careless, insensitive, and dull things that typical couples hurt each other with and amplifies them into a horrific and catastrophic symphony of loathing. I disliked the novel not because it was poorly written, but because it's not my kind of story. I suppose if it had been a hack novel, it wouldn't have upset me like this. So, I give Gillian Flynn high marks for crafting such despicable creatures. You may not mind protagonists who you can't love in any way, and you may find them interesting and intriguing because of their hateful behavior. If you do, I respect that, and it's likely you'll enjoy this well-crafted thriller. However, be prepared to put this book down with a nasty twist in your gut.
Gone Girl held my interest from the get-go. Cleaverly written with lots of twists. I couldn't put the book down!  And then the ending....... what can I say?  It was awful!  A HUGE disappointment.  Felt like you were cheated out of the cherry and whipped cream on a ice cream sundae!  I kept flipping through the pages of the acknowledgments thinking, if I turn the next page there will be something titled Epilogue or And Now the Conclusion.  I have never written a rewiew before but this book hit such a sour note with me that I needed to express to future readers how this ending will leave you feeling empty.  Read this book knowing you will be entertained only to have your climax come crashing down on you as you read, what you won't realize, is the ending.
Cynicism is easy...
not what I expected
Not my kind of book
Language too filthy
Won't bother reading another Gillian Flynn book. Who told this woman she could write?
A waste of time to read.  The movie has to be better but won't waste my $10 to see it
Imagine yourself with a huge bag of chips, open the bag and begin munching down... a few handfuls in you realize these chips aren't really so great, they are too greasy and way too salty. But your fingers are greasy and you can't seem to put the bag down so eat a few more handfuls. You aren't really enjoying the chips but again you can't seem to stop - your fingers are greasy anyway so you keep eating. Finally you look in the bag and it is almost empty and you are feeling sick to your stomach, your hands are greasy and there are crumbs all over your shirt. You do the only thing left to do - tilt the bag up and finish off the crumbs. You are left feeling sick, dirty and ashamed. That is what it feels like when you read Gone Girl.
I purchased this book (in a set of three by Gillian Flynn), because I was looking for a good Summer read, and most of the reviews for this were good - not to mention that they have made a movie.  The book started out good and I was intrigued... but the further I got into it, the more disappointed I became and although some of the details were surprising, I always had the feeling that Nick had nothing to do with Amy's disappearance.  The main problem I had was I didn't like either of the main characters.  The ending (or non ending) was very disappointing - I am left with the feeling that I forgot to finish reading.  I'm wondering if I will bother with the movie.... and am  hoping that the other two books in this set are better.
Very slow most of the beginning of the book.  Has a completely unbelievable ending.
Just did't like it
Worst ending ever!
The ending is lame
I'm not sure what I just spent the last 24 hours reading. One could argue that it must've been a good book since I was unable to put it down, but it's quite the opposite. I kept reading it, hoping the story would get better. That the characters would develop in a more thoughtful and cohesive way. All I can say is this book left me with the same feeling as a horror movie that ends with the main character waking up from a horrible dream. That the whole movie wasn't real. The back and forth of the two characters just started to annoy me a third into the book. I can say, though, that the author did a great job in creating a ""psycho bitch"" character, because boy, did I want to punch Amy by the end of the book.
Ms. Flynn chose a terribly unsatisfying ending.  If the ""bad guy"" gets to win, at least (in realistic fiction) make it believable.  It's as if even the author got tired of the unbelievable ""coexistence"" between Nick and Amy after her return.  It sure seemed like they got tired of it.  I thought the author wrote a great mystery, for the first half of the book, and the twist she created was awesome.  But having Amy always win, no matter what awful things she did, got very tiresome.  And I'm not sure who Ms. Flynn hangs out with, but I don't believe every character (and on nearly every page) would really use the f-word that much.  That detracted immensely from her writing and her story.
I didn't like the format and the language was unnecessary and the story sucked.
I would not recommend this to anyone.  I definitely would not go to the movie.
Hated the ending!
The author must be as sick as the characters. A waist of good reading time.
I didn't read it
garbage writing.
Hated the ending
Very bad ending.
Hated the ending
I love this book
Movie was better
Very tough read.
hated the ending
Such a let down.
Horrible
THE ONLY GOOD THING ABOUT THIS BOOK WAS I BOUGHT IT AT A USED BOOK STORE FOR SIGNIFICANTLY LESS THAN THE SALES PRICES ON AMAZON.BOOK WAS AT LEAST 100  PAGES TOO LONG.  COULD HAVE USED A COUPLE CHAPTERS TO SET UP ALL THE CHARACTERS THAT WOULD PLAY INTO STORY LATER.INSTEAD, AUTHOR KEEPS REPEATING THE SAME SUSPECT(S) CHARACTER DETAIL OVER AND OVER AND OVER AND OVER AND OVER AND OVER AND OVER...YOU GET MY DRIFT.I SKIMMED THROUGH MUCH OF THIS BOOK JUST TO GET TO NEW SCENARIOS IN THE STORY.  I THOUGHT THE ENDING WAS APPROPRIATE CONSIDERING HOW DYSFUNCTIONAL THE MAIN CHARACTERS ARE.
I was so mad at myself for reading this book against my better judgement,after all it's an Oprah book. I don't ever like her picks,so shame on me for going against my gut. The characters left me cold,couldn't warm up to them.First few chapters I knew it was a bust. He is a self centered man child and she was stupid to even be with him.Even though this is a familiar theme in some relationships,I had no desire to suffer through their doomed marriage and even less patience with their families.I disliked every character in this book. And the ending made me even more upset that I wasted my time on this empty novel.
This book left me wondering if the author was an angry, bitter woman with a chip on her shoulder toward men in general. And I am a woman. Her characters were completely selfish with no redeeming qualities. The graphic nature of it made me want to puke. So many other reviews were disappointed with the ending, but it was no surprise. Many of us have known some form of that couple. Yuck. This was my first, and last read from this author. I prefer something uplifting, rather than a crawl in the mud with the worst society has to offer. If this was the creation of her imagination, I'd rather not go there again.
THREE UNS: unreadable; unbearable; and unbelievable,UNreadable thanks to strange, overworked, and sometimes downright childish prose that distracted from a good story that could and should have been told with 60% less verbiage.UNbearable because of the boring plot and ludicrous characters plus all the hype created by big publisher's connections to craven book reviewers like Janet Maslin of NYTimes.UNbelievable for all of these reasons, especially the unrealistic plot and characters as well as the English major ""Look at me Mom, I'm a writer"" prose.
I might like th
Very slow read.
Terrible ending
A fun concept gone terribly wrong. Not a prude in any way but really what was point of the so much super crude language. It didn't fit the character and was distracting. But this author must have had a deadline. THe ending didn't exist...she apparently just stopped typing. Where was the editor?
It was a waste of my time.  I didnt like the style ir the content.
I forced myself to read this to the end, but only to finish and delete it from my bookshelf.I found the characters really unlikeable. The language was persistently offensive. There was nothing intriguing about the two protagonists.The plot twists were predictable. I kept reading, thinking it would become ... intriguing or redeeming.  But, it just showed a waste of humanity, both of them, ugly and weak or cruel. Just ugly.  I wish I had not read it to the end.  There was no insight or discovery or growth. Just even more ugliness.Don't bother.
Couldn't wait to read it! Then regretted the purchase of it on my Kindle. It is a great story but the need for vulgar language and sexual comments by the twin sister left me conflicted. Do I read it because I want to know what happens? Or do I toss it because it's just a trashy novel? I decided to skim over the stuff that was unnecessary and vulgar. All to find that the story that's filled with twists and turns leaves one feeling let down in the end. Worst read of the year! I would never recommend it and would even go so far as to tell people not to read it.
Movie was boring and ending so foolish I never finished thebook
Not well written, excruciating and a slow read.  Disappointed!
Very ordinary.
I disliked this book so much I ask my friends to read it to see if I'm crazy or if the book is that terrible. So far, it's an even split. I despised the characters, but the ending made me so angry I would have thrown the book had I been reading an actual book and not an e-book. It took me a while to get over my dislike of the book (and author) to try another book by the same author. I'm disappointed that this is being made into a movie with some of my favorite actors. I have read that the movie will change the ending, so maybe there's hope.
I won't give any of the plot away or give spoilers, as some readers did enjoy this story; however, I will say I detested both main characters by the end & was mad at myself for trudging through when my instincts told me to quit reading shortly after starting this book.
ZZZZZZZZZZ.  SPOILER ALERT -- A book for people who don't read anything challenging.  Figured out what happened to GONE GIRL two pages after her disappearance.  Very boring beginning, ""I can maybe get through this"" middle, and totally ridiculous ending.  Both characters didn't even warrant my liking or hating - they were just two boring. predictable people.  Was that the author's plan?  So many idiotic ""iron tight"" plants by the wife which a baboon could figure out and know she was behind it all.  Waste of my precious time.
I started this book after reading many of the reviews.  In the reviews there was nowhere where it said that the book is filled with the ""F"" word.  No one in real life talks with that much swearing, especially a woman.  I was very turned off by the book.  I didn't even end of finishing it because it was so degrading to read.  I don't mind swearing in books, but this was going overboard.  Why can't people write a book without the use of all the profanity.  Don't think I'll read one of her books again if that is the way she writes.
I am not going to get very deep into this. The first 3/4's of the book were fantastic. It started off a little slow, but midway, took a great twist and I could not put it down. However, the end of this book might be one of the worst pieces of writing I have ever witnessed. It was awful and completely spoiled any good feelings I had toward this book. I felt betrayed. I wanted to toss it into the ocean, and I would have if it wasn't on my iPad. I do not recommend anyone waste their time in reading this book.
Disappointing
ANTI-CLIMATIC
waste of time
Disappointing
Exasperating!
As an educated, mature woman, I can say with confidence that ALL the characters in Flynn's Gone Grirl are GONE.  None of these characters mirrored the behavior of normal people.  Oh well, perhaps I should stay clear of Best Seller' lists.  My bad.
CAN'T STAY INTERESTED IN IT. STILL HAVEN'T FINISHED IT.
Hated the ending.Felt cheated out of a good story
This is not a good book.  Not worth the time to read.
Big fan of DARK PLACES, although not a reader of crime fiction, I bought the Kindle edition.  Like many others here, wish I had saved my money and not added to Flynn's big wad of cash.  Had she found another way to progress the story once the crime is established, I wouldn't have felt such derision for the second half.  In comparison, I thought the ending was dead on.  No big dramatics.  Just the creeping sense that life would be pretty awful for the both of them.
Boring book!
Did not like
Did not like
Predicitable
It was awful
slow reading
Crazy psycho
Stupid book.
Alful ending
Too bizarre!
Unbelievable trash recently made into a worse movie.
Terrible book.  The Good Girl is a much better read!
This book was so disappointing on so many different levels. I kept reading on and on TO THE VERY END hoping it would get better, and it just didn't.Not going to get into plot or style. I will say that the characters have absolutely no redeemable qualities so you wind up being disappointed in everyone. I just felt grumpy through the whole thing.Don't fall for the hype. They are going to consider making this story a movie? That is sad. Just sad.
Started out with an intriguing, if somewhat formulaic plot.  Enjoyed twists for a while, but it soon became ludicrous.  I was disappointed in myself for having read it till the end.  Haven't spoken to anyone who liked it.
I bought Gone girl cos it was shown in Time magazine as one of the good reads of the summer, also the reviews I read were unfortunately the 4 and 5 stars. Then I started reading.. it had an interesting start and the suspense was good .. I loved the way she unfolded the different sub plots. However by the last 1/3 of the book it all starting going down hill, I was making excuses to keep myself reading hoping to atleast have a great ending. To me a great ending can be either happy, sad or even just an unexpected but believable angle. This booked lacked any of that criteria. I dropped the book with a sigh.I had planned to buy her other books before reading this and wanted to use this to gauge her writing style, i must say as an ambassador for her story telling skills, this book does a bad job.I will most likely still buy her book, i do think she knows how to spin a story and maybe deserves the benefit of doubt.
I had been wanting to read this book for awhile, and all I have to say is UGH! It was completely unrealistic. The characters sucks-none of them are likeable. I will admit that the first part/ section of the book was interesting, but after part two started it all went downhill. In the real world this plot would never fly. At all. Ever.But, maybe that's why it's a fiction book.Not sure if I'd spend money on any of her other books now.
My feeling was this book was written to make money by using coarse vulagr language through out, by using explicit sex scenes, and totally unlikable characters.  I learned nothing from reading it,.  It was not enjoyable in any way.  There was no real ""plot twist"" and I lost both time spent reading it and money spent buying it.  When our club finished discussing this book,, I promptly threw it in the trash bin.  It was at home there!
I hated this book.  Clever, yes, but there is not one character in it to love or admire.  Has our society gotten so manipulative that marriage has become a total farce.What a waste of my time and money, hoping that the clever plot will finally lead to a transformation of character.  But no, the people just get more and more despicable.This is not why I read, to be disgusted by manipulative and hateful people and their behavior.
sorry I really didn't like the way is was written
The characters are presented in the first chapter, and they are who they are -- they don't evolve or change or grow -- there is no development in them.  I was hoping for a good story, but I knew by the end of the first chapter what was going to happen -- and it did.  Thus, it took me all of an hour to read the book;  and when it came time to discuss it at book club, I found (as I suspected) that I had not missed a thing.  Don't bother.
This has to be the sickest, worst book I have ever read. The person who wrote this must be horribly psychotic to conceive such a piece of trash. I read the beginning chapters, and when I realized we would go thru the trumped up prosecution of the husband I went right to the return. It is no wonder America I has such sick, demented  acts going on. Just read this crap for a road map. I think I actually paid an amazing $3.99 for this.
I never ever stop reading a book, this was chosen by my book club and everyone said that it got better however I never got into it and I have read a ton of different books. I thought it was very very boring.
I bought and it's not showing on my library...😠
Did not enjoy reading this book.  Too wordy!!!!!
I really disliked this book.  It is dark, displays absolutely no higher values/virtuesthrough any of the characters, and when done with it, I wished I hadn't perserved, but given up on page 180.Of course, this is my personal opinion, and others might find the suspense riveting.  I found Amy's twistedness boring and the fecklessness of Nick and Amy's parents rather sad.  This book left a bad taste in my mouth.
I borrowed this book from a friend and did not finish it.. it did NOT grab me at all!  I am an avid historical fiction reader and wanted to try a mystery for a change.. think I will stick with Sandra Brown when I take a break from historic fiction.. The plot of this book started out great, but fell apart during the first 50 pages... happy I did not waist my time to finish it.. found out the rest of the story from my friend..
Disgusting!
Loved it!!!
three stars
And this book doesn't.And it's all the more upsetting when the book could have been really good if the ending didn't suck so bad.Note to authors and publishers:Fudge the deadline, if the ending isn't good.  Just delay the publication until you GET IT RIGHT!!Hitting a deadline with a bad ending is just not worth it.And this happens all the time, not just this book.
This book was highly recommended to me by an extended family member and I bought it without reading the reviews (based on the recommendation).  The language is crude. Besides the over use of the F bomb,the name of Christ is used in the most disrespectful ways.  The main female character is raunchy.  Sometime the story was hard to follow.  If you like a book to leave you feeling happy, this isn't the book for you.
ughhh! terrible book, terrible, terrible story
Gone Girl had me asking myself..""huh?"" most of the time. The main characters were not realistic- they were very contrived. Too many superlatives and trite descriptions used to establish their characterization. Many of the characters in the story were described stereotypically which was disappointing reading. The story line was so convoluted and weird it wasn't plausible. Her over use of gratuitous sex descriptions seemed like a banal made for TV movie. Finally her general characterizations of women throughout the book made me wonder what the author has against women? Amy was intelligent but psycho, Go was sweet but somewhat witless to help her brother, Boney seemed too gullible to be a good cop and Amy's mother and other mothers were portrayed as manipulative. The writing was tight in some spots however this book was a disappointment.
This came highly recommended and will be a future Hollywood movie.  Knowing that, I thought it would at least be interesting and worth my time. The first turn off is the language and  the attitude of the main female character.  She is classLESS!  A real loser!  Sorry I purchased this book!  The author does not deserve my money.  I do not understand how this book even caught the attention of a Hollywood producer.
Two miserable characters in an ugly plot. Not very well written, and ultimately ridiculous.  I always feel compelled to finish a book once I've started it, but this one got worse as it progressed.
Not worth the bother.  There are no characters in this book to like, to sympathize with, to care about, to root for, to identify with.  Having a background in counseling and some knowledge of psychology, I found the wife's mental state somewhat interesting, but not enough so to redeem the book.  And in the end, no real resolution.  It is well-written--I'll allow one star for that.  I'm sorry I wasted my money.
Clever writing at times but characters in this story leave you feeling nauseous ,nothing entertaining about any of this story except some writing, whichseems very contrived to many times. The only page turner aspect of thisstory is you want them 'gone' as fast as possible. May be a best seller but I sure have read moreinteresting and compelling stories. Don't waste your money.
I hadn't heard about this book until the hype over the movie with Ben Affleck began.  Then I saw the interview with the author, Gillian Flynn (and her husband) on CBS' 'Sunday Morning' program.  They were going on and on about the amazing story and the surprising twist at the end.  I wanted to see the movie but thought I might have missed a good book here.  And because everyone knows that the book is always better than the movie, I decided to do my reading before heading to the theater. Well I won't be seeing the movie any time soon because the only thing that is amazing about this book and its ending, is how amazingly BAD it is.  Good heavens, what is everyone talking about?!  This book is absolute trash - bad trash!  (Is this what passes for literature these days?)  And someone actually got paid money for THIS?  Amazing indeed.Okay, enough outrage.  Here are some specifics (no spoiler alert):First, all the characters speak in a mind-numbing, steady stream of profanities.  And not just some of the characters - ALL of them, whether it's appropriate or not, whether it makes sense or not.  Not even in the worst gang-banger B movie would you find this kind of talk.  When a writer has to rely so heavily on four-letter words to convey strong emotions, you know you are dealing with limited creativity.  No joke.Second, the readers are served up an explicitly vile and repugnant description of marital sex-life (hence the claim by other reviewers of the 'yuck' feeling they get after reading this book and the need for a shower).  If you have any kind of sensibility about the joys found in a marriage, this will make your skin crawl.  And as the author is married, it makes me wonder if she is using her own experience.  (I sure hope not – maybe it’s from her research).  Although, in the interview on CBS, her husband commented on the disturbing affect the manuscript on him, and HIS FATHER.  I could see why.As for the ending – there is none!  The story ran out of gas about a third of the way through then rolled to a dead stop long before the last page.  As a matter of fact, because I was reading it on Kindle and I had no real visual indicator that I was coming to the end of the book (Kindle showed 90% completed when I saw the acknowledgement page), I thought, wait a minute, did I miss something?  Yes, I did miss something: a sensible plot.  It is as if the writer, and the editor(s), had no clue how to tie a bow on this messy and ridiculously convoluted story, that is completely void of any intelligence, and so they just, quit.  I wish I had done so earlier.
The ending of this book was a major disappointment.  Until the ending it was smart and well thought out and thought provoking.  So, I decided to write my own ending and I recommend that those who read this book skip the last two chapters and read my ending - or they can write their own!!Proper ending for Gone Girl:Nick - the last dayWhen the blood test confirmed the pregnancy I knew what had to be done.  When we woke up the next morning I told Amy I had decided that we had to turn the page on all the issues we had piled up over the last two years and that a riverboat cruise from Hannibal would be just the thing to do to start our new life.Amy smiled and seemed quite pleased with the plan.  In fact she was humming as she collected her things for the trip.After arriving at the dock in Hannibal and buying our tickets we boarded the Delta Queen for a day ride up the Mississippi and back - just like the riverboat rides I used to take as a kid in my Huck Finn outfit.  Our cabin for the day was on the top deck with the best view.As the riverboat steamed into the middle of the muddy Mississippi - it's great wheel turning and churning - Amy and I laughed and made small talk about the baby and the perfect life we were about to begin.When our riverboat reached the center of the river and began the turn toward Turtle Island - where it would turn around and return - we casually walked to the railing to get the best view.Without fanfare or warning or even a word, I wrapped my leg around the back of Amy's leg and with a forward thrust propelled us both off the balcony into the deep water.  I held Amy under - pushing her head down every time it appeared she was about to surface.  I began to breathe in the water as well.  As I blacked out - lungs filled with water - I caught one last look at Amy.  She was floating in front of me, hair sprayed out around her, looking like an angel and I'm sure I could see the hint of a smile on her face.Amy-the Last DayNick thinks I'm excited about the cruise he suggested because I believe he is planning for us to start a new life.  In fact, I know Nick better than he could ever know.I know he's planning to kill me and I'm OK with that.  First of all, and I'll begin one of my famous lists - I do not want a baby - never did.  Secondly, Amazing Amy needs to stay young and beautiful so the world remembers me as the blond, beautiful, perfect heroine.  Lastly but not least, the cloud of suspicion has never totally lifted off of me in regards to my disappearance and the killing of Desi - my death would end the speculation - I would be cleared - my book would explain it all.So, I'm happy to be enjoying my last day on earth with Nick - here on the top deck of the riverboat and now in great Mississippi River - such a tragic death - just the one I was meant to have.EpilogueThe bodies of Amy and Nick were found at the mouth of the Mississippi.  They had fallen in at the exact spot that would have allowed them to float unimpeded through the levees and filters - just like on the website Nick had researched on his computer before Amy disappeared!One of their fellow passengers said he saw them falling and it almost appeared that they were diving in rather than falling in - but of course no one thought that could have been the case.Boney and Go sat together at the funeral.  Both stared straight ahead and as the caskets were carried down the aisle for burial, both felt a chill at the same time and shivered.It was over.
I just received the item and have not read it yet. The condition I recieved it in was however truly dissapointing. The whole cover was ruined with wrinkles and rips all over the edges. The inside of the protective cover was also damaged on the top and bottom. I opened it and the book has clearly been read due to the folds on the pages. I will NOT buy from this seller again. Do not recommend.
I do not like the format or the characters. It flashes between the present and the wife's diary which is in the past. It is not exciting and did not keep me going.It does not flow well.
I would not recommend this book to anyone  My book club is reading it and it may lead to a good discussion.  but the two main characters i hoped would both die by the end of the book.
Too creepy
just awful
Ridiculous
Great book
This book took so long to go nowhere.  I should have quit half way through but I was hoping it would get better but it never did.  Provably won't read any other Gillian Flynn books.
I was horrified with the ending of this book.  It started out as a good read and took a nose dive at the end.  Not worth the time to read with an ending that was just plain awful.
This book was selected to be read by a book club member.  If not for that I would not bought it. I just couldn't get into the book, it was confusing going back & forth from past and present. I couldn't even finish reading the book,I just had my friends tell me what happened & how it ended. They admitted to skipping parts of the books and not being impressed with the book either.
I don't understand the rating of some reviewers?  I stopped reading halfway thru and went looking on internet for the conclusion of the book. Found my answer. Didn't like the characters and didn't like the ending.  I understand there will be a movie made out of the book with a different ending. I will not go pay money to see it. Yes I finally finish it, but took me forever.
I didn't like this novel at all.  The main characters were hateful, angry, manipulative people that it made it difficult for me to sympathize with either of them.  I didn't care what happened to the them.  Also, there was no surprise nor suspense in the story for me.  I knew from the beginning what would happen.  Why is this book in the  best selling list?  I have no clue.
Not much of a story and ended strangely.
I had trouble getting through this book.  I only kept reading because I knew they were making a movie out of the book and am sure will see it since I'm from Missouri.
Gillian Flynn owes Scott Turow a portion of her royalties. While I enjoyed this book (I actually liked her other books more), I caught on quickly to the premise. Presumed Innocent by Scott Turow is the master blueprint for Gone Girl and a far superior novel. I recently saw the film version if Gone Girl and the ending is better than the book's ending.
If you are looking for a story with closure, look elsewhere!  I was absolutely loving this book then the end came and I was WHAT!?  That's it!?  Very disappointed!
Horrible predictable cliche of a book. So disappointed. And stupid ending to boot. Plot device was so obvious that I thought it must be the author was doing it on purpose, as a red herring, (the reviews were so great that I assumed a plot device so obvious must mean there was a triple twist ending, so I slogged on.) Nope, no surprises. What a waste.
This was one of the worst books I have ever read. I was very excited for it when it came out and was completely and totally disappointed. I kept hoping that it would get better and that is the reason I kept reading, but when I got to the end, I was literally disgusted. What a horrible end, but I guess it fit with the rest of the book in my opinion.
Didn't think it was that good.  Wierd.
Hated it!
Hated it.
Terrible.
was  crap
No ending
However the book I received from the seller was not the book I paid for.Never heard anything back from them once I contacted them to remedy the situation.Guess I'll just go to Barnes and Noble so I know what I'm getting as this is the second purchase through Amazon that I have encountered the same issues with. Totally unacceptable.
I did not like this book at all. I know a movie was made based on the book - but the subject matter was so dark and awful - and the characters as it relates to the husband and wife were ugly characters. I can't figure out how these people got together to get married or why they stayed with each other - so obvious they did not like each other.
The first part is actually a very good read and then it totally fizzles out,I got sick and tired of the two main characters and did not finish the book!
This book had the potential for a good if not happy ending.  At least some kind of closure.  I wonder if the author will write another book taking up where she left off in this one.  I kept waiting for the other shoe to drop but it never did.  Maybe this is just not my type of book.  I need to know how everything ends not just left hanging.
Brilliant opening and then midway though I begin to check my watch wondering how a movie could try so hard to be puzzling and yet feel so endlessly, relentlessly  dreary. Really, really wished I had missed it. Something about movies in which evil triumphs just feelssmug these days. Either that or noir has just gotten deeply boring.
Dumb book. Can't believe it was a hit
This book came recommended to me by my daughter who read it with her book club.  The first part is quiet annoying with all the back and forth - the second part sent me for a loop - didnt see that coming - but what happens at the end i think is a cop out - i think the author just didnt know how to end it and it just didnt work for me
I figured out the big ""twist"" about 20 pages into the book, the characters are unlikable and the story is dull.  If I could give this zero stars I would.
The author is manipulative; the story, while catchy, is trite and ugly.  Not for those with weak stomachs.  Bury this garbage - don't buy it or read it.
This book is boring. I didn't like the characters and thought the story line was very unbelievable.  I probably won't read anything else by this author.
Dumb book. Too bad it went into film
A very complicated absurd book. The writer keeps repeating the same thing over and over again. I dont undertand how can it be in the bestsellers list!
Gillian Flynn duped me with that terrible ending.  Gone Girl was a thrilling page turner, leaving you aching with a need for resolution for the main character, Nick.  I was struck that the book ended so suddenly and with such disappointing results.  No more Gillian Flynn for me.  I could have used my time more productively.
I learned about this book on the TV show ""The View"" and was excited that Whoopie Goldberg loved and recommended it.  I was so disappointed.  I didn't even finish the book because I was so bored with it.  I read almost half of it and kept waiting for it to get better but I finally gave up.  Don't waste your time on this one.
Got into the story, thought it was going to be a great mystery - if it were a paperback instead of on my Kindle, I would have thrown it right in the trash! I thought I had found a new author, but I will never read another book by this author. One of the worst books I have ever read. Cannot believe this is so highly rated!
It was a bit contrived, not clever.
Horrible story.  Never finished it.
I disliked both protagonists form the beginning, but, of course, loathed Amy by the deranged ending. Sick, sick people with little or redeeming value. Many of my friends actually liked this novel. I am a very well read person with varied interests in genre, but am sorry  I was talked into reading this much-hyped novel.
do not waste your money. i waited 2 years for the price to come down on this. i had read reviews and it sounded interesting but i finnd it boring.
Didn't like. Amy's parents too paper thin. Weakest characters in the book. Every character too super-ego for me. No depth. Wish I hadn't read it.
Thought I would try to finish the book - maybe I was missing something.  I finished the book.  I didn't miss a thing.  Just didn't like the book.
This novel is so overrated. I simply hated it, all smoke and mirrors. When the author is writing simply to jack me around I don't enjoy the book
What Does It Say About America That This Book About These Two narcissists, OnE Of Them A Psychopath, Has Stayed On The Bestsellers List So Long?
Terrible
I have read 1/4 of this book. Couldn't take anymore. Life is too short to spend time trying to figure out what author is leading up to if anything. May go back to it when I don't have anything else to read. Tell author to read something by Diana Gabaldon. Then she will know how to write a beautiful book.
Was not impressed with this book.
I disliked this novel intensely.  There was no redeeming aspect to it.  The author continually led me down to a dead end or to an abrupt change in narrative and in actions taken by characters.  Nick and Amy were not consistently portrayed.  She had what is called a Borderline personality......narcnn
Utter drivel. Halfway through the first  page I knew how it would end. Insulting to ones intelligence, it drones on and on. Pathetic.
This book has some sex conversations and details in the bedroom that is a prostitutes worst nightmare.  I do not recommend this book.
Thoroughly found this story sad.  Characters were not sympathetic.  Ending left me angry.  Will not read another book by this author.
After finding out the wife was still alive, there wasn't much story to tell.  I found the abundance of profanity was completely unnecessary and ruined it for me.  I don't know what all the hoopla was about when the movie came out.  If the movie isn't any better than the book, I won't be going.
Don't waste your time or $ on this book. Continued reading just to see if it got better. Should have just trashed it and gave up.
It may say something about me, rather than the book, but I've tried to finish reading it three times. I read a few pages and give up. The characters hold no interest for me, the story line is not engaging. If I hadn't bought this for my Kindle, I would be asking for my money back.
Gone Girl was very well written.  I commend the author for coming up with something new and different.  But I did not like the story line or the characters.  After reading the book, I felt unsatisfied and confused about what I had read.  But perhaps that is what Ms. Flynn wanted.
Depressing, foul language, to much mania not enough mystery.  I knew where the writer was going a short way in.  By the end I was so glad it was done and so questioning why I'm one of those people who try to read it all even when it's no longer fun.  I can't recommend this book.
My daughter recommended it and she knows my taste but I'm sorry I hated it. It goes round and round with very little story to keep your focus. I even tried rereading it in case I was tired and not focused. No difference. My mom was reading it too, she also said the same thing.
I feel a little like AMY giving this book the WORST review, but someone's got to do it.I read the whole thing and I can't find answers to the question: what makes this book a best seller?unnecessary long, terrible ending, pathetic characters, so boring.
Don't know what all the fuss was about. This is a silly book. Chick lit at its facile worst. Don't waste your money or time.
I read this book before it was really popular, and I still know it was a waste of my time. The writing is not great, and neither is the story. I could hardly get through it. I can't understand why it I'd so popular. I have worked everyone I know to not waste their time on it!
I like the story this book tells, but NOT the way it's told. The book was very hard for me to read, even though I was curious to see how it all turned out. In all honesty, I'll have to wait for the movie to find out, since I just couldn't slog my way through the whole thing.
The movie had great acting, direction, filming but a story that started great ends in sheer stupidity. The great lawyer said it well when he said: you are the most ****** up people I have ever seen and I deal with ****** up.That sums up the movie. Totally ridiculous.
tried to like it but I didn't
A sad tale of mans depravity.
worst book ever! just couldnt see what all the hype was about. The lead character was so sleazy, self absorbed and inhumane, if felt dirty just reading it. The plot was long, non sensical and downright infuriating, it's was an e book purchase, wish i could return it!
Wow. Talk about a train wreck! I do not understand what all the hype was about. The storyline/plot is a bit disturbing.
Ugh, just couldn't find even one character to like. I read this for a book club, the book wasn't even worth discussing.
A thoroughly depressing book.  Failed love, betrayal, revenge, etc.  There is nothing redeeming or enjoyable about this book.  Go see the movie - the suffering will be over much more quickly.  In the case of this book, that would make the movie better than the book.
It was a really good story with all kinds of twists.  The language was awful.  I think you could have written this story and left out all the ""F"" words and have a much more appealing book for everyone - even her son - to read.  I won't purchase another of her books.
could not finish the sample  way too wordy  i would suggest you always read the samples before you pay for any books!
A thoroughly repellent book.
I can't review this properly without giving everything away!  I enjoyed it at first, but once things start getting revealed, it became more and more ridiculous with each chapter.  And the ending is so...ridiculous.  I was really disappointed in this novel.
I am an avid reader, English major, and teacher.  I wouldn't recommend reading this book at all.  The first half of the book is great and I was completely engrossed, but the storyline and writing quickly deteriorates after part two begins.  I was ok with the twist at first, but things became so far-fetched that it was comical.  Another reviewer mentioned she felt cheated and that's a great way of putting it.  After completing the book, I felt, because the story became so ridiculous, the writer must be making some sort of social commentary.  Some kind of Cindy Sherman type stuff, but I couldn't imagine what that could possible be.It reminded me of watching a movie that at first seemed well-filmed, deep, complex, almost insightful and then suddenly becomes flimsy, uninspired, and of low quality.  Major let down.  Oh well.
A complete waste of my time
I did not enjoy this book.  The topic was pitiful, the story was pitiful and I'm not sure WHY I finished it.
It's starts cheesy, gets uber cheesy and then picks up for a hot second but the ending kills it. I find it hard to believe this made the ""Best of [anything]"" list. I got this for xmas and I feel so bad, I'm going to give back the $12.99.
The book has unexpected twists and turns but it's pretty dark. Read about 2/3 then thumbed through the rest bc I had enough. Characters are not likable and pretty tasteless comments about women. Disappointed in material and end was pointless.
I want to immediately state the the book kept me reading. The story is about two self absorbed people that find each other and marry. Now the story takes a dramatic turn when the wife turns up missing and all eyes are on the husband. Finding out he's a philanderer and just all around jerk, you'll immediately believe that not only is he a bad husband, but that he's guilty. The book then focuses on the wife, how she created her own staged disappearance, and her history of these vile retaliations she has a history of inflicting on those close to her. She's a rich brat, she's selfish, and even though her husband has cheated on her and doesn't love her anymore, she feels he should pay with his life. This being her motivation to stage her own ""murder,"" she disappears for a while, until she is suddenly without any of the money she'd saved preparing for her getaway. I won't say too much more, but after returning to her husband, killing a close friend to pin the blame on in the process, she is given everything she wants. That's it! The rich, crazy b*tch wins! That ending, my God, WORST ENDING OF ANY BOOK I'VE EVER READ! Ive read review on here that say people that didn't get the ending are just not fully understanding of the book. That both awful main characters deserve each other. That is so outrageously stupid, I just cannot fathom anyone actually believing that. People fall out of love, people cheat, but people don't stage murders to pin it on their spouse. The wife not only does it to him, but stages scenes like this with friends throughout her life. Only to give the aura of being a victim her entire life. Rapes, stalkers, she's accused people of everything to let everyone know how important and perfect she is, or at least she thinks she is. And in the end, this atrocious ending, she wins. Wins out royally. She will continue to be crazy, to play the victim, and everyone will feel sorry for her. And that's it. Don't buy this book. You'll hate that you read it and feel terrible that the awful, disgusting, murderer wins out in the end. Again, DO NOT PURCHASE THIS BOOK.
Gruelling read. Hated it!
Characters were annoying!
Our book club just read the book – we were all disappointed the way the book flowed and it’s ending. We have no idea how it made a good read. I saw the movie and it was worse. Other people walked out the movie too. My husband didn't like the movie either. His former wife holds his daughter in bondage psychologically for the past 25 years. It was too crazy, too personal for him. He felt the husband was trapped - no matter which way he wanted to go he was trapped with no way out, forced to stay married to a woman like that - no telling how this would affect the baby plus he was subject to going to jail, especially when the whole town had already convicted him of her murder with no body. This woman was never convicted of murdering Dean, the wealthy fellow, showing us that she got away with murder. This story is a true story of a woman scorned and would do anything to hurt her husband.  I don’t recommend the movie or the book.
Weird.
Waste of time to read...
Didn't care for the book
I would not recommend this book to anyone and would have given a 0 rating if there had been one!
Did not like the way it was written, nor did I like the story - though I did read it to the end.
The writer had the perfect opportunity to end the story long before the so called ""ending"".  I felt my time had been robbed in reading a book that brought no pleasure, taught nothing, and therefore served no purpose.
allamerican banalities!
Too long and drawn out.
A great many reviewers have already recorded their disappointment with this over-hyped book. All I can add is that it's dull, slow-paced and clumsily structured, and that none of the promised ""twists and turns"" is unexpected or clever. At the halfway point the story has nowhere else to go, so with a dull clunk comes the obvious reversal in the story. By that time I no longer cared. There is not a credible or sympathetic character in this derivative novel. The author is trying to be Kate Atkinson but fails by the widest possible margin to reach that level. A waste of time and money, and one of the most irritating books I can remember reading -- after that halfway point I could barely be bothered to skim to the rubbish ending. It's a damning thing to say, but for once a movie might be better than the original novel. Could hardly be worse.
I started to read it but will not  complete it because of the language.  I just don't know why authors feel  they need to use offensive language to make a story.  The effect would be much better to omit that.
I felt it was a little too disjointed.  I thought the author was trying to hard to be too cool in his writing.  I thought it would never end.  It went on and on with very little suspense.  One word, ""boring"".
If you enjoy being hand fed low tier reality tv and watch sensationalist news channels, then you'll probably eat this book up. I listened to it as an audio book because I thought it was a crime/mystery novel that was worth a read. It's not. Instead it's a highly implausible story about a sociopathic narcissistic woman who methodically makes it her mission to ruin some s***ty guy's life. The fact that the woman learned how to outsmart the police by reading dime store crime dramas is laughable at best. The ending is even more implausible and ridiculous. The two actors that read the audiobook have annoying and grating voices not to mention antagonizing versions of the voices of the opposite gender. This doesn't help the characters at all. None of the characters in the book are good or believable. You don't root for anyone.The female lead isn't a good person, in fact she's a terrible person and yet there is a large population of women that are raving about this book. I find this more disturbing than the ending. This isn't about ""female empowerment"", it's about a woman abusing many people in her life. Normally I don't have an issue with unlikable characters or subject matter in books, but there was no redeeming quality in any of the characters. There is no justice, no break in the clouds and no reward. Instead it is the heinous actions of one and the reward of getting what she wanted.
What was all the hype about? That was the worst book I've ever read. Stupid stupid stupid. They both spend the entire book whining whining whining! The ending is so dumb I still feel like I missed some joke.
This book started with a premise filled with potential. What if the husband of a missing woman really DIDN'T have anything to do with her disappearance? This could have been a first notch thriller ripe with commentary about our blood thirsty appetites for 24-hour televised gore. Instead, it skimmed the surfaces of pop culture (why wasn't the Nancy Grace-like character developed more?), left WAY too many details either dangling or utterly implausible, and gave us two main characters we cared nothing about. There are so many better psychological thrillers out there more worthy of a reader's time. Instead of this shallow book, try a new author I just discovered. Try ""The Fixer"" by T.E. Woods. You'll see how satisfying a twisted, mind-bending crime novel can be.The Fixer (A Mort Grant Novel)
The first part was great and when I say the first part, I mean the first chapter. I bought the book after the first chapter and regretted it soon after. The story is confusing. It was hard to follow. The language was HORRIBLE. Thank God you can get a refund within seven days, no questions asked. That's exactly what I did....after reading 30 pages.
A great story spoiled by an excessive amount of porn.  Overuse of the ""F"" word and explicit descriptions of adulterous sex.  I would give it 5 stars if not for that.  I find that too offensive.
I just hated this story line.  It is well written but there is no redemption and it left a really sour taste in my mouth.  I could not wait to finish it and I did not want to see the movie.
Could not stand any of the book's charactersBook felt super long after I figured out the uninteresting twistHorrible endingWhy the profanity?Ugh-wish I never read it
I found the inner dialogue or journaling too tedious to read, and I didn't like the characters.  I read it until thebitter end because my sister kept telling me how much she loved it.
There was not one sympathetic character in this novel.I found the bouncing back between the husband and wife's narratives confusing.The ending was inconclusive and unsatisfying.
I AM OLDER SO PROBABLY THIS BOOK  JUST WASN'T MADE FOR MY GENERATION BUT WHAT A TERRIBLE BOOK IN MY OPINION.  ANY PLOTTED HER DISAPPEARANCE LIKE A PRO BUT WHATEVER FOR..JUST GET A DIVORCE!!
awful
Awful
Well written and definitely sucks you in - it's an intense read - I could do without all the language though, and sexual descriptions. Wouldn't recommend this for the younger readers.
Did not read all the long descriptions near the end as much of this book was very disturbing.  Recommended by a friend but I would not recommend this to anyone.  Not my type of book.
Waste of money.  Waste of time.  If I were the author I would buy them all and burn them.  Please don't buy this book you have better things to do than read about dreamed up crazies.
I could not make it through this book  because of the offensive language. I feel an author who cannot choose better words to get their message across, is not an author worth reading.
Why would one care about a man who is too stupid to pull his feet out of the mud and then too lazy to pull when the opportunity arose? I know no one who liked this book. But no one.
This is a book about sick people surrounded by sick people.  It is poorly written and a difficult book to finish.  I do not recommend this book to readers who enjoy a good story filled with interesting people.How did it get to the top of the list?It is the only book I will delete from my Kindle.
This was a good book HOWEVER I  wanted my mother to read it. THANK GOODNESS I read it first. Way too much crude unnecessary vulgar language. Books should be rated just like movies.
She freaked me out.
I dont like the end
Vulgar disgusting movie....have been telling everyone...very degrading to women...should come with more of a warning....could have been a great thriller...really missed the mark!
This is the worst book I have ever purchased.  The language and content are offensive.  I hate throwing books in the trash, but I would never give this to another person to read.
This is another one of those books that remains on the bestseller list.  I have tried this book several times and just cannot get into it. Time to delete it from my kindle.
Very disappointing to read that the bad guy wins. Also the antagonist is beyond belief having magical powers to read minds and fairy dust away any incriminating evidence.
I couldn't get into the story, I absolutely hated the characters! I cheated and looked at the end of the story, after about half way through. I very rarely quit a book...
This book started well enough but then waned and then ended poorly. As the title says unpredictable doesn't make for good reading, nor did it work well for entertainment.
So sad how disappointing this book was. Unending vulgar language, sexous, misogynist characters, extremely disappointing ending.Terrible waste of good earned money.
Big disappointment
Np didn't like it!
Didn't like book. Amy shouldn't have gotten her way. Not a great suspense novel. To me it was a mindless novel. It wasn't a page turner. I didn't find it witty or smart.
The plot and writing style are interesting but the characters are so awful.  I couldn't root for any of the characters... and they just got worse as the book went on.
Too twisted for me. If there are people like this, I don't want to know or read about them. We are already messed up enough without sensationalizing their perversion.
I don't think I've rated anything 1 star.  I hated all the characters from the beginning (maybe that was the author's goal) and only continued reading because I hoped it would get better.  I always like to read the book before seeing the movie.  Now I can save myself the $10 and thankfully I read the book for free.  It was depressing from the get-go, made my skin crawl (not a creepy, good Stephen King way either) and I felt dirty through it.  I hated the ending and like others found myself flipping through the acknowledgements thinking there was more.  Granted, the author wrote a twisty, turny story but several things didn't tie together.
This was a highly entertaining book that I could not put down. I have never been so let down by an ending....don't waste your money, you will be very disappointed !
Horrible ending...a waste of my time...disappointed...Will not read this author again...never, never, never again...thought Due's mother would have resurfaced, ha!
Writer is obviously very talented but story was far too black for me.  Wish I had researched the book more before I bought it.  Never again trust best seller list.
Why even bother?  The ending seems like it was composed out of fear of the deadline. Seriously? Is that the cleverest conclusion that could have been put together?
I'll make this short. I can't believe they made a movie about this book. There is nothing movie worthy about it. I honestly can't think why it would be published.
Whke it's good to set a background, that's all this story had done. Hard to continue reading. Don't know if it will get better if I continue . This was rated #1??
I hated it. The only reason I read it was because it was a gift. It was not even believable total B.S. I did not like Amy or Nick. What a wast of time and paper.
Started well, but after the second chapter I hated everyone in the book, didn't care what happened to them.  Ending was a sucker-punch.  A waste of money for me.
This story SUCKS!
I really almost never dislike a book I'm listening to or reading, I almost never quit on a book.I started thinking ""I don't like this book"" after about 1/5 into it.By the time I was 1/3 into it I told my husband, I am reading this book inspite of not enjoying it to find out what happens.At 40% into it, I decided I had to stop. I still wanted to know what happened though - so I read some of the ""Spoiler"" reviews and discussions of the ending (which many said they hated).Well... now I know and I'm glad I quit reading it. What unpleasant people in it, sick behavior, disgusting events.
slow, repetitive,  somewhat boring, do not care for the swear words or adult content. It could have worded things differently and still gotten the info. across.
This book was worse than television, horrible addicting waste of time.  I hate reading about sociopaths, I'm so much more interested in more interesting people.
I wish I would have known that Gillian Flynn is known for leaving open ended books.  If you like a lot of closure at the end of a book, this one is not for you.
at least I will save money by not going to see the movie!  Frankly, I didn't see the point of the story....just felt like the entire book was ""filler""!
I waited and waited and waited for something to happen and this book went no where.  Just a constant back and forth day in the life of a dysfunctional couple.
I get the appeal of quirky characters, but these two are just sad and depressing.  I'm glad at least I got it through the library or I would be depressed too.
I would have preferred to give this joke a zero. With all of the praise I kept hoping that something would happen to redeem this utterly absurd tale.  Nothing but a huge waste of time. The writer did accomplish one thing, I feel totally insulted.
This book was so unbelievable and had such an unsatisfying ending that I felt like I'd been had. Starts out well, has twists, but in the end didn't work.
I tried to get interested in it, but, good grief!  What an odd concept.  They are all more than a little off balance.  It was not a satisfactory ending.
I had been looking forward to a good read. In the end I didn't even hate the protagonists, just myself for not having the backbone to just stop reading.
This was a depressing book and everyone was mean. The plot was interesting I just could not get into it because I couldn't connect with the characters.
Very slow moving story. Dragged out!!!! Only struggling to finish it because I don't quit a book. But, you could definately find better books to read!!
I pretty much despised this book-did not have empathy for any of the characters  except Go. Like watching a train wreck, but a slow-motion boring one
The book started off intriguing, it turned to a who dunnit and turned out awful.  Will not read any other books by Flynn, it was that disappointing.
I regret buying this book. I found the plot to be very slow and in fact did not bother to finish the book. The characters are stilted and unlikable.
Meh.
i am probably a very naive person to expect from two young people in love to have some civility towards each other when this feeling is gone. the gone girl is not a mystery i expected, it is a story of mutual conniving and meanness to achieve a ....revenge?! on the other partner. the convoluted plan of amy to disappear in order to make her husband look guilty of her death....the helpless husband who cheats , drinks and gets into trouble....the eventual comeback...i was thoroughly disappointed in the plot and will not try any of the this authors books.
Title suggests something else... when the plot is actually  about the journey of an unhappy married couple who are poorly written without any clear character distinction. Flynn writes both her characters to be uninteresting and pathetic and in turn both Nick and Amy turn out to be the same character although Flynn attempts to write from each character's subjective perspective. Flynn's novel would have been more bearable if Flynn would have just written from one perspective. Poor execution. In the end, you kind of just want to throw the book because you've endure the terrible journey of continuing to read this book because the plot ending is so incredibly awful. I did find myself laughing out loud at some parts when Amy talked about her spineless cheating husband, but that was really a small good section of this narrative. I suggest avoiding this book. I forced myself to finish it...
This book confused me from the first paragraph. I could not follow anything and I would say that it might be a book for most women and a few men.
About 3/4 of my way through the book I struggled to continue. There were no likable characters and I didn't see it getting any better- it didn't.
Are you kidding me that this is a best seller.  Must be all the hype.  So disappointed, horrible ending after pages and pages of sheer insanity.
I knew about twenty pages into this book that I didn't like it.  I didn't like or care about either of the two main characters and that didn't change as the book progressed.  The only reason I continued to the end was because a co-worker had lent me the book and I knew he would want to discuss it with me.  Perhaps if I had liked the characters I would've been more intrigued by the mystery aspect of the story but I didn't, so I didn't.  Now, having finished the book, I know my initial impression was spot on.  I should've stopped reading twenty pages in.
Loved the movie, so bought the book.  Boring, boring.Go rent the movie.There is nothing else to say.Boring.
There is a great story and interesting characters but the ending was so disappointing that I actually felt upset I spent so much precious time!
A very disturbing story,.  How can one have dreamed it up?
I hated it. I can't believe this book remains on the Best-seller list. I stayed with it to the bitter end. It was bitter & a waste of my time.
I love the format as diary entries...kept my interest the whole time!  Loved all the twists and turns throughout the story.  Was well-written!
I can't believe I spent my time reading this book. It is sick, so many stories and she finishes unpunished and no one can prove she is crazy!?
Long. Convoluted. Boring. I spent a lot of time doing a 'fast forward'. No satisfactory--even interesting--explanation for all the loose ends.
This captures the zeitgeist of the times and the problem with zeitgeists is that theycannot offer reflection. All good novels need reflection.
I appreciate a well-written, character-driven story and was excited about this one based on the accolades.  It started okay, but I wondered a little about those who wrote all the glowing reviews.  I wanted to keep an open mind and give it the benefit of the doubt,but the more the characters developed, the more I hated them.  Not just the two main characters, pretty much all of them.  I kept waiting for something to redeem them and it just got worse.  The ending left me with a sick, disturbed feeling in my gut. I wish I'd passed on this one.
I don't like the terrible words. I don;t use that language and certainly don;t wont to read the awful words.sorry  a waist of my money
Interesting, well-crafted mystery initially.  It begins to unravel about half way through, and ends in a very disturbing, unsatisfying way.
Not my type of reading material.  I thought I was ordering something I would like to read, something different that I would like, wrong.
Could not like either character.Just when I thought it was going to get better there was a twist and neither one ended up being likeable
My Kindle book stopped early and I had to go to abook store to read the author's final chapters. It wasvery good until that.
Bazaar to say the least.  A really contrived story that leaves you at the end with the feeling you have just been had.  Sorry I read it.
Did not like. I like a good mystery however this book spent toon many chapters getting to know the characters and a bad ending to boot.
I got this book because it was recommended but it started out slow and I had a hard time getting interested in the characters and plot.
What a terrible ending.  After all the plot twists and clever writing, I was surprised that the ending was just, blah.  Waste of money.
I did not like the ending-actually, there wasn't any ending!  very frustrating!  I would not reccomend it for anyone! Not a good book!
I guess insanity pays. She definitely won. I kept hoping to see her get her just reward and what a waste. Do not recommend to anyone.
Did not like this book at all hated the ending especially. Sorry I spent the money for it don't know what any one would like about it
Too much detail, story didn't flow and wasn't a page turner.  Not enough description of Amy and who she was or Nick.  Plot unclear.
No opinion  haven't read book as of yet, I ordered it by mistake then had to; cancel as I was meaning to buy another book below it.
I don't like spineless men and psycho women.  I like stories that end happy not anxiety. Should have done my research on this one.
But it kept me reading ( more accurately skimming) til I got to the END! I don't think I will be reading any more of this author!
I was very disappointed by the ending, and hated all of the characters, except for Go. I have never been so frustrated by a book!
Boring certainly not a THRILLER  , I would not recommend, forget the hype, kept waiting for the thrill to begin...never happened!
I didn't even finish the first chapter.  Not something I was willing to spend the afternoon reading. I deleted it from my Kindle.
Looking for answers and just finding more questions.Left feeling I wasted too much time reading this book.Would not recommend it.
Got about 25% thru this.  Seemed like more of a chick book...the diary entries got real tiresome.  It was just too cutesy for me.
Our book club chose Gone GIrl as our book of the month. Without this incentive, I would have stopped reading two pages into the second half. Both characters were despicable. but I must say the best part of the book was the end. These people got what they deserved... to wake up in their own little hells for the rest of their lives. I like to finish a novel having found some redeeming quality or having discovered something about a subject or place that I didn't know. Not true with this book.
To me, this book was not entertaining at all. The characters were all people that I would do my best to avoid in real-life situations - not sympathetic or engaging at all.... The husband and the wife are both so self-absorbed and clueless that reading about them was painful. I finally gave up after 100 pages when I found that I really really did not care why the ""girl"" was ""gone."" Very disappointed as Flynn's books are usually interesting and readable. Unfortunately, this novel was not....
This book was depressing through out. None of the characters were likable. I would definitely not recommend this book to anyone.
Far-fetched and corny. Wanted to recommend it to my book club--thank goodness I read it first  I love mysteries but not this one
I should have read the reviews before buying this book. The ending was a joke. Wish I could get a refund. Don't waste your time.
Waste of time, horrible book!  Heard so many great things about book and movie and couldn't be more disappointed after reading.
It was a great book but the ending ruined it....the entire story ended in a few pages.Utterly disappointing ending?
worst ending of a book. I have never left a review befor but was so disapointed in the ending of this book I felt like I should
First half was fantastic. Second half lost direction totally and became really outrageous. I am mad I spent money on this book.
This was a most depressing book, especially the end.  None of the characters are likeable.  I would not recommend it to anyone.
This book started strong and I loved it.  A little over halfway through it turned awful.  I hated it!  The ending was terrible.
Ok. I don't want to review.  This is ridiculous lets stop this requirement okpleasedisregard everything ok too lol. Noah today
Sadly, I did not enjoy this novel.  I couldn't even force myself to finish it.  It was highly frustrating and so unbelievable.
This book was odd and I didn't like it. Cliff hanger ending too!!!!!!!! I wouldn't bother with this one, plenty more out there
No one in my book club liked it & we couldn't figure out why it is so popular since there are so many wonderful books to read.
I started skipping pages less than half way through.  It got predictable and the characters got tiresome. Read something else.
I wasn't sure I liked this book at first, then it surprised me and I couldn't put it down.  Then, that awful, stupid ending!!!
completely drops off. no closure or conclusion, perhaps that is the point. the ultimate letdown of any book i have ever read.
The only winner here is the writer who thanks to all of us is making a fortune! Even though I read so many bad reviews I still read this book out of curiosity. It kept me interested, but the story is unbelievable and I mean it. And it is not only the end that is bad. After reading this book I feel disgusted. Please don't give any more money to this author. I will make sure I never read one of her books again. If this kind of book can do so well I will start writing myself!
This book could have been good except the ending ruined it. It had such great promise and precision. It left me unsatisfied.
I made it halfway through this story and couldn't care less what happens to these people.  He is an ass and she is annoying.
The reading was quite involved with many issues presented I hated the ending. So sorry I purchased, it was a waste of money.
Boring 1st half and ending was surprising awul.  I wish I had not wasted money, when there are so manybetter choices.
Worst Book ever ... seriously don't waste your money. Took forever to get to an exciting part of the book. I mean it just dragged on and on  and then the ending just ... well no spoilers but let's say I wanted to throw the book out the window. I don't see where all the hype came from.Just wait for the movie, I'm normally prefer the book versions but I think in this case, I'll prefer the movie.Seriously ... just borrow the book, don't spend money on it.
Good read. Lousy ending. After all the twists and turns I feel cheated for having spent the time reading the whole story.
This  book was one of the best books I've ever read!!  Lots of twists and turns.  Didn't really care for the ending tho.
I tried 3 times to get into this book....I finished reading 40%.  I just couldn't get into the characters....at all.....
I still have NOT received this book - still waiting.  Therefore I cannot evaluate it.  Hopefully I will receive it soon.
The plot device seemed clever but really didn't hold together and it was impossible to care about any if the characters.
I haven't finished this book yet - I find the language objectionable so far.  Not much to say yet --  I do not hate it.
I've read so many positive reviews for this book, but I think it was overly long & excessively drawn out. I think 200 pages could have been cut without losing any important content from the story. I do realize that Gillian Flynn is a fledgling novelist; however I also feel that those writing the glowing reviews of this book should try books by authors such as James Patterson, Harlen Coben, David Baldacci to truly know what a great book is all about.
Gone Girl begins with solid pacing and intriguiging plot twists. Unfortunately the ending disappoints on every level. It is surprising to read the popular reviews on this book.
These are two self serving people feeding on each other!  Didn't like it at all!  And of course they are both crazy!
Seriously..... that is the best ending you can come up with?  The author copped out on this book.  The ending was just dumb and if that was the best you could do you should have done it much earlier.  I have never been so angry about a book wasting my time and money like this one has.  The author owes us all an apology for writing such a stupid ending and the publishers owe us an apology for publishing a book with such a stupid ending.
I hated the way it ended!!!  Don't think I would ever read another of her books.  And I surely won't see the movie.
If I could give it less than 1 star, I would.  The characters were unlikable and the story was a big waste of time!
I can't believe all the time I wasted reading this book, thinking that it would actually have some redeeming story.
Sorry didn't enjoy, didn't finish, it was too boring for me, obviously not my type of book, but others do/did enjoy
after watching GONE GIRL being on the best seller list for months i thought i have to read this book.  worse mistake of my time and my life.it took weeks to read since i couldn't get into the book.  i kept reading thinking it will get better somewhere. it never did...worse book l've ever read.  i did finish it, but not sure why.  please james patterson, sue monk, danielle steel come back into my life...
Twisted yuck horrible ending save yourself the grief and read something else worthwhile not this trash . . . .
Was totally confused by this book.  Made it to the end and still didn't get it. Gone girl was a waste of time.
I felt this story had no real line to follow.  It twisted here there and everywhere with no follow through.
Lame ending
This is written in a really strange way. The characters use odd language, and the story is hard to follow.
I was very disappointed with this book after all the hipe I had heard, it did not live up to expectations!
The plot is twisted and stupid.I kept shaking my head.... really? how is this a best seller? not for me...
Read it twice.  I really disliked this book.  Took me on a head trip I would rather not have gone on.
Did not like it. How this was a ""best seller"" is mind boggling.  .  .  .  sleazy and stupid.
I did not receive it so how can I review it?  I was told that the file was to large for my  reader.
Don't waste your time on this one.  Unbelievable characters, unbelievable relationships, and an ending that is about the lamest cop-out I've ever read. The author just mails it in; must have had a vacation coming up or a limit on the number of pages that could be published.  This is the first review I've ever posted and I've done so to help others avoid this book.
Not believeable.  Doesn't make sense.  Seems unfinished.  Worse book I ever read.  Waste of time.
I liked her style of writing but the story was not near as good as I expected with all the hype.
I found it too long and drawn out.  Got very tired of it because of this.  Not my cup of tea.
Didn't read much of it because of the constant use of the ""f"" word. Can't handle that, not sure why it is even necessary! I did read the last couple of pages just to see what happened. I'm glad I didn't read it because it sounded absolutely depressing, how manipulative can you get?  I would have put no stars but it isn't possible!
I started this book and it started out really good. The overuse of the F word finally got to me and I decided that I am giving it up and taking it back to the library. The last paragraph on page 168 got to me. While I enjoyed Nick story just when it got good it would switched to Amy's and I was annoyed by that constant back and forth.
Although the story has a common premise, Flynn approaches it with a well-developed twist. Unfortunately her delivery is so crass, the characters so sadly wrought, the last few chapters so contrived, the readers experience is a struggle to the finish. I feel sorry for Flynn's son who she says will be old enough to read it in 2024!
Figured this out before I read it.  Did not like it at all.Bounced back & forth too much.
Nothing I hate worse than a book with no characters that have redeemable qualities.  Sad.
What a waste of money.  I love a good read but this one was just not good.  I could not get into the characters or the story line.  I kept trying but finally just had to give up and eat the cost of this one.  It really stunk.  And whoever tried to compare this to Fifty Shades was out of their mind, not even in the same ballpark
If an author can't think of a way to conclude a book, they shouldn't start it.  Despite the nastiness of most the characters in this book, I found myself interested, pulled along by the plot.  But if a plot comes dead end into a brick wall, it's hard to respond in any way except perhaps with profanity.  If the author plans a Part 2, that should be made evident, so that you can decide whether you want to devote the time to characters as despicable as these.
I read and heard many great reviews about this book, including a review in Time Magazine.  I read a lot, but wish I had passed this one by.  The book was not a page turner, but the ending was no ending at all . . . simply no more words on the page.  Maybe I missed something, but feel this was a waste of my time to read.
I loved the beginning of the book, I just couldn't stop reading it.  I even recomended it to my friends (thank God they didn't buy it).  But the ending ruins everything!!  I can't believe it had such a bad ending.  I'm never reading Gillian Flynn's books again.  I wish I would have read the reviews before I bought it!!!
The book is pure torture.  I stayed with it because of the reviews, looking for some redeeming feature.  There was none.With a couple of exceptions all characters are pathetic with him being amoraly weak and her being amoraly self centered and cruel.Nothing to enjoy with the ending being the worst of all.
Garbage.
This book goes on and on and slowly says anything of value. The story line is so slow and filled with useless words. It is written with him writing a chapter and then she writes a chapter and her chapters are even more worthless.Don't waste your time or money on this book.
Why write a book with no resolution? Is there a lesson to be learned here? I can't find one. Twisted unlikeable characters with no epilogue. The book seemed to be missing a soul. Too contrived. If it wasn't for book club I would have stopped less than halfway. Still wish I had.
I did not not like this book at all and found the language overdone with swearing and absurd situations. I don't understand why it has been so popular. I did not even finish it as I just was offended by the language. If this a reflection of current reality, we are in trouble.
It's sad enough that more and more movies are filled with the f word, but now you pick up a suspense novel and there it is on almost every page.  Adds absolutely nothing to the story. Between that and all the crude sexual references I can't wait to delete from my Kindle.
Really like the product.  Unfortunately, should come with a disclaimer to not leave it submerged  in the product for any length of time.  Left mine in a tube of moisturizer for approx. 7-10 days and it is now the consistency of bubblegum--already chewed!  Yikes!
Did nor care for this style of writing - it was too much back and forth.
Great story line, stupid ending and too vulgar for my choice of reading.
I let time go by, just as I did with the ""shades"" trilogy that even the newscasters talked about. I can only give thanks for free library reading. This book is vulgar and disgusting in every possible way. I feel certain I will not ever read another best seller.
Too hard to follow---characters to changeable--not a good relaxing read
I enjoyed this book, couldn't put it down, until the last chapter. I can't believe that was the ending. Great story, terrible ending. Left me feeling unsatisfied and certain that a chapter was missing! Won't be seeking another book by this author again. :-(
I really tried to read this book, but I could not bear how awful each of the characters were and how awful they were to each other - they deserved every awful thing that happened to them. I stopped reading it. Life is too short to read awful books like this
I checked this out from the library, glad I did. After reading the first several pages, I started to skim the book. I had no connection with the characters. They were unbelievable. The plot was like a bad TV show. The ending made me snort and roll my eyes.
No one likes a book that leaves you angry and makes you realize you just wasted a lot of time.
I really do not understand all the good reviews. I bought this book 3 days ago and cannot get past the first 4 chapters. It is boring and the story is dragging and going nowhere. It does not hold my interest at all. I am returning this book for a refund.
I have to say I was loving this book, I could picture it being a great movie. That was until I got to the last section. The ending of this book is so awful, I could think of at least 6 different ways it could have easily went that would have been better!
This story was slow to start.  Almost set it aside many times.  Plot absolutely ridiculous.  If she planned her  wickedness she wouldn't have been so naive to be taken advantage of by the people in the cabin area.  The ending totally unsatisfactory.
Need a credit as I returned the kindle the day after I received it.
not my kind of book,  only good thing was it has a perfect ending
I did not like the back and forth chapters at all. I think the story would have been better if it had been written from one side or the other. The story line was also strange. I would not waist my time or money on this one.
It is hard to believe this book would be on the N.Y. Times Bestseller List and for so long.  I hated the book (could not finish the book, but read the last two chapters).  Another reviewer called the book vulgar and it was, poorly written with no ending.  Do not waste your time and money!
I got suspicious at the end of Part 1 - Skipped to the last 10 pages -Didn't bother with the rest. Grateful for my library & e-book lending. Might have felt obligated to read the whole thing if money had been spent.
this is obviously a novel of current thinking and  addressed to an audience that is not traditional.  It is not even well written.  I read it for a book club and would not recommend it for anyone. It was a waste of time.
Typical 'boy band' style writing. The story is so unbelievable and you can recognize that the author is making it up as she is going along. I am tired of these generic books, typical of the Grey series without the porn.
Ridiculously sick story.  Took 3 tries to finally get into it.  Kept hoping this book would end because I don't like to quit something until it's finished.  I do not plan to see the movie,even though I like Ben Aflect.
I could not read the whole book for the first time ever.  I did not enjoy the topic at all, although it was nicely written. The two main characters were so sick that i could not stand reading it. Not my kind of book.
After reading so many good reviews for this book, I decided to give it a try. IT WAS TERRIBLE. I don't understand how two people could be so psychotic and manipulative. DO NOT WASTE MONEY ON THIS TERRIBLE BOOK!!!!!!
I am an avid reader.  I am always looking for new things to read.  I came across this author and after reading the reviews, thought I'd give them a try.  I purchased all three books.  Unlike the other two titles available from this author, this book never went anywhere for me.  The other two were slow getting going, but once they got there, there was a great story.  This one was like a roller coaster who's track just ends at the peak of a hill.  I'm not really sure where the author was trying to go, but for me she just never got there.  I felt completely let down when I reached the last page, and honestly I felt cheated.  Please enjoy the other titles by this author but steer clear of this one, so you don't feel like you have wasted your time as I do.
I should have believed a lot of the reviews before I purchased this book. It kept me glued to the pages for a day and a half until the end. Yeah I feel very cheated. VERY disappointed and sorry I wasted my money.
trash!
This is the most boring book ever! I have only got to 15% of book and just can not read and waste my time anymore. If this is suspense novel, Then I must have read all the good ones and this is what is left.UGH
This book got great reviews and I made myself finish it. No one was believable. While the author was able to create tension, it got to the point where I didn't care because the characters were all so unlikable.
The author did a disservice to only children, making Amy into a cliche of a self absorbed and selfish person. And, she also did a disservice to abused women, as if those who claim abuse are really sociopaths.
The book was defintely not a page turner, but it was somewhat interesting. The end was just disgusting. I never want to believe that people are actually capable of this or would degrade humanity to this point.
The story starts out good.  Loses steam with way too many coincidences.  Not much.....  I'm sorry I actually paid for the ebook.  I'm puzzled as to how it got on a best seller anywhere.  Don't waste your money
One of the worst books I've ever read.  The 2 main characters are husband and wife, both psychos, who argue and berate each other constantly.  No redeeming value to this book. Depressing and the ending stunk.
I'd been hearing so much about this book but when I started reading it, I couldn't figure out what all of the hype was.  I read a lot and this is the dumbest book I've ever attempted!  Rambling and no plot!
Disappointing. Slow to start, difficult to get invested in the characters then just as it gets interesting it ends in the most anticlimactic, disappointing wimpy way possible. He's a wuss and she's a b¡+€=
The book for me was hard to get into, but once I got past the first 100 pages it was easier to read. All in all I would not suggest it to anyone and would just tell them to watch the movie. AWFUL ENDING!!!
was too weird for my taste......just not my kind of read.
It started off very well but then it feels like the author got lost & didn't know what to do next and then it just ends. Poor ending. It built up for a wonderful climax and then nothing.  Disappointing.
Could not get into this book.  Didn't finish reading it.
I didn't like the way it ended, she should not have won.
I don't understand why Amazon sent message I would like this book, but I finished reading it, although I thought every character in the book was disgusting.  I will not recommend it for book club.
I found this book to be vulgar and it even without that to deal with, the story was pointless!  I wonder how it made it to the Best Seller list, again it is a very trashy book about trashy people
There was not one likeable character in this book. It left me feeling angry and empty.  The only reason I finished it was because we read it for bookclub.  I would not waste my time on this book.
I was very disappointed in this book. First, reading it was a very depressing experience. The book dragged and dragged and then the ending was awful! The book was a complete waste of my time!
I did not enjoy this book at all!!! Very DEPRESSING!!!
If you like to read about two self-centered, egotistical snots then this is the book for you. I quit reading it because the characters were so unlikeable. Sure am glad I didn't buy it.
Started reading this and didn't like it immediately.
It was to slow moveing. It just took to long to say what it was going to do. It didn't hold my interest at all. The only reason I kept reading it was I had to read something.  CINDY
I don't like this book. Just started and put aside.
The beginning was great. After the revaluation she was alive, it just fell apart. I couldn't believe he would put up with the situation and raise a child with her as a mother.
I'm half way through this book and still haven't been able to get into it. Reading a story that is supposed to be someone's diary isn't my thing I guess. It's extremely slow.
This book is very confusing and I do not recommend it to anyone! It was very dumb and pray I never read a book by this Author again. Please spend you money wiser than I did!
I kept hearing about this book, and got on a waiting list at my library for it. I was excited when I got it until I started reading. It was a huge struggle just getting through the first few chapters. By chapter three I gave up. It was sooooo beyond boring, and I hate when every little thing has a 2 page detail. The author goes on and on and on simply about a guy waking up to his alarm clock at 6 am. Who gives a shit? I do not understand the hype about this book. I asked a friend who read it to just tell me the whole story, and I'm quite happy that i didn't waste the time reading the entire thing!
Unlikeable characters, unless they feel very very real to me, don't keep me turning pages. I hated this book. I hated it because I'd expected to love it, because I'd expected some dark murder mystery that would have been grounded in some kinda reality. I could like neither husband, wife, or the silly twin called Go, whose name I read as a verb every time, which made me have to re-read sentences to get the context. I hated the twist around half way through the book. It felt like a bad B movie. Is it skillfully written? I guess. Ok. I'll give it that. She can plot and structure a book. 'Nuff said.
After about 40 pages I was ready to quit.  So thought I'd read the last 10% of the book to see if I wanted to keep trying.  I'm really glad I didn't read any more of it.
I'm so sorry I wasted my time.Sick........................do I have to go on.  What a total disappointment.  There was no justice for Amy , Nick, Desk or his mom.
A good story doesn't need profanity. So why stoop to using it?Not only does an author cut out a large reading audience but reading any books penned by them.
This was a great read until the last few chapters and then this book almost felt like the author gave up and just did a unthought sappy ending. Will never recommend
Did not like this book.  Will not see the movie
did not read it too Dark, just started and quit
I read the first 3 pages and knew this wasn't a book that I would ever read.  I paid for it with a gift card that Amazon rejected.  Still trying to sort that out.
This was selected as a book for our book club. I do like books written with bouncing timelines. The characters are unlikable. The setting boring. Two thumbs down.
A book full of really unlikable characters who you really don't care what happens to any of them. If you want to know what happens just read the 2nd last chapter.
I had seen this book on the bestsellers list and decided I needed to read something new after a love story. I started the book and already bored with it,I struggled along. Upon speaking to people who have read it they said continue reading. I did and eventually it got a little better but when it all came together I felt like this book was a waste of my time. It doesn't deserve to be on the bestsellers list and I'm glad I didn't buy it,it was borrowed if from the library. This is the worst mystery/crime novel I ever ready. Don't waste your time with this..
it was disappointing that psycho bitch lived on and that Nick who finally became strong got stupid and allowed himself to indulge in a never win situation.
I cannot recommend this book!  I was disappointed by the plot and had to make myself finish reading it.  As far as I am concerned, Gone Girl should be Gone Book.
Do not wish to write a review about this book.
This was not  a book I would ever read again or recommend. I found it  painful to switch back and forth from person to person and it. Was childishly predictable
The book came recommended by someone whose opinions I trust. Everything was fine until Amy came home and then it lost me. Like author didn't know how to end it.
while reading the book i felt the filthy language was so unnecessary.  the plot was good but unbelievable.  worst ending to a book i have read in a long time.
I did finish the book, but was not happy about it.  I thought the whole story was ridiculous and frustrating to read.  I would never recommend it to anyone!
By the time I finished this book, I disliked both the main characters very much.  Also, the ending was extremely disappointing.  Don't waste your time.
Highly overrated and predictable from the beginning. SCENARIOS STOLEN from recent crimes.  No imagination at all. Save your money, this one is a dud.
A difficult read. I would not recommend it.
I was so into this book in the beginning.  Then it just got ridiculous! So many outlandish things happened.  I HATED the ending.  Just not for me...
Really hard for me to get into.  Tried to read on a flight to Cancun and just couldn't! Then I tried again at the beach :( Too bad, on best seller?!
I found this book to be too wordy without saying anything important which found me skimming through much and being most disappointed in the ending.
This is the worst book I have ever read. It was a chore to finish it but I never quit on a project. Don't waste your time with this twisted book.
sorry, just did not like this book at all.
I wasted money on this book. Seriously. It is bizarre. I am a seriously educated person, but this book which other reviewers are saying is only for ""the highly intellectual"" reader is nuts. The book has two very unlikable characters who have a bad marriage. I can deal with that. I can't deal with or wrap my head around how unreal the story unfolds about halfway through the book. It was something out of a lifetime Saturday movie - not believable. Jodi Picoult....PLEASE write some more books!
The story did not catch my interest.  it was  very slow beginning.  Did not like style of presentation .  Slow reading due to lack of interest.
I kept reading, thinking it was going to get better. but it never did!! I so wanted to like it because I was recommended by a family member...
This book started out good but quickly got very frustrating and the story line just kept dragging on.  I would not waste the time on this one.
I have literally only written one review on Amazon (this one). Could never have imagined an ending so disappointing. Don't waste your time...
The writing encompasses moments of genius. The ending:  horrendous. Waste of time and money. Will not purchase another book from this author.
I read this book after a coworker's recommendation, and I was sorely disappointed.  As a native Missourian, the book didn't ring true to me.
Not worth even one star. The ending is not just bad, it is totally unbelievable. I cannot believe it would happen even in a fictional story.
Who thinks this hard about screwing up a relationship?!  Focus your energies on something positive!  Plant a garden or volunteer!  Sheesh!
I did not like the wife or the husband and really had negative feelings re the characters....they got together for all the wrong reasons.
One daughter liked this but my other daughter and I really hated it.  The ending was scary and depressing.  I am really sorry I read it.
I'm reading a diary, and the switching back and forth from one persons diary to another loses my interest.  There isn't a flowing story.
Hard to believe he took the role. I assume the screenplay must be a lot better than the book?Predictable, unsatisfying, and sick.
This book was very ""slow"" and focused on psychologial issues which I find boring.  I prefer action.  It was a waste of my time.
What can I say I wanted my money back,what,was,the,purpose of the,book won't buy any more,of her books if was really bad ending,sucks,
Only if you need a way to get to sleep.
I read an average of two books a day.  Usually one is ""heavy"" and the other is light. I am a heavy reader.  The main character in this book is dull as are all the other characters.  The basic character formation never really gels until you finally hit the point of not caring about the characters.  This book could have been vastly improved by an experienced editor who was not afraid to ""use the red pen"".  I purchased this book from Amazon for my kindle.
The book was so good until the end. If you want to be thoroughly disappointed it's a good read. How could the author end it this way?
This book was not as good as its' reviews. The story could have been told in 3 chapters, too much repetition, and I hated the ending!
Not what I had thought it was.  Cannot believe all the excitement about seeing the movie.Stopped reading after about 5 pages.
Liked the book until the last page.  The ending was so horrible it made me hate the book and regret spending the time to read it.
Grabs you in the middle, but what a cheesy ending. I don't get the hype over this book...how many weeks on the best seller list?
Ok, my opinion of this book changed (significantly) as I read it. The story line seemed fairly interesting from the start and the character development was actually pretty decent (although ""character"" itself is clearly lacking with these characters, but that was the whole point...well done so far author!). There were a few flaws with the first half of the book (without giving anything away...specifically Nick's flashbacks to his wife crawling on the floor make no sense as the story unfolds...when you read it you will know what I mean), but all in all the book kept my attention.About three quarters of the way through I was still intrigued (although there were a couple points that seemed rather unbelievable (the wife's initial plan for herself...seriously???) but I was still willing to cut the author some slack there).Then..........the last fifty or so pages were brutal. BRUTAL!! I plowed through those last few chapters as quickly as possible, not because it was a page turner but because it was so ridiculous I just wanted the pain of reading it to end! What a total disappointment. It completely ruined what was up until the end an entertaining read. The ending was so stupid and unrealistic I cannot with good faith recommend this book to anyone. That being said, if you take this book on vacation with you and only get about 3/4 of the way through it before accidentally leaving it behind in your hotel room, then kudos to you! You did it perfectly!
Filthy language that ruined the story
I had high hopes for this as my friend  really liked it but I don't like reading about what mentally sick people do to others.
It's Immature, poorly written, short on vocabulary (vulgarisms), politically correct. I would give it half a star if I could.
It was too slow moving.  As a matter of fact I was very disappointed in this book. I certainly would not recommend this book.
I bought this book when it first came out.  I usually love finding an author I've never read before and this book offered everything I like in a book.  So, what went wrong? The beginning dragged on and on and I just couldn't get into it.  I've tried 4 different times to read this book but it bores me to sleep.  Should I try to get farther into the book? Does it get better or should I just drop it off at my library?
No stars at all..I think it is awful
No idea why people are making this book and Arthur of this book a big deal. Didn't care for it and n or worth my money.
I would not recommend this product to anyone unless they are interested in exploring the minds of two psychotic wackos!
Not worth my time, it went on and on and never really ended. The characters were well developed but I disliked the, all
I really want my money back.  I feel HAD! This is the worst book I have attempted to read in a very long time(if ever).
Wasn't too thrilled with this book.  I skipped pages just so I can finish it quickly.  I would not recommend this book.
Filthy verbiage!  Story would have been okay without the filth!  I am definitely not a prude but this was too much!
The first three or four pages in, I immediately knew I hated the way this author wrote.  I am not a five year old and don't need phonetically spelled out words of what sounds the cupboard doors would make while being opened or closed nor do I need or want other similar stupid things put in parenthesis to try and make the situation appear more cute or real.  Really dumb.I didn't have another book to contemplate at least for now, so I stuck with it for a while longer and found myself skipping most of Amy's diary entries.This far in, I don't care about anyone.  I don't care about any of the characters and hell, I wouldn't have given my parents their money back either.  LolAnyways, I decided to look up the book in Wikipedia to read through to the ending real quick before starting another book.  WHY did I bother?Horrible, horrible and more of horrible.  What a load of cod swallop.  When I found out this same writer wrote the screen play for the movie, I said NO WAY.Not only would I not spend the money to go see it, but I wont even watch it on my laptop for free with an uploaded link.  That's how awful I think this is.
I cannot believe I made myself finish this book for the worst ending I have ever read!  It made no sense at all.
vulga language hit me the first few pages and I just couldn't connect with the story. I returned it thru Kindle.
Was not one of my favorite reads.
ridiculous story  terrible ending
I will not be reading this book. I should have read a sample. Too much use of the F word for me. So unnecessary
This book is very slow and ridiculous and a terrible ending  I will not be reading any of Gillian's other books
Its a shame that there has to be so much filthy language in books these days. It takes the joy out of reading.
The book went on and on with no real ending. It was hard to get into. Finally got interested and then the end.
I am not a violent person, although I like crime lit--but this one was beyond the beyond. Obviously goody-two-shoes make boring characters, but these two were such disgusting skeevies you wanted to bang their heads together. The plot, if that is what it was, was so overly done it was laughable. You know those hapless catfish? I would club these people instead of them.
Cant get it to work on my kindle and ate the price of the book.  Wish I could find a way to get back my money
This book was a waste of time!  The ending was horrible.  I honestly don't know what the hype was all about.
I finished this book only because I started it. Did not enjoy the story and found the whole book depressing.
Excellent book--hard to put down
Now that I've read it.  I wish I hadn't  Her writing is crass.  I don't like itI'm sorry I read it
One of the worst books I have ever read. Not worth the money. I would Not recommend this book to anyone.
I did not find anything to like about this book.  I do not know why this book received raves in reviews.
ERROR = I DO NOT WANT THIS BOOK
waste of time - terrible ending
Read it for the hype. Didn't even finish half of it. Boring. Very predictable. Don't waste your money.
Totally no redeeming features to this book, a waste of time. Hated it, sorry I read it, what can I say
I didn't like the book at all only got to read a few chapters and deleted it too pages about nothing.
My wife didn't like it.  I need 13 more words in this review. So, try a different book.  That's it.
I agree with just about everything written by all of the one-star reviewers above and only want to add one additional point:  the book was a disgustingly second-rate imitation of Scott Turow's excellent novel, ""Presumed Innocent.""  It's all about the psychotic wife who will do ANYTHING to keep her man.  Scott did it much better.
I couldn't wait to purchase this book because everyone was talking about how great it is... NOT!!! I should have gone with my gut after, being bored out of my mind, reading the first 50 pages and put this uninteresting waste of a book down.  Don't spend your money or time on this book... I'm so sorry i have wasted both!  UGH.
I kept thinking it was going to get better, figured a lot of it out before the author.  The ending was lackluster.
I would like a refund can't read the book it is full of foul language distracts from story line
What a waste of my money! All that reading for the worst ending to a book ever!! Don't read it!
I picked this book up because it was on the best seller list. Why? I have no idea. The writing is terrible, the book was terrible, there were no redeeming qualities is this book. I wasted a week of my life reading this book, time I will never get back. Would I recommend this book. Absolutely NOT!
not a good read, overrated.
Was not a good book. Hated the book garbage don't know how it made it on the top 10 list.
A real page turner. In fact you dont even have to read most of them. A big waste of time.
One of the worst books I have ever read. It's too bad, because the first half is compelling. But the plot is see-through, the ""trick"" is obvious, and the end was predictable. Enough plot holes to drive a truck through - routine police work is ignored, alibis aren't checked, lawyers hang out with their clients tracking down clues, a man is killed when drugged and no post-mortem is performed apparently, so the police never know he's drugged when he was killed. Witnesses aren't believed because of alleged erratic behavior once in their lives 15 years before the events of the book. Every unbelievable action of the protagonist is explained away by yet another character flaw. I'm sorry I got past the awful title to read this travesty; my instinct was right - gone is not an adjective, and this is not a good book.I'm just grateful that I didn't buy it; I borrowed it from the library.
Did not have a good ending
So full of twists and turns.  Shreds the Ten Commandments and all ethical standards.
It started off again but by the end It was terrible. Not a single character to like.
Probably the most obnoxious book I have ever read, and I have read plenty of good, fascinating books in my 82 years. The story started out ""kind of good"", just enough to make me think there would be a delightful twist at the end. Just the opposite, the really stupid depressing ending.
I did NOT care for the this book AT ALL!  I will not be reading this author agsin.
Unredeemable characters.
Don't like crazy people!
Did not like ending !!!!
I read this book about half way through but couldn't finish it - I just couldn't get invested in these characters or their problems and had no interest in what happened to them. I was expecting a lot because of all the great reviews this book got but it didn't work for me.
Very disturbing. This book is well written, I just didn't enjoy it. Oh well.
I'm not one to write reviews unless absolutely necessary.  This book was awful and a total waste of time.  The only good thing about this read was I borrowed the book from the library and didn't spend a penny.  Then I would have been really upset.
didn't like it all. not your fault. zx zx zx zx zx zx zx zx zx zx zx zx zx
Every now and again you come across a book so badly written, with characters so terrible, so unsympathetic, so stupid, that you wonder who the author slept with to get this dreck published. And when that book gets turned into a movie, well, you know they've sold both their soul and body to Satan.The plot, predictable, the ending predictable and moronic. The characters are all too easy to hate. To be a good book you need characters people can love and relate to. Not characters you want to beat with a spiked covered bat, chop into little pieces, and feed to pig, then kill the pig and burn the body, then take the ashes and ship them to the center of the sun.Don't read this book. I could feed my dog alphabet soup and she could poop out something better.
I felt ripped off at the end...  ...actually I was suspecting that I'd be ripped off somewhere about half through... by the storyline, yes, but especially by the fact that this author ripped me off of my precious time in reading the book!
The ending of the book is so disappointing and horrible that it made me angry that I had wasted time reading it. The beginning was slow and the middle showed promise but overall I don't understand what the buzz is about. Terrible book
Did not like this book
Did not want this book
Too long and drawn out
After all the twists and turns this story took you would think the victim (not to mention the reader) would be vindicated.  No.  It's a flat anticlimactic ending to what I had hoped would be a good summer read.  Waste of time.
The book was interesting though a little far-fetched, but it did keep my interest.  But the ending was just horrible.  It's like it ended in mid-sentence and there were too many loose ends.  Won't read any more of her books.
What a disappointment. It starts out slow but starts to build interest so I stuck with it only to be disappointed in the ending. I can only hope there is no sequel planned.  I should have paid more attention to the reviews.
AWFUL!  The story DRAGGED on & on....it got to the point where I was just flipping through to get to the end...and this was on my Kindle!  The wife is just a psycho.  Cannot believe I wasted my time on this piece of trash!
didn't like it at all
excellent summer read
This is not a good book.  Two Psychopaths get married and inflict pain on each other for years.  Wish I could get my money back.  The ending was just awful.  So unsatisfying.  Don't waste your time or money on this one.
The author is not honest presenting the facts. It is very confusing
Mind-numbingly bad. The plot is absurd and the characters never feel like anything more than over-simplified cardboard cut-outs designed to move a story forward. I keep hearing this novel described as a page turner, but I struggled to maintain any interest in the characters or their ridiculous struggles. Worse, the book seems rooted in a pervasive misogyny. Women are at the root of all evil here--and ""strong women,"" as the book defines them, are worst of all. (Note: Flynn's definition of strong women varies significantly from my own. You'll know the ones Flynn considers to be ""strong"" by the cloud of feminine curse words surrounding them as well as their ""vaguely vaginal smell."" Ugh.)
Please tell me this gets better because as of right now, I am not understanding how this book could possibly be #1 on the bestseller list.  I am struggling to get through the first part of the book.  It is horrible
I was hooked for the first 2/3 of this book.  The diary/present contrast seemed a clever construct.  The characters, though unlikable, seemed on the verge of redemption.  Then we meet Desi, and it all goes downhill.  The ending was contrived, unbelievable, and frustrating.  To imagine that these two hateful people would slog through a life together, and even procreate, just to ""win"" is repulsive and beyond belief.  If you want a depressing glimpse into dysfunctional married life, I suggest you go rent the Michael Douglas movie, ""War of the Roses"" from the 1980s.  It'll only take an hour and a half of your time as opposed to the hours you'll waste on this novel.
Not my type of book.
Wow, what a ridiculous ending. I agree with others that it seemed the author did not now how to end the book, so she just stopped writing. Nothing clever about this at all, I felt really hoaxed. A previous reviewer said that those of us who did not like the ending just didn't get it - you know the story goes on without us - well I have news for you, we did get it and feel it was a cheap trick. She implied that we were too unsophicated to understand it - ha, you've been had! I watched the last episode of the Soprano's, which ended it the same manner and was delighed by it because it was true to entire span of the series - this was not in that league.
k i have like no desire to read this book fro all the BAD ratings so someone JUST SAY WHAT happens at the end does he stop writing and why does everyone wanna take a shower when they finish reading it
Thank goodness I didn't waste money on this book.  Thank you, public library! I HATED the ending, but I also hated how the book was set up, to begin with.  As somebody previously mentioned, it began sounding like a teen girl's diary, when it was actually a woman in her 30's, telling her story.  It went back and forth.  First Amy was talking, then the next chapter, Nick was talking.  To me, the book just didn't flow, I didn't care for any of the characters, the plot was ridiculous, and as stated before, I hated the ending.  It should have been called ""Pure Drivel,"" but Steve Martin already has a published book bearing that name.
I heard so many good things about this book, but it was awful, the beginning had a lot of promise. A mediocre husband...5th anniversary...drifting apart marriage and then she's gone. From there it went all down hill. Half way through the book I couldn't give a crap if Nick was innocent or guilty. Amy was an awful person. Even through her diary entries she came off as whiney and off. No sympathy for either character. The only person I felt sorry for was his sister.By part 3 I was hoping she kill herself or Nick and her kill each other. That was the only reason I finished this book.Don't bother. Way over hyped.
I travel a lot and listen to audiobooks weekly.  I bought this one and wished it had a rated ""R"" label on it so I would have known not to waste my money.  I got through the first few chapters and the nasty language got worse, so I never finished it.  I rarely stop listening to an audio book because I want to get my money's worth but this book was one of the worst ones I've heard.  I don't even want to give it or sell it to anyone else because of the horrible language.  They should have ratings for audiobooks like they do music.  I never would have wasted my money on this book had I known how bad the cursing was....so buyer beware.
did not care for it
This book should be a minus 20 stars it was so awful.  It is a sick book written by a sick mind.  The language is terrible, the plot disgusting, and the characters beyond psychotic.
Sorry, Author, but the only reason this was a best seller was the fact that there was nothing else on the market. I am an avid reader and this book was a waste of time and money.
Thiis is possibly the worst book I have ever read. A total waste of my time. I was happy I didnt have a hard copy to dispose of. It would have gone straight into the trash.
The book was vulgar.  I could not believe this was written buy someone that was over 15 with a knowledge of story telling.  I will never read another one of her books.
Despite it's sales success, this is essentially a shaggy dog story -- there's lots of talk and in the end not much has happened (or what has happened is contrary to what has been motivated by the plot). This novel also has two of the least admirable ""heroes"" you may encounter this year. After about 50 pages you don't much care what happens to either one of them. If you like to hear amazingly self-centered people whine for about two-hundred-plus pages, this is a novel for you. Otherwise, reader beware: Skip this one.
Loved this book!
sounded like the makings of a good story, it had 4 1/2 stars by a couple of hundred people on my Kindle ... sounded like a winner, could have been a winner if not for the tedious, boring, low level writing of the author...interesting story buy painful to read.sounded like the makings of a good story, it had 4 1/2 stars by a couple of hundred people on my Kindle ... sounded like a winner, could have been a winner if not for the tedious, boring, low level writing of the author...interesting story but painful to read.
I got this book for my kindle recently 'cos there was so much hype about it.  I should have followed my instincts and avoided it!I had read Sharp Objects  some time ago and didn't care for that one either.There were no likable characters, although I did like Nick in the earlier chapters, but the plot went downhill and fast.Amy was obviously a psycho and her parents-totally clueless!I only finished the book because I wanted to see Amy punished-alas didn't happen and I hated the ending.
. . . unless you love vague and annoying endings usually found in highbrow literary fiction.  As so many other reviewers have pointed out, this book keeps a reader riveted, hoping, waiting, knowing, that justice will be served then *poof* it ends, and you're not really sure why. Almost as if the author just got tired one day and decided to quit.  I listened to this in audio book form on my Kindle Fire -- 19 hours of my precious ""reading"" time wasted. I could have been reading a book with a memorable ending.
Purchased testing the on-line procurement. Started few times from the beginning. Boring me. Next time I have to be more careful selecting the books.
(I'll just watch the movie) the book was boring
i don't like it
Disappointed...
Hated the book!
This book was recommended to me by non mystery readers, and now I know why.  OMG!  Talk about much ado over nothing.  and I mean nothing.  No justice, not even poetic justice, and the male character could not have been portrayed as more stupid or idiotic.Sorry.  I had hopes for this, but I wont be reading any of this author's other works.  I hope the folks who make the movie realize how absolutely appalling the ending is and change it!
Hated it, couldn't even make myself finish it.
I am very disappointed in this book. It is a terrible read, very boring. Definitely not worth buying. This is by far the worse book I have read in a very long time. The entire book is just very plain and unexciting, The characters are not realistic and they are even boring. I love to read and rarely feel this negative toward anything I have read. I expected so much more from this book. What a big let down.
Can u give it less than one star? Boring.
Easy read, mediocre writing, all characters non-sympathetic leaving me unhappy for the time and dollars spent on this work.  Intrigued by the movie hype which was the motivation for purchasing the kindle version.  Not satisfied by the ending.  Bored with the he said/she book chapters as the writing style.  Was hoping for something substantial but was very disappointed.  Would not recommend the book or it's subsequent movie version.
Disappointing
This book was sooooo slow, only in part 2 did things start (still very slowly) to pick up.  I finished this book only to see how the truth would come out (spoiler alert: that never happens).  The ending was terrible, completely unrealistic (again spoiler alert: who would live the rest of their life looking over their shoulder?)  I can't bring myself to read another of Gillian Flynn's books because this was so terrible.
Hands Down the WORST BOOK I've EVER read!!! If there was possibility of ZERO starts I would have chosen that.When I read I need to find at least one LIKEABLE character = flawed or not. BUT there are NO characters that you can love. I tried to give it the benefit of the doubt and read on, actually putting it away twice. Since it was going to be a movie I tried again to see if there was some way the story redeemed itself.NOPE!! HORRIBLE ending. Unless Hollywood has taken license and it going to change the ending I don't see how it's going to be a great movie???During part 2 when you find out Amy is still alive I thought okay = she is flawed and maybe I can like her now. But then she went on with her psychotic charade and worse ... couldn't stand her.Nick has the opportunity to redeem himself, but plays on in Amy's sickening horrific plans.Go was the only character I could appreciate, but she plays such a trivial part that it couldn't carry the book for me. I spewed for days, reading horrific lines from the book to my husband. I JUST DON'T get how this became a best-seller. I can't even like it as a psychological thriller/horror story??? I really tried = but the ending just pushed it over the cliff for me.
Why did she end it like that?  I think she ran out of ideas and took the lazy way out.  I couldn't put this book down, and had high hopes for a great ending.  So many books do this to me I guess I shouldn't be surprised.  If you do read it, just don't expect a satisfying ending.  7/8ths of the  book is very enjoyable, but that last 1/8th is pretty important...
I completely agree. I spent hours reading this book...refusing to put it down.  After I read the last page, I was angry that it ended so abruptly. The book has so many twists and turns and builds up such an amazing story line and I was really disappointed with the main characters as well as the author for ending such a fantastic novel in such a terrible way.
I looked forward to reading ""Gone Girl,"" for I have several friends who thought it was amazing and could not put it down. I got only 1/3 of the way through the book when I stopped reading. Neither one of the main characters was at all worth caring about. I do not understand why it is still on the top ten reading list in the Times. Dreadful. I am so glad that it was leant to me and I did not buy it.
Spoiler alert: i read this book as part of my book club. I was about 25% in and was going to give up, but my friend said there was a plot twist at the half way point, so I skipped ahead and was able to finish it. The discussion was great at club this month since the rest of the ladies enjoyed the book, but I would never have finished it otherwise. Unlikeable characters as the number one reason.
big disappointment.  Can I return it?
The first 2/3 of this book was fantastic, worthy of all the media praise it has received. But then... the last 1/3 of the book completely falls apart. The characters, even the secondary ones, become more than flawed-- they are either utterly despicable (Amy, Nick) or pathetic cliches (Mo: ""I'll love you no matter what"" and even worse, Tanner Bolt).The ending? *Sigh* Just. Awful.
I was extremely disappointed in this book. Amy is a psycho & should be be in a psycho ward with no recourse.
I thought I was buying a mystery and/or thriller. It is neither. It is a book about two ridiculous people wrapped in an inane plot, a few witty lines and utter lack of any credibility.  It a tedious read with no redeeming features. I do not normally write book reviews but I found this book so bad and a waste of the money it cost to buy it. To repeat, do not buy this book.
The author created all this drama but couldn't figure out how to end it.  In the end nothing was resolved.
This book was so hard for me to read. I love to read! I would read a book a day if I had time for it - this book is one that I wanted to put down and never pick up again. I forced myself to finish it since I was reading it for a book club, but I won't have a rave review at our next meeting....sorry, just not my style.
Really do not like this book. Recommend you find another to spend you money on. Asking for a refund now.
I found the E book Gone Girl very boring and repetitive.  Needless to say, I was surprised that I found this to be true due to all the positive feedback I had received from friends, book reviews, etc. before I read the book.  I am truly shocked that it was so well received, and yet so difficult for me to get through. I would not recommend this for future readers.
All I can say is the book was good and kept my attention, but once it reached the last 30 pages or so the author seriously let me down, it was horrible, even terrible.  I wanted to throw my kindle across the room.....All that time I will never get back.  I won't be reading anything from this author again.
Didn't like at all. Kind of dumb
There was so much hype about this book I could not wait to read it! However, I was very disappointed. I found the story full of implausibilities which makes it difficult to enjoy on any level. I rushed through the end of the book just to get it over with. Don't waste your money on this one!
By far one of the worst books I've ever read - especially disappointing after the hype of it being on the best seller list for so many weeks!  What does that say about the American reader? OMG!Her writing style is appealing but the characters most unappealing.  And the ending ?? Atrocious is an apt description.  Fuggedaboutit.  (sp?)
This book reads like a Catholic girl (and I do mean girl) projecting her issues.  The Catholic Church has been the advocate for centuries of this madonna-whore trope and the patriarchal marriage (male dominant, male infidelity doesn't matter while female infidelity does, sentimentalizing motherhood and not grasping what children really need).  It is innately corrupt, counter to biology and human nature and now that paternity has become provable many people, except Catholics and Evangelical Christians, have moved on (not that there aren't still problems in these other cultures).She doesn't understand the structural problem and so she is turning the female character into a type of ""whore"" angry over infidelity and not being ""known"" by her husband.  But the roots are deeper and projecting this onto an English ancestry woman named ""Elliott"" is disingenuous.Please, own your own Catholic problems, hold the right parties accountable for the right reasons.  Projecting these issues will not resolve them.
I read more mystery novels than I care to admit, and embrace ""flawed characters"" who make stories interesting. These two main characters were more than seriously flawed, they were just plain disgusting. Such a ridiculous ending - I was really sorry to have stayed with it.
Can't get into, boring reading
Not worth the time to read it!
This book was fabulous until the last page.  It just seemed like the author gave up and didn't really care about the ending.  With all of the twists and turns throughout the book, I felt she had a lot of opportunities to draft an amazing ending.  Very disappointing.
I think this is one of the worst books I've ever read.  I've never read a book where I disliked EVERY character in the book.  Yes, it has some twists to it but without being engaged with the characters, who really cares.  The only reason I continued reading was the hope for a decent ending.  What a disappointment.
this is every mans nightmare!
After reading over 1/2 the book, i skipped to the last 100 pages to see how it ended, only because I had invested time in reading one of the most boring and unlikeable books I have ever read.  I learned a lesson though.  Always read the sample before ordering.
I purchased this book because of the high reviews and a friend recommended. I'm am beyond disappointed with the book and I read a lot and this tops the list of horrible endings.  No closure, nothing was resolved, nothing.  Would NOT recommend to anyone.
I stayed up late to finish Gone Girl.  It was a waste of time.  I liked the first part of the book, but began to lose interst as it became ridiculous.  I figured the ending would  help me to like the book a bit. But no!  It was even more far-fetched.
The ending was so incredibly dumb. I could not believe it ended where it did. I actually thought there was something wrong with my kindle and that the last chapters were missing. Don't read this book. It will leave you feeling angry that you wasted so much time to reach an ending that wasn't there.
Are you kidding me?! Spent the whole day reading this book only to find it disappointing. Engaging, yes. So many plot twists,I couldn't put it down. And then, bam! It sucked! Oh and the author does not know how to use the word ""literally"" correctly. As grammar Nazi, I couldn't get past it.
There were parts that I couldn't stop reading and others I wished I didn't.  Overall I really wish I didn't purchase this read in the first place.  The girl was off her rocker.  Then again, it did seem like the character was real.  I didn't like the ending.  Definitely not a feel good book.
Hated it.
booooring
Stunk!!!!
Hated it.
GIRL GONE (GG) was poorly written as if a college sophomore girl had just finished “CREATIVE WRITING 101” and learned to turn some cutesy phrases.  I get it – GG sells because a woman writer wrote about revenge against a guy, her husband.  Much better thrillers have been written by James Patterson such as GUILTY WIVES and THE QUICKIE which were constructed on the same theme of women teaching guys lessons.  Even my own thrillers of some young socialite women on various adventures top GG (DEMON OF HADES, DEMON OF LUISON, DEMON OF XIBALBA).  I found much of GG so boring I had to skip over verbal garbage to kind of skim through a storyline that lacked any credibility or thrills.  What’s wrong with readers that they fall for this meaningless rubbish?  Thank god I got the book from my local library so at least it was free.  I’m afraid one can knock success.
This was quite possibly one of the worst books I have ever read.  The characters are unlikeable, the plot is ridiculous, the writing style grating.
This book drove me crazy. The only reason I read it was for my book club.I can't believe the girls loved this book. I hated it. It was hard for me to finish it.1. I don't care about bad words but when it's the sister telling the brother about &$@ somebody, it' s gross.2. The unnecessary words. Describing somebody's head. How they want to uncoil thier brain. ""Semi-friend, barely friend, newish friend"". For me, reading this was insanity.3. I hated the way the author used stupid names for the charcters. There was one called "" Go"" after Margo.  It was so darn confusing. Another one was called Boney??!!4. I don' t care or want to know details on anybody's sex escapades!I guess the girls like it for the clues/mystery of who killed Amy but for me, reading this long book was torture.
About 50 pages into this I figured out the plot.This book was well written and clever but I cannot give a book a good rating when I hated the characters!!I stuck with it hoping someone would finally die.....alas, no one does.Don't bother with this one.
Cynical, all but one  periferal character (Boney) are unlikeable. The author takes the worst of human nature; sociopaths, misogynists, personality disorders of the worst kind, and writes from their perspectives. Disappointing that this is the writing to which so many people seem to be  drawn right now. We need uplifting, creative, good work. I read this because our book club selected it, and am so sorry I bought it and wasted my time, but because it's popular, I didn't have time to get it from the library. I'd  have stopped reading if I hadn't wanted to participate in the discussion for book club. I now feel that urge to read something well written, thought provoking, and positive immediately, to get the ""bad taste"" out of my brain. Better check and see if Lief Enger has a new book.
I couldn't wait to crack the book since it received such great reviews.  From the first 50 pages or so, it was  just like other books, MANY other books.  No original ideas.DISSAPOINTED!  Don't waist your time.
SO disappointed. Is this the type of dribble that makes it to top 10 book lists? I kept hoping for more than the plastic barby  and ken dolls that I was given. Even in the last Chapter I was hoping for more than the predictable-but I was wrong. Don't waste your time.
There's absolutely nothing thrilling about this ""thriller.""  I hated it, hated the characters and didn't care about their story.  This book is not worthy of the hype it's been receiving.  Don't waste your time!
It was a great story, but can't belive how the book ended. What a waste of time. The authour took the time to build up the story than just took no time for a ending. Dont waste your time or money !!!
Knowing nothing about this book, I purchased it as a Book Club read. What a waste. I'll give the author credit for some clever writing, but that's about it. It was a total waste of money to purchase it (not available at library) and of time to read.
This is frankly an awful book.  The main characters are not at all interesting ...they have no redeeming qualities. One is a sociopath and the other a liar and a cheater they both get what they deserve ... each other.  The actions of the sociopath are far fetched magical thinking type of things.. like for instant...if someone cuts you off in traffic you think about doing something... she does it...over and over.  This is one of the most disappointing books I have read in a long time.  I do hope I have better luck selecting something to read next time.
did not like the book.
This novel was so full of four letter words that I could not finish it.A good story spoilt , why books these days are so full of foul language when there are so many adjectives the writer could use instead. Very disappointed in this book.
This book came across as one big cliche and had heavy borrowing of plot devices from other, better written novels. The characters were stereotyped and so unpleasant that I did not care who was to blame, etc.One star is harsh, but deserved, as this book seems like the author was focused on ""how can I write a potential screenplay,"" rather than trying to tell a solid story. It was all designed to lead to the shocking plot twist, which was so obvious that there was not even a slight frisson in the emotions. It also was so condescending to the reader that I am surprised by its success. Why did I read the whole thing? I told a friend I would, but I am so sorry that I did.
I liked the first half very much, then some editor must have got ahold of it and had to make the ending just too perfect....and too much.  Less is sometimes more.  I won't ruin it by saying any more, but the ending was just bad.
I really enjoyed the book and then it just stopped being the story I was reading about. Kind of pissed me off actually.  I was extremely disappointed!  I have recommended this book and I'm sorry I did now that I know the ending.
The story was marred by excessive and unnecessary foul language. Didn't finish it, and deleted it from my Kindle account so I didn't have to look at it anymore. Disappointing!
Rated X
stupid!
The book had an interesting plot but the language that was used throughout the book was disgusting, vulgar and very upsetting to me. It was totally nessesary and I am sure I will never read another book from that author.
I wish I could give this book no stars! It appears at first to be intelligently written ...oh, wait, no, apparently the author has a very limited vocabulary, because she reverts to vulgar language on a regular basis! The story is interesting enough, but because of the profanity I quickly found  myself reading just to see how it ended. Just to be met with that, ""I can't believe I read the whole thing for this!"" feeling. It's a John Grisham anti-climax; Grisham with a potty mouth.  Amazon should have a rating system for books - Rated R for Language. This is my first time reading this author, and definitely my last!
This was too strange and convoluted for me. It did not hold my interest. I generally love mysteries but not this one. Apparently I am in the minority though.
What was it about?
Ridiculous premise
I did not care for this book. It was not well written and left a lot of unanswered questions. I wanted to read it before I watched the movie but I have no intentions of watching the movie now.
Horrible stupid waste of time. Do some reading, give up writing, stick with your day job, Gillian. Donate the money you made to charity. Work on creating wisdom in your tiny parched soul.
THIS is what passes for a good book these days?  Seriously?  Who did this author's publishing company have to pay to get this kind of hype?  It started off great and then became absolutely, utterly ridiculous.  I'm still annoyed that I bought into the hype and read it.  It was a waste of time.
I purchased this book because it was #1 on the NY best sellers listing and Kindle. It was not written in a style that I am fond of, it switched from Amy telling the story in one chapter and then Nick in the next chapter.  It started out as a good who-done-it, however the plot was revealed to early by Amy, in her telling of the story.  I did not like that Nick was portrayed as such a simpleton, and Amy so devious, and the ending completely turned me off!  Really!! His wife confesses the murder to him, and that she set him up to look like he murdered her! Then she  stays with her because she is pregnant.  He tells us in the book he is not sleeping with her, and so we are to believe he is such a simpleton that he just blindly accepts her word that the baby is his! Could this man be portrayed any weaker?  Also the FBI and cops bought her new version of the story, not likely!!A reasonably sane man or woman would set out to see justice done on this crazy woman! The last thing you would do is to allow her to raise this child,whether it was yours or her accused rapist,Desi, the man we know she framed as her abductor then killed. Knowing she is insane how could you stay in the same house with her?  HUMPH!I don't recommend this book at all!! I was truly disappointed in the ending, which had so many possibilities, but not the one the reader is left with. Of course this is just one woman's opinion, and I giveGone Girl: A Novel no stars!!!
This was a good story, however the writing style was AWFUL! I endured through the book to find out what happened and I was NOT pleased. I don't plan to read Gillian Flynn.
EXTREMELY detailed, even down to how the rug felt when walking on it.  If your willing to skip most of the 1st half of the book then yes, because the story idea is good.
How did this book get so popular?  The characters were uniformly despicable and the situations completely unbelievable.  The lead characters each got what they deserved.
...and time.  I thought I would try a new author...this book builds and builds and fizzles.  Wasting money frustrates me.
This book is so meh, the characters so ridiculous and boring, the plot so dull and the ""insights"" so trite, I'm thinking if it was published pretty much anyone could take a crack at writing a novel. I don't care one bit what happens to any of these characters. None of the ""twists"" surprised me. Wanna read a good book? Try ""Cruddy."" It's so well written you won't be able to decide whether to laugh or scream...not yawn, like I did quite often with this book.
I had heard about this book from several friends. It was slow from the start but gave it my all hoping for a stunning ending!  Disappointing to say the least!
Long drawn out, predictable and boring! And they are making a move of this.....hope it doesn't take as long to watch the movie as it did to finish this book.
This book is boring and predictable. Really no substance. Just a complaining wife who is self obsessed. The book drags on and on for not such a great ending.
Well written in many ways. Plot was disturbing but absorbing. Characters were well drawn. Ending was awful and overshadowed whatever qualities the book had.
I got about half way through this book and could not finish it.  The protagonists in it were so repugnant that I did not care if they lived or died.
I immediately donated it to a used book story.  The ending especially.  What a complete dope of a husband.  I was very dissapointed in my purchase.
Disappointing ending. Movie too long
This book was horrible. The first couple of chapters were o , but then it went down hill fast, and I do mean fast.  It simple got less and less believable  and the ending had to be almost the worst I ever read in a book.  The ending  was not  plausible  in any way, shape or manner. I will not see the movie and I will not read another book  by this writer even if I was stranded on an island.
Couldn't put it down!What an amazing story. Kept me on the edge of my seat. Great read.Loved it.You should read this book.
this book is absolutey incomprensible and a sad refection on author editor and publisher.i cannot understand the high reviews it has received so far which i can only attribute to people who like poking themselves in the eye with sharp pencils. in any event maybe someone could access the manuscript further down the track rework it and make it a bit more readable and with a decent ending.
Was told by a friend that this book was so good.  I was very disappointed!  The characters were lame and the story predictable.  Boring!!!!
This was long and drawn out. It was like pulling teeth to get to the end, and by then I just knew that it was predictable and unsatisfying.
The book has two main characters with no redeeming qualities which makes a book with no redeeming qualities.  It is written with too many confusing choices in words.  What the heck is a rictus smile and why would an author choose such words for average readers?  Ridiculous book.  Poorly written.  It drags on and leaves you wishing you hadn't wasted your time.  Don't bother reading it.
I wish I had.  I was going to read her other books, but not now.  It's like she wrote herself into a corner and couldn't figure a way out.
I give this book no stars.  Characters not appealing, sick people.  Lousy ending.  Made me want to take a shower to get the creepys off...
This author would not qualify as good. The book rambled on to no ending that made any sense to me. Will not select any books by her again.
Stupid story
Horrible! !!
Disappointed
Would recommend this book for most women. Gone girl kept u interested but u had to be able to follow the characters.  Really liked it!
This book is not a good read.  I've never read about two more disturbing people and the ending is one of the worst endings ever.
Started of good and declined quickly.  For the first few chapter, it was engaging.  Then it became unbelievable and predictable.
Many, many twists that keep you engrossed in this book. Excellent thriller. Wish the ending could have been a little different.
The ""diary"" style was not my cup of tea at all, and the characters seemed to have little by way of redeeming features.
This book was so bad. I read the entire book waiting for something to happen, it never did. I'm sorry I spent $12.99 on this.
One of the nastiest pieces of literature i have ever seen  disgusting and immoral.made me feel sick to my stomach
Just a waste of time! Read a few chapters skipped to the end very predictable :( Do no recommend this book....take it back!
This book was filled with ugliness. Ugly language,  characters, and actions. I'm sorry I read it. I would not recommend it.
This is a very entertining read.  Everyone that I reccommended it to agreed.  It's nice to read a story that has no heros.
Top of the best sellers list??  I can't figure out why. Yes. The book had me intrigued til it became incredibly twisted, unbelievable with the worst ending you could ever imagine. Don't waste your time. Justice was not served.
I GAVE THIS BOOK 1 STAR BECAUSE I DON'T LIKE THE CHARACTERS OR THE STORY LINE.  THE CHARACTERS DON'T SEEM TO HAVE ANY REDEEMING QUALITIES OR LIKABILITY.  THIS BOOK WAS RECOMMENDED TO ME BY SEVERAL PEOPLE.  I WOULD NOT RECOMMEND THIS BOOK TO ANYONE.  I AM 50% OF THE WAY THROUGH THIS BOOK AND I WILL FINISH IT BECAUSE I BOUGHT IT.
The book sucked...big time...
© high health reforms make it hard to weekly arrange go reform said quality now from put pref found John early books!™
Slow moving and convoluted.  Hated it.  Never finished.  There was no desire to find out where the wife went,  Refund?
horrible ending.  i couldnt like or relate to any of the chacters.  i kept on hoping it would get better but it didnt.
total waste of time  - must have been in the mindless stage when I saw this on my phone in the middle of the night  -
I felt like I had been ""beat up"" after reading this book, there was no relief from the negativity.  Hard read
This book was not worth one dollar, let alone five dollars.  Don't waste your money on it. Not typical of the author.
This book stinks. The characters are so twisted, that I wonder about the sanity of the author. I am sorry I read it.
I read the book and just now watched the movie on HBO.This boring childish dribble got me twice. Shame on me.
Book is the worst of any book read this year. Story scattered and didn't stay on subject or a to do with the story.
This book I read mostly because of the reviews I had read. It was a great disappointment though when I did read it.
This story was all over the board. When I finished the book, the only question I had was ""why did I waste my time?
Remarkably superficial, characters never go beyond one dimensional stereotypes, arguably sexist and ultimately disappointing across the board. Like eating late night junk food, mildly enjoyable at first but you quickly come to regret that you did it and it seems more and more foolish the more you think about it.
What a waste of time!!  I finished and felt as if I'd wasted four hours of my life.  The storyline was very weak..
This is one of the most annoying books I've read in a long time and I read a lot of books.  I could find no reason to recommend this book and finished it only because I had read a good review and hoped to find  a reason for that good review.  The improbable, nasty  liars  belong in a science-fiction movie.
This was a book chosen by my book club.  Otherwise I would have never finished it. The story was interesting and may have continued so if it had a better ending.  But the writing is so vulgar and crude that it was hard for me to read it.  There must have been at least 3 or 4 ""F"" words on every page.  It is the most vulgar book I've ever read and I thought nothing could be worse than the ""Girl with the Dragon Tatoo"", but this was.  When describing scenes of any intimacy--after all, the people in the book were married--the writer uses very foul language.  The writer is a young lady with a child.  I would be embarrassed for my child to ever read my books if I wrote like this.  Now bear in mind, I am not an old lady prude.  This book just went too far.  I don't expect my novels to border on pornography!!
This book was well written but for all of the twists and turns throughout the book it left me asking myself ""why did I read this book?"" The ending left the reader without closure, only frustration and was wishing I had spent the time cleaning out my sock drawer or doing something productive.
Truly, not really worth reading, unless you have nothing better to do.
Filthy! I tried several times to get past the filthy language and into the story.  I finally just gave up.
FineI can't move on until I type this have to complain about this still need more,words but be kind.
I didn't care for it. I think it jumps around a little too much.I especially didn't like the ending.
I just couldn't get into it. Very hard to get it all together. Confusion at the beginning. Will try again.
I was very disappointed in this novel and cringed at all the vulgarity. Will not buy another of her books.
I have no idea why anyone would want to read this work of fiction when there are a million true crime stories that are far more interesting.  For people who have never ventured into the genre of TRUE crime, this might represent something enjoyable but to me this is absolutely pointless.
Not agood story. I did not finish it and would like a credit from amazon!! Does amazon read this review?
This book could be a great read if the language was edited.  The f bomb totally ruined the entire book.
It stunk.
I didnt like it at all - I hate American-writing, I should have looked into it a little more before I purchased it!  Obviously very modern American language, I only read a couple of chapters, thought the language quite disgusting. Not even worth the one star I had to give it!
I found this book hard to get into.  It was boring and I didn't like how slow it read.I say no.
Read the book because of all the hype and was anticipating a ""knock your socks off"" ending and was highly disappointed. I thought it would end with a murder/suicide but just dropped the reader off the cliff with nothing. Don't even try to make this into a Lifetime movie.
Did not like this book. It was boring and the  ending sucked. I'm sorry I wasted my time reading it.
Amazon did not load the book and I have already paid for it and have not giving a chance to read it
The first half of the book I couldn't wait for it to end.  It was disturbing and disconcerting.  The second half got a little better but the whole idea of such maniacal calculating evil had me wishing I never picked up the book.  In truth I wish I hadn't read it.
I bought this book as a gift but now i don't want to give a used book to someone for christmas...
That is a couple of days of my life that I will never get back. I hated the way it ended.  Disappointing.
Did not care for it at all. The movie was much better than the book. The book was to drawn out
Sucked.
I haven't even read this yet, but, if it follows the movie closely, I will hate, hate the last at least one-fourth of the story.  If I had seen the movie before I ordered this, I would have never ordered it.
Story meh. Character development double meh. Didn't connect on an emotional level with any of them.Really for all the hype you would think you were going to read a masterpiece.Cheese not Chekov.
The book is based by teo point of views and I dont like books like that. I read rosie by ceceila ahern and didnt like it so I know I wouldnt like this book. :( should have read a few pages before buying it
I threw the book -- hardback, no less -- into the trash bin immediately after I finished. Rampant and cheap misandry and misogyny. Unsatisfying ending. SPOILER ALERT: Man descends into the depths of hell with his psychotic wife ... to preserve his life?  Yeah. Not.If I could give this a negative rating, I would have. This book is on the best-seller list? I cringe if this is what passes for acceptable mystery writing. I'd support my critique with examples but I'm too disgusted at the moment.Utter garbage.
If you have read the book and are looking for opinions about this weird book and the major WTF? at the end, here's a 2 cent opinion.  Initially loved the book and like others who have so stated, wanted to recommend it to others via word of mouth before ending the book.  Glad I didn't.Yes, we get the whole modern day relationships Men are from Mars juxtapositioned with a twist that Woman are also from Mars....but the author did a mean trick by setting up for a big finish - considering the major plot turn with the kidnap and the subsequent murder - considering the fact that the male main character ""Lance"" kept repeating that he had something good in mind then totally wussed out - yeah, it was pretty bad.What is interesting is the trend in today's semi-literate book/kindle publishing pop culture is the fact that this book is somewhat (but more egregious I'll give you that) representative of the endings seen today for ""best sellers.""  The books start promising, they hook you with major plot twists and turns and then the ending just falls off a cliff or becomes so implausible that one tends to feel had.Can't wait for the movie.
I don't normally do reviews for anything, but this was bad enough that I needed to warn people.I gave up reading this book at 20%.  The story was going no where, and was horribly written! The author gives ridiculous analogies for everything in the book! It is impossible to keep up with what is going on when she decribes how every character walks, holds their hands, breaths...
Awful
Okay, I consider myself I person who can fall deep into just about any book that is set in front of me. I am currently majoring in English Lit. So I am kind of forced to have a knack at reading anything and everything. I almost always end up enjoying every book that I read, and this isn't a small statement. I have probably read over thirty books this year alone.I enjoy reading for pleasure, but because of my busy schedule I do not have the time to try out any random book that I come across, so I tend to stick to the New York and Kindle best sellers. Gone Girl was a book that I was planning on reading for pleasure. I had very high hopes for this book, due to how fast it became popular as I watched it rise higher and higher on the best seller list. Needless to say, I ended up being very disappointed.After the first forty pages or so I felt no need to continue reading, this normally does not happen to me. The overall feel of the book just comes off too cold to be enjoyable. The novel begins with a guy whose life has basically gone to shit. He and his wife, Amy, have both lost their jobs and have moved from New York to his hometown in Missouri because his mother has recently died. With the last of their money, the man, Nick, opens up a bar with his twin sister, Margo.Most of Nick's thoughts are about how he no longer feels connected with his wife. He recalls memories of times when he has made Amy mad, and times when Amy has made him upset as well. He describes his home as lonely. On his fifth year anniversary, he avoids his wife at all costs, and then complains about her to his sister at 'The Bar.' And then, to top it all off, when Nick comes home after a phone call from an alcohol dependent neighbor saying that his front door is wide open, he finds his house rummaged through, and his wife missing.How is the reader supposed to care about his wife's absence when he doesn't even give a crap about her anymore? The couple does not exchange one sentence of a conversation in the beginning of the book before Amy is found missing. I feel like their relationship is not given any foundation to the reader for them to really care about the main dilemma going on in the book. I know I sure didn't.I surprisingly could not finish the book, could not even get past forty or so pages. Maybe I should have given it a bit more of a chance, but the book felt too cold, too depressing, too jumbled around from Nick's thoughts to Amy's past diary thoughts. Nick's thoughts in 2012, to Amy's thoughts in 2005. And after reading enough reviews to confirm that the ending sucks, I was left with no motivation to continue reading, but enough to write this review to let others know.
I tried to return this book but they charged me  anyway.I thought  would read it because  was being charged. BIG MISTAKE.  Not a good read.
I just finished this book last night. I was dragging through the overly described scenes because I thought perhaps that would be an interesting twist at the end. Instead I was sadly mistaken. This book was not a suspense thriller in my opinion. It was a book about a bored, spoiled, very clever, hateful woman who hurt innocent people when when she didn't get what she wanted. The husband is a depressed, angry, unemployed man who takes everything out on the rest of the world instead of dealing with his own issues. I was very disappointed at the way the author stereotyped not only Midwesterners and New Yorkers, but also the 30-40 year olds. I happen to be 35 years old and I am definitely not as dumb and hateful as ""Amy"" claims all women are.I am sorry that I wasted my time and money on this book. I wish I could demand a refund from Amazon.
This book will leave you wishing you did not read or waste your time.  Beyond vile ending and last half of the book.  I will spoil it for the folks wanting to read this awful book but this is not worth reading.  This book leaves you very upset with the ending though.  Won't read another one of this authors book I can assure you.
I thoroughly enjoyed the read. Just enough twists to keep you wondering. But the ending?!? AWFUL!!! I mean completely horrible.
I am sorry to report that I did not like this book.  It failed me on many levels.  The biggest being, the first three quarters of the book was a word for word repetition of a recent news story of a pregnant woman who disappeared and whose husband was convicted of the crime.  I'm assuming it would be inappropriate to use their names.  The book then takes a weird twist and goes really off with an unacceptable, illogical ending that left me cold and empty.  All the characters in the book thus far do a complete about face and become someone they are not in the beginning of the story.  It just disappointed and went flat.  I felt like I could have put my time to much better use than to waste on this book.  I certainly wouldn't recommend this book to anyone.
A strong beginning written in a clever, quickly-paced style soon deteriorates into pop fiction mediocrity. Implausible events/situations, new character traits popping up like rabbits out of hats, women with supercharged libidos all test the reader's willingness to suspend disbelief.  This book was written for Hollywood.  It will succeed in that, but it failed with me.  I set it aside about page 130 when Andie the ""mistress"" makes her surprise appearance pulling her dress off and cooing for sex. Both her sudden arrival in the narrative and the manner in which she makes it provoked one last ""Get Real!"" reaction. Gillian Flynn has writerly chops, but in this book she uses them to exploit our culture rather than contribute to it.
I believe that writing talent is evident when the piece ends in a way that doesn't necessarity satisfy the reader but does go somewhere that leaves the reader yearning for more, sad that its over.  I agree with everyone who says this is half of a good read, no more than that.  Too bad.
The  book was pointless, ending the same as it began. the language vulgar and i would not recommend it to anyone.
The beginning of the story was slow, but kept my interest.  Somewhere around page 100 the story improved and I enjoyed it.  As the story unfolded, and the twists and turns fell into place the ending was a bomb. It was very disappointing. I do not recommend reading it.
Did not like the book at all.  Had to finish because I started it.  Just did not like the story at all.
I though this was a really stupid book.  It made no sense to me and it took me ages to get through it.
I was quickly engrossed in reading this book and enjoyed the writing.  The last 1/3 of the book became tedious and a bit ridiculous but I continued reading hoping I could figure out THE clue that would tell me how the cops get their culprit.  And the ending is so disappointing.  I was angry about investing the time to read this book, getting so anxious to find out how everything would be solved, only to be left with an awful ending that did NOT tie everything together.  If you like good mysteries that bring together all the clues to resolution or enjoy a shocking (but satisfying) twist - this is not a book you will enjoy.
I did not buy or read this book.  I read her book ""Sharp Objects"".  It was an ordeal to read.  Based on that book, I decided not to buy another book by the author.  Not worth the time or money
What a twisted mind to write such a book!  The author must be as sick as her main female character.  I kept thinking the book would redeem itself, but it didn't happen.  Hopefully I'll forget it soon.
Do not waste your money on this terrible, horrible, very bad novel.  The plot is totally implausible and the characters are detestable.  The only reason I finished the book was because I had spent the money to buy it.  I could have cared less what happened to any of the characters.  The ending was just plain stupid.  I guess the concept behind the plot was clever but just too creepy for words.  This is one author I will avoid at all costs in the future.
Gone Girl, this book started out well but went on too long.The ending was terrible, as there was no ending at all.  What a disappointment.  Don't waste your time.
I actually physically angry and this author.  The ending of this book gave absolutely no resolution or satisfaction.  Will never read one of her books again.
I'd heard all the hype about this book and was eager to check it out. It was interesting but I thought it was way too drawn out. I was really disappointed!
I seem to have lost this book on my kindle and can't read it
With all the good reviews on this book I just knew it was going to be good. This book is terrible and boring a serious waste of money!
Got off to a slow start but then I couldn't put it down
This book has no redeeming qualities.  I look for a book where I can learn something.  I abhor the sex focus - real people do not dwell on sex or talk about sexual parts of the body or use profane language.  I hated that God's and Jesus's name was profaned.  Names that I love, cherish and worship.  It was a dark, depressing read.  It is not a wholesome book, not one that left me with any good feelings.  I bought it as I had read a series of books by an author with the first name of Gillian, couldn't remember her last name and thought this might be the same person. I only continued to read it as I had bought it and hoped there would be some redeeming quality in it. There wasn't any.
Even if this book was free, I wouldn't think it was worth the money. I knew from the beginning what was revealed halfway through the book and nothing surprised me during the entire book. I couldn't like any of the characters and found the writing irritating and oddly phrased. It seemed the author thought the more you describe something, the more interesting it became but it just seemed lame, like she was trying to fill pages. The only reason I finished this book was to find out the resolution, not that I was excited to see what was going to happen. To me, it was all so sad and depressing. I makes me hungry to read a well-written book that I can enjoy.
I have friends who loved this book.  I did not.
the ending of this book was an enormous cop out, ruined the whole novel for me. Greatly disappointed by it
This is by far the worst book I have read all year.  I plowed through hundreds of pages, hoping that justice would prevail and was left with the most improbably ending an author could imagine.  The characters are completely unbelievable;  Amy has committed murder and has plotted for months the degradation and possible execution of her husband.  Yet, she tricks him by getting pregnant and he says, ok, let's play nice!!!!!!!!  Grrrrr.  There has to be better literature for us to spend money on than this claptrap.  I am totally disgusted!!!
For the first time I went to the end.....I could not stand anymore.  This is ""trash writing""!!  I got to page 257 trying so hard to like this book....unnecessary vulgarity....poor substance...and the ending is even dumber!  The other reviews are spplauding the book....so I won't give it away, everybody has a right to their opinions.  If people are really like this.....heaven help them....I don't want to read about it. I wish I could get my money back!
So I never write reviews on Amazon, but I felt compelled to put in my two cents about this book.  I payed full price for this book at B&N, and I wish I could get my money back!  Serves me right for buying a hardcover.  I found this book to be mildly entertaining as I was reading it (the beginning was a bit slow, but it picked up toward the middle), but the ending was terrible.  Terrible as in, 'wait, that's the ending?  where's the rest of the book?'  I'm not the kind of person who demands a nice, happy ending for every book I read, but this ending was completely incongruous with the rest of the book.  I assume the author was aiming for some kind of ""modern"" or ""psychologically complex"" ending, but it just felt unfinished and unbelievable.  Trust me, if you're a regular reader of thriller/mystery books, you'll be very disappointed in this one.  I get the feeling that all the 'buzz' about this book is coming from paid critics, since I know I wouldn't recommend it to my friends.  I give it a few months of fame before it fades into obscurity.
Gone Girl: A NovelI am astounded at the positive press this novel got from reviewers.  It stretches the plausibility factor as thin as it can be drawn.  It is overlong, ploddingly paced and amazingly repetitive.  It is predictable in the extreme and gives the reader two totally dislikeable people.  These are not charming villains--Richard II, Hannibal Lecter, for example--but two people it is almost hell to spend so many pages with--think ""No Exit"" horrible people.  The wife is a monster of the first order and the husband is the most implausible fool in the history of literature.  To believe this nonsense we have to think that the police who have been burned by just such tabloid story fictions as this one never smell a rat.  And we have to assume that a husband will throw all caution to the wind and sleep beside a murderous spouse whom he loathes.  In reality there is only one adjective to describe such a man--dead.  And this potboiler by a formerly talented writer is just that DOA.
Simply terrible!  The story is so pathetic and poorly written.  I had to read almost half the book before it got a little interesting. PLEASE don't waste your time reading this book.
This book was an absolute piece of crap. Only finished it because I thought it would get better or all connect in the end. I want the time I wasted reading this book back.
We stopped reading after a few pages.  The language is filthy and we aren't fond of profanity.We wasted $4.99 on this book we now never intend to read.
Loved this book right up to the final chapter. Hate, hate, hate the ending! Didn't fit the story and was a cheap co-out. Don't read this!!
I don't know...maybe it's just me, but I truly don't understand any of the rave reviews.  I was determined to finish this book about the very dark and disturbing places in one marriage because of those rave reviews, but reading it was so exhausting, sort of like trying to run or jog through a deep and muddy swamp. Getting to the end, finally, left me angry because of the waste of my time. The characters are, without exception, unbelievable and/or thoroughly unlikable - without complexities.  Alternating voice chapters usually are a clever way to build suspense, advance a plot, fill in blanks and give texture and insight to characters, but not in this book. Here, it was confusing and provided no insight, since it was all a con anyway.
I don't understand why so many people love this book and are recommending it to others to read. There is no point to the book. The main characters are horrible people. How can you like a book with no one to root for? It got better in the second part after the ""twist"", which I saw coming. SPOILER ALERT...But then ended almost the way it started off, 2 miserable people not in love with eachother anymore, but are still married for some reason. The book didn't make sense. Why would someone want to be with someone so crazy? The author just focused on the ""twist"" in the story and didn't care about how the story turned out. Why are people buying her other books? I will never buy another one of her books! What a waste of my time and money!
I purchased Gone Girl on the recommendation of my niece.  She said it was fantastic and she's recommended other books that I've enjoyed.  Not this time.  Absolutely unbelievable.The first part of the book was slow...but I was told it would get better, so I soldiered on.  Second part of the book WAS better...or at least a bit more readable.  I kept waiting for the BIG REVEAL.  The ending was absolutely the worst ending ever.  No justice and I had a flashback to the television show Dallas and was HOPING that they'd both wake up and it was all a dream.There are MANY loose ends in this book.  With such an open ended conclusion, I can only think the author is working on a sequel.
I stayed up until 3:30 in the morning to finish ""Gone Girl"", and I absolutely hated it from beginning to end. I kept reading it hoping it was going to get better because it's on the current NY Times Best Seller list. It didn't. I disliked every single character. I thought it was contrived and trite and made a mockery of the reader. Every character in the book was a cliche'.  As for the ending ... what ending?  It's like the book stopped in the middle of a sentence and left me feeling that the author was laughing all the way to the bank at every single person who read it to the end.
Passed the book on to a young woman I know who reads A LOT and MIGHT like it, told her to throw it away if she can't make it past the first few chapters. I only read because it was a book club book, only one gal in the club liked it.  Most of us didn't even finish it.
There were maybe two times while reading this book that I thought things were beginning to happen..but that did not last more than a few paragraphs.  The story is ridiculous, the writing is elementary (except when she intrusively adds all the cuss words). Seriously, this is one of the worst books I have ever read.  Stupid, stupid implausible story line.  I even hated that she gave the name GO to Margo instead of calling her Margo.  Total waste of time and money! I finished the book yesterday and am still upset that I ever read it!!
Just when you start to care about one of the characters...there's a twist and you don't.  It really is not well written and the character development is disjointed and doesn't follow. Some may say, like ""real life"" when emotions are involved, but I really hated both of the main characters at the end of this book.  It will make a great movie and maybe, with acting, the audience will become more involved.  I really HATED the ending...very disatisfying with many unanswered questions.
I wish I'd read more of the 1 and 2 star reviews instead of simply relying on the best seller list.  This book has no satisfactory ending. It's infuriating. I could argue about other parts of it being illogical, derivative, cliched and more but in spite of everything, it held my interest.  Until the last page.  I, too, would have thrown it against the wall if it weren't on my Kindle.  Horrible non-ending. It's as if she just got tired and stopped writing.  Do NOT buy this book.
GONE GIRL WOULD HAVE BEENGOOD,OR AT LEAST THE PLOT,IF NOT FOR SO MANY 'F' WORDS.AS A  CHRISTAIN I AM APPALLED AT SO MANY PEOPLE USING THAT WORD.THE STORY COULD HAVE BEEN SO MUCH BETTER IF THAT WORD HAD BEEN LEFT OUT.
Resisted the reviews so I could form my own opinions. As I kept reading I would glance back at the author's photo and wonder why someone who looked so sweet and ""normal"" could write  such a perverse and sick book???? As I read her acknowledgements it made me more uncomfortable.  Where does this kind of thinking come from?  As my title says..in the trash on Tuesday.
This book was a selection for my book club at the local junior college.  After reading a sample I downloaded, I decided I did not want to waste my time on this story.
I don't consider myself to be much of a prude, but the foul and sexually explicit language in this book was really overdone, unnecessary and just gross.  I was surprised that a very conservative friend recommended this book to me. The plot is okay.  The characters are annoying. I stuck with it to see how it ends---wasn't worth it.
This book is crap! Don't waste your time and money. A story you might see on a made-for-tv movie. By the time you get to the ""ooohh big cliff-hanger"" ending, you're so tired of the whole thing that you don't care how it ends. I feel ripped off!
I was so mad when I finished this book, I vowed never to buy another of your special offerings.  It was horrible.  Why do so many of your offerings by authors I never heard of just drift off with no ending.  Can't these people finish a story??????
After the first two I thought it would have a better plot/ending.  Wasn't impressed.  Glad I purchased used, then sold.
I had high hopes for this book given all the praise from both critics and readers alike. Do not believe the hype. I read approximately 25 books a year and this is by far the worst book I've read this year so far. It is the first time I read a Gillian Flynn novel and I honestly think that the woman does not know how to write. It was atrocius! Who uses colons in almost every paragraph??? The characters were incredibly annoying and I did not feel for anyone in the story. The way Amy talks made me want to punch her in the face. I just wanted it to end, and not because I was sitting in anticipation waiting to see what happens, but because the characters annoyed me that much and I wanted to get back to my life. The reason I did not stop in the middle is because I kept up hope that maybe...just maybe, it was going to turn around and get better. Big mistake! This was, hands down, THE WORST ending to any book I have ever read. Utterly ridiculous! Do not waste your time with this book!
I could not get the whole book to download...only the first chapter. After 2 tries, I just cancelled the order.
I A Book filled with hatred where evil wins. Terrible. Makes you wish you had never begun reading it. No more.
I started this book with high hopes because of some of the reviews, and ended it in the camp that felt a shower is needed to wipe off the grime. What nasty people, what a pointless story. I wish I could rate it zero stars.
After listening to 2 discs of the audiobook on an 8 hour car trip.  We gave up.  The story developed extremely slowly.  ever heard the saying slow as molasses?  That is what this felt like.  It was painful.
Contrived and poorly written. If I didn't need to read this for my book club, I would have put it down and not finished it. Waste of time. So many good books to read....this is not one of them.
Started out great, very aspirational then it turned incredibly dark and depressing. Based  on reading the summary I expected a good love story, not the case. I would not recommend this book.
since this was #1 on fiction list, thought may be suitable for daughter to read.Wrong. It is pure trash. read a few pages to see if appropiate. put pages inbottom of bird cage
It's not very often that I don't finish a book that I spent money on. I felt like this book bounced around and it just kept losing my interest. I tried coming back to it over and over but just gave up. I was about 100 pages into it and felt like they were still ""building"" the story and that nothing had happened that was keeping me reading. Disappointed in this book!
If you like to relate to the main character, feel sad when something terrible happens, feel happy when something wonderful happens, and most of all hate to put the book down, this book is not for you. I did not care about the characters and there were no surprises right down to the last page.  I am sorry I purchased it and even sorrier I finished it.
After all of the hype about this ""fantastic"" book, I couldn't wait to read it. Then after I read it, I wondered why I had wasted my time. I really hated the story-line.
i have struggled with this book from the first page.....and it never got any better.  you want detail, upon detail over any object, feeling, or thought, this is the book for you.  drove me crazy.  i finally gave up on it....don't waste your money on this sad piece.
I don't know how this book got any good reviews.  The ending was extremely disappointing and lame.  It ruined the entire book for me.  I've never read Gillian Flynn before and don't think I'll be reading her again anytime soon.
This book was such a rollercoaster ride and created so much tension in me that I had to put it down for a week! After those few days the suspense was killing me, so much so that I gave up and peaked at some of the last chapters to calm my nerves. That's how good this is written! I did not look at the actual ending, just a few pages in one of the last chapters and that was enough to get me back into it. I loved it until the ending. It was so anti-climatic, such a break from the rhythm of the rest of the book that I thought I got a defective download to my Kindle. I wished that I had read the reviews before I bought it. I will from now on, that's for sure! I don't recommend this book. Unless you like being hung out to dry. It was that bad of an ending. What a let down.
What a bloody waste of my precious time reading this rubbish..Back to only reading British/Irish writers..Don't waste your time and dosh as I did!
Mysteries that have twists and turns are fun when created in the hands of a talented author.  This author is manipulative toward the reader.  The premise, the perspectives, the ending are pathetic. Different strokes for different folks I guess.  I won't be reading this author again.
Not worth the hype.  Unrealistic.  Very disappoinating read.The beginning kept me going, but the ending was a downer.Save your money.
I seriously cannot believe anyone would like this awful, awful, book!!!! I usually don't read books like this but a woman who works in a bookstore I love recommended it. If I could give this zero stars I would. AWFUL!!!!! Filthy language, seriously FILTHY!!!!!!! And WORST ENDING EVER!!!!!! There is not one good thing I can say about this book. I am an avid reader and don't remember when I have read something so unbelievable and trashy.
I deleted this novel after getting but a third of the way through it. I found no characters whose fate I was interested in. The writing struck me as forced and harsh. And what finally turned me off was when the author had her principal character, the husband, Nick, tell totally unnecessary and weakly motivated lies to the police. She might as well have hung a sign on him saying, ""Hey, I am supposed to be prime suspect."" x
I am ashamed to admit that I finished this book instead of putting it down after reading Part I. The plot is interesting, which is why I finished it, but I can't recommend it due to the excessive use of foul language. I've never read a book that came anywhere close to including the number of F-words in this book. There were probably over 100. I realize the guy is angry, but come on! It ruined the book for me.
Just thinking about writing a review for this book makes me tired. So, I'm not gonna spend a lot of time and energy on one of the worst books I have ever read. The plot is so contrived that it was painful to follow.There is nothing good to say about the characters. Not a one was believable. In fact, nothing is believable about this book. I can't understand how it got published! For those of you tempted to buy it, remember that ""best seller"" does not necessarily reflect the quality of the book, but reflects the quantity of fools that bought it. Thank goodness Kindle lets you try it before you buy it. I'd give this so-called novel zero stars if I could!
I began this book with great anticipation as I had read a review of it in a reputable newspaper and they had said it was pretty good.  The beginning is ok and quite well written as the author sets the scene for a 'who dunnit' missing persons...it soon becomes obvious what is happening and the book pretty much goes down hill from there.  The second half is badly written. I almost felt like it was written by a different person, it was so different from the first half.  Did the author start out well and then got a ghost writer to finish it off?  The second half is clichéd and the characters badly constructed, so much so that i felt they were almost cardboard cutouts! The plot is wildly unbelievable even if you take into account the usual 'willing suspension of disbelief' one must have when reading a novel and the end felt like it just dropped you in the middle of nowhere.  I felt really let down by this book and I would strongly discourage other readers from wasting their time even starting it.
I could not wait for this book to come out.  I do not know why.  I could not get into this book.  Maybe it was me but I just couldn't.  AND because of all the stars I did a bad thing and read the last two chapters.  All I can say is, I guess I'm not a fan of Gillian Flynn.  I tried to read one of her other books before this one came out and neither grabbed me.  I'm too old and there are too many good books that if they can't grab me by 25% through the book...I stop.  It wasn't for me. Maybe something happened between the 25% and the end that has everyone cheering but I wouldn't bother.
I have little time to indulge in reading, and I so regret the hours I wasted on this collection of degenerates.  The language made Catcher in the Rye seem wholesome. There was nothing redeeming about this read in any way, and  I found the ending as disappointing as the reviews had warned.  How I regret the lost opportunity of reading something of (any) value.
This book is overrated. In one sentence: it's a book about two people pointing fingers at each other, as the author builds your anticipation for a victory ending, only to provide you with the worst ending ever. I'd suggest you read the worst book you can image 50x before reading thi. You suck Gillian, I can't believe how lousey that ending was. Shocked.
Have not read the book. Downloaded for my iPad and I nothing but problems. Contacted Amazon customer service, several times and still not a response and yes I was charged for the book. Amazon's response ""someone will contact you"". I was considering buying the kindle fire HDX but with this type of service????
I didn't like this book from the first few pages....but I continued to read to the end..and at the end I was sure I hated this book.Seems by the reviews, I am in the minority...but that's ok.  I feel I wasted my time and money on this book, it was silly and boring.Simply put:  Not my kind of book.
Gone Girl contains way too much offensive language, sexual details and violence. Our book club decided not to have it for our next read because it gave some of our reviewers nightmares!
Awful book!  Truly awful!  It took me two months to read this book and I can read a book in two days.  Slow pace and awful ending!  Dont waste your money.  I wish I had read more reviews. I never write reviews for books, but this one was so bad I had to tell everyone: Don't buy it!
Loved the writing. Shame all that lovely prose was spent on such bilious, emotional cripples. Misery finds company as Holden Caufield's literary progeny swirl in bitterness and narcissism in a work that is equal parts exhausting and infuriating.
interesting plot formula.  lousy ridiculous ending.  worsens through latter half of part ii.  all about men haters and women haters.  brutally cliche.  horrifically disappointing.  huge waste of money.  big big two thumbs down.
I don't get it. Just awful people. Interesting at first but horrible characters being horrible to one another. Wish I had my time and money back. I never write reviews but am so confused how people could like this book......
I don't usually comment but I wish somebody had told me not to purchase this book. The characters are so horrible that you don't even care what happens to any of them. This book was a total waste of time and money.
Never mind reading this book. The endind sucks! Like a deflated Balloon. Incomplete. Unsatisfactory . Like a child changed her mind in the middle of a play, got up and left the mess. Unfinished.
This book had such good reviews I bought it....I wish I could get my money back!!!!There is no suspense just a lot of explanation of things that have nothing to do with anything.
hated it
This was a great book until the end that is. Thi book could have been one of the greatest books of all time them the ending vame and I felt ripped off. Wish I would NOT have read it...
I loved Part One of this book. The last two parts are terrible. I recommended this to my friend until I finished it then told her she should not waste her money.
I was really enjoying this book, the character development and the plot turns, a good whodunnit. But the last few pages completely put me off. I won't be buying this for gifts as I'd imagined. Can't believe the editor let this go out as published.
The book they sent me was water-damaged and stained.  The jacket was not even worth keeping.  I was very disappointed with the quality of the book.
This book sucks, do not bother it is a waste of time, and money Grrr  The only good concept , Cool Girl, I buy that, but after this the author had nothing, to me it seems like was making plots out of nowere
This book had so much potential! The beginning was great, ending just plain sucked! Don't waste your time or money. Big disappointment!
I wish I could rate this book ZERO stars because it is a horrid book.  Don't waste time on it.  The characters are contrived and silly.
I don't appreciate a book full of cuss words.  I only read a few pages because of the language.  I won't read that type of book.
I am half way through book but so far very very slow. Not the easiest book to pick up and read
This was one of those books that I felt forced to plod through.  The beginning wasn't bad but it really started to slow later on.  Yes she was a sociopath but they didn't give that the edge it deserved. If you read other suspense books this will not seem fresh in comparison. I agree with the other reviews that the ending made this book that much worse and I felt I wanted my money back.
I deleted it from my Kindle after reading the F word several times in the first few pages.
I LOVED IT;  AM ANXIOUS TO SEE THE MOVIE!
In the acknowledgements the author states that they got stuck about 80% through the book abd the editor had to help finish. There is a reason the editor is not an author. The ending destroys this book. If a book is a sensual experience, than this book will finish before you are done.I do understand deadlines and publishers demanding a story they have paid for, and yet if the story is not complete, do not waste my time and money please.The book is overpriced for an ebook.Maybe the author will one day go back and actually write an ending to this potentially good story. Till then here are some better choices at half the price.Never Smile at Strangers  Jennifer Minar-Jaynes  2.99Past Imperfect John Matthews  2.99
I have never, ever read a book about such self-absorbed, uninteresting people in my life!  I can't say if the author is good--if she wants you to intensely dislike every one of the major characters, then she has succeeded.  I haven't been this disgusted/outraged/disappointed with a book since my one and only venture into the Nicholas Sparks dementia.  I love a good thriller, and I enjoy psychological twists and interesting characters.  I can say, with complete honesty, that this books contains none of this.  I know it's getting rave reviews but this is one reader who sincerly wishes she had her time and money back......
To be truthful, I didn't read the whole book, I skimmed it.  The beginning was slow and tedious.  The writing kept going from present to past and between two characters.  This is not a writing style I enjoy.I was determined to get to the end, so kept paging forward on my Kindle and reading when some new piece of information seemed to be presented and truly wish I had just given up.  The characters had no redeemable qualities and were just sick and twisted.I will not read another book by this author.  I can't fathom the mind that creates such appalling, repugnant characters, much less writes about them.
From one of her first books, I thought Flynn would emerge as a fresh contemporary voice of a new writing generation. Instead, in this awful effort, she's emerged as another hackneyed, untalented grind-it-out-for-bucks author. She has no idea how to capture the voice of the male characters. A tough guy doesn't talk like this. And the lead female? Throws the women's movement back into the stone age. It's painfully laborious to make one's way through this tripe.
I don't know how this book is getting such rave reviews.  It started out as a very good page turner but then the surprise twist and continued saga ruined everything.  For me, it lost all credibility.  But I kept reading, wondering how the author would end it.  And it was't worth the effort.
It was really hard for me to finish this book.  It was so slow and drawn out. I had just finised reading ""Missing"" by Chevy Stevens which was awesome and I was ready to ready another thrilling book.  This one was a huge let down with a terrible ending.
This book was a disturbing tome with no redemption.  How the author could let the female protagonist get away with her misdeeds is beyond all human decency.  I am sorry that I purchased it and added to the authors coffers.
Entertaining up to a point....about half way point.  Ending was anticlimactic.  Put your money in the stock market...at least when you lose it you you can blame someone other than yourself for a stupid mistake.  Too bad there isn't a 'no star' option.....
I was getting into the story until about 1/4 of the way in when we find out he has a mistress and I instantly stopped being interested in the book. I simply cannot read about adultery I just can't.
Worst ending and makes you feel dirty for wasting so much time on a sick twisted book. I have read hundreds of books and this is my first rating bc I want ppl to really know how awful. Read the last chapter and you will be better off!!!
I cannnot read it  I have not recieved my paperwhite kindle and you  ask me to rate it.  my screen is too small on my I phone.  Please get me the Kindel
I wish I could give 0 stars. This  was such a waste. The ending was awful. It was a cop out to actually thinking and writing something with substance. Don't waste your money!
Just started the book and with a wonderful recommendation! So I don't have any  comment as of yet!!! I will stay posted....
I like it so far really need to finish were I left off good good good  good good good good good good good good good good
Just don't waste your time.  The author obviously just wrote something easy to market of no literary value.  In one word: inane.
It only goes to show book critics tastes don't represent the general public.  I want storytelling's that draws me into it and has me interested in what happens to the characters.  This book did neither.
First off, the language in this book is just insane. I am not a prude, and I don't mind the occasional cuss word, but one or two every page is too much. Second, I hated the characters. Nick is a complete jerk. I could not stand how he treated Amy. Amy on the other hand is a doormat. She lets Nick do whatever he wants to her and she just smiles and nods. This was not suspenseful at all, it was just bad. I got about 110 pages in and called it quits. If you think its a thriller you clearly haven't read many thrillers! Save your money!
This has to be the worst book I've read in years.SPOILER ALERT:I simply can't understand how a female author can write about a woman FAKING rape. This book is disgusting, with no sympathetic characters and the worst ending.  Totally unbelievable. Just because it's a NYT best seller does not mean it's worth reading. Spare yourself.  I wish I had been warned.
Horrible, reviews giving this book more than one star are lying.  So sorry I spent money for this piece of trash. Seems like it was written by several people that didn't have the same common interest.  Worst book ever written.  When I see others picking it up to consider reading it, I tell them, ""Don't waste your money""!
I read a lot of mysteries and thrillers, but this is this first book that made me feel I had to write a review.  Girl Gone did hold my interest until the very disturbing and unsatisfactory end.  To get right to the point, I actually wish I hadn't wasted my time reading it...
Intriguing first few chapters in but then a yawner. It was easy to flip through pages at a time, skim and scan to get a gist of what the two self-absorbed characters were up to. I had to flip to the end in order to put the plot, characters and myself out of misery.
I should have known that any book on the best seller list was for the masses.  More intelligent writing can be found if you do some digging!  Borrowed from a friend for air travel.  I rarely purchase books.  I get them from the library so I don't feel taken afterwards.
This book was boring and irritating to read, I'm shocked that the previous readers were not honest in their reviews.I especially disliked the mini quizes as the female charectoe couldn't just say what she was up to...Huge Waste of Time and Money!
She writes like a sailor talks. Why is it that writers and screenwriters are unable to write without the excessive use of the ""f-word"". It is as if they have nothing to say. I do not like the ending. Will not read this author again
I downloaded the book this morning listened to it for alittle over 3hrs and Just could Not get into it, wasn't holding my interest at all! the Readers (narrators) were Great the Story just didnt do it for me.
No idea how people could like this book!  I am trying to like this book, some parts are fine but the way it goes back and forth is annoying.Slow, boring, thank goodness for fast forward!
This is the weirdest book!  I don't understand the ending and I suggest people do not to bother to waste their time and read this stupid story.
Thought this was going to be a very literary book... might be a good beach read but don't expect any sort of beautiful prowse or plot!
I can't imagine why this book was rated a 4 to 5 star book. I thought it was terrible. No one is that stupid.
This book was a terrific read up until the end.  NEVER have a read such a good book with such a thoroughly unsatisfying ending.  Now I know reading it was a waste my time.  The ending is a mean trick or something; I almost felt the author laughing, thinking ""ha ha, fooled you.""  I feel tricked.  Don't bother reading it....you too will be angry with the non-ending.
THIS COULD HAVE BEEN A GOOD READ IF NOT FOR THE F WORD.I DON'T HAVE THAT WORD IN MY VOCABALARY AND SEE NOTHING TO BE GAINED BY SAYING IT.I CAN ONLY IMAGINE WHAT CONVERSATION AT HER HOUSE MUST SOUND LIKE.OK,I WILL ADMIT I AM AN OLD FOGEY,BUT I AM NOT FORCED TO READ HER BOOKS AND WILL NEVER BUY OR READ ANOTHER.JUST FOR THE RECORD I ONLY READ ABOUT 1/4 OF IT BUT KNEW THE BOOK NOR THE AUTHOR WAS SOMEONE I WOULD WANT TO ASSOCIATE WITH.
Gone girl is like a complex chardonnay, each sip lingering on your tongue, wanting more.  Then you get to the last sip, and you find a worm in the bottom of your glass.  You just want to gag.  All those aromatic flavors that tickled your brain are overwhelmed by a grub!The characters are three dimensional, the plot is tight, the style is unique, and the story is balanced with just the right amount of angst and humor and then...  Obviously, Gillian Flynn dosen't share my philosophy of ALL'S WELL THAT ENDS WELL!
This was a book I tried really really hard to like. However, it was so predictable, so stereotypical, and ultimately, so boring, I could get past page 200. If you love good mysteries, don't buy this book.
I don't normally read suspense novels and now I know why. Ridiculous ending. not worthy of the time I invested in this novel. Forgettable!
I have tried and tried to care enough to finish this book; the characters are emotionally stunted, boring, egotistic...words fail me. I just can't believe I got this far reading about 2 people who elicit no emotion beyond absolutely nothing but their complete disappearance.This is not a review about the writing which is fine....even the plot is OK. However when the characters, who not only were dreadful at the beginning but continue to reveal ever more unappetizing traits..... really who cares enough about them to bother finishing.Sadly, I paid the kindle price....gag....which is why I read as much as I did....
Actually, I have not read this book yet, so I have no opinion.  I have heard good things about it.
Boring constructs.  Jerry Springer mode.  Flynn tries too hard--she never hits an authentic or correct note for me.  Neither main character is likeable, engaging or warped enough to keep my attention---these are the same characters that you might see on Dr. Drew's horror fest...or the Jerry Springer freak show. Readers who enjoy this drivel might well be experiencing early dementia.  In conclusion, I really didn't care what happened to either character. That's the death knell of a novel.  The theme:  two boring sickos that clearly belong together. Does that put you to sleep or what?  You wonder why fiction is dying...look no further.  I realize now that some women no longer have a cushy life of earlier generations and have to make a living.  But can't they take their time and find something they're good at?
Amazon needs to give their books ratings like movies.  I was offended by the language and what was shaping up to be a sexual encounter on the street among two strangers in the first few pages.  I stopped reading.  What a waste of money.  A rating or hint of content could have warned those of us who would prefer not to be exposed to this.
this book was so boring zzzzzzzzzzzz  nap time how could this book beat the freaking hunger games series i mean really people this and the fifty shades of gray beat the hunger games
This book was one of the most disgusting books I have ever read.  Why is it on the Times best seller list?  I thought this was a mystery, but it was just a way of using foul, filthy language.  Do not read this book. Amazon should put a rating on this book and warn people about the horrible language used.  Only a filthy, small minded, thing could write a book so repulsive. Save your money - Do Not Buy This Book!!!
For one who loves to read good fiction this book is NOT the answer.  Trite, predictible, boring. Never moves, just keeps poking along.  First person narratives seldom achieve the goal of good writing and this is no exception.  The end is totally predictible from the first two chapters.  Plot never THICKENS but just runs on and on and on.  Ending is flat and leaves the reader wondering why the author spent all this time writing --- and --- leaves the reader feeling like a fool for wasting their time reading it all the way to the end.
Clever plot but the ending was so sudden, unresolved that it made me angry for reading it.  When done, it made want to buy a fluff comedic romance to wash out the bitter taste Gone Girl left in my brain...
Gone Girl book is awful.  I do not read books oranything else containing the F word.  This book,within the first few pages uses it twice.  Thatis enough for me to trash it.  If possible I'd likea refund and would like Amazon to remove it frommy Kindle Fire and 2nd Generation Kindle.Vulgar.
After reading rave reviews, I bought this book.  Found the characters thoroughly unlikeable and crude.  What's the point of dropping the F-bomb in every other sentence, except to reveal offensive characters?  I can't relate to any of the favorable reviews.  After reading 70 pages I skipped to the end just to see what happened.  The ending, too, is disappointing, dark and depressing.  I'll never buy another book by this author.
Can't remember. It's been too long since I read it. Buzz about the movie made me remember I had read it.
So disappointed after all the great reviews. This book was just boring. It could have been summed up in four chapters. The ending was just awful!
I'm hearing so many great things about this one, I can barely wait to read it.  I wanted to get it for Christmas, but no one bought it for me.  Which brings me to my point....if anyone's willing to lend me their copy, I would be eternally grateful.  I prefer hardcovers because the backs can be used as a desk of sorts, should I decide to write a post card and need a surface to write it on.  (Not that I plan on writing any, I'm just sayin')  Ok, so thanks loads.  Please response with your phone number and I'll give you my address.  Thanks. PS  THe only reason I gave it 1 star is cuz I haven't read it yet and I hardly find it fair to give it 5 stars.  I do reserve the right however to amend my review should I see fit at a later point in time....as it were.
Purchased this book based on the great reviews.  I read half of this book and it was boring. I tried...
This book was so poorly written....5 characters.3 abused witless women and two violent men.Who was most painfully abused?The reader.
After reading buzzy previews for a couple of months now, I was eagerly awaiting what I thought would be some thought-provoking escapism. Instead, I found myself speed reading the last parts of the book just to get it over with. This book desperately wants to be Gone Girl, and it ends up being nothing much at all. The artificiality of the characters' voices, speaking in some bizarro broken fourth-wall world, amounts to a strange kind of retroactive over-exposition. It gets thin and annoying by the end. I'm nervous about choosing my next book to read because I don't want to be so disappointed again.
I absolutely hated this book.  It was a nightmare of self-analysis, insecurity, drunken blackouts, and soap opera drama.Ugh!  Save your money.
This novel set in a suburb of London is narrated by three women, all of them unlikable.  The main character, Rachel, is a thirty-something that can't get over her divorce and is sliding into drunken despair.  She stalks her ex-husband and his new wife, gets entangled in a murder involving  three couples, two lame detectives, and a minor character who has the answers.  The narrators' chapters are not in chronological order which muddles things up and adds nothing to the story except confusion.
With all its comparisons to ""Gone Girl"", I found this novel too full of paranoia, too hard to find empathy or even sympathy for the protagonist. Rachael is too compromised by her own weakness, stumbling towards the story's end quite accidentally, forever caught in self-pity and lack of character. I  found myself constantly angry as events unfolded. Also I found the male characters to be two-dimensional, too ""typed"". Furthermore, the story relied too heavily on preoccupation with sexual matters, even sexist in nature. Read through but unsatisfying.
Don't waste your time.  Unless you enjoy the neurotic characters and their sad lives of their own making.  This book was a big disappointment .
I thought Gone Girl was highly over-rated, but it's a work of  literary genius compared to Girl on Train! Such flat-footed writing, dull vocabulary, lack of wit and style. Characters underdeveloped and pretty much interchangeable - just mouthpieces for the plot really. The continual cataloging of what Rachel put down her gullet was tedious in the extreme. Guessed whodunnit 2/3rd through the book. Total waste of time.
I hate books and movies where all the suspense is created by the narrator being an idiot, making avoidable mistakes. This tale is told by a drunk who creates all of her own problems and whose myriad mistakes made while hammered are only reason book isn't 50 pages long. I figured out who did it pretty early on, which is not to say im that smart, but that this book is that unsmart. It is similar to gone girl in that it's an unreliable narrator situation (which seems to be the only way that anyone can write an interesting suspense novel these days).  Not hitchcockian in the least----pretty TV movie. This is a thinly veiled attempt to capitalize on Gillian Flynn's writing style,  but not well-written or sufficiently entertaining for me to read the remaining third. Save your money and your time---I wish I had.
The New York Times review called this book ""Hitchcockian"".  That's the kind of praise that must be used sparingly, not squandered on something as thinly-plotted and tedious as ""The Girl on the Train.""  Here's the story, what there is of one, but SPOILER ALERT: a black-out drunk who witnessed a murder remembers vague and useless details at an excruciatingly slow pace, until the end, when it all conveniently comes back in a rush and she solves the murder and the killer makes the obligatory long-winded confession right before he gets what's coming to him.  Skip this.  Read Patricia Highsmith's ""Strangers on a Train.""  It actually is Hitchcockian.  In fact, it's better than the movie.
Unlikeable characters, uneven writing, and confusing structure- what a terrible book.  Rachel is a repulsive victim of her own making, Megan is a bitter, lost soul with a sordid past and Anna is an unrepentant adulterer with a superiority complex- all tied together through their ""love' of a manipulative sociopath, Tom. The idiotic women are so similar the alternating narrative is almost unnoticeable if you aren't tracking chapter titles and the time splicing is ridiculous and uneven.  Throw in a few random characters (red headed guy on the train, the roommate, 2 vaguely written detectives), and a  couple of deadends ( Scott, the psychiatrist, and what the hell with the pile of clothes?) and its just a big mess.  I forced myself to finish the thing for book club but could not have cared less whodunit or who ended up dead in the end.
This book is so unlike Hitchcock, I can't believe a reviewer alluded to this great man.  Don't get sucked in by the reviews calling this book, a Gone Girl-esque book!  This is what sucked me in , and boy was I disappointed.  A full cast of sad, loser-y people you'd never want to know, much less read about.  There wasn't one female character that was redeeming, unless Rachel's ""roommate""  counts.  Cathy wasn't even really part of the story.  She only gave Rachel a place to call home, and provide some uncomfortable moments.  As a friend, she was barely that. As for the male characters, they were even more reprehensible.  The plot, such as it is, concerns Rachel, recently divorced.  She is still obsessed by her ex, his new wife and child, and her old home and neighborhood.  She is also becoming or is an alcoholic.  Her ex-husband totally screwed her by sleeping with another woman and then dumping her.  She is now nearly homeless, and also jobless.  She spends her days riding the train past her old home and neighborhood, pretending to her roommate, Cathy, to be going to work and back.  This is where she sees something helpful to A recent murder of a young woman.  Sounds interesting, right?  Wrong.  You just keep reading about Rachel's sad, depressing life .  Apparently, she blacks out a lot drinking while revisiting her ex, his new wife and her old neighborhood.  This happens again and again and again.  Her obsession with her ex and his life is so pathetic and annoying that you just want to shake the woman.  I mean why would anyone put themselves through this agony day after day?  Does she have no real friends or family to turn to who care for her?  She knows everything she is doing is wrong, and wants to stop but somehow is totally unable to.  Fast forward to drunken nights with a stranger, drunken sleeping with barely know men, riding the train yet again and then finally piecing together a murder she vaguely remembers.  Hardly Hitchcockian or even Gone Girl-esque, or even suspenseful.  Worse, is that every person she knows in this book is terrible.  Mean, petty, uncaring rude,self-involved are the adjectives for all the characters in this book.  Rachel herself basically is the punching bag for all those involved in or out of the murder storyline.  I won't tell you the ""surprise"" ending of who the murderer is, but despite the neatly wrapped up ending, it is very unsatisfying.
If you are a literate, well-read person who has enjoyed dozens of ingeniously crafted mysteries and thrillers with masterful character development:  This is NOT the book for you! The droves of enthusiastic editorial reviews are quite misleading, much to my surprise and consternation. If you are going to read any review before deciding whether to give this book a try, I urge you to read the one by A. Grace, an Amazon Vine reviewer, whose trenchant comments provide a very accurate summary of an unusually annoying book..Just to confirm, this is a thoroughly contrived novel which relies on overly convenient omissions, transpositions of time, and other manipulative tactics to lead the reader down the garden path. (No sooner have you begun plowing through the book, it seems, than the author throws in a sudden hunk of backstory from the previous year -- generally a major taboo in fiction writing, which should be defied, if at all, for a higher purpose than to manipulate and confuse the reader.) The tale has no sympathetic protagonist to root for. The three semi-indistinguishable  narrators are uniformly dreary and, for the most part, self-obsessed women who have traded in self-determination and the pursuit of meaningful lives for an anachronistic dependency on men. (Typical of this trendy new genre, the men in the book are, of course, all referred to as ""men,"" and the women as ""girls."")It seems telling that 1,207 readers have highlighted the following passage in the Kindle edition: ""I can't do this, I can't just be a wife. I don't understand how anyone does it -- there is literally nothing to do but wait. Wait for a man to come home and love you. Either that or look around for something to distract you.""  (And by the way, while I'm on the subject of oft-highlighted passages, a more provocative one -- admittedly highlighted by only 184 readers to date -- is this: ""Life is not a paragragh, and death is no parenthesis."" Perhaps Paula Hawkins expects everyone to pick up on the allusion despite the lack of attribution, but how many readers will realize that this is a nearly verbatim quote from a poem by .e.e. cummings?)I don't know which is more demoralizing: This bleak and deceitfully constructed story, or the thought that it may encourage even more would-be authors to emulate its stylistic trickery and overall mediocrity.  More discriminating readers might do better to check out some of the classic puzzlers and chillers from giants such as P.D. James, Ruth Rendell -- even Agatha Christie -- or to revisit the authentic noir available on video.
This book started out with some mysterious promise. But never delivered. The characters are unlikable and sad. And the plot (if you call it that) was so drawn out. I had figured out ""who dun it"" about a third in. I skimmed the end. I won't be buying another book by this author.
I don't get why this book is a huge best seller right now.It only kept my interest because I told myself all that was leading to something really momentous, so many people cannot be wrong. It was a page turner for me because of that -- I trusted it the same way you trust a dentist who charges a lot not to do something really silly to your teeth.If everyone is buying this book I assumed the story was going to come to an interesting and unpredictable conclusion.Not so. In fact the conclusion was so bad that I thought there would be another twist, THAT couldn't be it. There was no other twist.By the time the mystery is revealed everything becomes perfunctory and very badly written. The perpetrator starts to act as if this were a bad comic book. The characters till then had been quite one dimensional but all of a sudden everything became thoroughly ridiculous.I was pretty annoyed, really, that I had spent time reading it...that teaches me not to believe the hype!
the 'hero' of this book is so weak, dumb, careless, self obsessed, it's hard to care what happens to her.As a minor character she would be exasperating, as the (or a) protagonist she is unbearable. I paid good money for thisthing, so I'm trying  like hell to finish it. But I'm not sure I'll be able to.Comparisons with 'Gone Girl' are, to my mind, absurd.
Three of the most pathetic woman characters I have ever read about. I would not recommend this book to anyone!
How this novel has garnered all the 5-star praise, and not merely from readers but from such elite sources as The New York Times and Boston Globe utterly baffles me. I am not the most critical reader, and often finish books whose writing I regard as ordinary as long as a compelling story is being told. I don't expect every novel I read to be Crime & Punishment, recognizing that good novels entertain, but great novels both entertain and illuminate. This ghastly book does neither.The pace is plodding, the storyline confusing and repetitive, and the 3 female characters, all of whom are dysfunctional and self-absorbed whiners, and whose points of view propel (allegedly) the story are all not only immensely unlikeable but also relentlessly boring. It's okay to be an unpleasant character, literature is filled with them, but you also have to at least be interesting. None of the three meet even this basic standard. Moreover, they all share the same monotonous voice; were it not for ""Rachel"", ""Megan"", and ""Anna"" in the chapter headings, you would have scant idea which of the three was speaking. Same one-size-fits-all voice, same whiny woe-is-me mantra.I have to confess that I finally closed the cover for good at p. 111. So I don't know whether Megan was murdered or kidnapped, or by whom. But I have a pretty good idea, as there really aren't any other credible options. Worse, I really don't even care what happened to her or who was responsible as this thing was such a tedious dud of a novel, totally lacking any tension or cleverness, two attriubtes that made Gone Girl such a riveting read. The novels could not be more dissimilar.
Although Ms. Hawkins' writing style is engaging and original, I found the story to be overly gruesome and the turn of events unbelievable.  None of the characters were likable - there was no one to root for - and I grow ever more tired of stories about people whose only concerns are getting laid and ruining their health one way or another.  This will perhaps make a mildly diverting made-for-TV movie one day, but steer clear otherwise.
This book was such a disappointment.  80% of the book was a page turner written by a gifted writer. However the conclusion is so juvenile one would think you were reading a 15 year old's high school assignment. The literary quality of the book completely fell apart at the end.
A very disappointing book with a sorry set of despicable characters. From the three women, the therapist, the ex husband and cuckholded spouse, they are a mean and dysfunctional group, and it becomes impossible to relate or empathize with any of them. I plodded through to the ridiculous end and then to redeem part of my purchase, resold the book on Amazon.
I can’t figure out what the fuss is.  The  “hook” is supposed to be the unreliable narrator.  However, the “plot twists” are artificial.  The main narrator  is an alcoholic, prone to black-outs and memory losses.  Hence,  when needed by the plot, she suddenly remembers things.  It’s ridiculous.  It’s also  ridiculous that the villain  seems to rely on the expectation that the main narrator will not remember things  later….seems a bit tenuous.  Also, the plot depends on a key character not recognizing someone she would instantly recognize  (actually, she does it twice:  she misidentifies one person, and misremembers someone else).  It’s  not credible.Another problem is that the  author has created really unpleasant characters.  The three women are all on-dimensional whiners,, who are self-absorbed and  really irritating.  Fortunately, I borrowed the book, so I didn't waste me money;  I'm just sorry I wasted my time.
This book kept plodding towards the inevitable. I knew who the killer was early in the book. Yet I kept reading in fascination, thinking that surely it couldn't be THAT obvious. Well, it was obvious. I found the main character, Rachel, to be really pathetic and, quite frankly, kind of weird. I did not have any sympathy for her at all. Please, don't waste your time reading this book. I don't know why it got so many great reviews.
I read this book with all the acclaim and amazing reviews.  It is an easy read in terms of the style, language and story telling. It is however tedious in details of just how much of a drunk Rachel is.  I found none of the characters sympathetic or care-about worthy.  Frankly, I just didn't care.  I didn't see the who dunnit until later...but frankly, just didn't care.  Although I saw what was coming in Gone Girl very early in the book, the brilliance of that book was in the writing of two stories from two perspectives.  The comparisons to Gone Girl are unfair to Gone Girl--compared to this book, Gone Girl was quality literature.I know everyone is reading it but skip it. Save your money, your time and your faith in humanity. This book was just so blah blah blah that it left me uneasy and uncomfortable.  I gained nothing from the reading of this book. Curious what the other people in my book club will think during next week's meeting but for me this was definitely a miss.
The whole premise of this book was so insipid, like the writer was noodling around for a cute idea to write about as she sat on the train to work. And she started writing and wasn't at all sure where to go with it so she tried making the characters intriguing, but they weren't. Many of the voices were so similar you couldn't tell who was speaking except by looking at the very pale gray label at the top of the page. The people she portrayed were really pathetic, totally lacking a raison d'etre in life. I finished the book because I had nothing else to read at the moment.
This was the most depressing book I have read in a long time. I am going to have to read 2 or 3 lighter books to cheer up!!
OMG when will I learn?  This book should have been put on my ""library"" list  rather than Kindle or bookstore. I'm trying to remember if I've evr read anything worse, on so many levels: confusing characters,  confusing chronology, totally unpleasant,  unlikeable characters ( EVERY SINGLE ONE OF THEM!), horribly  lame  plot diversions (  a thousand facts/clues lost, due to ""alcoholic blackouts""...... inept police investigations (  we find out at the very end that the  bloodied, murdered woman  was hauled around in  a trunk of a car that was  checked by investigators  for blood) - on and on, everything SO unlikely that not one thing is believable.  If you are still attracted to this book, get it at the library, do not BUY it and encourage the author to write another.
Almost aborted in 1st chapter.  After several, I skipped to last chapter.  That's all I needed. Rest was a laborious bore.
Two abusive men, three unstable women.. what's to like about it..  much hype some really unlikeable people..
It was terrible.  The two main female characters Rachel/Megan were consistently unlikeable.  No redeeming qualities.  Hard to stay with a story when you don't like the characters. The story line was confusing, ""is she lying"" or ""isn't she"".  That got old. When it could be followed, it was uninteresting.  I gave up a little past half way and skipped to the end due to a book club review.  All of my book club felt the same, and we rarely agree.  ""Best seller"" because large numbers of people were buying it under the premise that being on ""the best seller"" list means it is well written.  Not so.
Confusing plot, mis-spelled words, poorly written.  Hard to believe this book was a bestseller.  Not recommended.  Waste of time.  Pass on this one
The story itself did not match up to the write up about it. It was lackluster, I did not identify with the main protagonist who maintains an alcoholic stupor pretty much throughout the story. The ending was just awful. If I wanted to suspend reality throughout the entire book I would read fantasy or sci fi, not fiction.Don't waste your money!
I don't write reviews all that often. Even when I adore a book. I honestly can't be bothered half the time. But today, oh man, today.... I finished The Girl on the Train last night and I am so irritated. I got about 50 pages into the book and thought ""This has to get better...it is such a popular book...there's no way that so many people can praise a book with characters as horrible as these....as depressing as these."" But alas, I was wrong. It did not get better. The mystery wasn't very mysterious and the ""whodunnit"" aspect of it was a bit cringeworthy. The writing wasn't bad but it was nothing to highly praise either. I thought the set up was interesting but nothing spectacular. I think I would have enjoyed it more had the characters had a few redeeming qualities but none of them really do. Sigh. So disappointed.
My wife bought this for me to read based on the dust cover.  The premise seems good but the execution and characterization is extremely poor.  After 50 pages I really wanted to put it down but I've only given up on a book 2x in my life. So I slogged through it.As others have mentioned it's told through the viewpoint of 3 women.RachelAnnaMegan<SPOILERS BELOW>All 3 of which are at the best unlikeable, at the worse psychotic.  Rachel is an alcoholic and Anna is married to her ex-husband Tom.  Megan is having an affair with Tom.  Megan ends up dead.  Everybody is a suspect and you don't really care because of how unlikeable everyone is written.Total waste of time you won't get back.
I'm surprised this got Amazon Book of the month, even more surprised at the reviews. honestly, the construction of the book held potential, yes, in a Gone Girl way, but the execution of it failed. Slow, utterly boring stream of conscious inner dialogue robbed the characters of depth. Everyone just seemed stuck in their issues. A few twists and turns to pique interest, but overall, devoid of real suspense, likeable characters, or engaging writing.
I read the raving reviews and couldn't wait to start this book - I finished it today, and I wish I could have my time back. You know what bothered me the most - the character development in this book is not bad. In fact, I would say that at least for the protagonist it was so good, the entire last part of this book was a ridiculous joke.SPOILER ALERTYou cant tell me that someone who was not even a functional alcoholic, solved a crime, got the killer to make a full confession, came up with a plan, bonded with her arch nemesis and carried out the plan - all in the course of one afternoon. Maybe the woman she was supposed to be 4 years before all of this took place, but not the woman who rides the train drinking gin and tonic, making up stories in her head about people.  Duped and Disappointed - I returned this book.  It was not for me
The plot, such as it was, was rife with holes and inconsistencies. There wasn't a single likable or reliable to be found. The women were all victims-of themselves, of men, of each other. The men were all abusive and two out if three were openly misogynist. I was astonished to find the author was a woman - as the woman-hating tone started early and ran so deep. I suppose you could write it off to artistic license if the book were otherwise engaging, entertaining or thought-provoking - but it's not.
I was not fond of this book because the characters were all such awful people. One after another, they were so messed up.  The book was redundant, yeah, we know Rachel is a boring drunk, we know Megan is a loser.  Both men are horrible!  I can't believe I finished the book. No surprises, since we already knew Megan was having an affair.  Duh.I know we all have our flaws, but I truly have never met anyone like these people.  Maybe I'm just lucky, or don't live in the bottom of a barrel.
Still reading the book. Almost finished. Why am I still reading it? Mostly, because I do not like not finishing a book. Story told through the eyes of three women. All neurotic.  All unreliable storytellers. Rachel is the 'girl on the train.' An alcoholic. The most unreliable. The story, to me, is more about 'the girl on the train', her alcoholism, her insecurities and made up stories then 'who did it'. A dark, bleak storyline with dark, bleak characters. Maybe, I won't finish the book?
The worst book I've read in a long time and here's why:-There are 3 characters that take turns narrating throughout the book and the're all absolutely horrible.The main narrator, Rachel, is the main narrator through approximately 80% of the book and her character is the worst.  She's an overweight, depressed, jobless, alcoholic who manages to say ""I'm sorry"" about every 3 minutes.  Less we forget, the author reminds us of her drinking problem at least every other page. She's manically obsessed with ex husband and spends the majority of the time acting like a complete idiot.The other 2 narrators are either idiots or narcissist, but not as annoying as Rachel. I don't know why this book received so many 4 and 5 star reviews.  I read Gone Girl and thought it was great.  This book doesn't come close.
I have only read about 22% and am so bored I have gone on to another book.  Sorry I bought this book
The concept of the story is good, but the book rambles on and on with a predictable two page conclusion.  Don't waste your money on this one.
WAS THE WORST BOOK EVER!!!!!!So many lost opportunities, a poor plot line and NO twist or connection in the end between the characters:Tom? what? who cares about that guy. He gives his story up so easily in the end, really? he doesn't even transform as a character before that.What happened to all of the pieces of clothing that Rachel sees on her trips? that provides suspense in the beginning but means nothing.The ENTIRE story about Megan really doesn't mean anything - in the end, it doesn't even matter that she had/killed a baby (it doesn't even have anything to do with her death), the dr. Abdul guy storyline is a total waste.Scott is the lousiest character ever - what is the whole end fight with Rachel for?And Anna just puts her girl to bed and has a beer when Tom is confessing? lamewhat about the guy with the red hair?
I really should have known better, all those five star recommendations claiming this piece of trash was this years ""gone girl"", but when you think about it they were right, ""gone girl"" was a piece of trash too.  As in gg, there was not one likable character in the whole book, even the minor characters had flaws that seem to be included by the author just to illustrate that all men are pigs and have affairs as a matter of course.  And to keep those affairs from becoming public knowledge, they murder their girlfriends.  Even the seemingly upright and level headed characters have affairs or are flawed in some way.  And don't tell me life is like that. Truly a sad and depressing novel.  Next time someone compares and book favorably to ""gone girl,"" I'll believe it and won't waste my money on it.
Terrible. Our Bookclub all hated this. The story is written in first person but for 3 different characters. And the time period changes back and forth. So confusing. The characters are not fully developed except that they are sad or mentally ill people. We read this book based upon reviews that said it was a thriller but it is not. Also, reviews said it was good like 'Gone Girl'. It is not! I think the very early reviewers must have been paid to say this. Don't waste your time on this book!
Sorely disappointed and difficult to follow especially on a device - had a hard time figuring out who was who and who belonged to who - finally had to write down a flow chart so I didn't have to flip around in my Kindle. And Rachel - honestly, she was ridiculous ---are there people really and truly that stupid? I know there are people who are stuck and cannot make a good decisions for various reasons, but Rachel takes the cake. Not worth reading. Sorry I wasted time on this book.
My book club selected this book.  I wasn't even half way through and had to torture myself to finish it.  Very slow moving, somewhat predictable, with characters in bad places who are so unlikeable that you can't even feel sympathy for them.  Too many people making bad, selfish, stupid choices which will lead them to the inevitable.  The train rides take up a large portion of the story, which was mostly dull. I could not in good conscience recommend this book to anyone.
This was one of the worst books I've ever wasted my time on. There wasn't a single redeeming or interesting trait to any of the characters. Don't waste your time.
This book has no redeeming virtues at all. Each and every character is devoid of values, character, morals, virtue, or ethics. The only person who seems to have some goodness (the landlady) is a total enabler. The police are inept, arrest the wrong person. When the drunken ""girl on the train"" finally regains her memory and realizes what must have happened, she lies about her participation in order to avoid prosecution, and we're supposed to be rooting for her? I think not.
I didn't like the time sequences going back and forth.  It was very confusing at times.  I also did not like her characterization of every woman in this book as a ""Stepford Wife""  without their man to take care of them they were nothing.  I felt no empathy for anyone on this book and had to force myself to finish.  Why is it a best seller?  PS I never write reviews but this book was SO BAD. One star was generous.
This was the most boring book I have ever read. According to my Kindle I managed 32% before I gave up. The character was lifeless, the story was lifeless and just meandered along at a snails pace. The premise was totally unbelievable unless the train moved at the same speed as the snail. No dialogue just endless narrative of something. Completely unreadable.
The first chapters of this book got me hooked, but it soon became tedious to be inside the mind of a self pitying alcoholic for so long.  Every character in the story was despicable, which does not bode well when one has to spend so much time inside their heads . When the mystery was finally revealed - after too much drinking, whining, and sniveling by nearly everyone, but especially the main protagonist - I was angry that I'd wasted both my time and my money.
I did not like the book at all...not enough to give it even one star.  Apparently one must give a book one star to be able to offer an opinion.  Something within me compels me to finish any book I begin, just to see when, or if, the story will ever get better.  This one never got better, at least not to me.  Imagine taking a handful of broken characters from an assortment of soap operas and jumbling them together.  This might be the result.  I must look at the publishing house.  I will use extra caution before buying from them again.  I did find this book on a suggested reading list, so someone liked it, but certainly not this reader.  I'm sorry I have nothing good to say...usually there is something good. Afraid I could find nothing good this time.  Sorry...money poorly spent.  My loss.
I mean, I read it. It entertained me for a few days. But it was like reading an episode of one of those CSI dramas on TV. It tried to be mysterious and twisted but it failed to deliver on all parts. The characters could be interchangeable, the pacing was slow, and there really was no ""shocking"" twist. If anything, mysterious readers might enjoy this for the sake of the ""whodunit,"" but comparing this to Gone Girl is not...They're not even close.
Not one sympathetic character in the book.  Five main characters and not one of them has any redeeming values.  If this is the world Hawkins lives in, she has my utmost sympathy.  It is one of the worst books I have read in a long time and I read a LOT of books. If you want mystery/thrillers stick with Sandford, Child, Connelly, Silva, Flynn, Baldacci, Coben, DeMille, Thor, etc.  Do not spend your time or money on this book.  You'll regret it.
This book was pure torture, endless drivel while the dimensionless characters prattle on incessantly about their uninteresting lives.  The three female characters feel as though they are  different facets of one psychotic personality.  I found their struggles difficult to accept and relate to, especially after the third example of repeated behavior.  This book would have been better as a short story. Definitely not ""the next Gone Girl.
I was so disappointed in this book.  Hours of listening to an audio book that was full of codependent, bad decision making, weak women.  I kept hoping something would get better and that there would actually be at least one character that I liked and it never happened.  I must stop falling for books just because they are on a best-seller list.  Bad choice on my part and a lesson learned to read customer reviews before I buy.
Don't waste your time! Many times I wanted to throw this book away. The characters are whiny, thin and obnoxious. I found myself not caring about what the outcome would be. I've rarely ever not finished a book - currently at 3. This one almost made it to #4 but I managed to hang in there by forcing myself to read 40 pages a sitting. If you really want to read it - borrow it from the library and purchase something else.
Was snookered into this novel as it was compared to Gone Girl, which I liked a lot...This one is filled with dysfunctional characters who you wouldn't care to spend any time with in real life...I figured out who ""done it"" early on and by the end I imagined an alternative ending which was not a happy ending for the whole lot of them...Can't believe it remains on the bestseller list!
I am half way through this book and can honestly say I hate it. I can't believe all of the good reviews--I don't understand what all the fuss is about. The character development is weak--and I don't like any of them. It's B-O-R-I-N-G. I would advise you to skip this book and save your money...but obviously some other people like this book. I just don't know why!!!
UGH!  Crazy, alcoholic people.  I could not feel any sympathy or empathy for any of these characters.  Even the ones that were killed.  Jusst wanted it to be over so I could see if I was right about the outcome.  Almost quit reading on page 65.  Wish I had.  That being said, I hated Gone Girl, too.  And this story reminded me of GG
yuck!  I just disliked this book so much.  it seemed like a real take-off of 'gone girl' in some places and at times it felt as if some of the episodes were lifted directly from that book.  at any rate, I did finish it but am now looking to give it away to anyone I can since I don't plan on making it part of my permanent library.
The plot of the book isn't bad (isn't great either), but would be better suited for a one hour episode of some TV show than a book. The biggest issue with this book is that it has so much exposition and moves at such a glacial pace, it feels like watching an episode of Murder She Wrote after sitting through a year of soap opera. Almost three quarters of the book is the lead characters describing their feelings, having flashbacks or providing accounts of their daily lives (literally, dated and divided into morning, afternoons and evenings). You feel like you're their therapist, or reading their diaries. These accounts are often inconsequential and almost always uninteresting.The writing style would appeal to a segment of the female population, but most men will actively dislike it. I nearly quit it a few times, but the thousands of glowing reviews made me think there MUST be some hidden gem of a story just exploding in the coming pages. That never happens. In fact the ending follows one of the oldest TV commandments - the moment a killer is accused, even though there is no evidence, he/she will not try to deny anything and shall go into a full on confession, laying down every little detail without the slightest of prodding.
I truly hated this book...annoying character who kept getting drunk...just plain uninterested in what happened to anybody.  I CANNOT understand the popularity unless we are a truly dumbed down audience or the marketing department is very very good.....There are so many wonderful books out there, don't waste your time.
I'm just sick of affairs and alcohol.  I thought the basic premise was interesting - peeking inside the homes she passed every day and fantaczsing about the reality, but it went too far. When it began to sound like ""Gone Girl,"" I quit.
This was the most depressing book I have ever read. I don't recommend this book to anyone. There are no normal characters in this novel. It will take me a long time to get rid of the bad taste this book gave me. I was not able to read the whole book. Got about 49% through snd gave up. Surely the world is not filled with the sad people, male and female that populate this gruesome story.
I absolutely agree with all the other one-star reviewers.  This book was a big disappointment.  It's a blow-by-blow description of the protagonist's days, which early on gets boring.  The characters, especially the women, are self-involved losers who refuse to improve their lives.  In fact, all the characters in the book are stereotypes; none is interesting.  I hurried through to the end of the book just to get it over with, and I too wish I had my time back.  So much for a New York Times best-seller -- that praise means nothing.
I loved, loved, loved Gone Girl.  I hated, hated, hated this book.  None of the characters had any redeeming qualities.  I did not care what happened to any of them, especially Rachel, who is the central character of the book.  The book moves at a snail's pace with pages and pages of the most inane and boring dialogue imaginable.  I forced myself my to finish it, hoping that as the book near its ending, the action would pick up and something would finally happen.  The final chapters are more ridiculous than the rest of the book and Rachel is the dumbest creature on the face of the Earth.  Please!  Do not waste your time!
The writing style was enjoyable enough to draw me in, but it merely served to allow this book to tread water, as the annoying main character wallowed about. I want to be entertained, and am okay with, nay enjoy, unusual or flawed or criminal mains. But outside the context of 'literature', they must possess some degree of intelligence, humor, or evoke empathy, or be embedded in a plot with momentum. Alas, none of these were to be found.
I gave it one star because the author wrote it but I did not like any of the book. I do not like to read about alcoholics, did not find any saving grace in the life of a woman who let the end of her marriage push her to the limits.  Where was her self respect?  There is a sinister allegorical theme woven throughout the story. Unless you want to read misery, skip this one.  Okie Reading Specialist
I can't believe people actually like this!  This is boring, predictable, and just plain stupid.  There are basically a handful of events that just repeat itself until the writer decides it's enough.  The characters are boring and not likable.  The plot is repetitive.  They are all one dimensional.  I had 5th grade students who write like this.  There is no suspense.
I rarely write reviews, but I also rarely have to stop listening to a book. What mystery there was in the first 5 hours of the audio book was overwhelmed by the main character, Rachel's, ongoing pity party. I have no desire to get to the bottom of the plot if it requires me to continue listening to Rachel wallow in her self-made misery.
Terrible, can't understand why it is on the bestseller list .
Forgettable.  Didn't wow me at all.  Waste of time.
POORLY WRITTEN ,MISERABLE  CHARACTERS,TOO LONG  FOR PLOT,PLOT TRRIBLE,,A CHICK BOOK ALL THE WAY,CAN'T BELIEVE IT IS TOPS ON NYT BEST  SELLERS
Started out with a good idea and promise, went downhill very quickly and stayed there.  I started out reading and then skimming thinking it would get better but never did.  No character development, the main character is so pathetic you can't even connect with her.  The constant details of her drinking is way over done.  I could go on but I think other reviews 1 star reviews have nailed it perfectly.  Don't bother with this one.
I could not believe that Ms. Hawkins could write a book where the ""Girl on the Train"" was such a sad character who happens to be addicted to the awful disease of alcoholism.  It is a shame that this disease's consequences were used to create a most predictable story.  How anyone can say that this is the next ""Gone Girl"" is delusional.  Shame on the author.
Not at all worth the hype, and its certainly no Gone Girl.  I am disappointed I wasted my money on this
Two of us riding nowhere/Spending someone's hard earned pay."" -- Beatles, ""Two of Us""  1969The initial premise of this book is what originally drew me to it.  The story opens on July 5, 2013.  Rachel Watson, a genuinely tragic figure is a regular commuter who watches the world through the windows of said train.  An alcoholic, Rachel often views things through a blurry lens and is incredibly self absorbed.  Her life is one of shadows and periphery.  Divorced and still reeling from the split, Rachel lives in a rented flat and describes herself as living on the edges of other people's lives.  Cathy, her landlord tries to get her boyfriend Damian to fix Rachel up on a date, but Damian refuses, saying he doesn't know anyone desperate enough to date Rachel.  Naturally Rachel overhears them.Rachel is also an inveterate watcher.  Every day she pretends to commute to and from a job she doesn't have and every day she watches for a couple who regularly sit on their terrace within view of the train.  She gives them names, knowing nothing about them and believes they have a perfect golden life.  Rachel passes by the home she once shared with her ex-husband Tom on her daily commute.  She mourns the end of the marriage and that Tom and his current wife Anna use the furniture that once belonged to Tom and Rachel and that they have the baby she couldn't have.Megan, the woman Rachel sees on the terrace has everything but a golden life.  She disappears and Rachel is left at a loss as to how to explain her disappearance and possible whereabouts.  Rachel has an alcoholic blackout and no memory of the night Megan vanished.  Questions arise such as did Rachel see or hear anything connected with Megan's disappearance?  More importantly, did she have anything to do with Megan's disappearance?  And why do people Rachel doesn't even know bring her into their lives?  While others drew the Hitchcockian parallel to ""Rear Window,"" the riveting and intense psychological climax just wasn't present in this book.  I admit to being disappointed in the plot and I felt let down as I didn't experience the literary psychological suspense.  The literary technique of not sharing with readers what the characters are thinking about and Rachel's tendency to suffer from alcoholic blackouts falls flat.  I found Rachel tiresome and her blackouts as well.  She is a tragic figure and a cautionary tale of what not to be or be like.True, I didn't like Rachel and Rachel didn't like herself.  She berates herself constantly, all the while making extremely poor and costly decisions.  Her poor decision making is a part of her personality whether or not she has had too much to drink.Anna is the third woman featured in this dismal tale. Rachel calls them at odd hours disrupting their sleep until Anna leaves her messages telling her not to call.  Anna is a rather hard edged character.  As for Megan, well, time will tell.  Or perhaps Megan's character will tell if you stay with this book.Megan may or may not have the key to the series of interlocking questions that bind these characters.  She is not forthcoming with much in the way of information and readers have to try to guess what her story is and how it fits in with the rest of the story.  Megan is like a dangling branch, partially severed from a dying tree.In summary, I was not fond of any of the characters and found their dialogue stilted.  Others loved it and that, too drew me in.  That having been said, in time the questions do get answered, but still the story falls flat for me.
Worst book I have read since gone girl. If anything gone girl was better. I like mystery, suspense and action. None of that here but I may have missed some with the scanning to get to theendandanother book as soon as possible. I had just finished war brides before this and it was a wonderful book. Don't waste your time.
I'm so terribly disappointed in this book. It was slow, contrived and unbelievable. I don't understand how it has garnered such rave reviews. As I read this book it was very obvious to me the author used an inordinate number of words that did not add to the plot to simply fill up space. This was a terrible read.
This is a horribly boring ""thriller"". To me there are three key elements to every mystery/ thriller - plot, character, writing. This book is sadly lacking on all accounts. The plot is ok but I figured things out about half way through and I kept plodding toward the conclussion (counting the pages to the enevitable end). The characters were sad, one dimensionioal set pieces that never come to life. The shifting narative was gimmicky at best and a lazy writing style at worst (meaning all we can expect of Ms. Hawkins is more of the same). I have no idea how this became a Number 1 best seller on the NYT list (I guess because of suckers like me). By far the worst book I have read this year (15).
A terrible book. Each of these women has the same literary voice. You can never know who is speaking unless you are told. And they are boring and stupid. What a waste of time.
Try girl on the train...HORRIBLE BOOK...I have no idea why I finished it...full of senseless violence...degrading to women...depressing and disgusting...
I love to read dark, psychological thrillers, but I did not enjoy this book at all. None of these things would have happened to the character if she'd stop being a drunk. The only thing sloppier than the protagonist was the writing. I feel the character blacked out whenever the author couldn't think of what to write. Instead of weaving hints and subtleties throughout the book about the antagonist to keep you guessing and wondering, the author just decided her protagonatist got tanked (again) and she wouldn't write about the antagonist until the end then BAM you hear all about it. Lazy lazy lazy writing and a terrible way to bring in the antagonist. I never give one stars for books but I'd give this a zero if I could. Don't waste your time.
Another over hyped book that I really should have realised would be bad by the fact that the author of Before I Go to Sleep is raving about it on the cover, The Girl on the Train isn't as badly written as his book, but it's not very good either.  Good books should push you to want to keep turning the pages, I only kept going and had to force myself to keep turning the pages with this one. Due to all the hype, and the fact that the Kindle version was the number one seller for a while and well, made me think it would get better or there would be some huge twist or something and that the person responsible for the disappearance wouldn't turn out to be the person the beginning was pointing to.  None of these things happened, and you end the last page wishing you hadn't wasted time out of your life you'll never get back reading this!Solving a crime genre novels sometimes use the drunk alcoholic societal losers as their solver, usually it's an ex cop or military male character, or a private eye desperate for a case, so making that person a woman on a train pretending to commute to work each day was somewhat original.  But she is just a completely uninteresting and unlikeable narrator.  You feel absolutely no empathy for her at all and don't really care what happens to her, let alone her concerns about ""Jess or Jason"" or whoa is me my husband divorced me and is living in my house with another woman and a baby I wanted to have with him constant moaning.  I was surprised her landlord didn't mention kicking her out long before she raises the issue.  The events in the book are boring, the book is very slow paced, it's really not worth wasting your time with.
Since all the characters were unlikeable, didn't care who did it and wish they had all been killed.The IDEA of things observed/story lines created from train window was intriguing, getting this one at least 1 star.But...I hated every minute of reading it.
Very slow read.Too much repetition. Disappointed
Too slow. It requires a lot of patience. Style of writing makes it further boring . Could have used direct method of story telling and should have made it a thriller easily. Though story line is good and convincing yet does not make an absorbing reading.
When this book was compared to Gone Girl and a Hitchcock like ending I couldn't wait to get my hands on it. The vacuous characters and confusing back and forth time lines made my head spin.  Never could get a grip on what the point was.  Why the hype?
This book leaves you with a really icky feeling.  It is pure sleaze like a lot of the run of the mill books these days.  No substance!  YUCK.  I would never read another Paula Hawkins book again.  Such a poor writer.  Don't waste your precious time.
IT WAS NOT MY CUP OF TEA, I DIDN'T FINISH IT
I forced myself to read the whole book.  Rachel was a weak baby, and I wanted to shake her and say, ""grow up"".  Talk about blind to anything around her.  Megan was a weak nympho.  It was a book that left you dissatisfied.
Meandering, dull, repetitious series of monologues about the uninteresting lives of dysfunctional people. Nothing remarkable or even remotely interesting. Characters all bland and boring. This thing is a complete waste of time.
I almost stopped reading it by chapter 3 - but it was suggested I finish it ""it will get better""  It didn't...was a waste of time and very disappointing.  A one star is too much for this.  I'd rather read a cereal box.
This was so badly written I gave up at 50%. Writing from three different women's perspectives yet they all sound just the same? Unbelievable sightings from the train, shallow character development. Why is this so popular??
I was so disappointed in this book.  The characters were sad to read about and the plot line was horrible.  I would not call this a ""thriller.""  It was more a sad commentary about self destructive behavior.
Knock off of, ""Gone Girl,"" except not as good. The description of the book sounded so good! And it got such great reviews. The book was written okay, however I couldn't invest myself in the characters and was often confused as I often felt like I missed something because information was left out. The main character isn't likeable which made the book even worse. Waste of time.
I have no idea why people like this book.  It drags on endlessly and even when you finally get to the ""twist,"" you're so apathetic by the endlessly long set up to even care (that is, if you didn't figure it out oh, about 285 pages earlier.)  This is not the next ""Gone Girl.""  Don't let anyone tell you that.  Gone Girl you can't stop reading, pages just fly by.  The Girl on the Train slogs along to the point where you're forcing yourself to read chapters as if they were assigned to you in English class and you're just trying to keep up and not fail.  I'm actually kinda of angry I read this book when I have so many other books on my shelf waiting to be read.  It could have been 100 pages shorter and still be an absolute bore.  If you don't mind trudging through 360 pages of yawn for 20 pages of ""meh,"" then go right ahead.  Otherwise, move on, there are loads of better books out there.
I selected this book because of the revues. Couldn't have been more wrong. I have been struggling to get through it for weeks.  It is such a slow, tedious story , that appears to be going nowhere. I don't know if I will finish it. Im trying , but its a struggle. Talk about long winded.
I really found this book to be a waste of my time. I like to read different kinds of books, so that is why I gave this book a try. However, the characters are distasteful, the main character continuously makes stupid choices and as the story moves deeper to its ending, I found myself bored and annoyed. The plot may have been interesting if the characters had a little more meat in personality. I really don't think this book deserves all of the praises it has aroused.The only positive aspect of this book is that it gives you an inside view on what it is like to be an alcoholic, which is the case for the main character, Rachel.
This was the first book I've ever sent to the cloud as an unfinished read.  It was an incredibly tedious story about a self-absorbed woman and characters with no redeeming value.  The repetition of her train ride, visits to her ex etc. etc. was mind numbing to say the least.  There wasn't a single person in this story (as much as I read of it anyway) that I made any connection with or cared about. If you like whining, weak. emotionally flawed characters then this book is for you.  If you like real suspense or mystery novels then look elsewhere.
I was so disappointed in this book; I had heard rave reviews about it was excited to start reading.  By the fourth chapter I had already mentally checked out and felt the characters were extremely transparent and Rachel's character was exhausting.  It read like a hurriedly written young-adult novel.  Not sure who is giving this book five stars but I wouldn't even give it one unless Amazon told me I had to pick at least a star to write a review.
I thought the book was not very well written. The was too many repetitive of the main character's alcoholic problems. After awhileI totally got that she has a severe problem with her drinking. There was no light at the end of the tunnel. The ending was too predictable when I was hoping there would be a twist. I also got tired of the profanities used which did nothing to enhanced what was felt. It bored me. I would not recommend this book.
This is definitely a woman's read! The neighborhood where this tale takes place is most likely known as Peyton Place. Women have nothing better to do than seek affairs, compare their looks and drink and barf all day. Men are so unsure of their gender that they can only use brute force when confronted. I would gladly give someone rosary beads before recommending this nonsense.
Depressing read. Somewhat tedious. If my book club hadn't decided to read this one I probably would not have finished it. BTW, only one in the group of retired librarians enjoyed it at all. Subject matter can be of a dark nature, but don't necessarily have to leave you feeling that way when you finish. Life is too short and there are too many enjoyable books I want to read.
Read this book--which is barely a mystery--only if you like endless pages of two alternating first-person characters (both women) describing their failing lives. One character is the main narrator, and she is an alcoholic who is not only self-deprecating, but unreliable. At the risk of offering a spoiler, it takes eighty pages for the ""mystery"" to occur; the revelation of the true culprit happens in the last ten pages, and is a confession worthy of made-for-TV movies. And there are only four suspects. You'll figure it out long before the end.Perhaps if I hadn't read two other rambling, unfocused ""mysteries"" (Johnston's ""Descent"" and Landay's ""Defending Jacob"") previous to this one, I might feel better about it...but I doubt it. The whining of the main character in Hawkins book is annoying without being deeply introspective; it might be more tolerable if she had any real insights into her alcoholism and worthless self image besides her-man-done-her-wrong-and-found-somebody-else woes. It is very difficult to feel empathy for her. And this is the writer's choice. Presenting a character  as ""real"" lies in the long history of literary Realism, and, by the 1930's, bore important fruit in the development of the modern mystery. We mystery lovers are used to the imperfect detective who, deep-down, has some moral fiber,  and convincing crime-solving skills. The current trend of non-detective characters who drag their almost-ruined selves down the path of mysterious situations has, in my opinion, run its course. Why writers continue to follow in each others' footsteps in this trend may be attributable to the sales success of each previous one. But it needs to stop. I'm going back to Raymond Chandler.
I hated the book. How much? Well, this book pissed me off because I just couldn't finish the damn thing. I read about 45% of it and put it down for a few weeks hoping I could start it fresh and become more engaged in the story than I was during the first half. I was irritated because I have rarely walked away from even the most boring, tedious tale.I'm a reader, 60, educated and a male. This doesn't put me in the target audience. But I could have enjoyed the ride if it just moved along a little or if ALL the characters weren't petty, self absorbed basket cases. Their responses to what befalls them each individually seems trite and/or illogical to a fault. I wanted to throw the Kindle across the room as Rachel stumbles along on what is either a quest to solve a mystery or a road to redemption. That was about 70% of the way through the book. But the straw that broke the camel's back came when I realized that we're getting narration of past events from a character whom, by all rights, shouldn't be able to do that. And that's as close to a spoiler as I'm willing to get.Obviously I'm in a minority group of dissenters here and granted. For the folks that love this story, more power to you, your money was well invested. Also, I'll grant the writer due credit for skill in structure and character development but I found the whole thing boring, boring and a snooze. I had no sympathy or empathy for a single character in this book. Nasty, nasty people with nary a redeeming quality between them. If they were at least interesting...
I'm sorry but I actually wish that this author had never written this story. It was crazy, you can't keep up with every twist and turn. I honestly hope that this author never writes another story.
I purchased this book based on gushing reviews all over the Internet. I was sorely disappointed. The framework of the story is original but the characters, dialogue and nonsensical behavior left me frustrated. Speed reading though the last third of the book made it more apparent that the voice of the three female narratives were practically identical. The implausibility of five extremely dysfunctional people intersecting in the way the plot unfolds was not only disappointing but defied all reason.The character reversal of the protagonist at the end tore it for me. She's a doormat through the entire story and suddenly transforms into a physical and resourceful heroine who miraculously solves the mystery and kicks butt at the same time.When I finished it I couldn't reconcile my disappointment with the steady stream of glowing reviews. So here is the moral of the story behind the story...all it takes is for a few high profile reviews to generate buzz that in our media driven society turns into a storm of approval.Reading the many critical  (and accurate) reviews was validating but too late.  I wasted 6.99. I advise you not to do the same.
A slap to Hitchcock's face.
Unreadable, don't buy it.
First: the ""girl"" on the train is anything but!  It's a grown woman who is a serious alcoholic and a total train-wreck (pun intended).  What irks me about this book is that both the title and the description are deceptive.  I had looked forward to this book because I thought it was about a young girl/teenager who had witnessed a murder while riding past on a train.  Instead, it turns out to be the story of a crazy lush who stalks her ex-husband and is obsessed with a couple who lives by the train tracks.  Once I got over that disappointment, I then had to trudge through dozens of pages going into excruciating detail about her drinking.  Ugh!  The so-called plot twist was entirely predictable, so getting to the end was hardly an achievement.  I wag my finger at the publishers who falsify titles and descriptions in the name of sales.  Shame on you all!
I have just started reading e-books and thought I'd try this since I had a bus ride to take and the other book I am reading is 4 inches thick. I don't like books with prologue sections that try to hook you and leave you waiting half the book -- or more -- to find out what that was all about, but this one was brief, so onward.  I think I read the whole first chapter before starting to flick quickly through the screen pages:  Boring, flat, self-pitying, boring, paralyzed, nothing happening, how many pages devoted to Rachel's drinking and phone calls?, boring. . . .Anna, who cares?. . . Jess who is not Jess. . .Eesh. I gave up. The tone is very flat, even when the narrating character changes. I found myself wondering if this was indeed a mystery. Amazon has just informed me that it is. . . but the only mystery to me is why this book has been so successful.
I'm not finished with the book, so take what you want from my review. However, I'm debating even putting the effort in to finish it (I'm on Chapter 105 of 133). This was highly recommended on GoodReads and other sites and I consider myself a reasonably intelligent reader. Therefore, I'm surprised at how frustrating it is to get through this book. It's close to impossible to have any compassion for the protagonist and the story line just drags on. I'm listening to it on audible, so it's passing the time commuting to work but if it was a paperback, I probably would have put it away by now. It's not a page-turner and it is not riveting by any stretch. I'll probably finish the book because I'm close enough but have very little expectation of being any more positive than I am now. It makes me doubt these popular book reviews completely.
Worst book I've ever read in more than 50 years!  So bad in fact I could not finish it. The overlapping stories were just horrible.
Terribly underwhelming. Perhaps it was all the hype I had read about the book, before I actually read the book... but all in all, it was a very blah book. The central figure is Rachel - a sorry, drunk, divorced, unhappy, unemployed woman, still in love with her ex. Normally that sets her up as an underdog and I'd thoroughly root for her. But the book is SO repetitive without adding anything new to her story other than ""she drank and got wasted""... I ended up feeling disinterested in the proceedings. So, she takes the train and sees her ex's home every day, twice. I am sorry for her.But the plot is slow, the characters are tedious and the suspense was definitely not worth putting up with all those train journeys. Glad I didn't buy the book!
This book was a big disappointment! I found myself not liking any of the characters; the plot is unbelievable most of the time, and the writing is not inspiring at all. Don't waste your money!
This book was a ""wannabe"" Gone Girl but fell short of it. I couldn't relate to any of the characters because they ALL made ridiculous decisions. Throughout the entire book all I thought was ""WHY would this person do that?"", like why would it take a grown woman so long to not get over her ex-husband, or why would a woman marry a man not knowing any of his friends or family, why would a man with no violent history all of a sudden grab, threaten and lock someone up in a spare bedroom? A lot of the scenarios didn't make sense. It pulled me in in the beginning because I wanted to know what happened in the main character's past but I was truly disappointed.I would never recommend this book
I'm not quite clear why this is such a best seller.  I do think the writer has skills but this is the most over-written book I've ever read in my life.  Many times I wanted to just quit but I stuck with it.  Never really got any better.  And with so few characters it was easy to see who the criminal was and why very early on.  So the mystery was lacking, too.And I really don't need characters that are 'good' or find redemption per se but any person who is suffering from low self-esteem will get a lift by comparing their lives to the sad, lonely, desperate, lost and despicable bunch in this story.  So, again, I'm at a loss as to why people are drawn to this book and these characters.
If you enjoy smart, snappy writing with a good twist in plot and fascinating characters...then put this book back on it's sad, little shelf. It is an alcoholic's whodunit. This is a mind numbing waste of valuable reading time. I know my review is in the minority, so if you are still curious and wish to venture forward, then I bid you well. Know though, that a good book should pick you up and have you experience the characters, the setting, the story to the point that you cannot be pulled from it until you have finished it. For this experience, I suggest instead Anthony Doerr's All The Light We Cannot See. It is not a whodunit, but it is reading time much better spent.
I can't remember the last time I felt so ripped off by a novel.  I suppose it's my own fault because my imagination was at work from the very beginning: the design of the title.  Alfred Hitchcock was at work with me.  As a student of film, it took me a few chapters to try to puzzle out the possibility of the narrator's being a dual personality.  Again, the double vision of the print on the cover of THE GIRL ON THE TRAIN reminded me of the split image of the title design of PSYCHO.  I was excited to see how the author would be able to pull this off in print.  Well, I was wrong, and as I continued reading, flipping back and forth with the dates, the characters, and the plot, I finally gave up on any hope of my imagined premise.  I did finish the book, unlike several of my friends, but felt that everything ground down to nothing more than a soap opera on steroids.  The one issue that I developed respect for was the author's handling, with impact, of Rachel's alcoholism.  She triumphed, and that was a relief.
Dreadful book and in truth the only reason I persevered was because the reviews were so promising.  The story development is frankly tortuous and the characters so unappealing you feel like slapping them into sensibility.  I persevered through tedious story and character development only to be presented with a contrived ending.  Frankly the press support for this book now makes me very careful in who I trust as reviewers.  I suspect the whole industry is now caught up in a process of cross-congratulations and overly positive reviews.  The lesson, find reviewers who are independent of the trade and can recognize good literature not this rubbish.
I am yet another poor soul who fell for the hype and purchased this book because it was on the best sellers list. I never buy books on that list, I don't know why I did it this time. However, based on all these positive reviews, I feel like there is something wrong with me because I did not like this book at all. I had to force myself to read it through to the end hoping it would get better at some point. Nope.The writing is just an account of someone's depressing life. There is nothing unique or interesting about the writing (nothing). There is nothing to keep your attention. I learned my lesson about the best seller list too.
I am deeply mystified by how much positive regard this book is getting. I am also deeply disturbed with how bad the book was. I actually took it personally and kept waiting for it to rise from its wretchedness.  All 3 of the female main characters are interchangeable and portrayed as 1-dimensional, cartoonish, psychotic morons. The writing is a cross between a Harlequin romance and a telenovela. I can It also concerns me that the author, a woman, chose to portray women (or people) in this way and not as satire. Is it her own misogyny operating? Or is it cynical marketing about what will sell the most books?
After reading the Orphan Train (outstanding!!) I was totally disappointed in The Girl on the Train.  Depressing people, depressing situation, and not worth plowing through to get to the ""mystery.""I've read all the Hitchcock screenplays and seen the movies.  They were great!  The beginning of this book did sound similar to Hitchcock's style.  But the repetitive, self-destructive behavior/descriptions were so depressing I got to chapter 3 and gave up.  Why waste your time with characters (all of them) you don't like?There are far better books out there.  Skip this one.
I did not find this book the ""page turner"" it was purported to be other than to find out why. Lead character is a pathetic, weak, sick and pretty much unlikeable personality. She does not even like herself. I thought the killer was rather obvious 3/4 into the book so there were no plot twists for me. The first person viewpoint from the three major characters is ""been there done that"" and getting a bit weathered. I have zero interest in seeing the movie unless the cast is outstanding. I did not find this to be on par with ""Gone Girl"" so yes, I am wondering what all the excitement is about!
I was interested in this book due to the many reviews drawing parallels between it and Gone Girl. Besides thematic similarities, this book is nothing like Gone Girl, which I enjoyed due to its intensity, twists, and strong characters among other reasons.Unfortunately (or fortunately, depending on how you look at it) I've never encountered a book so inundated with sniveling, irritating, characters, which is only worsened by the flatly-voiced, despondent narration. This coupled with the excruciatingly slow pace of the book made it nearly unbearable.Not only was the book slow and painful, it was also predictable. It plods along, the reader (or listener in this case), feeling quite strongly that they know where the plot is going, but hopeful that something, anything will happen to make reading it worth while.Spoiler alert: It doesn't.
I didn't finish this book.  I waited to borrow this from my library for months and now I am happy to pass it on to someone else immediately.  How can a book with over 30,000 reviews NOT be a great book?!?!I didn't like the main character at all and both her and the book were boring as all get out!There are so many other great reads out there.  Don't waste your time or money on this.Borrow it from the library or a friend and try it out first.  Get allittle further in than the Kindle sample because that had me interested enough to wait to read it.
A friend loaned me this...and I am so glad I didn't buy it!  I think I am pretty much done with neurotic musing about sociopaths and their relationships. (See Gone Girl for more of this.)  I have always felt that young women (and men) should be warned about this character flaw which is more prevalent then you might think.  Anyway, I found this novel extremely boring with its endless repetitions, going back and forth in time, and the half baked ending.  I certainly wouldn't recommend that anyone read this.  And the puzzle is:  why do so many folks like it?  A mystery to me.
I hated this book.  It was such a spin off of Gone Girl that I thought about that the entire time I was reading it. While the outcome is not predictable, that in itself is predictable.  The characters are unlikable, self absorbed, ordinary and while they are disturbed, their weirdness isn't interesting or weird enough to matter.  I wish I hadn't spent the money on it.I purchased it after listening to a PBS bit on summer reading where it was recommended. I should have known better.  The reviewers were all book sellers.
I hated this book! It reminded me very much of Gone Girl, but that book was fast paced and really interesting. This mystery was only ok and it was very slow moving. The characters were ALL dishonest liars with broken lives. Is this what the author truly thinks of humanity? Everyone in London and the surrounding areas is a misfit with no morals? The book was very dark and depressing and there was no redemption. I would not recommend this book to anyone and told my reading friends to take it off their list.
I read this book because of the high ratings.  It is a horrible book.  The writing is redundant and not interesting. The storyline is not unique. A friend posted on FaceBook, ""if you think your life is bad, read this book and you will think that your life is light years better than the characters in this book .""  If you want to read a novel about someone going through a horrible time in their life and it never turns around, read this book.  But do not look for any surprises.
What a waste of time.  This book is getting lots of attention while it should be ignored.  I should have put it down when 4D (Drunk, Depressed, Ditzy, Destructive) protagonist continues haranguing the ex-husband.  This one is hard to stomach, 4D has no clue as to her ex's character?  She goes to work for months after being fired? 4D can't remember what she did while drinking but later in the book does.  The only cheat the author didn't succumb to is magic.
The main character is a black out drunk with no self esteem.  She is obsessed with her ex-husband and after losing her job, continues to pretend to go to work each day riding a train that allows her to see her old house.  She cannot remember key events due to her drinking and this fuels her feelings of worthlessness.  When the murderer is revealed at the end there is no suspense.  The author has the murderer spell everything out with dialogue.  Skip it.
From the beginning I was distracted by the unappealingness of all the characters. If the book hadn't been a book club selection, I would have not finished it. The worst part is that the entire novel is drenched in the alcoholism of the primary character who is about the weakest protagonist I've ever met. The constant stream of alcohol covers the lack of substance and narrative skill. My recommendation: skip this book and find something better to read.
This was one of the worst books I have read in a long time -- boring. I was bored reading about a drunk all the way through. I let two others borrow this book and they felt the same way, which is ununusual because we always disagree on the books. A book like this will make me a fan of the Library -- where I could have returned it without finishing. I already paid for it on my Kindle so I had to finish .... what a waste of time.
I was deeply disappointed by this ""best-seller"". I can only imagine it is on the best seller list because it has the requisite sex, violence and mystery.I understand that it is fiction, but the characters' actions were often completely beyond credibility. Making the main character an alcoholic was a pretty cheap way to try to have licence for the behaviors. The characters a blunt and uninteresting, same for the story.
If it ever happens again that I consider a Paula Hawkins book, I pray someone shakes me until I come to my senses.Muddled and exhausting. The ramblings of an alcoholic, schizophrenic, nymphomanic?  The story got too sickening to figure it out.  It is hard to believe that so many people bought this book.I believe the comments by A. Grace hit the tack on the cranium. Wish I had read that before I ordered the book.
Go on to amazon.co.uk and read the book's reviews there for a more accurate take on the book.This is not a thriller. During the first 70% of the book this is an examination of the angst suffered by three unlikable middle class British housewives The plot is wafer thin and is presented via exposition and resolution in the last 10% of the book. If you are looking for the next Gone Girl, keep looking
I was very disappointed with this book, especially after reading some reviews.  To me, and some others in my book club, these characters seemed weak and very self centered, each of them.  Most of their troubles brought on my themselves. I couldn't sympathize or even emphasize with any of them, except perhaps the Cathy who put up with Rachel, although why, I can't imagine.What a downer!
I don't understand this book's popularity. I found it initially confusing, eventually quite tedious (I was reading it for a Book Club so made the effort to finish the book) -- and I disliked the characters, who were fairly unpleasant and focused on self. I would never recommend this book to anyone. There's a lot of wonderful literature available. Don't waste your time reading this book.
It's probably not a good idea for me to review this book. From the fact that it is on the best seller list shows how well received it must be by readers. I personally found it very well written but much too dark for me. I was depressed the entire time I was reading it. The character doesn't have a redeeming quality. She's a falling down drunk and makes no attempt to help herself. How her friend could have been so patient after she threw up in the foyer didn't ring true to me at all.  I think for many people that would have done it.
I bought this book based on the glowing reviews.  I am trying to get into the book and each time I restart reading it, wonder what I am missing.  It is not a page turner but rather begs my patience.  I'm an avid reader, enjoy different genres, but Girl on the Train is a chore to read.  What did the more than 1,000 readers who gave this book a 5-star rating enjoy that I do not?I wish someone could enlighten me about this book's merits before I delete it.Thank you for anyone who is reading this.ML
I saw the book being advertised everywhere. I read the first few pages and decided to buy it. I literally skipped through the last of it. The characters were unbearable. You could barely cheer on rachel, just when you were starting to like her she would fall back in love with her mean, insulting ex husband.What a waste. Weak women in a weak book. Bleah
We listened to this book during a few long car rides. This book is like spending a lot of hours with really awful people. It also drags in the middle, is repetitive and desperately needed an editor. My husband, who also had the displeasure of listening along with me, said, ""If I wrote this book, I would be so embarrassed."" We couldn't wait for it to end.
After reading all the raves about this book, I was 100% disappointed in it.  None of the three main female characters had any redeeming qualities at all.  I kept hoping all three of them would fall under a passing train and end their misery and mine.  The killer was obvious early in the story and by the end I did not care at all if the killer walked away free.
I did not like this book. I did not care what happened to any of the characters. It was gimmicky and not written very well. Stopped reading a little after midway through because I really wasn't interested to learn what happened to anyone. You have to create characters that touch a reader in some way in order for them to want to find out what happens to them.
Pathetic attempt to make very dysfunctional unlikeable characters into a story. The way the author jumps around with dates makes for a difficult story. I gave up about 1/3 of the way through. Not worth my time or yours. I have no idea how it garnered so many 5 star ratings. This book was for a book club or I would not have tried reading as much as i did.
I thought there was going to be an interesting premise, and I was intrigued by the setting and how the plot was set up; however, the ensuing book showed a group of characters that lacked empathy, a moral compass, and any self-awareness. By the end of the book, I was really annoyed that I had invested the time. I would NOT recommend this book to anyone.
3 Crazy women and crazier men!  This book is not worth the read. A mystery of sorts but mostly predictable.
Don't know how this book made the best seller's list. I guess people like garbage. Takes forever to get to the point. Boring book. Author seems to assume that we know these characters personally before reading the book. Timeline jumps all over the place.  If you like reading a thousand different descriptions of a train, go ahead and buy this book.
This is the worst book I have ever attempted to read.  I kept thinking it would get better based on reviews.  Must have been some of those ""fake"" reviews.  Don,t  waste your time. If you are seriously depressed, in poor shape with a low self esteem, read this it will make you seem feel like your life is not so bad but actually great.
Uh this was terrible!  I couldn't wait for it be over. Why this is a NY Times Bestseller I have no idea. Don't waste your time or money. I was disappointed and couldn't wait for it to be over. I listened to the audio book. For more explicit reasons-read the other poor reviews-they explain it all.I'm going back to Non-Fiction.
Had heard so much about this book - I couldn't wait to read.  Other than being a little bit different of a read in terms of charater perspective, and accurately portraying an alcoholics denial, I can't say it was a page turner.  Certainly portrayed women as needy, dependent and manipulative.  Not worth the time it takes to read.
There was not one charachter with any humanity in this novel. It was chilling, violent and really quite depressing and disturbing. The mystery was convincing and the protagonist believable. It was a good portrayal of a woman's with drinking issues. Her voice was true, but sad and unhappy. It is a good example of this genre.
This book tries to be thrilling in the vein of Gone Girl but, the main character is annoying her is consistent desperation and self-loathing. Any attempts to redeem her by illustrating her spiral downward, are presented too late and are weak.  I was hoping something more would come but the pay-off fell flat.
Sorry, I thought this book was awful.  I like thrillers, but the main character Rachel is not only on the train, she is a train wreck. I did not enjoy reading about her frequent drunken blackouts and myriad of other self-induced problems. I couldn't get beyond the half way point and do not plan to finish it.
the worst book I have ever read. Most depressing
I ordered the book for a friend and took it out of the library for my self.  My friend loves mysterys.  I had a hard time getting trough it.  I don't know why it is on best seller lists.  I returned the book for her and another I ordered from Amazon called Headstrong.  She had a PHD in biochemistry.
I heard so many great things about this book.  I expected more.  The problem I had was the pace of the the book.  I was ready for some action to occur and it never did.  This book was indicative of a Lifetime movie gone horribly wrong.  Don't purchase, check it out at the library, if you must read.
Only near the end does this book become an interesting murder mystery with a twist -until then it has unpleasantNon-sympathetic  characters with depressing personal problems- not endearing, not uplifting, and not interesting enough at the denouement for all the slogging-through one has to do.
I wish I hadnt wasted my time purchasing this. I found it to be very slow moving. Waste of reading time to be honest, for a book that is so acclaimed. There are much better reads. P.S. Any reader would figure out who the killer was from midway through the novel. Underwhelming to put it nicely.
I did not care for this book at all. It was confusing, the characters jumped in and out of the story until you weren't sure who you were reading about.I just kept hoping this dragged out book was going to get better, but it never did. sorry, a harsh review, but I just didn't care for it.
Not one of the characters is remotely sympathetic - in fact they are all quite dislikeable - and the story is an echo of the far better written Gone Girl. It's hardly worth the time to read it and I trudged on only because the blurbs promised what was never delivered: suspense and surprise.
I found the novel unremarkable. The characters were all flawed with no particular redeeming qualities. The location was void of colorful description with the exception of the relentless train noises. The ending wasn't particularly clever. Certainly not an enjoyable ""summer read"".
Such ugly people.  Wish I didn't have to read this for my book club.  I may have begun this on my own as it has been a top seller for so long, but I would have quit after 50 pages like I usually do.  Such dribble!  Not a good mystery even though poetic justice is served here.
I suffered through the audio version thinking I was treating myself to some entertainment on my daily commute.The high overall reviews on Amazon coupled with the buzz surrounding the book suckered me in.Unfortunately, the story drags on and on relentlessly like a train to nowhere with consistent nonsense and irrelevant reflections and details. There is so much mind numbing repetition, and none of it adds any suspense or advances the plot. It distracts, irritates, and bores one to sleep.Add to this slow and plodding story line a dry narration (in a British accent), and you can imagine how painful the audio version was to endure. Let me see, Rachael gets drunk and can't remember what happened the night before. She gets drunk again and attempts to remember what happened a few years ago. Let's see, yes, she's drunk again and can't remember what happened a few nights ago. She's constantly blacked out, but in the end she gets a small window of clarity and pieces everything together to solve the crime. The unreliable witness, drunk, and overall loser of the story comes through in the end! Uh, no, you can't be serious.Could the therapist have lacked charisma any more than he did? I'm not quite sure what the sexual draw is to the guy. Could the two main male characters be any more psychotic and abusive? The three female characters were all pathetic. They were almost mirror images of each other. I won't give away the ending, but I had a feeling I knew who did it fairly early on. The author didn't play fair with the readers. She didn't give us any clues to help us solve the crime. There was no ""ah ha"" moment when we look back and say to ourselves, ""Yes, this makes sense based on this or that."" She went out of her way to such an extent, that it sort of indicated where she was going. As a reader we should be able to reflect back on earlier events to make sense of the ending. Unfortunately the author didn't trust her skill at writing a compelling mystery for this.No, the ending and confession were not realistic. The person who committed the crime was actually not realistic even if predictable. However, the character development for the killer, if you can call it that, actually supported the fact that this person certainly wouldn't have done it! SPOILER ALERT: This person was a pathological liar, but in the end confesses everything to a granular detail? Seriously? This person was detached and didn't give a hoot about relationships, so why was he so upset at the last turn of events? Realistically he would have just moved on, this is how these cheaters operate. In the end, I didn't care who killed whom. I sort of wish all five main characters, oh what the heck, let's add the therapist, would have gotten into a drunken stupor and been rolled over by the train. I sure wish I had by the end.
I was so ready for this book to knock the socks right off my feet...it didn't even manage to tickle them.I hated this book. I really did. It was a complete struggle to get through. The biggest problem I had was with the MC. She was a weak, obscenely dumb, pitying fool. Although, I found none of the characters remotely interesting (except maybe Cathy. I sort of enjoyed her). None of them were likeable in the least. I guess we have the author to blame for that...as well as the horrid, Lifetime movie-worthy writing! It seriously felt like a daytime TV event. No normal person acts the way some of these characters acted (which was with an utter lack of intelligence). No police officers are that catty, rude, and incompetent.I figured out the ending fairly early on in this underwhelming whodunnit. There were a few red herrings thrown about, but they were not wholly developed enough to convince (I'm sure a seven-year-old could've seen through such transparent writing/characters).I was hoping for an experience on par with the writing of Gillian Flynn, but I guess I aimed a bit too high. The readers reviewing this book and giving it more than 3 stars are most-likely the kind of people that enjoy/are entertained by cheap, PG-13 type thrillers like the Beyoncé-led 'Obsessed', or the harebrained 'No Good Deed'.This book is unoriginal, sloppy, and just...dumb! It's like Gone Girl's third cousin twice removed (the one with the cleft lip and poor social skills that lives in Great Aunt Millie's attic and likes to reenact scenes from Casablanca with dead mice).I'm amazed at the praise it has been receiving, because nothing about it was suspenseful, intriguing, or hard to comprehend. It doesn't leave you guessing, it leaves you kind of bored and feeling sad for it.I urge you. Challenge yourself- READ SOMETHING ELSE!Avoid. Avoid. Avoid
This is one of the worst books I've ever read. Gillian Flynn should be insulted that her book, Gone Girl, was compared to this inane book. It was boring and repetitive. I was tired of reading about Rachel and her drinking problem. Luckily, I only paid $1.99 on bookbub.com.
Could only read 4 to 5 pages at a time before book marking it for another time.  Open it again and more vomit, sweat, nightmares, staring through windows, drinking cocktails from a can.  Sooo depressing!  Half way through I pulled the emergency cord and got off the train.
Stupid book stupid story poorly written…last time I buy a book because it is a best seller….a four paragraph idea dragged out interminably….just terrible….author & publisher must have a great deal to their PR agency to get his turkey on the""best Seller"" list….
I found it hard to read as it was a cast of dysfunctional people.  It lacked having one strong character to make it more believable and give it some glue.I only finished it as it is the book my book club is reading.  Otherwise I would have closed it early on.
I read several chapters and put it down. I don't like depressing character studies. Why are all the new novels on the best sellers list of this boring genre? There is enough in life to be sad about without ""entertaining"" oneself with hopeless stories.
This is the only book I've ever read in which I wanted all the characters to die.  Not one of them had any redeeming qualities. How this ever got published is beyond me.  This is the worst book I've ever read and I've been reading books for over 60 yrs.
so, I could not put it down, but it was so creepy, I will have nightmares forever...what was the author thinking?  And the bites inside the mouth??there were lots of typos, too..but I just had a train ride to DC and back, and this book ruined it.
I don't understand all the glowing reviews of this book. I found it tortured, at best. Alternating voices of pathologically self-absorbed, self-pitying characters, a predictable and gratuitous violent end. Ultimately, for me, a huge disappointment.
I read the whole book in 2 sittings so guess it intrigued me but I didn't like any of the characters. I guessed the end half way through, however years of watching Kojak as a kid have made me a semi professional at guessing who ""done it""!
In my opinion, this was a ""GONE GIRL"" wanna be.  Adults in this book were all on same level of maturity.....about 14 years of age.I did finish it because I wanted to see how it ended.  But, it is not a book I would highly recommend.
I have lost sleep finishing this!  Time I can't have back:).  Three women taken in by abusive men.  Women are more intelligent than that on the whole!  Rachel's alcoholism and vomiting is exhausting for the reader.  Anna is a pathetic and a dim wit, And the murdered chic was a tramp!  I prefer books with stronger women💪🏻
What a silly piece of melodrama. None of the characters have any depth or seem at all real. No self respecting actress would play any of the female role. And I strongly suspect this made for TV drama will come to the big screen.  Waste of time.
I thought this was a depressing story about a down and out alcoholic who has lots of problems. The obscene language was offensive. The plot was unusual and there were some surprising twists at the end, but I would not recommend this book.
I did not like this book. At all. I will go so far as to say I hated it.It's not the writing. It is a well written book. My complaint is with the characters. The book is narrated primarily by Rachel, who it quickly becomes clear is an unreliable narrator. Within the first few pages readers realise she's an alcoholic and as the story goes on there are other reveals here and there that show other things that have been omitted, which paint her in a more and more unflattering light. The other two women who narrate are Anna, who is married to Rachel's ex-husband and 'Jess' (actually Megan), the woman Rachel watches from the train.Primarily the narrators annoyed me for their idiocy. The three of them make silly choice after silly choice. In particular I had no sympathy for Rachel, who doesn't seem to be doing anything to help herself. I couldn't care about the characters or what happened to them because they were too idiotic. Rachel drinks and does silly things; Megan makes stupid choices and can't seem to grow up, and Anna sees everything as revolving around her.I forced myself to keep going and I'll admit that I didn't guess how the book was going to end but the characters drove me up the wall. They made it irredeemable in my opinion. I will give this 2/10, based on the fact the writing was actually fine.[Review originally posted on my book blog, link is in my profile.]
This was supposed to be a book with some dynamism, some action.  What a joke.  We have a self absorbed drunk women stumbling into a pit of despair.  Well get over yourself, dammit.  I want my eight dollars back Amazon.
I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone.  It's pointless.  I couldn't have cared less about the characters or the story.  I read a number of reviews comparing this to Gone Girl.  Not even close.  I loved that book.
I thought with all the hype it would be a good read but after more than 60 pages I gave up. Not worth the money spent or the time invested. Maybe it got good at some point but I moved on to more interesting options.
It was not as good as I thought it would be.  The story just dragged on with this drunken woman trying to piece things together.  I finally found out who the killer was at the very end.  I would not recommend it.
I am sooooo tired of reading about miserable, needy, narcissisti women.  Only one minor character had any redeeming qualities.  Not particularly well written either.  Cannot figure out why this is a best seller.
I could not connect to this book, and therefore never choose to finish it. Not my kind of reading. I feel that I wasted my money and time by downloading and trying to read it. It had no value tome what so ever.
Can't add anything to the orther one star reviews and comments; a real waste of time.  Could someone explain how such a book received such favorable reviews?  Have we reached a nadir in literary tastes?
I am amazed that a book like this one rose to the top of the best seller list.  It wasn't even entertainment for me.  I made myself read it to the end to see if I would change my opinion.  I did not.
Stop now, look for another book. Read the other one star ratings and save yourself the unhappiness of the obligatory reading of a poorly plotted book that you hope will end quickly. Harsh but true.
I'm having great difficulty finishing this.  I brought it because it was highly recommended.  But what the ##### It's certainly not what I expected,.  given the choice I would not have bought it.
If you enjoy reading about 30 something characters who whine, complain and are mentally disturbed this is the book for you.  If you would like to read an intelligent mystery try Agatha Chrisite.
After awhile, I found the book quite boring, but once I start a book, I hve to finish it for some strange reason!  This book just went on and on and on...  I am surprised it was a best seller.
This was a very confusing book, difficult to read and not enjoyable.  Out of hope for it to improve I forced myself to finish!  The lead character is a confused psycho with an alcohol problem.
Read a quick synopsis online and save yourself the time and money. Characters are dull and the plot and writing is repetitive. I fell for the hype, not sure how this got so many good reviews.
The girl on the train was a very slow book.  it was very hard to follow, actually to me, the ending didn't really end, it just stopped. it was poorly written. Not worth the money or the read
I know that this book has been number one on the best seller list, but I didn't care for it.  I felt like the author was trying to copy Gone Girl.  I have not recommended it to friends.
Let me preface this by saying I love mystery stories and read a lot of books that are quite disconcerting. It is rare that I pick up a book and do not finish it. I did not finish this book. In fact, I left it in a hotel in Vancouver saying it was free for the taking. The characters were dark, terribly dark, and I feel like instead of letting us have our distaste at the characters, the author wanted us to have sympathy for these people. Compassion only goes so far and the behavior of those involved was so disgusting on all accounts. It ceased to be a mystery story and, instead, became an example on all the ways selfish people refuse to grow up. I was appalled. As a recent college graduate who knew many young adults who acted this same way, I found nothing redeeming about this book. I know such people exist, but we should not glorify them or make their actions seem okay. Also, spoiler alert, it was impossible to believe that the ex boyfriend would continue to contact the crazy drunk lady especially after she put his child in danger. No self respecting human would risk their family like that. I heard so many great things about this book, but in the end I was nothing but disappointed.
WHY is there so much praise for this TERRIBLE book?!!!  I cannot BELIEVE that anyone thinks this book is so fantastic!!  It's DEPRESSING and poorly written.  Don't waste your money!!
A poorly written document that passes for a book. I saw a TV program where  people are paid to write recommendations - this had to be the case here.  Don't waste your time or money.
This is definitely the worst book I have ever read.  Cannot believe it is on the top of the best sellers list.  Do people really like reading about such sick people?  Awful, awful.
Because of the comparisons I will say that I very much enjoyed Gone Girl. This book, I did not enjoy. I broke down and purchased it for Kindle because it was mentioned so frequently by friends and family and the waiting list at the library was pages long. I figured it must be good and all the reviews raved about it. I found it to be boring, slow, and unrealistic. For a book about observations and where a train is the main and most frequent setting, there really was not a lot of description. Each chapter is the same, Rachel takes the train, Rachel gets drunk. Anna's view did not really add anything in my opinion and Megan keeps everything a secret, even in her own head. The twists were not surprising or that interesting to me. Most things and extra characters seemed set up just to serve as red herrings, which does not work when it is obvious. Most of the plot happens in the last 30 pages, the rest is just 300 pages of her riding the train and not remembering anything. I mostly felt frustrated that the story wasn't going anywhere and when it did go somewhere it was pretty predictable. Maybe it is my generation, but I don't find infidelity that shocking.
If the purpose was to hate the female characters the author has indeed succeeded.  I have never read a novel with so many whiny, negative self-deprecating characters in my life.
Maybe it me...I say that after reading all of these spectacular review, but after almost 60-pages I just cannot get into this book, or the style of writing.How long does it take for a writer to build a plot, etc.  All I know so far, after these many pages, is that Vachel rides a train, is divorced, goes past the house her husband and his new wife live in.  Rachel sees them together, feels sorry for herself, goes to where she now lives, drinks herself into stupors.  She makes harassing phone calls to her ex-husband, and his wife...yadda, yadda, yadda.Not to be chauvinistic here, but this is a book written by a women...and would, maybe, be found interesting by women.  In my lifetime I have only ever read one book by a women, and she was one of those that knock em' out, one a month...but that one book, it was by Danielle Steele, about Vietnam, was the only one I have ever read, again written by a women, that kept me turning the pages.As to the Girl on the Train, well all I can say is that I was taken for a ride that was boring, boring, boring.  I never finished it and donated it to the local library~!
How it stayed on best seller list is beyond beyond. The book was depressing and tooo much rambling on and on about drinking and not doing anything to address how to stay sober.
Awful, degrading and boring
Very disappointing. I found myself skipping pages hoping it would get better, but it never did. Reading the story from a pathetic drunk's perspective made for a painful read.
So obviously a product of writers' workshop thinking: Create an unusual situation and antagonistic characters, etc., etc. Boring. Don't know how it got to be a best seller.
I do not understand how this book has temained on the best selling list. I thought the story line was confusing and I could not get invested in the lives of the characters.
I can't understand why this book is still on the Best Seller list. I found it boring, and there was not one character in this depressing storythat I could care about.
It was hard to like any of the characters. I was hoping I would  finish the book quickly and I didn't care how it ended.There wasn't one character that I cared about.
Awful! Weak female characters who have no self-worth or intelligence. Sophomoric, melodramatic , predictable writing style. Highly over rated book. Don't waste your time.
Thought the book was very depressing, filled with unlike able people.  Would not recommend it.  Just because it's on the Best Seller list does not make it a good story!
Any comparison to Hitchcock is completely misplaced. This started as a yawner and I couldn't make myself keep reading about the pathetic main character. Amazon should have a money-back guarantee of some sort.
Another contemporary feminist fiction novel full of unsympathetic characters careening through the plot.  Unless that is what you want to read, avoid this book.
Stopped reading at 50 pages. I don't care about this woman and her drinking problem. Why waste my time with this when there are so many other excellent books?!
Never finished it.I put it down and picked it back up twice and finally just gave up.Very rare for me to not finish a book.I tried! Sorry.
Why is this a best seller? I did not care about any of the characters and I had the crime figured out in no time. There are many better books to read.
The story is split between three women, all equally weak, flawed & unlikable.Not very cleverly crafted in my humble opinion. Although it sounded promising for the first few chapters, it soon transpires that nothing much happens for half of the book. The big twist or amazing conclusion which may nave redeemed the book didn't happen, and the ending announced itself loudly way before the unconvincing climax. And if Rachel's ex had changed his phone numbers and email address like any normal person being majorly harassed by an obsessive, alcoholic ex wife, there would be no story at all. Rather handily, this became a good cover story for him to cheat on his new wife.What was the point of the ginger haired man? A poorly executed red herring? Or the piles of clothes that made regular appearances on the side of the train tracks? And what turnedI should have known better when it was compared with Gone Girl. I hated that too. Don't believe the hype.
Should have been a short story, didn't like one character in the book, I don't know who hypes these books, but somehow they become best sellers, HOW?
Characters all psychological messes in fragmented pseudo-Hemingway bits between pregnant pauses. Little plot until 80percent through. Tiresome people existing primarily in their minds rather than living them. Most disappointing
The writers style I thought was boring & the story was hard to follow.  I read 3/4 & quit which I hated to do but I couldn't handle any more.
I can't get into this book. The main character seems like such a miserable person.  Get her some Prozac  I'm sorry that I purchased this book
Very monotonous, predictable read. Meanders around without ever really engaging the reader finishes as it started with an anti climatic end.
I am amazed that this book was on the top of the best seller list for so long. I found it boring and frankly disturbing. Not my cup of tea.
Want to read a book where everyone sucks? Do you want to be in a bad mood just thinking about it? Then by all means, read this awful book!
I really wanted to love this book and had high hopes based on other reader comments.  I greatly enjoyed ""Gone Girl"" but this book pales in comparison.  The 3 female characters with alternating POVs are all pathetic. Their middle class problems seem so first world and were not compelling.  One of the females, Megan, and one of the 2 main male characters, Tom, are conveniently compulsive liars and cheats and no one ever meets the parents or family of either (Megan's family conveniently dead, Tom's estranged) -- it felt so contrived! Then to add the final insult SPOILER ALTER -- pathetic Rachel (who is a white, educated, middle class adult, presumably in her 30's) ends up having everything worked out when her mother coughs up some money for her to get back on her feet and get a fresh start. Rachel didn't do anything real to rebuild her life or improve herself. Saved by mummy's money. Ugh!
I bought this book mainly because it had been #1 NYTimes best-seller.  Big mistake.  I regret the time I wasted reading it.The vast majority of the plot energy centers around the female protagonists triumphantly discovering, verifying, agonizing over, and obsessing over the infidelity of their husbands. There is not one word about any attempts to solve problems or make a better marriage. There is not one word about the good side of any marriage.. On the contrary,If this bleep is to be believed, the only propose of marriage is lose-lose to give e the wife cause to feel bigtime aggrieved.  If that were the case, women's best course would always be to avoid marriage altogetherThat said, Hawkins weaves  in a powerful and non-preachy.anti-alcohol subtext.  If this book saves one young woman from life-destroying ravages of drink, that would be terrific.  But a good read it is not.
I can't understand why this book is considered  one of the best books of the year, it is badly written and quite frankly a lousy story.
Tedious and predictable story. I figured out who the bad guy was about half way through the book. I can't understand the great reviews.
Not sure why this stays on the best seller list was not impressed didn't find it thrilling at all. I thought this was very predictable.
The idea of the book was original and clever. How many of us imagine stories around people we see with some regularity when we commute? I liked the big reveal that Rachel lived 4 houses away in her recent past and that introduced some interesting possibilities. Past that, I found the book difficult to read and ultimately poorly constructed. All voices in first person can work as a style of writing when each character has a distinct voice so that the reader can differentiate between characters. In this book, only the chapter headings helped. In fact, I wondered 40 pages in or so if this was one person with multiple personalities or if Megan and Anna were figments of her imagination, much like fictionalized Jess and Jason. Hard to empathize with any of these characters. The women are all alike (dependent, self-absorbed) and the men are manipulative with violent streaks. Where are characters with more complexity and balance, with a sense of self? This just failed on so many levels for me. It wasn't informing, entertaining or thought-provoking so I could never recommend it.
I did not enjoy this book at all.  Chapters are written from the perspective of one character at a time and the timing jumps all over the place.  The story is told from over the course of 3 years but jumps back and forth during that time and is not well written.  This is not a book that is suspenseful as portrayed by the synopsis.  Things that are mentioned and you think they will play a part in the book just disappear, never to be referenced again.  I had figured out who the bad guy was very early on in the book.  And the main character, Rachel, just makes you want to grab her by the shoulders and shake some sense into her.  If you like to read about weak women that can easily be lead by men, then by all means, read the book.  I read this because it was the choice for the monthly book club that I am a part of - I will now be deleting it from my kindle, never to be read again.
Actually, I couldn't finish it. After 80 pages of alcoholic self-pity and delusion, I gave it up. Did it get better on page 81?
I did not care for the characters, or for the story itself.Tedious and depressing.I would not recommend this book.
Couldn't find one character to like. Really very tedious jumping forward and backward in time following a bunch of sad losers.
How to put into as few words as possible my loathing of this book? I'll just try for one, and leave it at that: craptacular.
Not sure what others liked about this book. I kept waiting for the thrill to begin. Very slow until the final few chapters.
I have no problem tossing a book to the side after a couple of chapters if I don't like it. This one I wanted to throw across the room! I just can't understand the good reviews, but I had to keep reading to see if I could figure it out. I never did.I tried skimming once I got halfway through, but it wasn't easy. The book is told from the point of view of different characters but they all sound the same. Not to worry, you know you're reading about the main character if she is constantly worried about her next drink.This trend of going back and forth, writing chapters from the perspective of different characters and at different times (which she also does) can be the mark of a lazy writer. It takes time to create a single narrator, and I don't think this writer had the skill.
I was really bored by the storytelling and the plot twist was so disappointing that I wonder what the buzz is all about.
Worst book ever!  Don't waste your time. I'm not sure how it was even published.  I give it one star for good marketing.
I'm flabbergasted by the rave reviews, especially that there are 17,500+ mostly positive reviews. At the 20% mark, I debated ending the boredom since nothing had happened yet. Once I got to about 50%, I was still bored and confused about what all the fuss what about because still nothing much had happened. But I slogged through and finished, and I'm still shaking my head. Not one of the seven main characters is likable. Most of them drink heavily. The pacing is slow and repetitive. The book felt so amateurish that I really question what has happened to the reading public that books like this and Gone Girl, another poorly written and over-hyped mess, are so popular. Are books with fully developed characters and carefully crafted plots too challenging for people? I just don't get it.
In a word: crap.I took this book with me on a beach vacation because I wanted something to breeze through, something to entertain me. I do not ask for much in my beach reads: plot, some coherent writing, character development. I gave this book more than a fair shot. But I'm stopping at page 175.Poor writing, flat characters, and the author's sexist tone seeps off every page. Every female psychosis is on display here: dressing the part, feeling worthless, feeling like a child, sexual motivation behind how men act, women's revenge, ""I'm a force to be reckoned with,"" ""all these men,"" the list goes on....I can't take it anymore. Life is too short to read bad books like this one.I hate it1/5 Goodreads1/5 Amazon
I can't believe all these four and five star reviews!  I had to plow through this book because I found it not only boring but distasteful, like Gone Girl.  All about sleazy people whose main occupation was having sex with each other.  The means of telling the story--first-person snippets by the three female characters--struck me as sloppy writing, an easy ""out"" that let the author not bother with the finer details of plot. And the people were not interesting!  Their lives, including those of the men, were incredibly shallow..  I am an older reader but I don't object to sex in stories, just to sloppy writing about people that are so dull and uninspiring.  But this seems to be the new trend in best-selling books which speaks to me of how readers' tastes have deteriorated.
It's exhausting to listen to seemingly endless, inner dialogue of the characters.... I gave up 2/3 of the way through.
I read a lot. Not only is the story constructed in a confusing way, it goes on forever.I'm glad it's over.
I finally saw the light and no longer read the 5 star reviews, will always start with 1 star and make my decision whether or not to purchase a book.Not sure why some authors feel the need to classify their characters as flawed, we are all flawed - personally I found all three of her characters almost borderline sociopaths but that was never really explored - I honestly did not give a crap what happened to them before, during and after.  Although this novel has been compared to 'Gone Girl', I at least, was interested in the motivation behind the story in the Flynn book, not at all with this one.  I cannot even fathom the thought of passing this along for a friend or foe to read, but I guess will donate it to a library since its' been too long to get my money back.
I couldn't wait for this book to be over. I purchased it because it was on the 'recommended' list if you had enjoyed A. Doerr's exquisite novel  All the Light We Cannot See...which is on my top 10 forever list. It is unfathomable to determine the logic used to couple it with Doerr's masterpiece, but I assume this is why Hawkin's book has sold so well.There was not one character with whom to develop a  hopeful compassion (key ingredient) and draw you in intimately. I hung in and kept reading The Girl on the Train thinking Hawkins would somehow pull it off but alas...the depressing story  laid itself flat all the way to it's merciful conclusion.  Save your money. Pick up Lady in Gold and All the Light we Cannot see and sink into something you wish had no last page.
Convoluted, boring, and a main character that I would not like to know any better than the first couple of chapters.
So predictable, but worst than the plot were the women — all three were just awful people—vain, selfish, bored women who saw their identities through the men they were with or not with—primo goal was to be desired, more important than being loved, children were but pawns and on and on, but then come to think of it all three men were pretty wretched, too, and virtually indistinguishable from each other — indeed all the characters were but mirrors reflecting back each other's narcissistic selves. If they had all ended up killing each other I wouldn't have been the least bit disturbed. I might have even cheered. Skipped through to the end. Why is this book so popular?Plus reading about a drunk is just as bad as having to spend time with one in real life.
What a disappointment!  Like a narcissistic diary.  Made me skip the middle to read the gruesome ending.  No good people in this book.
One of the worst books I have read in years  If you start not worth finishing characters uninteresting and banal
I finished this book (which took some effort) last night, and I am thoroughly mad at how the raving reviews tricked me into wasting precious life time on this book. All (ALL!) characters in the book are unlikeable and cardboard flat. The story drags on (I skimmed over dozens of pages), contains a lot of unnessecary page-filling side stories like the redheaded man on the train or the job interview, both of which contribute nothing to the story. Then some miserable attempts at confusing the reader into thinking ANY of the main characters in the book could have been the perp, and an Oh!, so unexpected plot twist at the end, the kind that aspiring writers learn about in a weekend workshop. Boring, predictable, flat, irritating.
Three of the most pathetic woman characters I have ever read about. I would not recommend this book to anyone!
This book could not hold my interest. Don't know if it was the writing or the story . Did not finish the book
I had the same problem as with Gone Girl.  I could stand only so much of the tedious, boring story.  Gave up half way through.
Predictable, and not particularly interesting. Surprised it has lasted on the bestseller list for so long.
This was no Hitchcock mystery as some have said.  I was bored the entire book, but kept reading thinking that it would get better.  Very disappointing.  Don't waste your time or money on this one.
I was not expecting more than a ""beach book read"" but this was really bad.  It amazes me what ends up on the NYT bestseller list and book club selections.  To be in either catagory would suggest a minium amount of competency.  Out of sheer stuborness I stuck with it to see if it would improve but it just kept getting worse.  The ending was so awful, worse than the rest of the book, if that is at all possible.Totally confirmed my opinion that this is a little stinker of a book.  Not worth your time or money.P.S.  Some reviewers seem to have misread the NYT review.  They actually gave it a very bad review but I thought for $6.99 I would give it a try!
This book has been on the bestseller list forever so when Amazon put the Kindle version on sale for $1.99 I decided to give it a shot. Not going to deny I went into this with a little bit of a hesitant attitude because I doubted it was going to be my kind of book. It wasn't. I really thought it was terrible but I managed to hang in there until well past halfway. I was in the publishing industry for many years and have read many a book but few, maybe none actually, as overrated as this book.I'm obviously an exception because with the huge popularity most readers must have loved the book. Good for them, happy they got a return on their entertainment dollar.
I just couldn't get into this book at all.  I've picked it up multiple times, and just couldn't do it.  Part of it is the pitiful state of the woman - you could see her total inability to cope right off the bat - but the author beat it to death setting you up to realize she was not going to end up being a credible person when it really mattered.  Frankly I gave up - possibly too early - I suppose eventually she figures out the whole thing and is able to convince the authorities that she really has a clue - BUT I just couldn't bring myself to get to that point.  Bravo for those who were able to finish this book and  thinks it's terrific - I'm not one of them.
I thought the story was all mixed up and at the end I didn't quite know what to think so I gave up.
OMG.  There are so many good books to read and this is NOT one of them.  I resent this book so much for taking time away from all the other books I could have read instead.  I have tolerance for unsympathetic characters and unreliable narrators.  I also don't mind the looonnng, slooooow unspooling of plots.  But this novel is ridiculous.  No one to care about.  No pay off.  Incredibly repetitive and needlessly long.Really it's as if one stumbled across the fussy, cheap journals of three different women, and a cursory glance through them proves they are poorly written, desparately dull navel gazing.  So one throws them away!
I was ready for a psychological thriller ... I am 45 pages in and cannot feign interest any longer. Rachel, the main character so far, is a drunk. As with most drunks, she has difficulty remembering events, and she is a liar.  Not an interesting liar, but a woozy, self-absorbed drunk, who loves living in her imaginary world, and who, like real life drunks at this stage of alcoholism, has sunk below any hope of recovery.  So far, this read is as repetitive and fruitless as trying to help a real-life drunk help him or herself.  You'll resent being lied to and regret the time you invested.  You know where this story is going, no surprise.
I'm giving this book one star because of the ending -- which disappoints on so many levels. My method of reading this was a Kindle, so I'd say the book was an absolute fantastic page-turner until about 85%. Then I started getting a picture of how the book would end. I'll deliver no spoilers. Let's just say, by book's end I thought all of the three women principal characters were pretty much idiots. And all so conveniently in the same London neighborhood! Sorry, I don't feel sympathetic towards them. Morever, it's a bit of a male-bashing plot. A bad ending, in my opinion, negates what comes before it.I want my ten hours back!!!!
hated it; it relied on most of the characters being drunk and not knowing what they were doing
I did not like the book.  It was depressing, quite reading it when I was half way through it.
ZZZZZZZZ  I jumped all over this book......over 22,000+ reviews.....got be good!  after three tries I give up  I do not like stories where the main character is whiney and childish and that is exactly what Rachel is.  I loved Gone Girl and I see no resemblance to that book! All the characters are immature and or violent which doesn't normally stop me but this one sure did.  How it was rated so high is beyond me.  Rachel should have gotten off the train and gone home to momma.  Sorry this was very poorly written...makes Gone Girl a literary masterpiece  Maybe this would be a better movie?!
I am sorry I even wasted any time on this book. Luckily I listened to it on CD so when it got too tedious and unbelievable I would skip forward. The characters are all despicable, no redeeming qualities. Rachel is a hot mess, so boring and weak spirited. Megan, who sparks a little interest, is a slut without an iota of morality. Anna is a shadow, of not much of interest. The men, to a man, are also despicable. The author thinks adding mundane little details like ""she put the spoon down on the saucer"" is good descriptive writing is sadly delusional. Do not bother with this book.
My husband and I bought this to listen to on a road trip. The cover advertised it as Hitchcock like. Don't believe it! There isn't one character  that I could  relate to, and very few that I cared what happened to them. The main character is an alcoholic; it is painful listening to her. A warning for some- the British think nothing of using the ""F"" word.  The progress of the story is tortuously  slow. How this book is on the NY Times # 1 Best Seller list is beyond me! I'd say it was a waste of my time except I was in the car anyway. I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone.
This book was just painful. I tried several times to read it. When I realized I was forcing myself I quit. Books are meant for enjoyment.  I could not get into the main character.  She was such a mess and she was just depressing. Nothing to draw you into her world. Not sure if it was the character development or writing. I finally scrapped it after numerous attempts and making it through only 7%. I don't generally like reviews that haven't read but this book was just so blah I felt compelled to warn others before spending money. There are so many other great thrillers to read.
I don't understand all the raving reviews. The character development was vague and blurry. don't expect any minimalism here: ""she took a sip of Gin, she took another sip and walks across the room. She takes another sip and sits down.. ""I wanted to throw this book across the room a few times. The protagonist is pathetic and unlikable and all of the females are portrayed as weak. If you are expecting some huge mindphuc of a plot you will be disappointed. I have to add that there is nothing to intellectually gain or learn from this book. Just an endless stream of babble.
I picked up this book because it had an interesting premise, and as a general rule I like thrillers. However, I'm not sure that I can classify this book as a thriller. There's nothing particularly suspenseful about an alcoholic forgetting memories and people that are unfaithful to their spouses. Hawkins attempted diversions to the ""dramatic"" ending of the novel, but the weren't very interesting. There was nothing really to keep my reading other than the fact that I had already paid for the book and couldn't take it back. Nothing to keep you on the edge of your seat.
Only finished reading because I paid for it. Very hard to follow, would not recommend.
I had a difficult time developing much interest in the frequent mental musings of the main character. difficult to distinguish what was ""real"" and what was being imagined. I was not interested in imagined plots and events and characters that she was constantly engaged detailing.for all I know the first half of the book was just a dream she wrote down.I picked it up again after a month with a fresh approach and the second half of the book is a bit better.I still haven't finished it and unsure whether I will have the interest or energy to try.
i rated this a 1star because i am at 19% in and can not get to 20% ~ it is awful !
I thought the book was terrible.  Can't understand how it became a big seller.
Absolutely horrible, very poorly written, and the worst book I've read in a LONG time! No character development or plot development in a book that starts, ends, and in between goes nowhere.  I found myself reading nothing but ""blah, blah, blah,"" most of it irritatingly repetitive. Many reviewers say the ending was not satisfying. I disagree. I found the end immensely satisfying, for it meant I completed the tedium and could now go onto something more rewarding, not a high bar compared to this piece of garbage.
I see why this book is a bestseller.  There is something authentic about it:  - the claustrophobic dysfunction everywhere you turn (so true of modern culture):  - alcoholism, walking around dazed, stupid. -trying to function in a fugue state. -the bad choices of most of the characters, and the difficulty at find out the Truth. It dragged on insanely until the very last few pages. I'm not even sure if the book was ""about"" the batty, alcoholic mind and imagination of the protagonist or her actual experiences.
THIS BOOK IS DREADFUL, REALLY, REALLY AWFUL. I HAVE AN IVY LEAGUE DEGREE IN ENGLISH, & THINK I AM A GOOD JUDGE OF LITERATURE. I NEVER GIVE UP ON A BOOK, AND KEPT THINKING I COULD FIGURE OUT HOW IT STAYED ON THE NYTIMES BEST SELLER LIST FOR SO LONG. IT IS A STORY POORLY TOLD, CHARACTERS WHO AREN'T CREDIBLE. & A SENSELESS PLOT. MY SISTER, A FORMER ENGLISH TEACHER, WARNED ME NOT TO BUY IT, AND I WISH I HAD SAVED MY MONEY. I WON'T EVEN LEND IT TO A FRIEND, BUT WILL DROP IT IN THE BOOK RETURN SLOT AT MY LOCAL LIBRARY.
Seldom do I not finish a book.  Even if I'm not loving it, I still want to know what happened.  This book was full of unlikable characters--alcoholic screwed up main character, selfish screwed up character, annoying character.  Oh, all females.  The men seemed okay enough.  I kept asking ""did she do it?""  My daughter said, ""Mom, let me tell you, she did.""  No, she hasn't read it, and the worst part is, I didn't even care enough to skip to the end to find out!  Horrible, horrible, horrible!!
I  only got through about the 1st hundred pages.  I thought it was incredibly boring, extremely slow paced, and the main character is so depressing.  Everything in the book revolves around her riding on a train and what she see's or doesn't see on her daily commute to and from work.  The time not spent talking about the her moments on the train are spent talking about what a pitiful person she is and how she can't wait to numb the pain in her life(caused by a bad breakup with her ex) with the next drink.
I bought this book based on various published reviews. But, friends that also read this book agreed with me that the raves the book received did NOT sync with how they actually felt about the book as a whole.  In fact, one friend said she probably wouldn't finish it.  I finished the book, but found it just another exercise in mental stamina. I was glad I finished it but felt ripped off.  The characters were so far from my reality that I just wanted to slap them; tell them to get a life or go to a shrink!
I wanted to read this book to see what all the hype was about, but this one really missed the mark with me. Nothing noteworthy happens until half way through the book. There are no likable characters to root for either. I kept waiting to see if ""the girl on the train"" was going to do something interesting or just be a miserable drunk. Yes, the real villain is an unlikely character, but finding that out on the last 5% of the book didn't redeem it for me. I am really surprised this book is so popular.
The characters are unusually un-likeable. The story is confusing and not well thought out (Jess and Jason become Megan and Scott), plus one chapter is about Megan, the next about Rachel, then Anna and not necessarily in chronological order. To make the ending more dramatic, the author decides at the very end to add this whole entirely new dimension to one of the most bland characters; which makes her the villain. It feels so badly thought out. But the author does somewhat manage to create suspense.
If nothing else, I'm happy that I did not waste money on this. I've been seeing the hype for a while and seriously thought about downloading it. Thank you, local library for saving me the money!  Granted I wasn't too serious about throwing myself into the plot initially, but I found it very confusing switching among the three  bland, uninteresting female characters.  I could not become vested in the plot at all and even with skipping large chunks, I easily figured the ending. What a waste of time!
This is not worth reading.  Why a publisher would pick it is questionable.
This is a boringly slow story with mindless detail.  Best seller? Really?
Not sure what all the hype is about for this book.  Picked it up due to I like a good thriller and so many compared this to Hitchcock's classic (and my all time favorite film) Rear Window.  This is not even close.  Rather a dark, depressing story of a pathetically portrayed main character who is a divorced alcoholic who blacks out on a regular basis.  I supposed since my life has been personally touched by the horrors of alcohol addiction, I found this a horrid and hopeless waste of time.
A perfectly silly book about drinking too much and getting away with it!
I consider this book the most over-rated best seller I have ever read!
totally disappointed in this book, very slow moving borderline boring
Started it was not impressed with story line did not finish the book!
I absolutely despised every main character in this story. I finished it as I wanted to see if I was correct in the ""who did it and ran"".  I was and I had it pegged midway through the book.  A waste of time in retrospect and I am so glad it's over. Oh and about Rachel - She wins the award for the dumbest and most pathetic protagonist I've ever read about.  Ms. Hawkins needs to give all the women in her future novels a bit more credibility and likability.
What a sad comment on society that this highly depressing, dark and dysfunctional book has so many positive reviews!!  I bought it because I thought, heck 35,000 people??? but what a waste of time and money.  I actually started skimming toward the end as it was all so predictable and dull.  Good writer but too bad the focus was so dark and unbelievable.  really, people are more gray and multi layered then what is depicted.  Don't waste your money or your time.
I found this book to be depressing even though it held my attention.
I tried really hard to like this book.  I went into it not knowing what to expect, and it felt like nothing ever really happened.  There was a beginning, middle and end, but I could have read a Cliff's Notes version and be better off.  I just kept waiting for the character to be anything but a boring alcoholic and plod along through this mess, but it never came to fruition.  I powered on through it to the end, and having it done was certainly the best part.
An avid reader, I usually consume fifty or more books a year.  Probably the worst book I have ever read, this novel had completely unsympathetic characters, not one of whom exhibited any redeeming qualities whatsoever. Additionally, the plot was contrived, almost dishonest in its attempts to be misleading; it was depressing in the extreme and utterly devoid of any positive aspects. Although I did read Gone Girl, which was much better written, I do hope this
The plot is thin and all problems are solved when the main character's blackout memory gap suddenly resolves itself . . . despite the author's repeated warnings throughout the book that this is not how blackouts work. But it doesn't matter. By the end you don't care who dies or who survives because the characters are so ridiculously unlikable. Spoiler alert: Don't bother pushing through to the end under the assumption that it has to get better. It does not.
This novel, that has received high praise judging from its inclusion on best seller lists, I found to be thin.  Female characters were nearly indistinguishable , the chapters devoted to one major character at a time was head-shaking...  now, WHAT was the point of this chapter?  Now, wait a minute:  didn't she (wrong she) say ""X"" in another chapter?  I just plain didn't connect with any character.  The conceit was worthy but unfulfilled.
I had high hopes since its been on the best seller list for so long.  How disappointing that the book is so boring and predictable.  I had the killer figured out before the midway point.  Not an interesting read in the slightest.  One dimensional characters, thin plot lines, no suspense, slow moving, and crazy British slang make for an awful waste of time.  I don't understand the hype behind this piece of garbage.  Don't bother with this one.
I read Gone Girl and enjoyed that book very much. I decided to give this book a shot when people compared it to Gone Girl. Ugh. This is probably one of the few times I really wished I listened to the negative reviews. This book is nothing like Gone Girl (except for maybe the ""twist"" ending...which was still pretty obvious). I felt it was poorly written and dumb. I regret spending $2 on this. I regret my wasting time reading this.
What an over hyped book this is!!  I'm sorry but Hawkins is simply not a good enough writer to carry off three Distinctly different first person interwoven narratives. Not even close! All three women sound alike, and that's not just because they are all eminently unlikable.  It's because Hawkins isn't adept enough. Maybe she will be one day. But then again, this is hardly literary and she's probably laughing all the way to the bank!!
I craved a quick read for a leisurely afternoon; this book was certainly that.The one star is for the narrative, and that's being generous.The Girl on the Train is unique in that it is the very first time I've found each key character  dark, deplorable and thoroughly unlikeable.The plot is as thin as barley water and the ""mystery"" ended for me shortly after meeting Megan.I'd like my afternoon back.
So this book is continuously compared to Gone Girl. Is it because much of the idea was copied with the missing woman and psycho characters all with deep problems, none of them likeable, none provoking any sympathy from me even at the end. This book wasted my time and took longer to read than usual because I just didn't care what happened to these people. If the book had not been chosen by my book group, I would not have finished.
While I admittedly have a low bar on much crime/suspense fiction, this may be the most overhyped fiction of my recent experience. There was not an interesting character among the self pitying, self destructive cast of this book who, when faced with a set of choices, always made the wrong one. I was often tempted to toss this book aside mid-stream but did not, somehow hoping there was something I was missing. Alas, there was not.
To disjointed seems to hop from one to the other with no reason
This is the worst book I have ever read.  While the premise is good, the build up lasts for 95% of the book so you wandering around with the most pathetic main character imaginable.  I truly do not understand the hype behind this book.  I didn't make it very far reading the book before I gave up.  I then forced myself to listen to the book on tape while driving to work.  It would have been much better to be half as many pages.
The story is totally overblown. Not one character is remotely likeable. The writer does draw you in at the beginning but by the last third of the book it becomes impossible to suspend one's disbelief. How did this book get on the NYT best seller list? Probably because of book clubs. That is the only reason I read the book. What a waste of precious time. I will make similar comments when the book club meets in August.
This book is so over rated. I am sorry I took the time to read it. Wonder who got paid a bundle to give it good reviews.I was so disappointed.It is boring,,drags on and one will almost guess the end. It is like you are reading over and over someones day dreams, ugh!!!! I kept waiting for it to get better and it never did. This is on m y list of one of the worst written and suspenseful books written.
THE GIRL ON THE TRAIN IS WILDLY OVER-HYPED...  It is so boring, confusing, like listening to three psycho women jabber...  What is with all these exaggerated positive reviews?  I think a lot of critics love a book about screwed-up, alcoholic, boring women wading through some existential nightmare...  I'm forcing myself to read on through this piece of garbage...  The writer should stick to journalism...
Are you kidding -a best seller?  I made three mistakes on the book; I did not read the Amazon reviews, I bought the book and I read it! I regret losing the money, but really POed I spent the time reading, thinking it would get better - it didn't.  With exception of the police and the baby, the characters all should have been institutionalized.  Message to buyers - Read the reviews!Cop Shop
This book has been recommended to me from my kindle and is on reader's lists and NY best sweller.  However, I found the characters annoying and the exciting part of the book was the last few pages!  I love to read and like to be entertained by the story.  This was not the case.  The characters were far from flawed, they were a mess!  Wouldn't recommend this book if you like an interesting story.
Hated it. I couldn't read more than a few chapters. Boring
This is one of the most boring, unbelievable books I have ever wasted money on.  Forced myself to keep reading about 1/3 through the book and then completely deleted it from my Kindle.  Characters totally unbelievable, story plot (if there is a plot) utterly useless, seldom do I read a book that I can't find some good in - this is the exception.  A total and absolute waste of money and time.
This book has a simple plot with with boilerplate writing about colorless, vapid characters; there is nothing clever or unique about any aspect of it.  I got bored and skeptical early on but continued to read it since five people I know loved it.  As for myself, I do not know how a book so dull and unimaginative could possibly be considererd a ""thriller"" and end up a best seller.
I did not like the book (diary) at all.  Finished it to see if it got better as it went along.  For the life of me I couldn't figure out how it stayed on the Miami Herald Best Seller list as #1 for soooo many weeks.  Too many personalities and it was hard to figure out if they were actually separate characters or one person with multiple personalities.  Not a good selection for me.
Didn't care much for the book.  Struggled to finish it.
Don't know how I managed to finish this book, but I felt as though I'd been released from prison when I finally was able to put it down forever. Tedious, humorless, the characters are pretty much interchangeable - they all sound alike. The book has been called fast-paced, but in comparison to what? The OED? Kept waiting to be surprised, never was (unless I count being surprised that I was NOT surprised.)
The ""Girl"" on the Train is so annoying and pathetic that it was hard for me to slog through this book.  The book was recommended by a relative.  I bought it on the Kindle edition.  I don't appreciate stories where the characters are all dysfunctional. The ""Girl"" has no redeeming qualities.I couldn't recommend wasting your money on this one.
I did not find this book all that interesting or exciting - despite all the hype! I could not relate to any of the characters. They are all rather pathetic and sad.- especially the main character who abuses alcohol and can't get over her ex husband. Come on! Time to move on! I think I have had enough of the psychological thriller type after 'Gone ""Girl"".
Easily one of the most overrated books, I've ever read.Grew so tired of the alternating plot / offset timelines for the characters.Very little character development, and when you take away the ""trickery"" of the format...story, is really very weak.I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone, there are so many other better books out there...
This book is a huge disappointment. I have no idea ow it got rave reviews in print. Written in a stream of consciousness style Rachel the main character""  the girl"" is a self pitying whiner who continues to drink and ruminate on her fantasies. Other characters are similar : shallow. Supposedly a surprise ending redeems all I don't think so.he girl
Very disappointed. This book does not live up to its hype and I am sorry I wasted my money.  Confusing...I felt like I needed to take notes or have Cliff Notes to keep up. Not for pleasure reading at all.  My first by this author and I understand this is a new genre for her, hopefully she goes back to something better. Perhaps listening to it would be better.
Terrible story, terrible characters, and just plain awful. I didn't care about anyone and didn't care what happened. I don't know how this book got on any best seller's list. I kept hoping it would get better. Ugh. I just can't recommend this book to anyone and I'm not sure I want to give it away because I don't want anyone to know I read it. Save your money.
I definitely was duped here. When the title is something as creative as ""The Girl on the Train"" its really my fault for thinking that it would be interesting in any way. It starts off very slowly and you keep thinking that it will pick up at some point, but it takes so long that when it actually does get going you are well past the point of caring.
The biggest mystery of this story is how in the world it even made the best seller's list, let alone has risen to #1. I rarely drop a book after reading it partially, but this is an exception. I managed 30% and gave up. The alcoholic fears and ramblings of the two women in the story are of no interest to me. Sorry, but no redeeming features are found here.
I found this completely unsuspenseful and boring. I love a good thriller but this is not it. Nothing *happens* almost the entirety of the book, and when the ""reveal"" comes, there is nothing that leads up to it. Very poor character and story development. I still can't believe that this was the biggest book of the summer. Not what I expected at all.
What happened to an intriguing plot? Why was this book published? The characters were relatively flat and mostly unlikable. I feel like I just wasted several hours of my life reading this book. The writing wasn't terrible but it wasn't great, either. I got no satisfaction out of this story. Nothing like Gone Girl in terms of a (somewhat) satisfying story.
What a miserable waste of time and money! There is virtually no story line--just the rambling, disconnected thoughts of some miserable soul. I quit reading a quarter of the way through--utterly boring. (And as an English major, I will read most anything, including the back of cereal boxes, most of which are more entertaining than The Girl on the Train.
What a stupid book.  Doesn't even deserve one star.
I was looking forward to reading this book because of all the great reviews but what a waste of time. The time jumps/different character chapters are annoying. I never really cared about any of the characters. I figured out who did it early on. The ""train"" doesn't really have anything to with the story either. Trite and typical.
I was so disappointed.  I thought this was a wretched book.  It is slow, repetitious, uninteresting - the characters aren't likeable - it drags on andon until finally things begin to happen and we get to an ending - yes, there is a bit of a twist, but by then you really don't care - you just want itto be over.  Depressing!
I failed entirely to find redeeming features in this charmless, tedious portrait of a neighborhood seemingly populated entirely by needy pathetic women plus one psychopath. Seriously? The story telling device of multiple character viewpoints fails early on, leaving you with not much thereafter. Mediocre would be a compliment here.
slow, boring, don't understand the good reviews.
Repetitive & predictable , life's too short !!
Looks like I'm against the tide here. I found it utterly boring.  I got tired of the main character's repeated reports of her drinking and its effects, and her whining about her life.  Skipped several paragraphs.  I love mysteries, but this was annoying to read.  Yes I turned the pages quickly, but just to skip them.
Disappointing after all the raves on this one.  Writing style of jumping from one character to another over diff time spans was unpleasant and unnatural enough, then the sad accounting of the alcoholic heroine and reverie of misfit acquaintances was troubling, not informative,nor emotive, nor mysteriously appealing.
I love to read so I was curious to read this book because of the positive ratings and reviews. I even had a friend recommend this book. I found this book hard to get into although I read it to the end. The main character was annoying, the reading slow and confusing at times and just not a book I found interesting.
Our book clubs 'biggest surprise' was that this made the best sellers list at all.  The characters had no depth to them.  The story was a bit confusing and dull.  What a disappointment!  (We printed the publishers 'questions' for book club and wondered what book they read because it could not have been this one!)
Predictable and depressing. Not a great read.
The book was very tedious and mediocre.  I couldn't wait for it to end. I don't see how it was such a number one bestseller for such a long time. I am an avid reader and this book was not a better book for sure. That said a lot of people loved the book.My book club not particularly. Half loved it half didn't.
I can't understand why everyone is talking about this  book.  I was on hold 3 months at library to get it thu  Overdrive, I was so disappointed in it,  Wanted to quit reading many times, but thought there must be something that everyone talks about.It is probably one of the worst books I have aver read
I am an avid reader and was excited to purchase this book (after reading so many great reviews).  This book was boring and the storyline was just disappointing to me!  The alcoholic first wife, the new wife, the neighbor wife..too many wives!  Would not recommend this to someone that likes fast paced books!
The book is poorly written.  It moves from one character speaking to another and all the characters spark in the same voice.  The last third of the book becomes more interesting, but I knew who the murderer was by about half way through.  I read it for my book club.  If you don,t have to read it, skip it.
This was the most pitiful thriller effort I have ever read. Waste of money. I have got this book as a gift. I got two copies in two different languages, and both versions were boring. I would not recommend this one to anyone. The characters are depressive, and the plot (if there is any) is predictable.
I was very disappointed. I read the reviews and thought from the ratings this was a safe bet. After completing the long and dreary story I felt the reviewers who believed this to be a great thriller really haven't read one. Sorry, but this story did nothing for me except wear me out. Very repetitive...
Nothing much to this book or the characters. Heavy drinking, lying, cheating, blackouts. That's about it. I guessed who the murderer was very early in the story. Who else would it be? The female characters are all pitiful victims. There are 2 abusive male characters. I'm glad this book is over. Yuck!
I don't understand why everyone is raving about this book. I thought I was starting to read some great fast paced book with a twist , but really it's a very slow read, mostly in the perspective of a sad lonely alcoholic. Nothing eventful happens until near the end, and even then it is disappointing.
Wow! Didn't read the reviews pretty purchase. The 4-5 star reviewers must have been reading another book with the same name.  The puzzles not worth the effort, or the nastiness. One of the negative reviews used the word ""tedious."" Definitely, for me. Can't believe I read the whole thing.
There was way too much going on in the book. The author's writing is poor, and the book has too much going on. You do not get to the main point of the book until the last chapter of the book. It is hard to catch onto, and it just drags out.I would not recommend this book to anyone.
Be smart and ask any of this novel's legions of faithful for a summary.  Drink some alcohol as you listen to wash out the disbelieving contempt you'll taste as the nattering doesn't, well, seem to go anywhere.  Bad book; stupid denouement, .  I advise Rebecca Scherm's Unbecoming.  That is all.
I did not like this book.  But because it was on the best sellers list I felt I had to finished reading the book hoping it got better.  I still wonder why it is still get great reviews.  I must be missing something.  I have to say everyone that I have talked to about the book did not like it.
Terrible. Predictable, who-cares whodunit.
Terrible book, not worth the time to read.
The book dragged. I wanted to stop reading it, but friend had read it and told me it would pick up and it had a good ending. It did pick up but not until like the last 4 chapters and i had already figure it out by then . I wouldn't read another book by this author or recommend it to anyone .
THE GIRL ON THE TRAIN.....A HUGE DISAPPOINTMENT FOR MEA huge disappointment. The whole book is A REALITY SHOW -- as simple as it can get. The protagonist lurches from one drunkenbout to the next and her endless musings about another bottle of wine wore me out.....could not finish it.
I didn't realize that there were 2 main characters until 20% done--I decided this was not a novel to read on the Kindle. There's no easy way to go back to check how the novel is set up, chapter heads, etc.  I found that going back and forth between 2 similar characters was confusing to me.
While it had a certain intrigue about it, it was not a very interesting story. I didn't feel that I was enriched in any way by reading it and I kept wondering why I was continuing to read it. I would not recommend it. It is what I consider an airport or beach book! Just passes the time.
Worst book ever! I am not even going to finish the book because it is so bad and I always finish every book I start. Really, do not know why there were good reviews on this book.  It is predictable, and not suspenseful in the least. It is not an intelligent, thoughtful book in any way.
Not what I expected.... drug on too much.
I truly do not understand the popularity of this novel. Average writing at best, unlikable/exasperating characters, preposterous plot...These elements can be successfully combined in the hands of a skilled writer--take Gillian Flynn for example. Paula Hawkins possesses no such talent.
This whole book and it's characters are a hot mess. I've read a few reviews that compared it to Gone Girl, the only aspect of similarities that I can find is in the way that they both mess with your mind. The major differences being that one was well developed and not a rambling mess.
Very disappointing read.  The four main characters seem to live in a vacumn with no clues for the reader about what motivates them.  Rachel, the main character is annoying and I could not muster up any empathy for her.  Flawed characters are often fascinating, but not in this story!
I read this book because my co-workers said it was a great read....Well it was not, at least not for me.  Hated this book, too depressing and mundane couldn't stand Rachel, too weak! Found synopsis online and glad I didn't waste my time finshing it.  Wish I could get my money back.
I finally plodded through this slow paced mess of a novel.  The characters were equally unlikeable and by the end of it, I was neither surprised or satisfied.  In listening to the audible version, I think I blacked out like Rachel, but my blackouts were from boredom, not alcohol.
Giving this book one star is generous. I have no idea what all the hype is around it. I hated the characters and only kept reading because there was such a hype around it. Really didn't enjoy it if this is # 1 I'm left with little faith in the rest of the list of best sellers.
I was so disappointed because the reviews were good. Have just come back from a Book Club meeting an everyone had the same opinion. It really made no sense. This is he first time in years I did not complete a book I had downloaded. Would give it no recommendation at all.
For a book to be on a best seller list for so many weeks,  I had hopes of more entertainment. Instead it was confusing, and dull to say nothing of boring. I predicted the killer from the get-go and was not disappointed. Not a great read at all. Try another 'train' book.
Personally not a favorite of mine.Moves slowly and poor writing style.The story is just seeks to be a cheap thrill. Lacks deeper meaning and character development.I mean really, I've read twilight and that was written 3x better than this. This was just plain awful.
Possibly the worst book ive attempted to read.  I tried to read this book and could not at all get into it.  Boring, redundant, hard to follow.  Returned after a few chapters. It was very hard to keep up with the characters and what the characters were talking about.
This book is readable but the story line seems like a pitiful attempt at Gone Girl set  in the UK. The author tries desperately to pull things together at the end to make you believe she was setting up for this ridiculous ending all along. Just an awful book, really.
Waste of time. Did not finish the book
I thought this book was dark, depressing and ended poorly.  I also do not think think the author described the characters at all.  I had a hard time connecting to the characters and getting a visual image to go with their story.  I wasted a few hours of my life....
Everyone told me to stick with it, so I did.  But there aren't any characters with any redeeming qualities.  The men are all horrible people and the women are all dysfunctional or dead.  Not my idea of a good time, personally, but everyone else seems to love it!
I wasted my time reading this book, even though it was a quick read.Perfect example of falling into the hype of ""critical acclaim"".  'Had' to read it ... But was very disappointed.I learned nothing and reading it made me very sad.
I didn't expect this book to be so dysfunctional after reading the book jacket & customer reviews. I found it difficult to stay with it & actually stopped reading it for a while.  Every character had some new form of dysfunction which became very old very soon.
Not my kind of read.  To slowWWW!  Did not like the back and forward. Hard to keep straight.  The ending was not even GREAT.  Don't know how it was on the best list for that long.  That is what sold me.  Would not do that again.  But that is me.  You may enjoy.
Very boring start, depressing dialog, it almost seemed like we were repeating the same situation on every page. A glimpse of a possibly interesting character that fizzled out. It must have been me because it's been on the NY Times bestseller list for months. I
I did not get past 50 pages when I realized this was not my type of book!!!  In fact, it was the worst book beginning I had ever experienced!!  I asked myself how this came to be on top book ratings??!  Betty Di Mare  I really did not want to put one star.....
Still can not get through this book!  It has been 6 weeks!  I cringe when I read it...so disjointed and disappointing... NOT interesting and just the story of another alcoholic battling. demons.... VERY BORING!  Wish I'd bought it on Amazon..I would return it!
This is a story of two neurotic  women, back and forth. The story could been told in about 25 pages instead of repeating and repeating.I finished it  because I paid 6.99 for it and did not want to feel I wasted that much money.  But I felt that way anyway,
I only finished this book because it was the first book of a newly formed book club. I must admit that most of the club liked it, but not I. I didn't like a single character. I didn't care what happened to any of them. I was not intrigued or entertained.
I so wish I could get my money back. I wasted dollars and time on this silly, poorly written endeavor.  So irritated that I got suckered by marketing and positive reviews by people who obviously can't distinguish good stories from cheap trash. Just ugh.
Trying to get through this book was like waiting for paint to dry.  I share the opinion of many readers depicting the shallowness of the characters.  At times I wanted to reach through the pages and strangle Rachel.  What a bunch of narcissistic twits.
I tried three different times to get into this book and I found it tedious with a boring plot.  In addition, it takes place in England and I really steer clear of book happening in some place besides the United States.  I would not recommend this book.
I listen to audible on drives and almost stopped and returned this book in the middle - but I was driving. The narration was long, drawn out, and tedious at best. Unless you like really slow, uneventful books spend your time (and your money) elsewhere.
I keep reading that we MUST read this book and it's on the best seller lists.  I just didn't get that.  I thought the characters were stupid,shallow and not to be believed.  It just was something that disappointed me from the get-go.  A waste of money.
If I'd have watched it as a movie I wouldn't feel so bad about wasting my time reading it and it would have been the same.  The characters did not have much depth to them.  No surprises in this book one knew who the killer was from the beginning.
Most of this book is slow moving and boring . The last fifty pages try to make up for a wasted experience.The fact that it on the nytimes best seller list is disappointing. A much better read that I enjoyed was "" The Perk""By Jiminez.
Marketed as being like Gone Girl, which is a tough act to follow for any author, but this is not even in the same league. It is a story as tawdry as any tabloid grief porn and the characters are unsympathetic. I feel sullied for having read it.
Let me first start by saying that I did not finish this book. I tried. I got to 30% of the Kindle version, and even though at that point the “action” had started, I just could not bear to continue.Many of the people in my Goodreads “Good Thriller” group had read or planned to read this book, and most had given it high praise. Some reviewers compared it to Gone Girl. That should have been my first clue; I somehow managed to finish that one and immediately wished I hadn’t.I was confused by the characters. I honestly could discern very little, if any, difference between the voices of Rachel and Megan (who, early on, is imagined to be “Jess” by Rachel, who sees her from the train and makes up a story about her life). I did not like these people. Rachel was an alcoholic divorcee, and I could not garner any sympathy for her. Megan was a stay-at-home wife with little to do but go to therapy and sleep around. Then there was Anna, the new wife and mother of Rachel’s ex-husband, Tom. I didn’t really have any feelings about her at all.Then Megan disappeared, and the police showed up to question Rachel, who could not remember a single thing about that night because she had been very, very drunk. I did not like Megan or Rachel, and the drama in their lives just seemed to go on and on. I was mildly curious about what happened, but I didn’t enjoy the writing enough to want to continue reading. Normally, I would have struggled through it, at least to perhaps the halfway point, but there are so many other novels I have yet to read, so I am giving this one a rest. My apologies to those who really enjoyed this, but it simply was not a pleasant experience for me.One star
I have a caveat when picking novels - when it says psychological thriller, I usually put the book back on the shelf. Because I got this book on audio cassette, I disregarded my usual caveat. Frankly, if I had not been listening to this book on tape I would have quite after a few pages.  The characters are all totally screwed up and dysfunctional.  Rachel drinks to the point where I felt like I had a hangover when listening.  She goes out of her way to screw up her own life. There was not one character that I could identify with.  They are all paranoid and are constantly suspicious of one another. And I guess they well should be because they all have multiple sex partners. The couples constantly checking their partners emails and cell phones, they all have lives from the past.  There is the expression about people with ""baggage.""  Well, these characters have trunks!I will give the author credit for weaving a complicated story that intertwined characters all of which are screwed up.  And the format of having the three different women narrate various chapters is effective. But it was just not my kind of book.Lots of people compare it to Gone Girl, which I found OK - a nice diversion - but not great.One of the other reviewers said that there will be a movie out of this book. They will really have to cut some of the characters.  The story is far to complicated as written to be on the screen.There are reviewers who loved this book. All I can say is ""to each his own.""  My recommendation would be to get the book from the ""free bookstore"" the library. That way, if you don't like it you won't be out any money.
I can't believe I read the whole book. It was so confusing I never knew what was going on.  If it becomes a movie maybe I will be able to understand it.  I am going to stick with my regular authors James Patterson, Lee Child, and Steven King.
I tried, but could not get interested in this woman....I felt like i had to keep notes to keep track ...so I got about 1/3 through it and said this isn't fun and put it down...Upsetting to think I spent my kindle money on a very boring book.
Book was not what I had expected the story line and base story had the makings  of a great exciting adventure book,but how ever it did not deliver on any of those fronts. I read this book along with my best friend we both were disappointed
Way over rated based on the reveiw
I kept reading this expecting it to get better but it didn't.  The comparison to Gone Girl and Hitchcock were deceiving.  The concept is good and would probably make a good movie, but the book and writing didn't live up to its potential.
I couldn't believe how bad this book was after hearing and reading how good it was. I got about halfway through and got fed up with the whiny, wimpy, spineless women characters, not to mention waiting for something interesting to happen.
Don't waste your time.  Hard to follow because the characters and the time period switches back and forth. The Man character is a drunk and is not stable.  It is hard to follow.  I do not understand why so many people love this book.
Read this because it was on the best seller list. I finished it but it was a struggle. Other friends told me they gave up on the book and never finished it. How on earth did it get on the best seller list yet alone number one??????
Can't believe this book received so much positive press!  It was boring, repetitive, unsympathetic characters!  Last half of the book I just skimmed just to finish it.  So sorry I bothered!  If I could give it zero stars I would!!
A story about three desperate, weak female characters only obsessed with getting the attention of men. I wish Hawkins would have added at least one strong female character. I found myself rolling my eyes at Rachel, Megan and Anna. Also the story was so predictable. I figured out who the killer was half way through the book.
I cannot understand why this book is on the USA Today best seller list.  It is dull and redundant.  The story can be told in 100 pages or less.  Reading it was a trudge thru dull factors.  I am sorry I wasted my time and money.
Too many editors spoil the book.
Unsympathetic main character. Awful attempt at a twist without any clever or interesting misleads. Do not believe any review that compares this to Gone Girl. Although I was desperate for the main girl in the book to be gone.
I did not know that this was a Thriller,when I bought mit.I disliked it entirely ,but have to admit that I could not stop reading about those horrible Characters.each one as flawed,as can be. No,that is not what I read for.
I did not enjoy this book as much as I thought I would.  I didn't like the characters & frankly, was bored with the main character before I finished the book.  The ending was predictable.  Don't waste your time on this one.
If you like Gone Girl,you will probably like this.As I did not like Gone Girl at all,there you are.Idiotic,repugnant characters.I was warned by the previews,my fault for reading.At least it was free with Kindle unlimited.
Depressing, bizarre storyline...no redeeming, realistic qualities to any of the characters.  I kept reading thinking there was going to be some big aha redemptive moment.  NOT...I would not recommend this book to anyone!
I didn't, couldn't, finish reading this book.  I was so bored by the whining, crying, self-caused anguish...are people out there like that?Thanks, Amazon, for refunding my money.  I'll spend it on a book I enjoy.
The story runs all over the page. Constantly requires jumping back a chapter to figure out who is doing the story telling . Thought it would be better given its meteoric rise on best seller list. What a disappointment.
I did not care for the book or the writing style. Sometimes slow and confusing but finally does draw to a conclusion. The main character ( who tells most of the story ) is a frustratingly weak and annoying victim.
I honestly can't believe it's on the Best Seller list.  It is dark, brooding story of a very, very psychotic, alcoholic woman.  Didn't like it at all and would recommend you save your money and not download it!
Did not enjoy the book at all, not much of a plot. It never seemedto go any where.I would like to have my account credited theamount of the book and have it removed from my library.Thank you.
There is no comparison to Gone Girl except that it takes forever for the book to get started. These characters are all ridiculously sad and shallow. It was also very predictable. There was no suspense at all.
This book was poorly written, everyone is always drinking, and the female characters have no self esteem. I found it boring and I liken it to a TV soap opera! The worst book I have read in the past few years.
Overrated, hype not supported
No theme or suspense. Boring.
Would not recommend this book
None of the characters were likeable.  I had to push my way through it for our book club, and I knew who the killer was long before the ending.  There are so many good books out there - why waste the time.
I don't like it at all...going back and forth with chapters no fun...will see what book club group says...read first third and then the last pages...skipped the middle but got the gist of the story.
Hated it. Could not figure out why it was on the best seller list. It was crap and tired of her being an alcoholic all of the time. Had I not paid money for the book, I would not have finished reading it.
I simply found it uninteresting although the idea of having the story revolve around a girl's observations over time as she views things out her train window was innovative. The book was just not for me.
This book has no soul or mystery. Horrible characters and bad storytelling. I would not recommend to anyone above the age of 14, but as the subject matter is for adults, I wouldn't recommend to anyone.
Characters were not likable.
Hated this book.  The only people I liked in it were the killers or the suspected killers.  The female characters were the type of people you make a life mission of avoiding, so why read about them?
.It is not my kind of book.  With Kindle you could read something about the book  before you  ordered  the book.  That is not always the case now.  Where aare the free books that kindle  had?
This book is being compared to ""Gone Girl"" but is not even close.  While the plot had several twists and turns, It was illogical and far fetched.  I could find no empathy for any of the characters.
It is hard to care about such unattractive people. The writing style is mediocre at best. I only finished skimming it because my book group will discuss this. I honestly don't understand the fuss.
I thought the novel was very overrated. Too cumbersome and redundant. Certainly not in the same class as PD James, Ruth Rendell, Ngaio Marsh, and Dame Christie. Became a real burden to finish. GH
Not one of the characters made you want to like them.  They are all cold, broken, uncaring people.I kept thinking things would unfold to where I'd at least pity any of them; but not to be.
The Girl on the Train is one of the worst books I have ever read.  None of the characters have any redeeming qualities so the reader has no empathy for any of them.  It is also poorly written.
The main character is an alcoholic with no redeeming qualities.  There is no reason to follow the life of a alcoholic busybody, in spite of the fact she may have seen a crime being committed.
Oh Rachel, Megan, Tom & Scott. The author succeeds in creating a set of characters you completely loose all interest in by the middle of the book. I don't really care who killed Megan or why.
I read at least 3 books a month and this has got to be one of the worst. It is a sheer waste of time. Jumps all over the place and I ended up not caring who did it. Boring, boring, boring.
I feel absolutely duped by the synopsis on the book and the praise that accompanied it. A dull, slow, unrewarding read. It fails as both a mystery and as character exploration. I hated it.
This books was a boring read featuring women with poor morals and judgement and just plain dumb violent men.  Are there really such people in the world if so who wants to read about them?
I did not like the drinking and drugs!  It was very slow-going as far as reading.  We need upbeat books.  This one was a downer!I do not like to criticize, but it was a waste of my time!
This best-selling garbage is a copy of another best-selling piece of junk, Gone Girl. Both are amateur efforts that neither realistic or believable. Both are 100% boring and ludicrous.
Not good.  For a book rated as top 10 this stunk. Sor4ry I wasted the money for it and the time to read it. I did finish but only because I keep hoping it would get better,, It Didn,t.
This was a real mistake to spend money on. Awful story about alcoholism, a disturbed mind and raving jealousy.  And it just goes on and on with no let up  in the misery and depression.
This book is slower the a snail it one revamp after another going nowhere. If you read the first chapter and the last you are done. Save your money and your time this is hyped rubbish.
It has been very hard to keep reading it.  I like mysteries but this one is certainly not holding my interest at all and probably would not buy any other books written by this author.
Not a single interesting development in the story. The forward motion of the plot is completely contingent on various, multiple coincidences lining up perfectly; very disappointing.
When I first started the book, I thought I was going to like it. But it quickly degenerated into a ""Gone Girl"" wannabe plot similarity without one single likeable character.
I did not like this book.  The three female characters from whose perspective the book is written from are such losers that I could not relate or empathize even slightly with them.
The writing was too choppy...constantly changing from one character to another was extremely irritating.  The best part was the last page because that meant I was finally finished!
I was so looking forward to reading this book, but I was so disappointed.  I couldn't even get through a quarter of the book.What I did read was terrible.  Waste of money.
Very poorly written, it took awhile to catch on to the characters and be able to follow them through the story. Portrayed the lead character as a bad drunk. Not enjoyable to me.
I really did not like it at all.  It had no excitement, no twists, a just no interest novel.  I heard so much about it but was extremely disappointed and did not even finish it.
This book is good up until the last chapter. Horrible ending, predictable, and frankly stupid. I was hoping for so much  more from the way the author developed the characters.
I don't know what everyone is raving about. I tried to get interested in this book , but found it confusing and uninteresting.  I am happy for those who enjoyed it wish I had.
Can't understand how it ever made #1, much less staying there for so long. Didn't like it at all. Finished it just to see if the last chapter would be a home run - it wasn't.
It was so boring with ""morning"", & ""evening"" descriptions on the train. Only finished it on the recommendation of a friend, otherwise I would have tossed it!
Just not my kind of book
A hard unappealing read.
Entirely too repetitive!
I  did not care for this book.  The people were too confusing to get straight. The story too depressing.  Only stayed with it to see the ending.  I would not recommend it.
I wasn't expecting another batch of dysfunctional creatures so similar to Gone GIrl.  But I'm one of those readers who commits to finishing a book once started.  Oh well.
I did not like this book at all! There were no redeeming qualities to any of the self centered, neurotic characters.  It is a sad tale that should never have been told.
Not one character in this book has a redeeming quality - wanted them all to just go away. Can't believe the rave reviews and it's place on the best sellers list AT ALL.
I hated the characters from page one. Could not stand them. I was unable to read past chapter 4. If I want to read about selfish, crazy people, I'll read the newspaper.
Bluntly put, this book has very little substance with it's predictable  storyline and flat characters.  It starts out promising but quickly turns into a....train wreck.
I was excited to read this book asit promised a Hitchcockian experience. I was disappointed. I didn't connect with the characters and the dated chapters were annoying.
I hated this book.  I felt no sympathy for this group of losers.  Talk about self absorbed.  They all needed to get a life and do some good for the rest of the world.
HARD TO READ..COULD NOT KEEP CHARACTERS STRAIGHT AND COULD NOT GET A STORY LINE.  HAVE NOT FINISHED IT BUT SO FAR I DO NOT KNOW WHAT KEEPS IT ON THE BEST SELLERSMLIST
Horrid book!  I tried and tried and tried to read it all, but hated the characters and the narrative.  How anyone could say that this was an great book is beyond me!
Save your money... very confusing and disappointing. Characters were not believable and ending left me dissatisfied. Best part was when it was finally over. Trash!!!
I didn't like all the whining.  Many people have problems in their lives and do not act like the characters in this book.  I would not recommend this book to anyone.
The pace of the story is too slow. Most of the things go on inside the heads of the two boring characters. I had to force myself to read it till half. Now I give up.
I couldn't see why I wasted my time reading and finished this book. Such a terrible mess, with all disillusioned characters. Don't waste your time reading this one.
When I arrived at the last page I had to ask myself where the rest of book was.  Did someone tear out the last half?  Not worth spending time reading in my opinion.
Dull and boring.  Tried several times to ""get into the plot and characters"".  I  think it is over hyped and the abundance of good reviews may be fabricated.
There was nothing compelling about the 'story line'  or the characters that appealed to me.  It was just like being on a train....'click-clack, click-clack' boring.
tHe story was unbelievable and not really well told. i would not recommend it.  i wonder what the author was trying to tell the reader with this story if anything.
First and foremost, the writing in this book is bad. By the end of the first page, I knew it wouldn't even come close to living up to the hype and Gone Girl comparisons. The writing does not grab you or keep your attention, so finishing the book felt more like a chose than something I was interested in doing.The characters and the plot are poorly developed. I kept waiting for it to get better, but it never did. Several of the plotlines end up being completely pointless (ie they had nothing to do with the final ""twist"" or the fate of the main character).. I guess they are supposed to increase suspense but in my opinion reading the book was similar to the experience of watching someone bake a delicious cake and then throwing it away. I kept reading even though I was bored because I anticipated a shocking twist and interesting resolution (probably in large part because of all the Gone Girl comparisons), but the story never picks up steam or becomes interesting.Ultimately, I would advise against reading this.. if you're like me, you'll probably read it anyway because of all the hype, but it's really not worth your time.
I read about 100 pages and was completely turned off.  Thought the plot was improbable and the characters unlikable.  Very disappointed, given the hype.  Skip it!
Very predictable and a little boring but if you've got 4hrs to spare on a plane ride it's OK.  This is a book where we need to hope the movie is much much better
Had to fight my way the first half of the book. Unique writing style but most characters were kind of depressing. Second half was better but far from a thriller.
Very slow and somewhat  confusing read. I did not like this book at all. In fact I quit reading it about halfway through. Much better books out there to read!!!
Not sure what the hype was on this book.  Was confusing at time, I put it down for several weeks and picked it up because thought I might be missing something.
I bought this book after hearing positive reviews, but for me it did not live up to the hype. The mystery took too long to establish and the end seemed rushed.
I don't get the love for this book. Predictable. Boring, average quality writing like that wretched Gone Girl. No thanks, glad I read it free from the library.
Had high hopes for this book because it got good reviews but was disappointed. It was a very depressing theme and the characters were insipid. It was a downer.
I finished this book waiting for it to finally be worth the read.  It never happened!! They are filming this movie at my job. I hope its better than the book!
Impossible to read !!!
This book is overhyped, predictable and just plain disappointing. Amazed that it has gotten so much buzz and suckered so many readers into buying this tripe.
Not at all clear how this was a NY Times best seller. The plot is simplistic, the psychological profiles meaningless and the whole thing is just uninspiring.
I thought it was terrible. Who wants to read about a psychotic girl full of drama? I quit after reading 10% of the book and that is not something I often do.
I know this book has been on the best seller list for some time. I found in boring, too descriptive of things that didn't matter and overall a waste of time.
I have no idea why this novel is rated as high as it is. The narrative is sloppy and at times completely disconnected from the story line. I wasted my money.
Plowed through it just so I could say I finished it.  Cannot believe it has been on the best seller list for so long.  Found it very slow moving and boring.
Being a NYT best sellar I expected more from this book.  It is depressing, did not leave me any good teaching nor a good feeling.  It was a waste of my time
This was a dark sad book. It wasn't even interesting in it's darkness. I found myself thinking, who cares? I returned the book, I didn't care to finish it.
Not a fan of this book at all. The main character was depressing and quite whiny. My wife felt the same way after reading it. Definitely pass on this book.
I did not like it.  I thought it was confusing and boring.  It did have some twists but I did not like the characters and could not get involved with them.
The first person POV was well done.  The present day time was easy to read.  The multiple narrators were also well done.  Unfortunately, the actions of the narrators and the tedious whining self-pity by the main character, Rachel, was grating at best and ultimately down right intolerable.  I tried to like this book.  But it just was not to be.  I will say that it is definitely better than Gone Girl.  That one I couldn't even finish.  But Ms. Hawkins tried to accomplish too much without succeeding.  This story could have possibly been a good novella.  But too many pages were filled with tripe and really made no sense.  Somebody should have taken a red pencil to it.  I can read a book, and enjoy it, even if I don't like any of the characters.  But when I am disgusted by the characters and their actions, that earns it a single star.  In the author's defense, I have just finished some excellent fiction by Stuart Neville, Gerard Brennan, Timothy Hallinan and Jan Burke.  That might have caused her to lose out by comparison.  This book is definitely not for the well-read mystery/thriller reader.
What a disappointment. I was psyched to read this book. Was not a page turner for me. Characters were unlikeable like in Gone Girl, but not as good as GG.
Not a big fan. This book was recommended to me by several friend but I did not like it. Figured it out really early and everyone in the book is depressed.
This book was very slow all the way until about three quarters of the way through . Or maybe it just wasn't my type of book. I really didn't care for it.
I read 1 to 2 books per week, this was not for me.  Very depressing and no likeable characters.  I am amazed it has been on best seller list for so long.
Very rarely can I not complete a book.  I tried very hard to wait for it to get better.  I gave up about half way through.  Worst half book I ever read!
Didn't like this book. Very dark and no likable characters. Went on and on often about nothing.  I read to the end but was not having an enjoyable read.
It was so depressing I couldn't get through it,maybe I will try it again but honestly there are so many other great books out there,why waste the time?
Disliked intensely. There were no characters I could relate to or empathize with. The plot was unnecessarily manipulative. Save yourselves the trouble.
The ending is completely unbelievable. Rachel is unlikeable and completely frustrating. Comparisons to Gone Girl are wayyyyy off. Don't bother. Really.
I do not understand how this book has continued to be on best seller lists, it was mind numbingly boring. I could not fight my way through half of it.
Was disappointed.  After reading all the reviews, I found it confusing to follow each character's part with each chapter focusing on a different one.
Weak characters with no real substance. Repetitive story line. Would not recommend  this book to anyone and am ashamed of myself for wasting my time.
a HORRIBLE book the profanity is ongoing/nonstop very unpleasant reading. Sexual content is just filth nothing left for the imagination just ronchy
Highly recommended, but one of the worst books I have ever read.  I hated the whiny main character and it wasn't ever suspenseful.  No thrill here.
This was an inferior attempt at copying an average book - Gone Girl. It was Ground Hog Day for drinking and being hung over- chapter after chapter.
One of the worst books I have ever read. No redeeming features. Confused story of alcoholism, violence, psychopathy. Boring and painful to read.
This book was nothing more than what can be found on daytime television. I can't believe it's a New York Times bestseller don't waste your time.
Finally gave it up, couldn't even finish it.  It seemed weird and disfunctional. She was definitely mentally challenged.  Not pleasant reading.
I really expected more from this book as it had been highly rated by Amazon and other reviewers. So disappointing and lacking in so many ways.,
Terrible, had to put it down because it was so slow-moving and predictable. Disappointed that this is what people want to read these days. Ugh!
Slow paced, boring. I guess if one lived in England it would be okay, but it certainly does not rate listing on the NY Times best seller list.
It was so boring and could not keep my interest.  I read all of it waiting for something to happen.  I don't understand how it became popular.
This was rather depressing.  I can not believe it.is on the best seller list. Every Character was so troubled.it was not a pleasure to finish.
I reluctantly give this book 1 star. Maybe 1.5 stars.  I suppose the author did a good job of developing the characters since I know them well enough to deduce that I hate every last person in this book.  I hate Rachel, I hate Megan, I hate Anna, I hate Tom, I hate the therapist, I hate the roomate and I hate Scott just a bit less than the others. I struggled to finish this book.  Rachel is the ex-wife of Scott. Scott cheated on her with Anna who is now his wife.  They have a child which Rachel was never able to produce.  Scott and Anna are neighbors with Tom and Megan.  Rachel is a sad sack of an alchoholic who sees Scott and Anna each day on their back deck from her seat on the train.  Rachel also routinely intrudes on the life of her ex Tom and his new wife Anna.  She covets the lives of both couples.  The story is narrated from the viewpoint of each of the women, except you can't believe anything they say because is skewed to their own selfish viewpoint. I will stop here and not provide any spoilers.
Had to finish this because our Book Club was reading it.  I found it tedious, drawn out, boring.  The self-centered characters were annoying.
Reading this book proved one thing to me: I am a lemming. I followed the herd over the bestseller cliff and read this drivel. It is horrible.
It is difficult for me to understand the positive reviews this book received.  It was disappointing and the plot and characters were shallow.
Lot's of hype and recommendations for this book.  Got it.  Didn't really like.  Painfully slow.  Not gonna buy another one of these.  Boring.
I didn't like it. I'm not sure why I plodded through to the end because I certainly didn't care for the characters. Save your time and money.
Unbelievably boring. The majority of this book is a waste. I'm not sure how this was even published. This book needs some serious revisions.
The beginning was boring,the middle was boring,and the end was …… you get the idea.Wish I'd never invested my time and 2 bucks on this book.
All the people in this story are idiots, but particularly Rachel. Wouldn't recommend this book to anyone.  Sorry I wasted my money and time.
I had to force myself through this book - the writing is simplistic and downright terrible.  I really don't get why people like it so much.
Don't know how this book was on best seller list. Like reading a personal journal. Not a suspense  would not recommend. Too many good books
How dare you rate this as among ""best books of 2015""?  Weak story, weak characters. You need to take more responsibility as Amazon.
A very boring book.  It got rather tedious reading the ""diary-like"" writing.Not impressed.  Stopped reading half way through.
very strange......ugly life for too many people. Crude language not necessary. This book gets deleted from my kindle. Enough said.
I tried so hard to like this story and stick it out, because I hate to give up on a book. Rachel, Anna, Jess/ Megan, Scott and whoever else ( ex hubby) were just so unlikeable. I couldn't identify with any of them because the protagonist was....well a train wreck from the beginning to end, and as far as I was concerned never got back on track. I understand being in love and having ones heart broken and everything else she was going through was awful, but it was really hard to identify with her on any level, because I didn't like her, and I tried. I didn't like her roommate either, who pops up a lot in the story. Towards the end when the truth came out it could've been exhilarating because I wasn't really expecting that, but personally I was just glad this train had pulled into the station and I could step off! Felt like all these characters should of been tied to the railway tracks,  Not much to say, it was a page turner, but only because I wanted to get to the end as fast as I could !
I thought this was one of the worst books I have ever read and frankly didn't finish it. Not finishing a book is very very unusual for me.
Really disappointing read. Language level no higher than elementary school level. I didn't care for the characters, all who behaved badly.
I had a tough time with this book. put it down not interesting enough.. I did finish it  and wish I had done something else with my time.
One of the most boring books I have ever tried to read. I tried to plow through it since I spent money on it, but I finally just gave up.
Couldn't get through it. Had to quit around p 80. And I almost never quit. Can't think of another 25 words to meet your minimum.
Wow, this is a terrible book... It reads like someone deliberately set out to try and do a Rear Window/Gone Girl mashup with an overlay of convenient amnesia. In a nutshell, the story is about an alcoholic who commutes into London every day and imagines the lives of a couple she sees from the window of the train -- who also happens to live on the street the alcoholic woman lived on with her ex-husband. When the woman disappears, the alcoholic thinks she might have remembered seeing something. From that point on, it's one of those stories that is built around an unreliable narrator who might or might not have the key to the mystery thanks to her blackouts. Which might barely be forgivable if any of the characters were actually interesting or had depth -- but they don't. To be sure, there are plenty of books where key information is withheld from the reader in the interest of a gripping story, but this one is just clunky and bad.
There was not a single character I cared for. I did read it all in hopes of it getting better. It didn't happen.I found it boring.
Very confusing and hard to distinguish which characters are telling what story.  I didn't like it all.  Couldn't even finish reading it.
It is inevitable that Girl on the Train will be compared to Gone Girl; they came out at about the same time, they are both thrillers about a missing beautiful young wife, and they both feature profound dysfunctionality.  It's a silly comparison, because they are not in the same league.  Gone Girl is a masterpiece of clever prose, deep personalization, and wild twists in the plot.  Girl on the Train is pedantic forced prose, unlikeable and unbelievable characters, and little in the way of real twists.  I knew who did it halfway through the book!  Worst of all, the frequent violent spousal abuse gave me the creeps.  After about the third time an out-of-control husband beat his wife and she meekly accepted his apology and took him back, I got fed up.  I know that this happens in real life, but I don't enjoy reading about it when I'm supposed to be enjoying a novel.  The only positive emotion I got out of reading this book was enormous relief when it was finally over.
A wandering bunch of words with no contininuity. For all the hype this book has gotten it was the bigest disappointment of the year!!!!
This book was depressing , there were no likable characters , I was glad to get to the end , the plot was reasonable but not brilliant
Depressing and predictable, lacked detailed plot, I would not recommend unless you have a few hours to read something easy on a plane
I gave this one star instead of none because I did finish it to the last page. It was poorly written and definitely not spellbinding.
Read this book to about half way and then gave up. Just sorry that I didn't read the reviews before parting with my hard earned cash.
One star. Very repetitive . Female characters so much alike I often forgot who was talking.  I did finish but it was a waste of time.
I really did not like any of the characters.  I am glad I don't know people like them!  I just wanted to throttle the main character
So slow. It took 100 pages to get to something remotely interesting. I honestly don't understand the hype. What a waste of my life.
Terrible. Plot line seemed interesting in reviews. Reviews way over rated this book & likely sucked more than a few into buying it.
Too dark and depressing. Did not finish-Thought it wud be a great mystery based on reviews however it's darkness was too much
writer is deft but plot is implausible and most uninteresting. i felt i had wasted my time and gave up before the last few chapters
Huge disappointment to me.  I felt everyone in the book was a misfit !  a disfunctional bad guy !  Drugs, sex, etc.  It bored me !
This book was very confusing, not an enjoyable "" summer read"". If you choose to peruse this- you need to take notes along the way.
I died a thousand deaths trying to finish this book. Finally gave up. I needed to watch some mud that was drying! More rewarding!
The only reason I'm reading this is for my book club.  I do not plan to finish this book.  I would never recommend it to anyone.
I don't know how this thing got on the best seller list.  It was awful.  Good thing I got it from the library and didn't buy it!
Boring. I understand any story needs some setup but the story never started. I lost interest  and didn't even finish reading it.
I enjoyed it somewhat but it wasn't as great as I had expected something that was #1 on Best Seller List for several weeks to be
Did not enjoy it.  Kept waiting for the story line to get better and it never did.  For me, personally, it was not a good read.
I expected this to be much better based on the reviews. Poorly written...only finished it as I this was my book club selection.
What a waste of time! If you hated Gone Girl for its blatant manipulation, you will feel similarly about this book.  If possible, it's worse.  The minute I read the comparisons, I should have known better.  Thin and unrealistic plot, no character development and a contrived narrative style, it has no ""there"" there.  None of the characters have any redeeming qualities that would make the reader care what happens.  I wanted to throttle Rachel if she apologized one more time for her drinking binges to the point of blacking out.  The author finally ran out of unpleasant coincidental encounters between the characters, so she had to trump up a particularly unrealistic and gruesome ending just to get the whole thing over with.  I felt like the author was writing solely with a movie deal in mind, which she apparently has accomplished.
I was very disappointed in this novel. It could have been a short story and might have had more impact. Don't waste your time.
I'm an avid reader but I found this book to be slow and difficult to follow. I should've known better  than to buy a thriller.
Thin, repetitive storyline. We've heard this plot before -- but never as poorly executed. The characters, dialogue and premise is a huge cliche. It's sort of like a British Desperate Housewives of classless losers on Blenheim Road -- except the TV show, Desperate Housewives, was inventive, clever and entertaining in its tongue-in-cheek comedy/drama/mystery. Here, everyone on Blenheim Road has a secret ugly scheme.The characters are one dimensional, boring and any reveals are trite and telegraphed long before you read them. Despite the fact that Rachel and Anna constantly and intensely clash throughout the entire book, here's a revelation that Rachel has in the last quarter of the book: ""Something's not right and I can't shake the feeling that it has to with Anna.""  Really? Ya think?? How did this book get so many thousands of 4 & 5-star reviews?? Something's not right -- for sure.
As I was down with a cold and my bookclub picked this book, I began reading it with no expectations or foreknowledge. I finished it in one day. Bleh. Like Gone Girl it left me feeling sullied. It's one remotely acceptable quality is that it keeps you turning pages. If you want a page-turner that has you rolling in sinister characters' minds like a pig in dirt, no, like a vulture in decomposed remains, then go ahead, you'll probably enjoy it. The characters are cliches and we are thrust into their repetitive patterns over and over again. Watching four episodes of Bones back to back instead of this ""fiction fries/junkburger"" would have been culturally enriching by comparison, and certainly far more life-affirming.I despise this trend of no-substance page turners that are becoming bestsellers. Perhaps we shouldn't read a book just because ""oh yes, we've heard of it.
I do not understand the hype about this book, I just didn't like I t.  Oddly enough it is one of the few books I bot retail.
I found the book hard to read as it kept skipping back and forth. It was very dark and not much fun to read - too much work.
I found this to be a very slow tedious read. So much so, that I moved the book from my device. I fo0und it to be quite dull.
Skip itVery slow readI didn't like any of the charactersKept waiting for it to get better and it never did
This book should have been called ""Gone Girl on a Train"" but, believe it or not, Gone Girl is better than this book.
Slow start.  Confusing intro to characters.  Basis for plot could have been so much better.  It was a drudge to get through.
Ridiculous story line.  You keep reading thinking it's going to improve but it doesn't.  Don't waste your money on this one.
This book started out very well and had me hooked. However, the more I got into it, the more of a soap opera it became. Ugh.
A depressed girl lives in a fantasyland, refuses to move on, rides the train everyday, pretends to work, creates a life for some people she sees who lived by her old house. She gets so drunk all the time she has blackout moments. The girl she created a life for goes missing. She inserts herself into the investigation because she has nothing else to do. The whole book goes back and forth between what happened, I'm scared, she acts completely paranoid, and round and round we go. I just wanted the book to get on with it!!  Seriously how many times can we stand to listen to her internal monologue?  Not to mention this book is extremely depressing. Author needs an editor. I got tired of the same drivel that didn't seem to move the story along. And don't even get me started on how pathetic every single woman was portrayed in this book. I think the idea was good but way to slow paced for me.
I would only recommend to those interested in boring, sad mysteries.  It was hard to enjoy without one endearing character.
I tried, I just couldn't get past the first couple of chapters.  usually I love thrillers, but I was less than thrilled....
Had to force myself to continue to read it cause I pad for it. I felt no connection to the main character. Totally boring
This book was worse than a waste of time. Decided to keep reading this inane story due to my own stubborn tendency not to quit books in the middle. My own fault. The protagonist, Rachel, is a complete wing-nut who happens to also be an alcoholic and consciously makes the wrong decision at every opportunity with or without the aid of alcohol. She is impossible to like and her monotonous internal chatter takes up a lot of the story. Sigh. The book is fraught with maddening ""unrealities"", for instance, Rachel survives financially for days and days on a ""tenner"" that her cliche' enabler flatmate, Cathy, loaned her. Really? The enormous plot twist near the end is the kicker that has me writing this review. It was simply ridiculous. I'm left wondering how this book was ever published in the first place, and who are these people giving 4 & 5 star reviews?
I tried out the audible version of this book and only got halfway through. Quite frankly, the characters were unlikeable and a bit pathetic... The plot was very slow to unfold, and the same mundane situations seemed to occur over and over again. I tend to get really caught up in books, but found that this one actually made me feel a bit depressed - not what you want for your commute to and from work!If you want to try out this book, I would suggest reading it instead of listening. One of the issues I faced was that I did not have the patience for the self-pitying character monologue parts, something that could have been redeemed if I was able to skip through to the more exciting 'thriller' scenes. The plot itself has potential and I do wonder how the mystery was going to unfold, but unfortunately I could not continue reading long enough to find out.
nothing. worst book i have read in a long time! terrible prose. stupid and dull. how did this get on a best seller list?
I love a good suspense book. This isn't it. It is 200+ pages of sad, slow diaries of people who are unhappy, one alcoholic, a couple of mentally abusive men and spouses cheating on spouses galore. You don't get any of the good parts, just the sad pitiful parts.  The last 8 pages some action takes place, but otherwise I continued to read hoping that the next page or the next chapter would be better, only to wait for the past chapter to get some suspense. I will not even share this book with anyone as they would look at me questioning why they wasted four hours reading it after I already wasted four hours to find out it was pitiful.The characters are pitiful.  Their choices in life are pitiful. I honestly can't believe anyone would publish this book and feel cheated for buying it.
I had a difficult time finishing this book. It's written as a mystery, and that is the only reason I finished the book-to find out the ending. For me, I found it impossible to like the lead character, Rachel. I couldn't feel sorry for her, couldn't feel any empathy for her, nor did I care about her as I read along. I even felt that way at the end. This is very unusual for me. I found it depressing, and I dis-liked Rachel so much, that I almost put the book down numerous times. It was almost irritating to read about her. This book has been compared to Lost Girl. I can't see it at all. Most of the characters in this book are so miserable, that it was almost painful for me to continue reading. I felt it was a waste of my time, and am glad I didn't recommend it for my book club.
Didn't even want to finish after I started but I did.  Did not like all the jumping around of storyline & characters.
For me it was very boring. Just couldn't get into it. But that being said alot of people I know read it and liked it.
I didn't  fine one redeeming character in this whole book.  If I had a way to cut off my Kendall I would have. Sorry!
Not sure how this ended up on the best seller list. Tough to follow and enjoy. Sorry but bad choice for me this time.
There was not one happy or pleasant moment in this book!  I read for pleasure and it was definitely 100% unpleasant..
I never felt engaged with the characters.  Very disappointed.  I didn't even finish the book, something I rarely do.
Depressing book that goes nowhere. I don't know why so many people ranked it highly. I wouldn't recommend it at all.
I Wouldn't recommend it to anyone. Hi w on earth did this book make the best seller's list???  Utter disappointment.
No depth and very predictable.  If you are stuck in the airport with nothing else to do feel free to read this book.
Confusing narrative. The women were not interesting, just pathetic. Don't know how this got on the best seller list.
I wanted to like it but it just drug on too long! Not enough suspense, and the main character was kind of pathetic.
Hated it.  Stopped reading halfway through.  Same thing over and over again.  She drinks, she gets drunk, boo hoo.
No thanks. Jumps from 3 perspectives and times too frequently. Hard to follow the flow. Little reward at the end.
I to read but had a difficult time getting through this book.  Not sure how it stayed on bestseller list so long,
Depressing .  Not worth my time.  Women portrayed as weak.  Too much violence .  Worse book I have read in years.
A bad romance novel masquerading as a mystery. It's terribly written. It hasn't been well reviewed and no wonder.
Not a lovable character any where in sight!  I was looking for some interesting plot twists or at least some interesting characters.  The plot sounded interesting and intriguing.  I wish I'd left it at just reading the book jacket.The main character is completely unlikable.  I found myself caring less and less about her to the point of nearly not finishing the book.  The ""woe is me"" sad sack storyline compounded by the drunken blackouts just left me not really caring what happens.  I hate to sound unsympathetic because there are definite ways to make flawed characters relatable and sympathetic.  Cheering for the under dog and all that, but this book doesn't do it.If you are looking for intriguing characters and plot twists, look somewhere else.  You will not find it here.
Not worth the read.  Depressing.  Boring..  can not find fourteen words to describe how bad it is.  Bad bad bad
Had high hopes, but I found all the characters unlikeable and depressing.  Had a hard time finishing the book.
This book and Gone Girl were very similar the plots were arduous and at the end I wondered why I had bothered.
It was poorly written and shockingly boring not to mention banal. I believe the author can do better than this
These aren't characters you love to hate - you just hate them. All are terrible people without any redeeming qualities. I find the voice of Anna to be utterly depressing. I'm not really sure why I listened to the whole thing - I blame my head cold and being too tired to find something better. When I fell asleep during passages I didn't bother to go back. Catching up wasn't difficult. Towards the end I fast forwarded, but I should have just turned it off. Apparently 3 different women narrate the book, one who does the male parts. Why didn't they just get a guy? I found her forced deep throated voice to be ridiculous and distracting. If you would like to listen to the bizarre and depressing lives of alcoholics who make one bad decision after another this one is for you. Not my cup of tea.
Just depressing
Not recommended
Was over rated.
Glad I did not pay full price for this book. It was okay but would not recommend to my friends. Dull reading.
No likable characters. No point at all to this story. I did not enjoy one page in this book. Just my opinion.
I am in the camp of ""hated this book."" The plot was good and the way the author structured it, moving from one first-person voice to another, was intriguing, plus some back and forth in time. But to stick with a book I have to have at least some regard for the main character. I had none for Rachel, the principal voice. She was constantly drunk out of her mind and doing terrible things. Who could like that in a person?After reading the first third or so, I forwarded my Kindle to the last 20% just to see what happened. And I was on a cross-country flight where some distracting entertainment would have been welcomed. Just not this one.But I know lots of people who loved the book. Go figure...
did not like it too disjointed.  did not like the writing but still had to find out what happened in the end
I started reading this, but quickly grew bored - I didn't find it thrilling at all.  Just slow and...boring.
There was not a single sympathetic character! After reading 75-80% of the book, I deleted it from my i-pad.
Found this book aggravating and depressing. I always finish books even if I don't enjoy them...not this one
Horrible characters!!  Not one of them had a redeeming characteristic. Pathetic people with pathetic lives.
The subject matter is not to my taste, nor did I think it was well-written.  Obviously I'm in the minority.
Even though the plot was convoluted  it was still predictable. Personally I would not recommend this book.
Found it a bit tedious.  Main character was whiney and repetative.  Could not in all honesty recommend it.
I did not like the plot, the characters, or the endless self analysis.  But, if the purpose was to get inside the confused tormented mind of an alcoholic, or other self addicted indulgent lives of routine pettiness, the author succeeded.  The novel was twice as long as it needed to be and did not flow well, thus drawing the reader into ""muddled mind"".....pure torture that I did not need.  I can not understand how this book gets such good ratings from the masses, which was the only reason I read it.  I could not finish the book even though I was at 80%,,,,,it was like ""groundhog day"", over and over, and over, ....I did not even care who did it, or what happened, I just wanted out of the trap.If you want an enjoyable read, find another book.
Who cares? Not one likable character. A good sedative if you cant sleep. All this for that. No thank you.
Yet another version of an inexplicably popular genre: poorly written books about awful people who do awful things to each other because they're too shallow and too bored to think of anything better to do with their time. Girl on the Train, Gold Finch, Gone Girl, Go Set a Watchman. Why do all these train wrecks start with the letter G? Not because they're good or worth your time to read. Why these books are sometimes grouped with Anthony Doerr's All the Light We Cannot See is beyond me, since Doerr always writes beautifully about worthwhile people and subjects. Kindle keeps recommending books like this for me, I guess because I keep reading them. Addicting, like the booze their protagonists often over consume. No worries, though. Tomorrow I'm going to quit.
I have already completed reading 67 books this calendar year...this book is either the first or second of the yr that I could not, would not, finish...I soldiered through 58pp of ""I'm depressed."" ""I am really depressed."" ""I'm a drunk."" ""My husband is unfaithful.""The author's shifting time frame, or ""unreliable narrative,"" as one blurb so optimistically described this muddle...one chapter jumped ahead 6 months, next goes on in same time frame but the next leaps back 2 years, in addition to the time shifts with the characters' memories and flashbacks within each chapter............UGH...I threw the book under the train!Granted, I'm a guy...but I can enjoy Richard Paul Evans, Mary Higgins Clark, and Elizabeth George. But, for me, Paula Hawkins' train broke down--after an hour it was still in sight of the station!
Failed to keep my interest.  These people were just flat out nuts!  I'm sure the author could do better.
This book has no redeeming qualities. It's premise is silly and sophomoric. To have others call it ""Hitchcockian"" is insulting. Every character in the book is devoid of any thing approaching humanity. From the main characters to the secondary, from the good guys to the bad guys they are alike in that they are all  weak, whiny, disreputable and without any morals or ethics and so boorishly depicted that you simply cannot care about anyone in the story. You quite simply can only hope for a virus to come along early in the story and wipe out everyone involved. The virus would be more interesting and have more ""humanity"" than the people in this novel. If they make this into a movie I hope they add Ebola so I have someone to root for.
The book doesn't go anywhere until 90% through the book.  How did this thing get on a best seller list?
Forget the girl on the train, who is an alcoholic wasteland, every character in this book is a train wreck. They were all so shallow, delusional, two-dimensional and emotionally/psychologically damaged (mostly self-inflicted) that there was no one for me to root for. I literally didn't care about any of them by the end -- or the beginning for that matter. The only reason I continued reading was because, based on all the great reviews this novel received, I thought there must surely be a worthy plot twist or truly incredible climax that I didn't see coming. Sadly, though -- even with the multiple narratives -- by the time I was half finished, I knew where the author was taking the story.One positive note: it's a very quick read.
This book was mentioned on British Television's "" Loose Women"" and I was intrigued. Described  as having a ""slow start"" the reviewer claimed it morphed into a ""page turner"" - I must have missed that piece. Actually it's a huge yawn from start to finish. Cliched one-dimensional, insipid characters, riddled with self- involved angst and dysfunction - a litany of mind-numbing  domestic trivia characterizing their average day. And I thought MY life was dull. Both my mother and sister independently reached the same conclusion - a huge crashing bore of a book, with a pretty obvious Who-Done-It. How it ever got published,  far less became a best seller, astounds me. But I guess idiots like me bought it and put it there.
Book was boring. Took forever and was hard to follow at times. I skipped just to get to the main point
I eagerly anticipated reading this book, especially after all the glowing reviews comparing it to ""Gone Girl"", a book that I literally couldn't put down.  This book was a painfully slow read and certainly not the suspenseful ""page turner"" that it was billed to be.  Based on the positive reviews, I slogged through chapter after boring chapter thinking that the story and pace would surely pick up soon.  The author takes an incredibly LONG time getting to the reveals in the final chapters.  By the time she finally does, I just wasn't interested anymore.  Plus, I found the ending to be too contrived and unbelievable.  For me, this was a dull, tedious, disappointing read all around.  I wish I hadn't wasted my time on it.
This is a self-absorbed, wordy picture of a poor lost soul. I refuse to read beyond this point - done
How was this a best seller?  I hated it. It's dark and depressing, and it made me sick to my stomach.
I am at a loss why everyone is raving about this book and find it ""hard to put down.""  Rachel is exhausting - at first you feel sorry for her and empathize with her, but after about 100 pages of her grasping at her formal life while she is constantly drunk - it gets old really quick.  Anna is a the girl we all hate - loving playing the mistress and enjoying every second of knowing she is stealing a married man.  Megan is just a clingy train wreck, and the men are all portrayed to be scary/sleezy.  Like Gone Girl, there really isn't one character that you can actually like let alone root for.  Halfway through the book I guessed the ending...there is only a handful of characters, so it's not hard to figure out where this is going. Zero twists, worst boring ""suspense"" (I use the term loosely) book....can't believe they are making this into a movie!
I thought it was very boreing, and for me it took over 65% of the book to relate to the characters.
I don't agree with the comparison to Gone Girl. This was far too slow and not nearly as involving.
I didn't care for it and gave it up half way through. I'm not a fan of drinking and adultery....
Another pop novel pandering to the public. Girl Gone wanna be. I'm sorry I even read part of it.
The girl is a weirdo with whom one cannot identify oneself, I would not recommend it to anybody.
I was astonished by the sheer obliqueness of this novel. Having read the rave reviews, I couldn't wait to get my copy of this book. As other reviewers have noted, the character development is nonexistent and none of the characters are at all likable or believable. Hawkins is not a bad writer, at least stylistically, but reviewers' comparisons of her to Flynn have me baffled. Gillian Flynn's Gone Girl was far better written and cleverly executed than this banal offering. If you want a well written mystery from the last year, I would read Ng's Everything I Never Told You, which is a much more thought provoking and interesting read (and not coincidentally, one of Amazon's best books of the year).
Could not finish it. Can't figure out why it was number 1 for so long. It's a puzzlement to me.
This was a terrible book, very boring.  Can't believe it made number 1 on the best seller list.
Holy cow.  What a morose book.  Granted, I didn't know much about the plot.  Just heard it was a thriller and read some small blurb about it and look at all the people that are raving about it!  Kind of thought it would be more like Rear Window.  A great gripping sort of mystery novel.  It wasn't.  Not at all.  I did not like, Rachel, the main character.  She got on my nerves PDQ.  In fact, I didn't much like any of the characters.  I feel like I have to go read something else just to get this one out of my system.  I know this won't go over well with some of you wordsmiths but, all I have to say is, yuck.
Tried to enjoy the book but it was too slow and felt formulaic about 5 chapters into the story
I just couldn't get into it.  It is rare that I don't finish a book, but this was one of them.
Over hyped book.  Boring.  Very hard read.  Only finished it because I paid good money for it!
I just wanna know more about the red headed dude on the train.  He gave me the feels. Lol ugh
I did not like any of the characters! I forced myself to finish reading it....don't know why.
I thought it was a very boring book.  It seemed to move so slowly.  I finally gave up on it.
I really wanted to love this book, but couldn't find a single character worth caring about.
I was very disappointed with this book. I don't know how this book got such great reviews ?
no one in the book club enjoyed the book.  it was very disjointed  We all rated it a 1 star
It was awful. The alcoholic girl was beyond tedious.Thin plot poorly developed.
I had to read this book for a book club and found it painful to finish. While the writing was decent the story-line was unrealistic. I felt the author used Rachel's blackouts as a crutch to get from one chapter to the next without cohesively tying the story together. As well, none of the characters of the book are likeable. Rachel, the main character, is the least likable because she is either blacking out from alcohol or making stupid decisions when she's sober that leave nothing endearing about her. The rest of the characters seem forced and lack any likable characteristics. I recommend saving your time and finding another novel. And spare your book club!!
whining characters can't believe this was on new york times best sellers list. Boring.....
Dragged on. Prefer British authors who can throw a bit of humor & irony into their plots.
Ok if you want to read about dysfunctional people with absolutely no redeeming qualities.
It's not difficult to write a book when the main character is an alcoholic.  You can avoid character development and ensure that the main character is one dimensional.  In fact, all the characters lacked depth and it was a meaningless book filled with repetition.  You don't have to write very much when  the main character is drunk; you can use the same words and vary them a bit which the author did throughout the book.  It was absolutely boring and a poor excuse for a novel.  Although it can be used as an exercise on how to write a novel using very few words and varying them so you can tell a story.  I'd like to know how this became a bestseller.
I won't review the plot because I hate it when reviewers do that.  You all know the gist of the story.  As I was reading it I was thinking Gone Girl again and I guess many others were thinking the same thing.  None (and I mean none) of the characters were in even the slightest way likable.  I finished the book because I wanted to know how the author would bring this to an end, but not because I felt it was a good book.  It was rather painful to read.  All I can say is if you want to read it, go ahead, but for me it wasn't an enjoyable read. It was more, read it because everyone else is, and my book club picked it and now I can say I read it.
slow dimwitted book with less than zero plot. Can believe it is on the best seller list.
I only made it through the free sample and found it so depressing that I could not imagine why anyone would actually buy this book!  And yet, it is very popular.  How can that be?  I saw a woman in a doctor's office reading it and asked her if it got better.  She was almost done with the book and said ""no, it's awful, I kept reading thinking it would get better but it hasn't"".  We bonded over wondering how on earth this book got so popular!  So I told her about the book I did like after reading the sample Nightengale by Kristin Hannah.  Great story and wonderful themes of love, self sacrifice, standing up to evil, and forgiveness.
I picked this up after seeing good reviews and a comparison to Gone Girl (which maybe is not high literature but was a gripping page turner with great twists).  This book fails to measure up .  Too much time is spent at the beginning setting up Rachel's issues (and oh the repetition in that - yes, we get that she's a drunk -- and how many times do we need to read about a fussy baby as ""the baby was grizzling""?), and then, when the story should be reaching its climax, it is rushed and relies on cliches and tired, forced dialogue to wrap up.  I do not recommend.
Started off well enough to buy, but just went on and on until I could have murdered her
Pointless book and not worth reading. No real plot, just a random solution at the end.
Couldn't even finish the book. Didn't hold my interest.Two of my friends felt the same
I cannot believe this is a b est seller. What I joke this days anybody can write books
Sorry, but I don't like the characters or convoluted story line. Waste of time for me.
to compare this to Alfred Hitchcock is total insult to this man who was a great writer
I detested all the characters in this book.  Don't understand how it is a best seller.
The main character is irritating, annoying, lazy, pathetic, and a drunk. This was a terrible book. I thought it was going to be amazing because it was on the best selling lists and it was a total let down.  My husband and I listened to the audiobook on a summer road trip and it was painful.  We have to force ourselves to listen to it to justify my purchase of it.It is not thrilling, not exciting, not mysterious, not well written, simply not good. This is not a thriller if that is what you are expecting. A book is always tough to read when you dislike the main character.I do not recommend this book.
One of the worst books i have read in a long time. Do not waste your time or money. Z
I don't know how this became a number one seller.  Poorly written and hard to follow.
Total waste of time. Cannot understand how it was number one on he best seller list.
One of the silliest books about an alcoholic, a couple of nuts cases and poor theme.
I can't believe how many people gave this book 5 stars!  I thought it was terrible.  My pet peeve is when a book is narrated by different people, yet all of them seem to have the same personality, as is the case in this story.  I think what really disappointed me was that this could have been a good book - I like the premise - but it just did not deliver.  The ""suspense"" never really came across, and the characters are all so flawed that in the end I really did not care what happened or who ""did it.""  Maybe someone will make it into a movie and write a good screenplay...The story has potential.
I was not crazy about this book at all!! I know it's been a best seller for months, but I disliked the characters which didn't make the book an enjoyable read.  I wanted to grab Rachel and tell her to grow up and get on with her life in a positive direction!  I wasn't really surprised about how the story turned out.  I found Rachel to be a complete busy body, who couldn't handle her own life!Maybe I'm just too old to appreciate these type of characters, but I read Gone Girl and thought it was a fantastic book.Mary Klotz
Boring & repetitious. Saw ending coming a mile away. Good maybe for very naive YAs.
Too slow!!!! Depressing!!!, Sorry I wasted my time reading it, it never got better.
40 pages was as far as I could get. Perhaps the worst book I've ever tried to read.
The protagonist isn't the only psycho in this book.  Each one of the main characters is disturbed, their relationships are disturbed.  They criss-cross to the point I needed a score card to keep it all straight.  Each one contradicts him/her self consistently.  It happens within a page or two over and over and ....  Half way through it, I thought:  is there no end to this??  I finally skimmed the last 100 pages or so to get to the confession.  Then I was relieved it was over.  I absolutely do not understand the high reviews.
I do not find books about the abuse of women or abusers a source of entertainment.
this book should have  -0000 STA The worst book, with no plot  ever didn'i finish.
stupid book
This book dragged on, I felt I was on a treadmill.  I quit reading after halfway.
I simply became tired of reading it...it was slow and too much inside her head.
Too much drinking and very depressing,Story could have been told in fewer pages
I do not have words to describe just how much I hated this book. Both narrators are whiny and self-absorbed with virtually no redeeming qualities. Because it had high critical ratings, I kept reading in hopes that there would be some level of redemption for this work at the end. My hopes were dashed -- I had simply squandered two hours of my life with a poor book companion. The mystery is fairly easily resolved by the reader so that we wander in the protagonist's mind while she tries to catch up. The diary style is reminiscent of Gone Girl, but with less interesting characters.
I hated this book.  Don't understand how it rated so highly by so many people.
After chapter 7, I stopped trying to see what so great about this book. Sorry.
After a promising start the plot and characters bog down to predictable trash.
Pedantic, depressing, meandering drivel.  Don't waste your time or your money.
Boring. Could not get interested in it. Girl self-absorbed with her drinking.
Truthfully didn't finish the book. Tried but it was so boring. Went no where.
Not able to get into this book.  Have tried several times but just to boring.
Disappoints on soooo many levels. Grabs you but it's all downhill from there.
I am sorry, but I just couldn't finish the book it was too depressing for me.
Plot was tedious.  Story was mediocre.  Does not deserve to be a best seller.
This book starts out alright, but goes seriously downhill from there, I started skimming through the last two or three chapters just to finish it. I thought I was going to lose it when - in the span of 2 pages - Anna used the words ""in any case"" three times. When Tom confessed, he might as well said the words ""and I would have gotten away with it, if it weren't for ya meddling keeds"" thats how poorly written and thought t out this book became. Wasted precious momnets of my life on this. P.S. Note to author; try making use of a thesaurus next time.
Each chapter seemed to be more of the same. I had a tough time finishing it.
There wasn't one character that I could relate to or even like in this book.  As they all kept hurling toward their combined messed-up end, I just kept hoping they would hurry up and self-destruct so I could forget about all of them.  Total waste of my time.  I had to force myself to finish it as I had paid for it; something I regret now.  I didn't see any comparison to anything Hitchcock  would have touched here. Sorry Paula Hawkins.  I will not be waiting for your next book.
How can you like or care about any of the 4 key characters?! They are so self absorbed. Rachel is a train wreck and reading this book is equivalent to not being able to turn away from looking at a horrible wreck and when it is out of sight, a range of feelings may remain with you but would you recommend the scene to others? I can't. Perhaps creating a sense of voyeurism was the author's intent and the editor's goal and they succeeded.  However the pace is too slow and it isn't a surprise ending for an ex-wife and a wife to align against an evil husband.
After reading this book, I felt like I needed mouthwash to get the bad taste out.  It is hard to become invested in a novel where the characters range from pathetic to despicable. Do I cheer for the psychotic alcoholic, the miserable mistress, or the child killer,  as they relate to the sex addicted liars in their lives?  Wow.  Just who I want to spend a couple of hours with. I should have gotten off at the first station and taken a bus to anywhere.  At least this book had a happy ending,( I guess)....justice for somebody, revenge for the misbegotten.
Junk!  Didn't finish.  There are so many wonderful books to read this type.
This book just went in circles. I couldn't even bring myself to finish it.
I thought it was a lousy novel. I can't believe it was rated no.1 so long.
A middle-class, British version of the Jerry Springer show, in novel form.
Too many dysfunctional characters in this book.  There was no one to like.
Ugh. Although it started out on an interesting premise it quickly descended into a made for tv or straight to video movie audition. Plods along with such predictability that I had to keep reading because I could not believe ir would go there...but go there it did. Unlikable characters that became more ridiculous and one dimensional as the story plodded to it's predictable and unfortunately boring conclusion. It's too bad. The writing isn't terrible but the beginning promised far more than the book delivered. Sorry I wasted time on this one.
A typical mystery novel with unlikeable characters and very poor writing.
I really don't understand all the hype.  I struggled to finish this book.
Utterly pathetic characters, in a dreary setting, with a monotonous plot.
...lets be honest: women are still only really valued for two things-their looks and their role as mothers. I'm not beautiful and I can't have kids, so what does that make me? Worthless."" This line was when the book went downhill for me. I couldn't get on board w the female characters. Any of them. They were so wrapped up in their their warped sense of selves and each of them needed men to define their worth. I'm not a podium touting feminist, but these characters are so sad and pathetic that I didn't care about any of them.
could not get into the plot.  stopped reading it 1/4 of the way through.
I DID NOT LIKE THIS BOOK AT ALL. ONE OF THE WORST BOOKS I HAVE EVER READ
What a huge disappointment. I can't imagine why this is such best seller
improbably and unbelievably dysfunctional characters with bizarre story.
There are six main characters in this story. Five are totally unlikeable. I don't know how many times I wanted to put this book down. The story is told by three women from alternative perspectives. The three women characters are weak, whining, and reckless. Two of the males are self-indulgent, bombastic, and manipulative. ""I'm sorry,"" but Rachel's character, emotions, and actions are pathetic; give her another bottle. This is English literature at its worst. The plot is fairly predictable. Read something else instead.
I didn't like this novel at all. Had to force myself to get through it.
There was not one likable character in the book....I need at least one.
I am still trying to determine how this made any best seller list - I found this to be a dreary and depressing book, extremely slow paced and repetitive. In the future I will rely more on the other reader's reviews, than books that somehow make it to a ""best"" selling list. An unfortunate waste of my money and time.  I had to purchase a ""light hearted"" mystery book just to clear the cobwebs in my head from this.  negative 2 stars.
I didn't like this book on several levels.  None of the three main female characters were in the least likeable--all unemployed self absorbed whiners; by mid-book I was hoping they would all be victims of a serial killer.  After the murderer is revealed, it's (I won't say he or she) character is somewhat hamhandedly portrayed.  I finished it by skimming through a lot of the tedious dialogue.  Can't believe there's talk of making it into a movie.  I did like the premise of the voyeuristic train ride, but that's about it.
Ridiculous plot. Not one character is slightly likable or interesting.
I don't get what the hype was. I thought it was dark, slow and boring.
Would not want to have any of the characters as friends. Boring people
I've heard a lot of people say that they love this book, so I thought I'd give it a try. I didn't think the description on the dust jacket was a very accurate description... the main character is too drunk too often to be likable, and her obsessions are more annoying than thought provoking.I did not find any of the characters likable, largely because it seems the author focuses more on what the characters do rather than on who they are. That's a fine line to walk, and I don't think Ms. Hawkins walked it well.
Not the best book I have read ,iteresting at times but also confusing
This book was a big disappointment to me.  I had trouble keeping track of which character was speaking.  The main plot seemed to tell about a girl who drank so much that she lost a bit more of herself with each day.  She may have witnessed a murder, and seemed compelled to solve it, which was futile because her memory was so impaired.  Sadly, I gave up after wading through about 60% of the book. (I know, the plot finally gets to the point, and I quit too soon!). Sorry to have wasted my time on this mess.
I must say I was very disappointed for a book heralded as a ""thriller."" I found this book very difficult to follow with the constant switching of 1st person narratives. And the day to day mishaps of a drunk was very laborious. Of the 323 pages only the last 30 or so were mildly ""exciting."" From the midpoint of the book on, I just kept saying ""please get to the point!!""  Others who had read it and saw me reading it would say ""hang in there, it will come together in the end."" Not my idea of  ""thriller.""  I absolutely don't understand the rave reviews, while respecting differences of opinions. Unfortunately ""buying"" the book myself adds to the undeserved hype.
I couldn't find a single character to like...makes for a long book!
Gripping but depressing.  Wish I hadn't wasted the time to read it.
tried so many times to read this book, just couldnt make it happen.
this was one of few listed best seller books I would not recommend,
An overhyped boring not so interesting story. I would not recommend
This book was really disappointing. After I read it, and I did finish it hoping that there would be some exciting twist or redeeming revelation, I felt like I had watched a subpar movie on Lifetime. The constant droning of the main character grew tiresome, the plot never really took off, and the ending was somewhat predictable. I will not recommend it to my friends and am surprised it has gotten so many high reviews.
I had a really hard time with this book. The switch between the characters at difficult time lines was my problem. I ended up making notes on what character was doing what and at what time. When I finally finished the book I decided it was not worth the read. Maybe if I read it again I'd like it better, but I can't get the original reading hours back and don't want to invest any more. Maybe the ladies liked it better. It has great ratings so a lot of people obviously like it, just not me.
The character Rachel was pathetic and not in a pitiful way in which should she could at least elicit sympathy.  She was so thoroughly annoying and stupid that I didn't even finish reading the book.  I neither understand all the glowing reviews, nor why it's being made into a movie.  I'm  glad I'll never see the movie because I care as much for Emily Blunt as an actress as I did the character Rachel in this book.
Terrible attempt at a ""thriller""/ ""mystery"" novel.
not worth the paper it's written on .......a nothing nowhere book
A horrible book. I don't know why it is on the best sellers list.
It was shallow and predictable - didn't care for the book at all.
Did  not  like  it  made  no  sense  read  about  half  of  it .
I still can't seem to finish it.  Very repetitive and boring ---
I don't understand what the hype is about this book. Prior to reading this book, I had read several reviews that it is comparable to Gone Girl, an excellent book, so I was really excited to read it. It is in no way similar to Gone Girl. The characters are completely pathetic, the pace is extremely slow and the outcome was predictable. Two other ladies read this book with me and all three of us have the same consensus that this book was a waste of time and totally boring.
stupid book. can't believe it is still on the best seller list.
The narration was trite and maudlin; couldn't hold my interest.
I liked it very much.  It held my interest all the way through.
Not a very exciting or entertaining novel, slow paced and dull.
This book was horrid. You have a fat woman on a bus who is drunk all the time & may or may not have seen something that happened to a woman- she doenst know because she was so plastered. She doesnt work, and harrasses her ex-husband with phone calls. It is affront to feminists everywhere that this book has such hollow, languid, uninteresting & stupid (I might as well just come out and say it) women in it. I expected better from a book that is ""a best seller"".
Terribly written, predictable plot. Do not recommend this book
I don't even know where to start. There's not a single decent character. All three female characters are self absorbed train wrecks. There was nothing redeemable about any of them. Attempts were made to explain their horrific life choices and behaviors through their past traumas, and yet, you still dislike them and remain unsympathetic. The male characters were frightening and abusive. Unfortunately, there is not one good thing I can say about this book.
it is horrible I have tried to read in many times but no goo.
Ugh.  Boring. Went back and forth too much. Lost its flavor.
It's not good at all.  The story keeps repeating it's self.
not as good as described by the critics, quite disappointed
thought it would be spell binding,  a little hard to follow
Save it for a very hot day on the beach= otherwise skip it.
I hate stupid whiny people and just pain in the ass people are deplorable too! . None of these people seemed to have a good heart or a kindness in their soul. Boring,selfish, whiny,pathetic and on and on and on. God, at the end I din't care who did it. But maybe he/she could do them all in and the pain of hearing them through the rest of the book would be gone.I felt so sorry for their friends and family who had to deal with all of them!
Not nearly as suspenseful as Gone Girl and I don't like Gone Girl either.  But this book is so bad there is no empathizing with characters, and no suspense either.  An alcoholic woman makes you cringe with her terrible decisions, she is really stupid.  The book is slow and only livens up at the very end which is unsatisfying.  No woman could really make such dumb mistakes and she shows no common sense when threatened with violence......
I read this book quickly because I didn't like any of the characters and wanted to get away from them.  (Book club choice).  The narrator is alcoholic and not very smart and the others are mean and vindictive, why spend your time with them?  One part could have made a good story but it's passed over quickly.  Much better books out there as far as I'm concerned.
The ladies in my book club liked it well enough, but I thought it was very predictable and I absolutely HATE reading about stupid women - in this case there were FOUR! Not a single female in this book seemed to have half a brain or the wherewithal to stand up for the things they ""said"" they believed in. Not to mention the men - they were pretty much all jerks in one form or another with no moral compass whatsoever among them!
What a depressing book full of really funky characters....
gave up after reading 30%; extremely repetitive and boring
Felt like I was in the mind of a delusional drunken woman.
This book had such a slow start. I found it to be boring.
I am still reading.  I do not like the way it is written.
I thought the book was boring and would not recommend it.
Very diappointing...and disgusting......BEST SELLER..?.??
No storyWaiting for the shoe to drop it never did.
Story is boring and rambling.  I did not finish reading.
It was pure torture to wade through. Would not recommend
Cannot believe it has been number 1 on the reading list.
I am not finished but just had to see if anyone else felt the way I do about the book.  I am about 65% complete........It is so slow moving, and depressing.  I will never read another book by the author.  I do not understand at all how this book has ben on the best seller list for so long.I guess I am still going to finish it because I am so far into it.  But it is hard to pick it up and read when it is so SLOW.
Unbelievable that this poorly written, very amateurish book, is being compared to Gone Girl. What an insult to the author of the skillfully-written page-turner Gone Girl! The depressed and self-pitying women in this book all sound exactly alike! Hard to get through it. Badly done!
Did not like, would not buy another book by this author
One of the worst books I have read in a long time !!!!!
Not very likeable characters to spend so much time with
Very, Very overrated. NOT worthy of best seller status.
A tale of dreary, boring people (women, not GIRLS) leading miserable lives.  I'm about half way through and am not enjoying it.  Not sure if I'll bother to finish - so far, I don't care what happens to any of these one dimensional  characters. Not as bad as Gone Girl, though.Now that I'm really thinking about this over-hyped  waste-of-money, I've decided that it goes into the give-away pile today.
How this book got on the best seller list and is still on it as of Memorial Day is quite a mystery to me.  It was one of the most depressing and dullest book l have ever read.  I kept saying to myself that it has to get better, but it doesn't.  I had little enough sense to read it to the end.  What a waste of my time!  Maxmontgomery
Half way through and couldn't finish, very depressing.
It was okay but very predictable.  Wouldn't recommend.
I really tried to like this book, but I found the plot weak and the story horribly and painfully elongated by a drunk' s blackouts and unreliable memory. We are told that blackouts occur because no memory is created and then suddenly the drunk remembers again. Predictable ending even with the weak introduction of the red haired stranger. How did this book get such reviews? What a waste of reading time.
Hated it!  Comparison to Hitchcock is insulting.  If you like drunks that black out again and again and AGAIN and guess what ""I can't remember"", taking forever to get a story told, this book is for you.  It took patience to get to the end because it was the same thing over and over and anyone could guess the end.  Kept on reading waiting for this book to stand up to the reviews-it didn't..
After reading about halfway through this tedious novel I gave up and jumped to the last 20 pages to find out who killed whom. The excessive wordiness and the slow pace of the book caused me to lose interest after the first 50 pages. I forced myself to read further because it's popularity suggested that I must be missing something of value in this book but I was mistaken. It was a waste of my time.
I quit reading it half-way thru, and I NEVER do that!
Very slow read, really could not get into it. Boring.
Writing/story line seemed annoyingly overly dramatic.
Started it. Depressing. Haven't finished it because the idea of a divorced, out of work woman who just can't get it together was sort of a downer. I wish I could get past that part to the mystery, but it just drags on too long. . .Spent way too much on the pre-order, Not worth the hype and I can't imagine how they are going to make a decent movie out of this.  Pass for something by John Grisham!
thought it would be an interesting perspective of a young gal who has to ride the train to better herself rather than the alcoholic who rides the train to drink ......yes, its a narrative of someone is the downward spiral of drinking but that was soooooo not what i was thinking it would be ....i was hoping for an introspective of an anonymous person on a train rather than someone who needs AA!
Found the book to be a struggle and was glad when I finished it.  Following the lead character (Rachel) was exhausting with her alcohol problems. The author left out some answers to questions that I had in my mind:  who tipped the police about human remains buried in the garden?  What eventually happened to Scott and Anna?Would not recommend this book to any of my book reading friends.
This book is made up of a cast of awful characters largely doing awful things. It's a promising story that takes too long to unfold and ultimately is unsatisfying.With that said, if you are a new reading or are looking for a lazy beach/vacation read and enjoy the likes of dan brown you may appreciate this page turner...otherwise there are literally hundreds of better books to be had.
Ugh.  So silly and stupid and superficial and cheap.
Hated The girl on the train,  didn't even finish it.
What's all the hype? The plot isn't even believable!
I did not like it at all . I couldn't even finish it
Worst book I've read in a long time . Annoying !!!!!
Worst book i ever read. Didn't get half way thru it.
After waiting for months on the library list for this popular book, I am totally disappointed.  Even as a standard mystery, this misses the standard.  The characters are unappealing and poorly drawn, the plot is questionable at best, and any claim for good descriptions or scene creation are not valid.  I am truly perplexed as to why others have found this book worthy of recommendation.
Bought this book based on the reviews.  Kept on reading it thinking it would get better but after more than half way through I gave it up..  I really don't get why this book is popular.  Psychological thriller... you got to be kidding.  It's just page after page of personal rambling by two self obsessed characters.  I did not care about the characters and the plot was flimsy at best.
Quite possibly the most disappointing book I have read in a long time. There was not one likable character. The plot was derivitive and slow. Really overall nothing like Gone, Girl. Whoever made that comparison is congratulated purely on selling books because he/she must be dealing with a storm of poor reviews from smart readers who see through the scam or were duped by it, like me.
After reading so many positive reviews, I purchased The Girl on the Train.  Big mistake!  Miserable main character living a miserable life equals a miserable book. And the other characters weren't any better.  Always an optimist, I kept reading it hoping it would get better but by the time I got to the end, I didn't really care who did what to whom.  (Apologies to the author.)
Can't believe this is so high on best seller list.
Too convoluted and boring till the last 100 pages.
Not at all what I expected. A big disappointment .
Author writes three good chapters and then goes astray.  I felt like she stalled out, the editor called with a deadline, and she wrote anything she had to just to polish it off. Characters were unrelatable and the plot strayed into the Not-Even-B-Movie territory.  If it gets made into a movie, it will star some silly alleged actress who was on a reality TV show for 3 months.
I couldn't believe how difficult it would be to relate to the characters and how simplistic they are. All have plenty of complaints. All are bored and boring. They entertain themselves by obsessing. Their sentiments are postcard exercise in banality.The only thing that kept me going was how bad they were getting and curiosity of how much more annoying could they get.
Really awful, don't waste your time on this book.
Disliked the characters and story was predictable
This book was very disappointing. I don't know what all the fuss is about. Every character is totally disfunctional. The book is a mess of broken, deceiptful relationships. The plot is weak. I figured out who the killer was a long way out from the end. There are so many other great books out there.
There is not a character in this book with any redeeming qualities.  Each one is vile and self absorbed.  Cathy was a good person. But, she was made to look weak for all her kindness.  I feel saddened and somewhat violated after having read the book and getting involved in these pathetic people's lives.  I kept hoping for redemption but there was none to be found.
It reminded readers of ""Gone Girl"" so I should have known better as I really did not like that book, but I took the chance and read most of ""Girl on the Train"" which I struggled through hoping it would finally get better.  It never did and I gave up without finishing the book something I try never to do, but it just wasn't worth anymore of my time.
This book was not as great as the hype.  I never connected with any of the characters.  Usually I root for at least one of the people in the book but I could have cared less about any of them.  The storyline dragged and wasn't interesting at all. I only kept reading because I always hoped it would get better but unfortunately it never did.  Don't waste your time.
unlikely scenario,flawed heroine---a dismal read
I didn't care for the style of writing and story
As hard as I tried to want to like this story, it just became more and more depressing, disappointing and irritating with each turn of the page. The title is great, if only the story lived up to it. The characters, especially Rachel, were twits spinning around a hard to believe lame story. I kept hoping it would get better, alas, it is a trainwreck of a tale.
I'm about 3/4 of the way through and am not liking the book at all.  I'll update when finished, but I dislike this book enough I can't resist posting something about it.  Utterly unlikeable characters.  There's nobody that I like enough to root for and the characters all make such ridiculous, stupid decisions that they all deserve whatever happens to them.Update:Finished now and my opinion hasn't changed.  Predictable, unsatisfying ending.  Characters remained thoroughly unlikeable from beginning to end.
Never finished it. Just didn't hold my interest
Dull. Save your money.  A waste of time to read
I did like any of the characters in this book.  I felt that they were all so needy, winey and uninteresting.  I could not wait to finish the book.  I knew something was going to happen but could not figure it out until close to the end. I could not understand why the husband Tom put up with Rachel like he did.  I definitely would not recommend this book.
I thought the story dragged and was not interesting.  I also felt the structure of the way the story was told was hard to follow.  I am an avid reader and this is the first one star review I have ever given.  How this got to number one on the best seller list is a real head scratcher.
Audible: Extremely slow .. I don't know if the extremely slow pace is specific to the writing or the readers voice.  I barely listened to Disc 1 - switched to the last Disc to listen to ending.  So slow it made me anxious.  IF you are used to fast paced mysteries then this is not for you ... if you are a Dickens reader then this might just be the ticket
For the love of god!!! Rachel is too pathetic for words. I could not get through the book because the characters were so whiney and pitiful. Megan, Rachel, Anna, all of them! Such a waste of money. I couldn't get over how annoyed I was by them. If you want to read about a worthless drunk who is totally consumed by her own self pity this book is for you.
I see mine is the 35,109th review Phew ! Here goes .It seems many people have made comparisons with the book and Alfred Hitch cocks masterfully suspenseful  Rear Window (  based on a short story by  Cornell Woolrich ) .Whether or not Paula Hawkins was inspired by them am not sure , but to be fair , she seems to have made a decent effort to create something  a bit different .From her commuter train to "" work "" Rachel Watson  witnesses a couple from the patio of a  terraced  house no 23 Blenheim Road  embracing and kissing .An innocuous enough event,  but a prelude to a  murder mystery  that gets our protagonist involved  trying to solve and drinking more  in the process it seems . I found her  character interesting and  complicated  by circumstances - a drinking problem , dismissed from her job and separated, but plenty of time to spare to try out her sleuthing skills.. .So far so good . However that's where the story begins to unravel as  the writer flits between the key players and their partners as  suspects or victims .  ..This approach , though interesting and rather  clever , doesn't work for me .The plot as a result  becomes rather disjointed  , consequently forcing the reader to try and figure who is what and where in the scheme of things .It becomes a distraction and breaks any tension or suspense the writer is might be  trying to develop.The climax where she confronts the villain is rather melodramatic with a conveniently located corkscrew as her concealed  weapon of defence.Certainly though  there is a mystery there is not the Hitchcock  , Du Maurier or Polankski type of tension and suspense that I'm more familiar and which have come to expect .Frankly very disappointing. Hopefully the film version will be able to deliver where the book came short  Frankly  iI doubt it somehow . .
I flipped through the pages to find out what happens but I didn't like the characters at all.  If someone told me how it ended I would not have felt the need to read the story through.
Terrible story, similar to the psychotic heroine in 'Gone Girl'; waste of time to read!!!
I didn't read this, but bought it for my wife. She's a prolific reader with good taste (well...she's my wife) so I listen to her opinions when I'm hungry for my next read. She said this one was just ""boring."" The plot took was slow to develop and when it did, was unexciting. ""Just another murder."" She struggled to finish it, saying ""...the last quarter was OK if you make it that far.
Let me just say I HATED IT,  I do not understand the attention this book received.  I found the  main character such a loser so unsympathetic that I couldn't finish the book and that's unusual for me.
Couldn't finish it. Probably my fault.
Not worth the time or effort to read through this confusing tale.
Overrated!  Not as bad as Gone Girl but close.
Boring - Sorry but I don't see the attraction.
Boring
boring
One of the worse books  in long time ; sorry  I spent time to read to end.  Several others in the common residence where I live said same thing.  It should have been titled ""The Alcoholic Idiot on the Train  Who Couldn't Mind Her own Business.  Haven't heard anyone who thought it deserved to be #  !  on best book list.  Sorry, sorry, sorry
While presented as a psychological thriller, the characters are all low-lifes with not a hero in the bunch. There's the drunk with many pages devoted to conveniently-timed blackouts and drunk texting and several women with no self-esteem who repeatedly make poor and predictable choices. A who-done-it, but any of the creeps could have done it.
No plot. Hard to follow. Subject matter weak!
Characters were confusing. Who was with whom?
I chose this book based on its 5 star rating which I am totally surprised by, now that I have completed the book. I found the characters unlikeable, the story very disjointed and generally difficult to read and follow. Disappointing to say the least. Would not recommend.
I only read part of this book, because I found the perceptions of this disfunctional young woman boring and irritating.  She just went on and on about nothing but her own miserable existence and a need to imagine the lives of others.  I do not want to hear about the woes of losers who have the brains to do well and support themselves.
Just like ""Gone Girl""...I initially couldn't put it down, hated the ending, and then was sorry I wasted time & money.  Most of the characters had no redeeming qualities and the main character was really a loser.  Usually it's nice to care about at least one character in a book!  If you want to read it get if from the library!
Mediocre novel at best.  Not worth the hype.
I  spent money for this???Very disapointing.
Dreary  as a bad dream on a cold foggy morning. At first interesting, it develops in a difficult to follow narrative, with three voices of three not very pleasant women with many problems.The mystery of what happened in Rachel's drunken blackout is intriguing, but nothing can cancel the sensation of unsparing blackness and despair of the lives of persons who abusse others and are abused. Rachel's fairy tale of Jess and Jason, the fancy names she gives to couple she sees from the train, is cruelly broken by reality and murderIIn In a way, this is also a whodunit, with a deludsed alcoholic who plays Nancy Drew prying into lives of perfect strangers. You'll never guess the culprit, whose reveal is followed by a grisly finale. Decidedly depressing. this is a book I won't read again, nor recommend.
The first half of the book put me to sleep.
Boring.  Don't know why it's a best seller.
I could not finish it. Not my kind of book!
I was bored reading it and quit reading it!
Hugely disappointing, given all the hype...
Pretty close to the worst book I ever read.
The story of a sad,, alcoholic, fat,  woman, wasting her life, pining away about a man she lost and  fantasizing. on a train, about how wonderful her life would be if she had him back, only to discover he was not so great after all.  Some people would enjoy reading this book for some sadistic reason, but not this reader.
I do not get all the fuss about this book. I should have read more reviews before purchasing.  It is boring, the characters are all unlikeable, and the suspense ho-hum. I stuck with it for awhile, but realized I was wasting my time, so have not and will not finish.  This is not even close to this year's ""Gone Girl.
Very disappointed.  I had the 'who done it' solved mid-way through the book. The chapters are told from the view of one of the 3 female characters- Rachel, Megan or Anne - and jumps in time frame. The author does NOT develop any of the characters so they are all shallow.  Don't understand how it made the best sellers list.
Characters are not only flat but unsympathetic. There is no one for a reader to identify with or root for, so why would a reader care? Worse than Gone Girl, and that was pretty bad in the same way.Having multiple narrators could have been very effective, but not when every one of them is so dull and unlikeable.
The most boring ... Predictable book ever. No character development. Rachel just started to get on my last nerves towards the middle of the book. Anna was just plain annoying. Megan was a lost soul. Paula Hawkins is no Gillian Flynn. Highly disappointed.
I hated this book!  The characters were very flat, and oddly similar. None of them were relatable!  It was like a really bad version of Gone Girl, but not nearly as interesting. Not a page turner, and I figured out all the plot points early on. If I didn't have to read this for book club I would have stopped reading it.
Did not like and would not even finish it.
Just ok. Don't know why it's a bestseller.
Lots of hype, but for me, did not deliver.
Difficult read. The book started out slow and floundered to the end. The story line bounced all over the place and the story lines did not match up. I dragged myself all the way to the end hoping/thinking it might get better. Sadly it never did. With so many excellent reads out there, I would not recommend this book.
This is the worst book ever!! Terrible, awful, confusing as hell!! I don't get what all the hubbub is about this book!! Is was nowhere near how good the book Gone Girl was!!! Now that was a super suspenseful satisfying read.  This was just boring and sooooo confusing!!! I hated this book, don't waste ur time or $$$$$
Sorry I wasted my time reading this book!  I kept waiting and waiting for something to happen - and it finally did in the last few chapters.  However, it wasn't enough to make reading this book worthwhile.  Don't know what all the hype is about with this book.  I've heard the same response as mine from other people.
I hated this book. Absolutely hated it. It was an attempt to out-do ""Gone Girl"" in meanness, and it almost succeeded. Not one person I have spoken to actually liked or enjoyed this book, any of its characters or even the story. Don't bother.
Didn't Finish it.  Couldn't get involved.
Did not like this book.  Just pods along.
I just don't care about these characters.
Probably the worst book I have ever read.
There isn't one character in here that was likable. And the key points are repeated so often it gets annoying. I was waiting for an exciting twist, but it never happened. I think this one is trying to be like Gone Girl, but it doesn't come close. And I prefer to read a story with at least one likable character.
This was madness in it's truest form.  I thought it was a waste of time reading this depictionof an alcoholic and her inebriated state of affairs and delusions.Don't waste your money as there are too many good stories out there to read.Sorry Paula Hawkins, surely you can do better than this.
Horrible ending. So many great reviews for a book that totally falls flat at the end. A waste of my money I could have gotten a better book, I chose this one because the plot seemed good but after I finished reading it I thought it was so stupid. Not a suspenseful book or a thriller it really is a soft book.
The characters in this book all are hysteric neurotics,none of whom you can identify with.The literary device of beginning with a murder and then switching back and forth with the characters is interesting at first, but eventually tiresome adding unnecessarily to the interminable length of this saga.
I could not get into this book. Gave up.
Never met such dysfunctional characters!
very slow moving and depressing to boot.
I couldn't wait to read this book because I had heard so much about it.  However, I was very disappointed and thought it was a miserable book.  There was not a likable character in the whole mess.  The women were weak and the men cruel.  Don't waste your time with so many other wonderful books out there.
I could not wait for this book to end. It is a very slow read. The main character is constantly ""blacking out"" and mis-remembering events, making her untrustworthy and annoying. 90% of the book is leading up to the discovery of the murderer and the ending doesn't make up for the slow buildup.
This was a poorly written piece of trash. I cannot understand how it could be on the New York Times best seller list. The only possible explanation is that there are a lot of twisted disfunctional people out there who read books. Yikes
95% Awful. The constant drinking. The Peeping Tom qualities. The insinuating yourself into people's lives. How did she pay rent? Where did she go all day pretending she had a life? Why didn't her roommate kick her out long ago? The last 5% was amazing. Twists and turns. Irony of the corkscrew death.
I could not get into it.  Long, boring.
Confusing. Struggled to get through it.
Overrated the most simple book ever !!!
Just not my kind of novel.  Very soapy.
book had lack of purpose and meaning...
sorry for this awful reveiw but to me the story was about 3 neurotic women. the first a neurotic alcoholic, the second-a neurotic nymphomaniac and the third was just neurotic.Frankly it was a waste of my time but i had to read for a book club. One out of eight of us ""liked"" it.
Not nearly as entertaining as Gone Girl. It moves too slowly, so much so that it is easy to put down and pick back up almost as an afterthought. It should have been edited to a shorter length. Too much repetition and attempted foreshortening that didn't really work very well. Very disappointing
I was very disappointed right from the beginning of this book.Aside from being immature, it was long and dragged out with tales repeated throughout. The only reason I finished reading this, by skimming over most pages was to see if I was right on who the killer was. And sure enough I was right!
First, I would like to point out that I've never taken the time to write a negative book review.  However, I feel compelled to speak up.  My advice: please don't waste your time.  I think ""The Girl on the Train"" tried to copy ""Gone Girl"" but it just didn't work.  First of all, the book went ON and ON about the main character Rachel Watson and her drinking problem.  TONS of pointless details. WHO CARES? Rachel's character was not even remotely likable.  She was lazy and rolled in self pity.  To be fair, ALL of the characters were miserable people- it wasn't just Rachel.  How can you write a book without ONE likable character? What's the point?  (I've asked several friends how they felt about the characters and got the same response that ""they were all miserable people). In what universe is this book a best seller?I could in theory live with the miserable characters and copycat theme (things did get a little more interesting after I had listened to about 75% of the book). HOWEVER, just as I was getting slightly interested in the characters and plot- there was a line in the book that was SO OFFENSIVE to me.  I can't remember the exact wording, but when Tom Watson was speaking to Rachael at the end of the book, he said something to the effect of ""you're like one of those abused and neglected dogs that comes back after a beating with its tail wagging..."". WTF??????SERIOUSLY? That is a terrible thing to say and a horrible comparison.  What sane person would even think to say something like that?  People can defend themselves, people have free will and can make choices (example: Rachel Watson is a lazy drunk, Anna Watson is selfish, Meghan Hippwell is irresponsible, and Tom Watson is a sociopath).  Animals on the other hand, are defenseless. It was such a flippant remark.I read and listen to a LOT of books.  I honestly can't remember EVER being ""offended"" by a book until now. So, congratulations Paula Hawkins (if an overwhelming feeling of repulsion is what you were going for....you succeeded).  Not that she will ever read this- but what would make me feel better is if she would donate part of her book sales to an animal charity.In sum- I would recommend reading this book if you enjoy hearing the sound of nails on a chalkboard.
The story begins with thirty-something old Rachel commuting her way from a London suburb into town, via train. While on her train commutes Rachel likes to look outside the window and give factitious lives to those whom she sees. A couple in particular stand out, this couple lives down the street from Rachel's previous home, but due to them not moving in until after she moved she does not know the couple. She decided to name the female Jess and the male Jason.Rachel is an alcoholic and has split from her husband, Tom. Even though Tom still occupies the home they previously shared together, now living with his new wife Anna and baby daughter, Rachel still clings on to her feelings for Tom. Later in the story it is revealed that Tom actually had an affair with Anna whilst still being married to Rachel. It is also revealed that one of the reasons for which Rachel began drinking was due to the fact that Tom wanted to have a child, but after many failed attempts Rachel fails to get pregnant. After they split up Rachel moves in with an old friend, Cathy.One afternoon while coming back from work Rachel decides to go see Tom at his home, while drunken. The next day Rachel wakes up in her home not being able to recall anything from the previous night except for that she fell or something as she has injuries to prove so. That day while on her way home Rachel notices that Jess is not outside drinking coffee as she usually does during the mornings. Later, Rachel sees a news article with a picture of Jess stating that she has been missing and that her real name is actually Megan. Rachel notices that the date of Megan's disappearance and Rachel's visit to Tom coincide, making her wonder whether or not she might have seen something while she was drunk.The story also being told from Megan's point of view, gives more details of her life. One of the many things she talks about has to do with her history of being unfaithful to her husband, whose real name is revealed to be Scott. Scott, now overzealous due to Megan's affair, is very paranoid about who she does things with and what. To reassure her husband Megan begins to see a therapist, Kamal, with whom she later also has an affair with.On the days before Megan's disappearance, Rachel spots Kamal kissing Megan, while Scott wasn't home. As soon as Rachel learns about Megan's disappearance she decides to finally meet Scott in person, she meets him and when he asks her who she was she tells him she knew Megan, but she really did not. Rachel tells Scott about what she saw with Kamal and Megan, immediately thinking of Kamal as a suspect. Afterwards, Scott tells the police what Rachel told him, but due to previous altercations between Anna and her they do not believe her.Rachel feeling guilty about Megan's disappearance decides to look into what had happened on that night while she was drunk and how she happened to end up injured. She decides to ask Tom, but he tells her she was awfully drunk and must have tripped or something. Not believing him she decides not to give up, and starts to sober up and stop drinking.Megan's body is later found in a nearby wooded area, the autopsy performed on her body revealing that she was pregnant. Rachel starts to figure out that many of the things that Tom has told her are lies, deciding not to keep quiet she tells Anna. Anna already suspicious of her husband after finding Megan's phone in his gym bag, lets Rachel talk, but doesn't necessarily believe her. Confronting Tom, it is revealed that he had had an affair with Megan and that when she told him the news, he didn't want Anna to find out, taking care of the situation. Tom now holds Rachel in his home, not wanting to let her go, knowing that if she leaves he will be arrested. Later, Tom confesses to hitting Rachel after she drunkenly saw Megan in his car. He states that Megan coaxed him into taking responsibility of their child or she would end up telling Anna about their affair. Tom seeing no options, he hits her with a rock killing her. Rachel now seeing an opening, runs out of the house only for Tom to catch up to her immediately. Tom is about to kill Rachel, when Anna appears helping Rachel kill him with a corkscrew. The police arrive and clear Rachel and Anna of Tom's murder, justifying it as self-defense.
The plot was stong, but every single character including the victim were utterly detestable. Dragged myself through to the end, but would have been better to rename it Girl Under the train and have the protagonist throw herself there in the first chapter. Would have been less painful to read.
I kept reading this book to the end, thinking it would get better at some point.  It didn't.  I was unable to develop empathy for the shallow characters, who were not sufficiently developed for me to care what happened to them.
The book was a complete waste of time.
One of the worst books I've ever read.
That was a long, boring, and drawn out book. It was so unrealistic and not relatable. The main character gets involved in a murder mystery for the reason of being obsessed with people she doesn't know... She was an idiotic main character. It will be too soon I'd Hawkins writes another book.
Girl on a train, was a tough one to read. I was so confused. I only have the opportunity to read a few minutes at a time and every time I picked it up I was totally confused.  The main character, was not likable. Friends loved the book. I tried to read it twice however twice was enough.
Wasn't expecting to read the ramblings of a self-pitying, falling-down, black-out drunk.  Got 25% read when I chided myself for wasting that much time on the dribble.  Worst book I ever partially read. With a digital book I don't even get the satisfaction of sending it to the landfill.
The Girl on the Train is a very hard read. I'm finding it very difficult to get through the book. I know it has received great reviews, but I am unable to  agree. Very confusing and uninteresting. I have discussed this with book with many people and most of them feel the same as I do.
If you like nihilism, a boring book of maudlin descriptions, negative perspectives on life, people who can't hardly get out of bed to do anything constructive, etc. then you'll like this book. I was unable to finish it.The positive reviews are a mystery to me.
Ok book but not one I would recommend
Sorry thought it was slow and boring.
This book held my attention with a surprise ending. For that I give it one star. However, it seemed to make abuse of women a common thing and the women were made to feel that they somehow deserved it and kept coming back for more. I hated that part of it. Also the foul language.
I can't understand why the folks on CBC radio praised this book so highly. I found it very boring and repetitive.  Over and over again we hear that the main character was drunk again and can't remember what happened that night and she does some foolish actions that annoy others.
I generally don't read mysteries, but wanted a beach read. Read it in two days;that's the best thing about this book.The pain is over quickly. Could not be invested in the female characters. They bored me. And the mystery is due to drunken blackouts? Cheap stunt. Waste of time.
Far too wordy for me. I wanted to scream ""Get to the point!"" I bought this copy for my brother, who put it down after the second chapter.It was described as a story like Rear Window, which raised my expectations, only have them crashing with great disappointment.
Sure, there's a twist, but it's not that groundbreaking or shocking. As another review mentions, the main character is unlikable and unrealistic. The whole book ends up grating on you. I stuck with it for the supposed big twist at the end and I wish I could have my time back.
Too depressing. Not what I expected.
Boring.  Just could not get into it.
Ugh. Plodding and full of self pity.
Boring!!!  The first 2/3 of this story is repetitive, introducing characters without any redeeming traits.  Lots of vomit and drunken happenings if you like that sort of stuff.  Story grew more interesting when there was some consecutive interaction between/among characters.
This book came up as recommended reading if you liked GONE GIRL.. wow... I am shocked. This book had no depth. It was slow. The plot was boring. I am amazed at the high star reviews. I normally don't review a book.. but this one was so bad, I felt the need. Save your money.
Why did I keep reading about an alcoholic caught in a  predictable melodrama with a predictable ending.  After reading about half the book I skipped to the end.  My prediction was correct.  If repeated descriptions of alcoholic misery appeal, this book will not disappoint.
while I never got around to reading Gone Girl , The girl on the Train gets a one star from me, just so much drizzle, boring read no surprises , the story line was so lame, sadly I'll only remember this joke of a read the next time I'm on a train In London , brutal , yukkkk
I didn't find this book thrilling at all, and I specifically read it because it was billed as a ""thriller "". I didn't like any of the characters so never identified with them and didn't care what happened to them. And the book in general is not written very well.
Really didn't like this story. Had to force myself to keep reading. Jumping all over the place with the characters. Could not feel compassion for the main character. wasn't  believeable. Reminded me of ""Gone Girl""  which I also hated for many of the same reasons.
I don't know why this book is a bestseller. The story and characters are depressing and the writing is without finesse. All of the male characters are ultimately unsavory people or much worse.  I finished reading it in the hope that it would get better but it never did.
Not worth the read. Too depressing.
I hated this book on so many levels
I don't care for the author at all.
Depressing from first to last page.
Was very disappointed by the book.  Found all of the major characters totally unlikable.  Reading about people who make messes of their lives is boring.  There are too many really good books out there.  I would recommend readers not waste their time reading this one.
Apparently everyone loves this book but I thought it was depressing. I didn't form a connectoin with any of the characters and the main character was just depressing and pathetic. day in and day out, just hearing about all of her issues was not entertainment to me
I seriously think that this book is an utter waste of time. The whole book is about a lady who has completely no control over her life and has just lost it. Its quite disgusting to read stuff about such people who are a waste for this economy and world in general.
barely bearable and tedious, the reliance on the deus-ex-machina of ""alcoholic blackouts"" makes this unreadable.i put it aside after 100 pages, which were not worth the time it took to read them.(and 16 THOUSAND reviews of this? how ???)
Don't bother reading this book unless you want to read a boring story about a young alcoholic that rides the train everyday. Her drinking is boring, so is her train ride. This book was compared to Gone Girl, and it does not compare. Slow reading, a waste of time.
This book is trying to be a movie script but wouldn't make a grade B movie. The characters are shallow DNS the plot is manipulative or tries to be. Unfortunately you would have to have sympathy for the characters for it to work. Don't waste your time your money.
for most of bookit was just boring
I wish I could get that time back.
The worst book I have read in ages
While I was very interested in the beginning by the train setting and premise, I was soon bored by the shallow characters, both underdeveloped and without any redeeming qualities. I finished the book, but I don't recommend it. The one star is for the beginning.
Solving the mystery (of who killed Megan), was compelling and moved me to finish the book. The characters were shallow and especially the women were all portrayed as victims, used by men and unable to make mature decisions. Overall, this book was disappointing.
We only read a few chapters and it was so disconnected , we quit!  Avid readers, my wife reads to me every afternoon at 1700 while we enjoy a glass, or so, of wine and savor a good story and/or mystery. This one never got started and was not worth the effort.
I can usually read any kind of book but I just could not get into this one.  Maybe it is more understandable later on, but I read about half of it and did not understand who was whom, who as crazy, who was real....do not understand all the hype for this book.
I did not care for the book.  Reading the first few chapters, I wasn't sure if the author was talking about one character or two. There was so much jumping from character to character and time frame to time frame, that it became a distraction from the story.
I was disappointed in this book.  The writing was dull, repetitive, and without literary merit.  The characters were unlikeable and boring, especially Rachel, the main character.  The ending was predictable.  In fact, ""boring"" describes his novel.
Did not care for the story at all
Boring to tears. I gave up on it.
Depressing and none too thrilling
Totally and Completely Disappointed. Main character is completely and utterly annoying and unlikable. Did not even finish it, which I never do with books. Had high hopes for this book and it failed to deliver. NOT a book I will recommend to anyone, ever.
The tedium of most of this book was never justified by a skillful climax.  Three largely interchangeable male-identified women obsessing about two loser men is beyond tiresome.  It's decades out of date;  even the three POVs sound the same.  Bad,bad,book
Disappointing.  The lead character is unsympathetic.  I forced myself to finish because I don't like to quit on a book. But I have to say, it was only in the final pages that I found ANY kind of satisfaction with the plot, and getting there was a slog.
I did not like the first person narrative chosen for each character. It seemed artificial and contrived. The characters seemed flat, sad, deranged. There were no redeeming qualities in any of them. I wouldn't recommend spending good time on a bad book.
After reading the synopsis of the book, I thought it would be a good read. I was quite disappointed- just couldn't get into the story, it kept jumping around. Finally I gave up and deleted the book. I am an avid reader and it's rare for me to do that.
Unpleasant people and situations
It was way to depressing for me.
Don't like the story, it is slow
A TOTAL waste of time and money!
ughh, tedious and obvious and painfully wrapped in semi-soft language that is so pedestrian you can't believe you've spent time reading.  Unrealistic characters dealing with mortality, murder, adultery, addiction and deceit.  Leave it in the trash
Guys, guys, guys do not buy this book. You will never connect with any of the characters, even the male characters. This book didn't get interesting until I was 80% through it and it was a difficult eighty percent. I would not recommend this book.
This was the most depressing book  ever and I do not recommend this book for anyone.  My niece read this and said she did not like it at all.  Why people like this book is beyond me  I never respond to these reviews but this was not my cup of tea
What a disaster!!! It was picked by somebody for our book club and therefore I was forced to read it. Even after 3 months of plodding thru it, I can't finish it! CANNOT be compared to Gone Girl and a slap to Hitchcock to compare it to his works!!
What a depressing book.  Every character seems to focus their entire lives on sex or alcohol or both.  I mean, there is absolutely zero self control amongst these people.  If you want a book that will just make you feel kinda gross, read this.
Too much rambling on about her alcoholism and not enough about other characters in the book. Would have been okay as a short story. Read this for a book club and we were all disappointed. Nowhere near as good as Gillian Flynn! Disappointing!!!
With all the rave reviews I though this was going to be a great read. It was extremely sad and main character should be in rehab. I didn't realize this is the same author that wrote Gone Girl. I only saw the movie but didn't like that either.
If you like chasing a story line the way you chase in a Vidio game, read this. The writing is disjointed matching today's life styles. Glad I still like historical novels that require cohesion of thought and more than cardboard personalites.
What a boring book.  This takes forever to get started.  It is very ""clever"" in its writing style but this means you have to work harder to follow it, and wade through pages where little happens.  Avoid if you like a good, fun read.
Forget it! Not my type of book.
poorly written - waste of time.
Mixed up to difficult to follow
Baby lust destroys three women!
Ugh!
One would need to have the mindset of preparing for a final to remember all the crazy dates and details of this book.It was also pretty obvious how drunks can be annoying and irritating.I did not care much about this book
I could not get into this book at all. The start was so slow to catch my attention that I gave up.  I am sorry I wasted the money.  Other reviews were very good, so perhaps the story improves, but it took way to long for me so I gave up!
The plot of this book is like a hamster-wheel, going around and around to no real purpose. The characters are obnoxious, and seem to catch each other's lousy neuroses. I did manage to finish it, but I'm sorry I read it. It has no depth.
I should have waited for the movie version so that I could not watch the movie.... I am not sure why I finished reading this book. ALL of the characters were unlikeable, actually I found myself hating all the characters... I was hoping that they would all do each other in suicide pact.... If you have some time to kill and low expectations pick another book. This was no Gone Girl...
Predictable and a bit mundane.
Too boring. Never finished it.
Poorly written. Don't bother!!
300-ish pages to say not much.
Tedious, vet disappointing. Jl
Much as I thought it impossible, this book is even worse than ""Gone Girl""!  Neither of the books deserved the attention accorded them. They are definitely not great literary works.  Obviously I did not like the book one bit.
If I could have given this book less than 1 star I would have.  EVERY character is so unlikable.  Not sure why I continued to read it, except that I convinced myself that it had to get better.  I was wrong!  Complete waste of time.
This was a big, ol' hot mess in my opinion. Nothing Hitchockian about it.  Had there been but one likable character in it, I might have given it two stars.  I couldn't wait to get to the end, which was unsurprisingly unsatisfying.
The protagonist is an alcoholic, lying busybody with an overactive imagination.  There is not one character who is sympathetic or someone I would  like to know. This book is a total waste of time, it wasn't even that well written.
I'm sorry but I just don't get it. This is a quite dull book. I don't see how people were drawn in to this story. The characters are products of their own bad choices. Depressing, hopeless, destructive, and not at all interesting.
Too long. Lots of repetition. I wanted to stop reading long before the end, but decided to plug on for the ""surprise ending."" I guess it was somewhat of a surprise (1 on a scale of 1-10), but not worth the long way there.
Do not recommend. For some strange reason it is a bestseller. It has latched on, I think, to a really great novel with the words 'Girl and Gone' in the title. I found this novel dry as a bone, and not at all entertaining to read.
This book is so poorly written I can not believe it was a best seller and do not recommend it to anyone .3 silly witless abused women and 2 violent men.The most abused person in the book?... is the person reading it.
I did not like it. I found it frustrating and contrived.A friend asked if I had read it. She is half way through it and said she is not going to bother finishing it.
A story of a drunken woman whom lost her life, lost her husband and end up as low as any alcoholic could go, i really cannot feel any sympathy toward the main character, the pacing is slow, predictable and a total waste of time
I hated it. . . . very boring
This mixed up story with all it's twists and turns got very old very fast. I could not identify with a single character, thank heavens, and I got tired of all the verbiage regarding what they were thinking. Not worth reading.
Found the basic concept uninteresting. Heroine! boring and unbelievable. No interest in characters. Felt it was written for twitter generation, wanting superficial ,scant depth. Mid way through, more interesting page turner.
What was all the fuss about? I did not like using the inexplicable behavior of the main character to move along the implausible story. ""I know I shouldn't go to see him, I don't know why I am doing this, but hey here I am!
There was not a single good person in this book. They were all flawed. Selfish careless and stupid. It pulled all the right strings and I couldn't put it down til I finished it but I felt bad and cheated when it was done.
This book did not have one sympathetic character in it.  As I read more and more, I became acutely aware that I couldn't care less about anyone in this depressing story. Needless to say, I think it was a waste of time.
I got bored of this quickly.
Skips around a ton. Very frustrating to read but intriguing. It will keep you on awake. It will scare you. Scar you. And then after it's all over-It isn't really even good. Stick to Gillian Flynn for a good tale
I tried twice to read this but couldn't keep the characters straight - too much flipping in time.  A list in an appendix of who was who would have helped.  I finally decided to use my time more wisely on another book
The voice of all the characters seemed to be exactly the same.  I never felt that there was much realism in the plot/character development. And for a book that was supposed to be suspenseful it held little suspense.
I really tried to get into this book but it just didn't not keep my interest at all. I like a book that gets my interest and keeps it. So when there is a low spot in the book it holds my interest and keeps me going.
I did not enjoy reading this book.For me, it dragged too much.  I almost stopped reading it  ( mid-way) but I have aways finished a book,just to satisfy my philosophy of completed reading a new/old book. H.Llewellyn
Read the first quarter of this book and did not like anyone, especially the silly drunk Rachel.  Decided to read the last chapter to see if I even cared.  Read the end and am super glad I'm not wasting anymore time.
LOVED IT - EASY - FAST READING - VERY MUCH LIKE GONE GIRL.  I COULD NOT PUT IT DOWN.  WOKE UP AT 2AM AND STARTED READING THE OTHER NIGHT.  COULD NOT WAIT TO SEE WHO COMMITED THE CRIME.  I PICKED THE WRONG ONE -BARB
Wanted to throw her under the train. She was completely predictable. And you knew she would make the wrong decision at every key moment. Really hated the book.
Probably a great book for some. I found it depressing and boring. Not a complete review because I couldn't finish it. To many good books to read to waste time reading about this girls alcohol and mental problems.
This seemed to take forever to read. The story jumped around from character to character and was very confusing. Finally  realized each person was giving there account of each incidence. I did not enjoy the story
I did not enjoy this book at all.  I only finished it because I am in a book club.  I didn't like the characters at all and had a hard time following the plot.  I really liked Gone Girl but this one is a big NO.
Too disjointed for my taste
Awful- as bad as Girl Gone.
To much hype for this read.
A waste of my reading time.
After hours of tedious reading (was it Rachel or Tom, Anna, the therapist, the red-haired stranger???)  I no longer cared whodunit, and wished all the characters would simply kill themselves and end my misery.
I forced myself to finish this book.  Repetitive, boring, didn't feel a connection to the characters. I loved Gone Girl, but this just didn't interest me.  Hard to figure out how so many gave it 4 or 5 stars.
Long, drawn out, keeps switching characters every chapter. I was lost and didn't really care what happens. Got about half way thru and gave up. Way too much detail not enough going on. Book dragged on and on.
Long, dark, disturbing and boring.  I am not sure why this book is getting such good ratings??  I didn't care about the characters at all.  I just wanted to get to the ending after the first couple chapters.
A depressing and dry read. Amazed I finished it. No entertainment value here, not even an engaging who done it. Just a sickening story of decept and alcoholic delusion. I would not recommend this to anyone.
Hated it.  Reminded me of Gone Girl, which I also hated.  The movie, Gone Girl, was much better than the book.I do not think that what she saw from the train was shocking!!!  Expected much more.
Terrible, hard to follow the characters.  I didn't finish the book, my husband did finish it but didn't like it.  I haven't talked to anyone who did like it.  In fact, I thought it was a rather sick theme.
This book just dragged on and on with seemingly no destination much like her journey on the train.  Very very tiresome .....even the characters were boring and uninteresting  a total waste of my time !!!
Did not care for this book
Dont waist your time...!!!
It was a waste of my time!
Boring and poorly written.
I did not enjoy this book. Though Hawkins writes with a beautiful prose, the structure and storytelling became redundant and stale for me. This was a read I wish I found more thrilling and page turning.
A silly piece of work. The writing is fine but little is required of any of the three narrators. Just pitiful stuff. There's no sense of a big revelation. Not even enough there, there, to feel let down.
This book was horrible. I read 75 to 100 pages of the same rehashing of a girl's problems.  At times I didn't even know what character was what.  I didn't ever finish it and would ask for my money back!
I read this book for my Sept. Book club meeting.I read it in two days because I forced myself to read it. I'm a Calgon take me away book reader and I found this book very "" DARK "" & disturbing.
Hated this book, though I made myself finish it.  The main character is mostly unlikeable, then you pity her.  predictable for the most part.  Cannot fathom the fame and sales that it has accomplished.
Trite and predictable, it was nevertheless a page turner. I don't understand its popularity. I read a great deal of contemporary fiction, always searching for quality writing. I did not find it here.
I thought it was a terrible book. Seems very much like take off from Gone Girl. Most of characters are unlikeable, unrealistic, and uninteresting. Too many good books to read. Don't waste your time
I did not like it at all.
Just couldn't get intonit
Was just not interesting.
Not a good read. Depressing. Only saving grace was that apparently Rachel conquered her Alcoholism .  Me Hawkins is a very ""descriptive"" writer I am certain she must have a good book in her head.
The whole thing was just bad - always having to go in person to speak with someone; always stopping to stare at the house.  Perhaps the characters were supposed to have a 12 year old's mentality.
After reading several chapters I got tired of her complaints, her drinking and her putting herself down, so I never finished the book. To me, the main character, the GIRL was absolutely boring.
Can't imagine that this book is a best seller.It is so dark ,depressing and twisted that I did not enjoy it at all.I did read it to the end giving it another chance to improve but it never did
Horribly hard to follow in the beginning.  Had this book been a loaner, I would have stopped reading by page 20.  Since I bought it, I made myself continue.  Got hooked halfway thru the book.
Ugh....it took everything in me to even get to page 50, at which time I skimmed quickly to the end and wasn't impressed at all.  If you like Gone Girl then you'll like this.  I liked neither.
HATED this book 80% of it. Until the end I hated it and thought it was completely dull. The entire book was about a forgetful drunk. Liked the ending but hated everything else about the book.
What a waste of time. Just plain bad. I have no idea what the hype is about this book but I highly recommend you NOT read this when there are so many other good books out there. Your welcome.
In my opinion, The Girl on the Train is a very dark book.  With the exception of one character, I did not like any of the others.  I only finished it because I don't like giving up on a book.
I never liked the main character .  To much repetition of her getting drunk and not remembering anything  The best part of the book was the last 25 pages, and I almost didn't make it that far
I can't see a single redeeming factor in this book. It is depressing, gloomy, and has , in my opinion,not worth the price nor the time it takes to read. The plot is thin, the characters one sided, and the story trite.
boring and stretched out
I found this book boring
Would not read it again.
Not much of a challenge.
Couldn't even finish it.
Too crazy.  Too unbelievable, and too hard to comprehend. Have to wonder why it was ever a #1 bestseller............or how far my mental abilities have fallen........either a possibility.
it was just an unusual book and the many twists in the story kept one on edge. Also like the fact that the story takes place in England where things are a little different than in the US.
Such an unusual theme.... I truly disliked the main character, who was not only an alcoholic but also lazy, a dreamer and a liar.  How this ever got on a best-seller list is beyond me!
One of the few books that I just couldn't connect with nor finish which happen very seldomnly for me (second time ever).I will probably give it a another try but not this summer.
I did not like this book. The plot was unnecessarily complicated and the characters seemed contrived to me. If you Must read it, check it out at the library and don't waste your money.
Poorly written book. The characters are uninteresting and pathetically repetitive in thoughts and actions. So predictable. I only wish I hadn't wasted my time. Nothing like Gone Girl.
This book had a basic good plot, but it was so tedious, same words over and over, characters unbelievable, and a waste of time.  How has it stayed on the best books list for so long?
I did not like this book.  I do not finish it!  I had to stop reading it!  I never stop reading books.  I always finish them but this book was so bad I could not go on and finish it.
Boring gibberish that may be of interest to victims of abuse but seems a waste of paper and ink or bits and bytes. Book clubs should skip this one and spend the money on better wine!
You'll want a drink, but you'll never want to drink again. Thoroughly depressing. Every character is devoid of ""character.
Couldn't get into it...
Didn't enjoy this read.
Complete waste of time!
awful. Terribly boring.
A somewhat tedious read
It's hard to imgine how this book got published.  However, perhaps there are lessons here.  If you can't write reasonably motivated characters make them alcoholic and borderline schizophrenic so you can put them through all sorts of irrational actions.  Then add a tendency to blackout and lack any memory of what happened as a plot device.  This used to be called not playing fair with the reader.  It actually didn't matter to me because the main characters were so hateful that I would have not been displeased if the author killed all of them and left the contirveded ""mystery"" unsolved.  II struggled to read it all the way through because it was a gift from someone I love. (Just to be clear, the only ""Hitchcockian"" aspect to this far too long novel is that it involves a woman staring from a train, but the brillance of ""Rear Window"" was the claustrophobic feeling created from the single setting. But the character on the train here is fully mobile and the train is just a extraneous device..
The telling of the story in different time frames by different characters was confusing.  The characters did not engender sympathy or empathy.  The story was essentially pointless.
This laughable introspection dithered between boring and sloppy. I would recommend this to no one and am feeling shortchanged that I wasted 2 hours waiting for it to develop. Fan!
I am an avid reader--reading every well written book in all genres. Well obviously I missed something in this book. The customer reviews contributed to the decision to purchase this book. Love of mysteries began when I was a child reading my father's books. Girl on the Train should be entitled ""Girl who missed her train and can't get over it"". This story drags on leaving the reader waiting for the phenomena to take place. It is understandable that soon something will take place that merits all the reviews written. Perhaps her next attempt will be focused on the brief focus on Tim. Sorry but I will wait for the next well written mystery. To be candid the customer reviews always are welcome however I would not care to judge those who enjoyed this book. Something for everyone is welcome and should help all who apply their talent for creating their heartfelt wishes to be shared with all. Keep trying Paula as you have made a good beginning and I am sure there will be more to follow. P J Today
This novel was extremely depressing.  Needed to hear from at least one character with redeeming qualities!  Very much dislike the me...me...me attitude of all of the characters.
I prefer books with dialogue.  This one had none of that, at least for the first couple chapters.  It did not hold my interest and I deleted it from my kindle before finishing.
It was an interesting book but some parts were obscure. It held my attention to the end while Itried to figure out what was going on. The shift in times was confusing at first.
It is hard to recommend a book with a story line that takes too long to develop, with not even one likeable character. Bottom line is it's a depressing, slow moving whodunnit.
The first 100 pages, anyway. That's all I could manage. A miserable story about miserable people. I read fiction to escape. In this case, I had to escape from this awful book.
Waste of time.  Poor read. Jumps round too much.  Trash novel with no redeeming value.  Half way through got readers interest.
I'd give it a zero..but not a choice. Ugh..tortuous read.i don't get what the hype was all about.Poor read. Don't buy ot. Borrow it from some poor soul who paid for it.
The plot started good.... Continued way to long over the same thoughts and feelings of each of the characters.... The material was good for a 30 page book..... Didnt like it.
Sorry I spent my money on this one.  I hate this style of writing.  I'm not wasting my time on it.  On page 50.  ThatsenoughS
Sorry guys...I stopped around halfway... This is the most boring book I have read in a couple years, exacerbated by the British idioms that are foreign to me as an American.
The main character is a weak person that ruins her life because some man left her for another woman. She didn't have any respect for herself. Was a depressing read & boring.
I bought this and hated myself afterwards. I did not like it at all. The girl seemed mentally ill and I did not want to read any more about her or her adventures. I quit it.
By the middle of the book, I was rushing to get it over with.  Didn't care about any of the characters whatsoever.  After reading Gone Girl, this one just felt like a chore.
I  realize all real people are flawed and thus fictional characters should be as well.  However when all the characters in a book are so unlikable it's a bit tedious for me.
Don't waste your time.
did not enjoy the book
Not worth all the hype
A better title would be Three Neurotic Women. Or perhaps, A Miserable Group of Jerks.Rather than getting my money back I wish I could get back the time I wasted reading it.
Too many names brought in at the onset.  Kept going back and forth and became hard to follow.I put it down and started over without success.  Never finished the book.
I think this book is over rated. Found it extremely disappointing. Very slow and just not very interesting. Could hardly force myself to finish it. Very long and drug out.
It was incredibly boring!!  I tried and tried but after about a third of the way through I had to give it up.  The writing was good, the story line depressing and boring.
This was a very hard book to get into. Chapters focus on 3 girls are related to one man.  I just found this a hard read.  It was good at the end but the book was boring.
I really tried to read this book, I had  borrowed from a neighbor who couldn't get past the first pages and I couldn't either.  I tried to plod through but just gave up.
I found it irritating to be stuck chapter after chapter reading about a poor girl who constantly self-medicated and woke up hating herself for not remembering anything.
Lots of adultery and the writing is not awesome. The main character is the queen of stupid choices over and over in the book. I won't ever think about this book again.
No stars actually, hated it.Book was all over the place, depressing and hard to follow.Tried to stay with it, but finally gave up.Yuk, waste of time.
Confusing and violent
Not very well written
Predictable chick lit
I just didn't like it
Didn't like it at all
Boring did not finish
Mankind at its worst.
Extremely over rated.
Boring and monotonous
Really disappointed. I was expecting a good mystery but instead got mired in the ""girl's"" alcoholism and a silly plot with a lukewarm twist.  A waste of time
I disliked all of the characters and especially the main character. Nothing notable or life changing about this book. It is not a mystery, it is a story about abuse
awful book.  i despised the main character.  ""i know I shouldn't do this....blah blah blah.""  And she does.  She's pathetic.  Not one character is likable.
Too much detail and jumping around between women in the book! Strange! Struggled to get through the book! Will closely review her next book before buying! Craig S.
Bought this audio book at Costco. Never did finish it. I got fed up with the alcoholism mentality (kudos to the author for nailing that one!). Not my cup of tea.
Shades of Gone Girl which I tried to get through twice.  I'm trying to get through this book but I'm afraid I'm going to have to put it away.  Waste of my money.
Gone Girl gone wrong. Too much trying to make the book cruel, didn't work out. Waste of time and money for me.....
Very dark story.  Thought it would be great, but really didn't like it.....had to read it to find out ""who done it"", but clearly would not recommend it.
I really hated ""The Girl on the Train"". I guess that if you like Pychos and Alchoholics and Disturbed people with bad writting.....you will love  it!!!!
If you want to read about what it is like to be a chronic drunk and a pathetic loser then this book is for you. I can't believe that it was actually published.
There is not one single character to like in this novel.  They are deceitful but filled with self pity.  Reminded me of Gone Girl which I did not like either.
Would not recommend.
not my type of story
so slow moving it will put you to sleep ... the trailer to this book was really the most exciting part of the whole story ... have given up trying to read it
Poorly written and too drawn out. Each spoke in the same voice.  I kept at it hoping it would improve. Last few pages were best but a long read to get there.
I am, usually, not that negative about a  book I have read, but I could not find anything about THE GIRL ON THE TRAIN that might make the book recommendable.
Was not crazy about it. Hard to follow. The ending was not complete. Felt a lot was unsaid and unanswered. Did not feel anything for any of the characters .
I felt the book was awful. The depressive tone was overwhelming--would have thrown it away if it wasn't on Kindle...deleted it. Could not recommend at all!
This was confusing to read and difficult to follow at times. I eventually decided not to finish the book and put it aside. I don't plan on going back to it
I finished it to know that I tried to find a message, a story, or reason for her writing it ... I found none.  I wouldn't recommend it. However, your call.
Hard to keep up with.  Not a likable character in the book.  I have no idea how it got on the best seller list.  It was difficult to even finish the book.
It was badly written about very uninteresting characters. I didn't really want to finish it, but wanted to see which dislikeable character would survive.
Pitched as British GONE GIRL, but poorly written with a Lifetime movie plot. But I bought it on amazon for under ten bucks, so I can't complain too much.
I'd rather not waste my time reading about uninteresting, simple, damaged people. Recommended for my book club by someone who obviously had not read it!
I thought this was a rip off of Gone Girl, which I also thought had a lame ending. It was a quick beach read, but not something I'd recommend to others.
Made a mistake with this purchase. If you are one of those who loved Gone Girl you will love this book. I did not and I do not care for this one either.
I did not like this book at all. It wasrepetitive and extremely boring.  How many times can an author present a Drunk and don't remember scenario?
Very disappointing.  The story was intriguing until yhe last chapters when the author seemed young to throw in tbe towel and just tell us what to think.
I would not recommend reading this story. The author can write and is very thoughtful but I was so tired to read about a drunk no matter what she did .
The main character is the worst. I just kept hoping she would drink herself to death because of all the pity parties she kept holding for herself. Ugh.
Don't bother, this book is miserable from the beginning. Unlikeable characters with no redeeming qualities; transparent plot, and a predictable ending.
Not enjoyable read.
Boring, predictable
Very disappointing.
Tedious and boring/
This was awful! Where Twilight was a whiny teen narrative, this is a whiny adult narrative. Dreck. I cannot recommend The Girl on the Train to anyone.
I had too much trouble keeping track of the characters and gave up before finishing the whole book. I found the text wordy and rambling. Disappointed.
I read this book for a book club.  I could not finish it; it was so confusing.  I felt like I was reading some kind of a journal from a crazy person.
The ending was predictable due to the lengthy narratives from each person.  I might read something else written by this author....but it is unlikely.
Really good main character was not real smypathetic so was amazed couldnt put down as good  as it gets even rachel was more understandable by the end
Because I've been taught to be honest about things, here it goes for my review of ""The Girl On The Train""  Terrible , terrible and terrible.
Very slow and depressing.  Would not  want to read another like it.  I did not like Gone Girl either so should never have ordered Girl on the Train.
Was the most confusing book I've ever read I did not enjoy it at all it was hard to follow glad I'm through with it was wishing I had my money back
Took to long for the plot to develop. Started to lose interest in continuing the story but hung on til the end. Did not see how was a best seller!
Strange reading about dysfunctional people. Did not like the writing and was disappointed in way it ended. Would not recommend reading this book.
The main character is too pathetic for words and so are the others.  A sloppy drunk earns no empathy. Writing did not measure up to my standards.
This was the most repetitive boring book about a drunk women in a mixed up relationship with several men.  Very overrated and a waste of my time.
I didn't like any of the characters. Couldn't sympathize with any. Almost stopped reading it several times. Finally read through to see who won.
Did not even complete the book.  Too many sentences began with ""I"". Might try to finish it someday as so many people evidently liked it.
I hated this book!
i wasn't a huge fan of this book, I felt that the story was dark and slow to develop with little to hold my interest in any of the characters.
Ugh I was expecting so much more. Boring and not suspenseful and just frustrating to read. Major disappointment for a book I expected to love
I don't want to be inside any of these characters' head!  There are supposed to be different women, but their voices are very much the same.
Figured out ""whodunnit"" pretty quickly.  Not worth the  time it took to read.  I kept hoping for a better ending.  It didn't happen.
The main character is dunk most of the time so her story is mostly ramblings.Kept reading hoping it would get better but it never did.
I thought the story dragged.  It took forever to get to anything that made me want to keep reading and the characters were not sympathetic.
Stayed with it. Wish I hadn't.  Woe is me.  Longest poor me pity party on record and yet no happy ending for anyone, especially the reader.
Did not like at all. Thought it would be great after all the high reviews. Did not like any of the characters and was overall disappointed.
Way too many flashbacks.  Flashbacks are history.  Fiction is supposed to be tense.  I knew what would happen from the beginning.  Yawn.  C
It is the most depressing book I have read. It talks about drinking, love affairs, and depression. I cannot finish reading this awful book.
Too much stereotypical ""woman"" crap for me. Every woman in the book is pretty weak, insecure, & pathetic. I've never in my life wanted a kid, so that whole aspect of the book was alien to me. I can't stand the idea of a woman believing her self-worth is based upon the ability to have a child or not. Now, I'm fully aware that there are many women who with love this book. I was just extremely disappointed & only finished reading it because I promised my friend I would. It's a great book if you enjoy, for lack of a better description, Lifetime channel sort of programming. Not my thing at all. I want my female protagonist to be strong, level-headed, logical, & confident, and not basing her whole existence on how many men desire her or how many kids she can have.
Just an ordinary tale of troubled souls. More boring than anything I have read recently. Better murder mysteries on Dateline and 48 hours.
I can not force myself to finish it.  It is boring and depressing.  I have no idea why it is on the best sellers list - sorry I bought it
A big waste of time.. I wanted to read it since it's becoming a movie. Not an enjoyable read for me. Couldn't find one likable character.
Clever story but the main character, Rachel,  was hopelessly tedious and irksome. Read for a bookclub. Could not wait for it to be OVER .
I didn't care for the book.  It didn't hold together for me.  At times it wasn't clear whose point of view the story was being told from.
This is dumbest book I've ever read,! The reviews on this book were great I wonder who the readers were,or where they came from...
Sad and dark and depressing and finally truly horrifying.  I prefer my entertainment a little more entertaining. Not even a good mystery.
Should've counted how many gin and tonics, bottles of wine the author put in there...I think after the 50th mention, we got the picture.
One of the WORST!
Moves too slowly.
sorry I bought it
Boring narrative.
What a bunch of narcissists.  Western civilization is in trouble if these people and the author represent the 20's and 30's generation.
characters that seem to havee no redemptive qualities--did not care for this book and do  not know why people are making a fuss over it
If you like dark suspenseful novels then this book is perfect for you. I don't like either, I read this for book club and wish I hadn't
Well written, but very disturbing characters whose lives all revolve around sexual encounters.  Only read it because my book choose it.
Beginning very confusing, main character drew no empathy from me, pathetic and weak. Whole book was characters talking in their heads.
Poor character development and every character is so fatally flawed that by the end, you don't feel anything but hate for any of them.
OMG, not sure why people are loving this book, my friend highly recommended it, I was so bored and depressed I almost didn't finish it
Did not enjoy the book very much. One main characters, Rachel, was annoying and hard to like. Would not recommend this book to anyone.
This book was awful.....if you know anyone who suffers from insomnia,recommend this book....2 pages and they will be out like a light.
I read this for my book club.  I was really looking forward to the read because of all the hype it had received.  Huge disappointment.
I can't remember ever being this disappointed in a book.  A very boring at least until the end where it became a bit more interesting.
From beginning to end a sad story of a depressed person. No real point or substance. I felt compelled to finish but even that was sad.
Tries too hard to be mysterious and suspenseful. Long winded and storyline was not believable. Not a good read for fans of gone girl.
I did not care for the book.  After 4 or 5 chapters I found it somewhat confusing and quit reading it.  I thought it very depressing
This story line was predictable and overdone. The main character was Whiney and uninteresting.I would not recommend this book.
I found it hard to keep the ongoing running in of characters straight, especially when I had put the book down and started up again.
I did not like this book.  It had too much going on. I never did find out who the red headed man was;  Too busy  too many characters
Written by a woman, about 3 women and maybe written for a woman.  I'm a man and I'm so sorry I purchased it and read it to the end.
The plot was tedious, filled with unrealistic characters in ridiculous situations. I considered the book a waste of time and money.
Did not enjoy the book.None of the characters were likable or believable.  They were a needy and pathetic cast of characters.
Pretty awful. Started out strong, ended badly. There was no depth or context to this book. Gone Girl readers will be disappointed.
A depressing book filled with dysfunctional characters. Who needs this? Not the sort of subject matter a happy person should seek.
I did not like this book. It jumped around too much, I didn't really care about any of the characters and it seemed to never end.
It's a shallow, ill-written book with no redeeming qualities. Don't waste your time on what seems like a Lifetime movie, at best.
I agree that it's like a drunk alog, depressing and was not drawn into the story. Hard to finnish and then sorry I took the time.
From the girl's point of view but it was boring and I never finished the book because the character just kept ranting on  and on
Mawkish rubbish!
A waste of time.
WARNING!!!  With such an interesting premise, my choice was to buy this book, but about a quarter into the book, I realized purchase was a big mistake.  My expectations were woefully too high or this book is woefully pitiful.  The reviewers that raved about the ""Hitchcockian"" aura apparently understand that concept differently than I; the characters were much too weakly drawn to drive a suspenseful novel.  I agree with other reviewers who point out the constant sexual encounters, the emphasis on the protagonist so weak that any disappointment sent her directly to drunkenness and the dull dialogue that add up to nothing. Save your money and your eyes (or ears) for another read!
I can see Paul Hawkins reading ""Gone Girl"" and saying to herself  ""I can do that"".  Unfortunately she couldn't.
Pretty boring, just didn't pike my reading appetite at all.  Sorry, but I am sure it is only because it is not my kind of book.
Extremely disappointing.  Drinking problem repetitive beyond my patience with an unrealistic resolution.  Story not believable.
Last time I'll buy anything suggested by the NY Times book review...this book sucked, loaned it to a friend, she hated it also
Alcoholics don't know how much they drink..they just drink. The protagonist in this story is a nosy, boring, unemployed drunk.
Bad book, I try to read this book but it was so bad that I left in the page 20.... To many publicity but not a good book .....
It was so difficult to get through this book that I finally read the ending and skipped the last 1/4 of the book.  So Boring!
A good mystery  three women caught in a web of disruption of their lives believing in one man they should never have trusted.
I had trouble keeping up with the characters and the flashbacks to other dates.Probably not a book I would read again.
An example of British low taste and smutty interests. Perhaps making the reader feel lucky after seeing such pathetic lives?
Too depressing.  Too much negativeness! Would not recommend it to anyone. I want to read novels about people who inspire me.
I did not enjoy this book.  The characters were miserable and the story was depressing.  I don't recommend this book at all.
No redeeming value to this book at all. I couldn't wait to get it over with. Wish I hadn't spent hard earned money on this.
The characters in this book were so depressing!  I wouldn't recommend this book as I got depresses just reading about them.
DID NOT like this book at all, boring and running here and there - could not finish it and very disappointed in the story!
Started out so slow. Almost put it down and not finished it. It does pick up in the middle but I really was not impressed.
Don't waste your money. Felt like there were a few chapters missing. Very disappointing read. Again don't waste your money
Very repetitious meaning how many times  are we going to read about Rachel's  drunkeness too shallow not much of a mystery
This is not a book that I would recommend for anyone to buy or read if given as a gift.  It was a total disappointment!!!
I would give this book zero stars. I read it to the end hoping it will get better -- it got worse! A total waste of time.
So glad I finally finished this awful book. Don't see how it made best seller list. Have read much more interesting books
Did not like it
long and boring
Slow and boring
slow and boring
Didn't like it.
sorry I read it
TOO DEPRESSING!
too depressing!
I'm wondering why this has been a best seller for so long. I guess I have missed something. Found it dragging in pla ces
The story line was convoluted, did not think it's ending was fleshed out. I would not recommend this book expected more.
A plot-driven page turner that keeps you reading late into the night but withvery little depth of character or language.
Very slow and depressing. Jumps around a lot. Gets a little better towards the end. I had to force myself to finish it.
Absolutely did not like this book. Hope I can get my money back from Amazon.  I read 1/4 of it and wanted to toss it.
this was unbelievably boring, and horrible characters so I didn't care who did it in the end. Don't waste your time!
Beyond Terrible.  I was ready to jump in front of a train halfway though the book so I would not have to finish it.
really expected more...befuddled logic slow moving story that meandered to nowhere. needed a drink or two to finish
Depressing, confusing, boring. Read half of book and I am putting it down will save it for a day I am more patient.
Too much angst.  Friends said it got really good half way through.  I'm not wasting my time reading all that angst.
I hated every single character in this book. I've never read a book like this before. It really made me depressed.
colossal waste of time.  Right down there with ""Gone Girl"" and ""Goldfinch.""  I want my brain back!
Too confusing for me. Not much substance.  Bad end.  Have to pay more attention than I desire to do.  Didn't like.
For a best seller this book is absolutely awful. It is a chicks only story. If you are a guy, don't buy this book.
was totally bored with this book-can't believe it was ever a best seller-too long, too much repeated detail, etc.
Boring, redundant and depressing. Did not enjoy this book at all. I would not suggest this book to anyone at all.
THE PLOT RIDES THE TRAIN SO MANY TIMES THROUGH THE SAME TERRITORY THAT ONE GETS TO KNOW THE LANDSCAPE INTIMATELY.
I could not get into this book.  I kept trying and found it boring.  All she did was ride the train and complain!
Disappointing.
didn't like it
disappointing.
Very formulaic
Tedious, sorry
This story has a slow start and confusing group of characters but becomes one of those books you can't put down.
I did not care for the book at all and would not recommend it, however others in my book club did like the book.
I didn't like it at all.  It was all I could do to finish it.  Way too disjointed. It isn't even worth one star.
Drags on.  Jumps all over the place. Average writing.  A Gone Girl wannabe. Just did not make the grade for me.
I am not sure I will finish this book. Everyone seems to like it, although I heard the ending is disappointing.
Not sure what marketing firm is spinning this book, but don't fall for the hype.  A Gone Girl wannabe.  No depth of character.  No redeeming factors.  Not even particularly suspenseful.  Starts with little and ends with nothing.  Just another story of dysfunction run amok.
Sorry I ordered it.  It didn't interest me or bring me a story to look forward to reading.  Not my cup of tea!!
I will never get back the couple of hours I spent skimming this awful book.  Ludicrous plot even for fiction.
I have read some favorable reviews, but I, frankly, found it boring, confusing, and dull. I could not finish.
I didn't finish it.  It started in a dark corner and never seemed to get out of it.  I got tired of waiting.
Was almost like reading gone girl. If it wasn't  for the last chapter it wouldn't  even have rated one star.
Don't waste your time, unless you want to read the ramblings of a drunk feeling supremely sorry for herself.
This is just me, but I seriously disliked the characters, and could not get past the first 1/4 of the book.
Confusing boring. Shallow one dementional characters. I kept thinkingIt would get better...got worse.
I did not like this book as it was very confusing which character was talking. It was a slow reading book.
Not an enjoyable read. Psycho book about a psycho girl.  Hello ""Gone Girl""--another waste of time.
Doesn't keep you interested and it becomes confusing by switching back and forth with different characters
Dysfunctional, unlikable characters.  By the end I didn't care who had committed the crime.  Don't bother.
Weird story; modeled a bit on Gone Girl.  Not a likeable character in the book; last 25% is worth reading.
Terrible book
waste of time
Did not enjoy
Not worth it!
Waste of time
Fantastic read- I could not put this down. Wonderfully written page turner and lots of twists and turns.
The book was too long and I didn't really like any of the characters. I just didn't like the book period
Boring.  I read 100 pages and stopped.  It might have gotten better but I just could not read anymore...
It took forever... it could have been written in half the pages...even then it would have been too long.
the characters were all dysfunctional---didn't like the book at all---but did have to finish it---------
I thought it was boring, repetitive, and shallow.  I can't comprehend why it's on the best seller list.
I hated this book! The characters were really unlike able and the whole story was utterly unbelievable!
Boring and redundant, got very tired of reading about the same issues and problems over and over again!
This book was truly depressing.  The main character is an alcoholic and the others are a little wacko.
This book has dark, unlikable characters. Reading it was like surrounding myself with toxic strangers.
Marginally entertaining for an Anglophile, just for details of middle class life in an English suburb.
I disliked so much what I read of this book the despite the good reviews I refused to finish the book!
The writer's intent to confuse the reader about characters was boring to me, unappealing and annoying.
It was hard to follow and dragged on too long.  Needs some editing  I read it through but it was so-so
I found the main character to be desperate and pathetic. She annoyed me every time I turned the page.
poorly written, dysfunctional girl and others in story.  No clue why this got so much positive press!
I found this book confusing - difficult to know who was who - and I quit after about 1/4 of the book.
Too many questions left after reading this.  It's confusing and not very interesting.  Don't bother.
Entertaining. Predictable. I did not think character development was strong but it was an easy read.
The main character is really weird.  The story moves slowly, if at all.  Could not keep my interest.
A long drawn out story with a cast of unpleasant, dysfunctional characters.  Sorry I wasted my time.
I didn't like it.  It was depressing and repetitive; a real downer, so I just gave up on it.  Maybe it just wasn't my cup of tea. Sorry.
i really did not enjoy the book. the characters had few redeeming qualities. don't waste your time!
This book was wonderful. I am going to keep an eye for the authors next book. Couldn't put it down.
Waste of time reading about 3 messed up ""ladies"". The idea was good, but it drug on and on.
Jeez, I couldn't handle the drunk girl. Skipped thru quite a bit, no patience for stumbling around.
This was not a book you couldn't put down unless you needed some sleep. Was very draggy and boring.
One of the most depressing books I have ever read.  I finished but even that was a disappointment.
disappointing, loosely written, too much self-pity, flawed women with too much time on their hands
Unremitting misery is just not appealing to me. I gave it a good try but  couldn't even finish it.
This book is so overwrought, over the top and hysterical that it isn't in any way even believable.
What a dreary story. There was no one to like. Not one positive event.  I did not learn anything.
Possibly one of the worst books I've read...boring and disjointed. I had difficulty finishing it.
Too difficult to follow easily with character changes, times, and days of the week.  Depressing.
The twist at the end in no way made up for this tortuous read.  Overall depressing in every way!
How did it ever hit the best seller list?  It didn't work for me even though I read 40 per cent.
does not make a lot of sense and get pretty annoying at the end
Not my favotite. Read it because everyone else was. A lot like gone girl. Didn't like that one.
Very confusing switches back and forth between characters. Stopped reading it half way through.
Found this book very sad. Very broken and without redemption. Too many vicious lost characters.
Boring waste of time. Characters you don't care about.  Plot is slow, repetitive and plodding.
Most boring useless book that I could not finish it. Put you money on another worthwhile book.
Very depressing book, especially for those with no experience with alcoholics. A real downer.
It was boring, unrealistic and I kept thinking this has got to get better which it never did.
Central character most irritating. Did not live up to all the hype and marketing of the book
Found myself skipping pages and pages hoping to get to the meat of the book. Never happened.
hyped to the hilt  good story but dragged out to the point I coudn't wait until it was over.
Reading this book was akin to treading muddy water, hoping it would get better.  It did not.
I couldn't finish this book.  It was too painful to read, and I didn't like the characters.
I had a hard time getting into the story. I didn't get too far before I stopped reading it.
Boring and very hard to get through...i was expecting something like gone girl.... It's not
It was a crazy book about neurotic people.  The sad characters had no point in their lives.
I really did not enjoy The Girl On The Train..  It was too graphic and depressing to read.
Awful waste of time.  Really cannot think of any redeeming thing to say about this book --
A torturous waste of time! Luckily, I borrowed it for free so didn't lose money on it too.
I found this story most depressing with little reprieve of sadness. I could not finish it.
Enjoyed but was into a few pages before I realized that there were 2different girls input!
had to force myself to keep reading, it was hard to like. it got better toward the middle.
very boring
I didn't finish the book.  couldn't get into it.  Don't know why it's been a best seller.
I highly reccomend you DON'T read this book...extremely slow...no nail biting on this one
Not one sympathetic character, dreary, figured out the ending very close to the beginning
Found it boring. I kept reading expecting something to happen. Nothing exciting ever did.
I was intrigued for the first 20 pages or so, and then the utter monotony of the story dragged on and on.  I even guessed the ending early on.  I couldn't stand the reading the same theme over and over so I skipped the middle of the book, got to the end and Lo' and behold, I was right.  This look is not for the seasoned reader.  It most likely appeals to those who don't read much and are caught up in the hype...and for goodness sakes, this book is not life changing!
Did not like the way In which it was laid out.  Very hard to follow and very very wordy.
Very difficult to follow.  Would not have read this if it wasn't chosen by my book club.
Didn't like.  Thought it was very predictable.  And, thought it makes girls look stupid.
I did not like this book at all.  I read 1/4 of it and decided I couldn't read any more.
Garbage
It just wasn't an easy story to follow and then when you did it wasn't much of a story.
It was confusing in some places.  You had to watch and remember which lady was talking.
kind of made my way thru about 60-70% of book and felt it was time to give it up. . . .
Boring.  I could not get more than one-third through the book because it was so boring.
As poorly written as ""Gone Girl"" with a plot obviously derived from that book.
I thought it was boring. I have friends that absolutely loved it. Gone Girl was great!
could have done the book in two chapters...very dull and boring.....sorry I bought it.
Characters are interesting but it's hard to read about one bad decision after another.
I didn't find any redeeming values in the characters.  More about living the low life.
I stopped reading it about halfway through. What kind of people read this trashy book?
I found the book depressing. My neighbor quit reading it but I made myself finish it.
It was not my favorite....did not care the way it bounced from one person to another.
Very disappointing. All of the characters are so flawed that it was a difficult read
I tried 3 times to read this book.  Depressing and confusing.  I couldn't continue.
I found this book tedious and really didn't care for it, although it WAS different.
Didn't like it, felt dark.  Read about 100 pages, couldn't finish it. Disappointed.
This is in the same vein as 'Gone Girl', which I didn't like either.  A bit trashy.
Not really my cup of tea.  Commuting and drinking while doing so.........who cares!
I did not like this book at all.  There was no point to it.  It dragged on forever.
Boring.  I really got tired of all the drunken blackouts.  I finally gave up on it.
I thought it was slow & plodding.  I gave up reading it after a few early chapters.
A one star rating is generous! Dysfunctional, pathetic characters, poorly contrived plot.
I can't wait for the book to get interesting, supposedly it does 3/4 of the way 😙
Ugh. The protagonist is so annoying I was hoping she'd meet an early demise. None of the characters are likeable, and the main character is the worst. The twists and turns are absurdly obvious and the journey does not make up for it.
I was very disappointed in this book since it was recommended by so many magazines
Terrible!!
Horrible!!
over rated
Just awful
Over rated
Waste of money.  I'm struggling to.get through book ... can't wait for It to.end.
Not one likable or believable character in the whole book. Tedious and pointless.
It all seemed a bit 'jumbled' to me and, all in all, not a very enjoyable read...
A suspenseful tale if you like reading about sick -- really sick --dysfunction..
Didn't like the book at all.  Found it confusing as to who was telling the story
Psychological thriller.....but hard to follow what person was telling her story.
I didn't like any of the characters. I didn't care what happened to any of them.
Did not care for this book.  Was too tough to figure out who was speaking when.
This book drove me crazy.......not as crazy as the primary female, however!! ,,
People making bad choices -- over, and over, and over, and over. Very tiresome.
The characters were troublesome and I had no wish to learn any more about them.
not my kind of book, had to fight to finish it, kepy hoping it would get better
I couldn,t get instrited in it.  I will try again.
I guess my age is showing. Beyond finishing the book I think it was worthless.
I hate rachel, the main character. So insecure, depressed and low self esteem.
Very dark story.  Certainly not a book you would pick up for relaxing reading!
was very suspensful. could not put it down. recommended to famoily and friends
I read about 5 books a month, and this is the only one I would not recommend.
I've tried 3 times to read this. It looks good, but I just can't get into it!
Boring. .unless you like to read about a woman who is a fall down drunk..yuk!
The main character was not likable or believable. Overall pretty frustrating.
Difficult to follow at first. Not great writing. Depressing till last chapter
Enjoyed the book.  Well written. Surprise ending.
Thought it was too confusing.  I'm tired of struggling with Hawkins writing.
I only read 100 pages and that was very hard to do.  Really a waste of money
I thought this book was a waste of paper.  This girl is nuts in my opinion.
Strange dark slow read about dysfunctional people... Would not recommend ;(
Had a little trouble following the story line. However it was a decent read
Very disjointed. Difficult to follow when reading a few chapters at a time.
Awful, dark novel. Who needs to waste time reading about a drunk psychotic?
I stopped reading it about third of way into it. It was way too depressing.
Tiresome. No way does it compare to Gone Girl and I would not recommend it.
A waste of your time!!!! I had high hopes for this book. The premise of the book intrigued me. This book was poorly written and didn't have a clear course. But wait, page 290 changed that. The secrets revealed made the book a page turner. The author finally gave me what I wanted, a book worth reading. I gave it one star but the last thirty pages I give four. Don't waste your time!!!!
I was disappointed in the writing and I expected more from the characters.
So disappointing. Writing was not great and the plot was very predictable.
So boring
Too slow!
I didn't care for the main character at all. Made reading the story hard.
I thought a little slow and drawn out. Could have been done much quicker
Hard to follow the story line.  lDidn't care for the content as a drunk.
Bought this book the other day after anxiously waiting for the price to come down on my wish list. I started it tonight and to tell you the truth I am struggling with it. It is so boring I can barely stay awake. Please tell me there is a good reason not to trash it right now and go on to something more interesting....how would I describe the plot of this book? What plot?
I found it boring and cannot imagine how it received such rave reviews.
Pretentious and boring.  Attempt to paint characters very unsuccessful.
Don't understand how this book got positive reviews. Labored narrative!
I don't like this book.  It's about two sad women making poor choices.
Only read half on a plane trip from England.  Boring.  Try DIsclaimer.
Dull book.  Could not get into it.  Never finished it.  Made no sense!
Not very good.  One-dimensional characters; silly plot; waste of time.
Thriller? I don't think so!  It was all I could do to finish this big bore and the ONLY reason I did was because I paid for it. Not one likable charcter in the entire book. I couldn't have cared less what happened to anyone. Save your money and if you want a real good read that is a thriller, read 'The Silent Wife' - now that's a book I couldn't put down.
I could not get into the book at all maybe I will try at another time
Not well written at all. A very difficult read.Boring actually.
It was confusing, uninteresting, to the extent that  quit reading it.
Overrated. I had figured the mystery out early on. I was disappointed
This book is a morbid and dark travesty of literature. The plot is psychopathic and so insanely twisted that it almost seems like a joke. If this is a joke, it is a very bad one. This book has not only given me nightmares and made me wary of everyone, but it has ensured that I will never touch alcohol in my life. Also, I will never, ever use a corkscrew
Not good..a real struggle to read..wish I would have saved my money!
slow moving, dull, didn't want to waste my time plodding through it.
I couldn't get in to it for some reason, so I have not finished it.
Dull and ponderous.  I finished it but consider it a waste of time.
I didn't even finish the book. It did not hold my attention at all.
Outstanding read! A mystery with a twist...entertaining-provocative
BORING !
Not good
Terrible
I haven't re it yet but my wife loved it and couldn't put it down.
I hated this book. All of the characters are completely unlikable.
Lousy, mechanical writing- d' ont understand the positive reviews.
The girl on the train was an awful waste of time. Boring and dull.
Quite frankly, I never finished the book.  The way the character is depicted in the beginning was just too depressing for me.  I don't mind sad sack characters but I guess I wasn't in the mood for this one after some of the other things I'd been reading.  Friends have told me that I should go back to it but I haven't taken the time yet.
I cannot remember, a while  back, but did not get into it at all.
not very interesting , not a story that I would read or recommend
A series of illogical excerpts based on an unrealistic premise...Total waste of time
Not an enjoyable read, convoluted story.
Like a gray day, not that enjoyable.  Not my style to be honest.
Not what I was expecting.  Lacked character - lackluster, crude.
Slow reading. Needed a chart to keep names in correct placement.
If you want a clinical picture of depression, this is your book.
Could not even get into the first few chapters.  Not recommended
Not as good as I expected it to be but a good read all the same!
Very dark and extremely confusing.  Jumps all over the place....
Very difficult reading.  Most of it didn't make much sense to me
Took all of me to finish this book. Very dull and uninteresting.
It was slow go did not like it. Did not finish the book at all.
I was bored trying to get into it. I gave up after a few tries.
Most irritating  main character in  fiction.  Get a grip, lady.
I'm not sure why everyone likes this book. There isn't one redeeming character and about halfway through I wasn't even interested in finding out the conclusion to the mystery. And when it is finally revealed, the climax is really weak. Comparisons to Good Girl are grossly exaggerated, this book doesn't even come close.
I don't understand how this book received top reviews and stayed as number one on the Best Seller list for so long.  I found it without any redeeming features and only finished it because it was for a Book club.  None of the characters had any values that were admirable.  I put it in a similar category with Gone Girl.
found it hard to believe or sympathize with anyone in the book
Poorly written. Neither a work of literature or entertainment.
An absolute waste of time. I wanted all the characters to die.
Another mystery novel about horrid people doing horrid things.
This book was so dumb. I can't believe it has so many good reviews. Yes, it's not War and Peace- this is a beach read. But seriously- it does backflips to try to make the ending work. The ending is just so convoluted, so ridiculous, so convenient: it is literally the dumbest ending I've ever read. Happy reading!
Very slow and a bit disturbing.  Just not my kind of reading.
I really didn't like this book.  I thought it was depressing.
Really boring story.  Had to force myself to finish the book.
Slow read, took forever to get to the point. Very depressing.
THIS BOOK HAS BEEN NUMBER ONE FOR 4 WEEKS RUNNING, AND I CAN'T MAKE HEADS OR TALES OF IT. I HAVE NO IDEA WHAT'S HAPPENING EXCEPT THAT THE CHARACTER APPEARS TO BE MANIC AND POSSIBLY ALSO HAVE MPD. I HAVE TRIED, AND I  CAN'T READ IT ANY MORE.....MAYBE IT'S ME...I JUST CAN'T FIND ANY COGENT STORY LINE..
This was an extremely depressing book.  There was not one character to root for or admire.  The main character is an alcoholic, wallowing in the miserable life she has made for herself.  The male characters are abusive, the psychiatrist is immoral,  and I just could not wait for the whole thing to be over.
I could not get into the characters and the story.  Oh well.
Poor writing, hated the characters and story, hard to finish
I didn't care for the premise or thecharacters in this book.
Awful. Very slow and repetitive. It was difficult to finish.
I realize this is an acclaimed novel, but I just found it depressing.  I kept trying to find a character to even moderately care about seeing him or her develop, and I just didn't.  For the first time in years, I quit reading before even half finished, just tired of the tired little lives portrayed.
Mind numbing, boring, predictable drivel. Pass on this one.
Found it loathsome. Some people like it, just not my taste.
I thought that I was reading the script of a bad soap opera
Best seller, maybe, but I found it unfinishable.  Disjointed, confusing, unlikable characters, inscrutable plot lines & poor character development of unsympathetic people.  Don't care WHAT Steven King says......excellent writer he may be, but critic he ain't.  Totally disappointing waste of money.
Boring!
Strange
Just ok
Boring.
Boring!
boring!
Tedious
Stinks.
Boring.
No value.  Unlikeable characters.  Very dark and enclosed.
Slow and convoluted.stopped reading half way through book.
Took a long time to get going .  Rather depressing  read .
How did this book make the best seller?  It was pointless.
I couldn't finish reading it because it was so depressing.
Worst book I ever read, couldn't wait until I finished it.
I think the saying ""different strokes for different folks"" applies to me.  I did not like this book at all.  I read reviews of how good it was and bought it.  I found it ghoulish.
I cannot understand why it has been on the best seller list forever!  It is a pure struggle to keep reading.  The only person I know who has read it, told me she was not impressed and didn't care for it.  Her advice, keep reading and pay close attention to the title of each chapter.  Bored!
It was confusing and draggy. I would not recommend at all
It was hard to get into struggled till 60% into the book!
Very depressing novel.  Had to put it down after 20 pages
couldn't get through the bookit was very slow going
Too much like Gone Girl.  Didn't like even one character.
Life is too short to read a book this bad.  I could not wait to finnaly finish it.  There were no redeeming characters and the only reason it was somewhat suspensful was because to ""Girl"" was always drunk and unable to remember anything.  This is time I will be unable to replace.
I don't know why I Finished this book.  I hated the weak characters.  There was not one who had any admirable qualities or showed any strength of character.  This book was a complete waste of time.  I'm a bit ashamed of myself for reading and finishing it.  Don't waste your time on it.
Could never get into the story. I gave up half way thru.
Did not like the main character, found the story foolish
DID  NOT CARE FOR THE STORY LINE.DID NOT HOD MY INTEREST
Confusing in parts of book.  Characters neede more depth
I did not even finish the book, I disliked it that much.
Very disappointOng. I don't see what the hype Was about.
it never caught my interest so I went on to another book
I never finished it, boring to the point of exhaustion .
Didn't read it. Slow beginninging.
Didn't like it.  It was depressing
I didn't enjoy this book. I kept waiting for it to get good, but it never did. I also fail to understand the incessant need to use the f word. It shows poor form and lack of vocabulary. This is a book I cannot recommend and one I'm embarrassed to say I actually read to the end.
Tedious, very clichéd, predictable. Total waste of time
I just did not like the characters or the story at all.
was really chopped up  hard to keep the  people stright
Was not what I expected. since it had received so many good reviews. I did not like the characters They are not people I would care to associate with.. Main character is a drunk who lies,etc. Not my type . Was very disappointed in the book especially because of the reviews!
Really not even 1 star. Ugliest book I have ever read.
Not a very believable story and not very well written.
This book did nothing for me.  The story was not there
OK, a bit odd and slow in parts.
how can people be so dumb as to do what she did??????
Just didn't work for me. Sure helped me get to sleep.
Very depressing story if you like this sort of drama.
I did not like this book - a matter of taste I guess.
I'm really tired of reading about screwed up people!!
Very disappointing. The characters were so messed up.
I did not like this book at all. Very hard to follow.
I didn't finish it because it was so slow and boring.
Figured it out early on.  Main character ridiculous.
Absolutely dismal!  Wish I could give it zero stars.
Could not finish book. Rather depressing and boring.
Tedious and depressing.  Loathed the main character.
This is a story about some not very likable people.
Couldn't put it down. Read it in one day. Very good
was very slow & predictable. Didn't enjoy it at all
Slow, boring and about people I don't want to know.
Boring
Boring
boring
Boring
BORING
Boring
The subject matter was beyond depressing and has shown not redeeming qualities at all so far.  I'm at least 2/3 of the way through the book so I am not sure if I can finish it or not.  I cannot imagine how it has been on the best sellers list so long.
The story takes too long to take off. I was bored.
I didn't like the characters, but cleverly written
What a downer with no redeeming actors in the book
Story jumps around too much.  Hard to get into it.
Too many dysfunctional characters, too depressing.
Such a depressing story. I didn't enjoy this book.
Did not like this book. Would never recommend it.
Thought it was depressing and not very realistic!
Not my favorite book it did not keep my interest.
A waste of time.  Story about very selfish woman.
One of the few books I could not bother finishing
It was depressing and was very slow at the start.
Depressive....didn't read beyond 2nd chapter....
Haven't  finished yet , it moves at a slow pace.
Thought it boring; disjointed & long, drawn out.
I did not needed any of these people in my head.
predictable and the obsession drags on too long.
I read the whole thing it was like a drunk alog.
Although brief, this novel manages to be tedious and repetitive. Fans of Gone Girl will be disappointed--those who disliked Gone Girl will hate it.With massive editing, it could be a decent movie--alas, Hitchcock is long gone.
Loved the book, back & forth about who done it.
ButI could only force myself to read about 1/2
I found the book depressing.  Very predictable
This was a tale of some pathetic inidividuals.
very depressing story. did not like the book.
Tedious. Annoying narrative voice. Overrated.
Did not like book at all. Didn't even finish.
could not keep my interest and hard to follow
This was so boring I couldn't get through it.
It's an acquired taste. Not enjoyable to me.
I did not care for this book at all.  Weird!
Not surprising, except how lame the book was
I just didn't get it. Thought it was boring.
Probably the worst book I read this year.  The characters were so unrelated and pathetic that it was a chore just to turn the page.  Don't waste your time or your money on this trash.  If I could unread it, I would.
One word can describe the plot - confusing.
Not a likable character in the entire book.
Awful.....hated it.....could not finish it.
Very slow start.  Was not my favorite read.
For what it's worth I thought it was stupid
Did not care for how this book was written.
It was a chore to finish reading this book!
Lousy
Way over rated !  Tedious reading at best.
THE most depressing book I've ever read!!!
There was nothing I liked about this book.
I did not like this book!  Too convoluted.
A depressing tale of dysfunctional people.
Didn't like it at all. Very hard to follow
Not enough action until last few chapters.
Not the type of fiction  I enjoy reading.
I couldn't put it down once I started it.
Could get past 30 pages.  Didn't like it.
Very difficult to follow.  No continuity.
This was so bad, I didn't even finish it.
Did not enjoy. Could have been condensed.
Of the hundred Kindle books I have purchased over the past 4 years, this one is truly paralyzingly boring!!! :O(  Like watching paint dry. I finally gave up after 50 pages and put it down FOR GOOD.
Lazy, contrived, read Gone Girl instead.
Underwhelming, Boring and Poorly Written
dreary and depressing; never got started
Really awful- complete waste of money...
No redeeming value to reading this book.
DIDN.T LIKE THIS BOOK, DIDN'T FINISH IT.
Waste of valuable time.
would not recommend for anyone to read.
Hard to follow...didn't like it at all.
Total confusion!!  Would not recommend.
Too many angles and characters for me.
Found it hard to follow and confusing.
It's not what I expect! So depressing!
Don't count me.  I cancelled the order
It is a sad book.  Not much uplifting.
Bit of a Gone Girl clone. Not as good.
Coming soon to a s***ty lifetime movie
Didn't like or relate to any characters. Figured out who done it. Didn't feel it was wrapped up very well. Plot and action were not very believable. Characters were constantly whining.
Hated it! Couldn't wait for it to end
slow reading,not especially realistic
Can't get into the theme of the book.
Disappointing.  I stopped reading it.
A really horrible book on every level
I loved the book couldn't put it down
didn't enjoy it. style was confusing.
I was reading it to my wife. We bailed after 50 pages. ""You want to go on?"" ""Not so much."" Not well written enough to put up w/ the unhappy characters any longer.
Absolutely laborious to read.  Nothing about it said psychological thriller as it as was billed.  I cannot understand how this was given a No. 1 rating on the best seller list.
